File extraction proverbs long

The Diary of Lucifer
by Lucifer











Introduction: Much of the text concerns Babylon and the need for it to be destroyed but this is not the only consideration, for the writing of proverbs is endless and yet never satisfied, and more wisdom is moving towards what is better. The existence of the Elsnon and Enoch is of particular concern to me as well as the restoration of society and the advancement of society, essentially, the purging of foolish lies that hinder a better existence where better things can be taken for granted, is another concern that can be found in the proverbs. That the proverbs do not condemn any other religion should not be surprising, for I have not intended to bring war against another religion, or another nation and wish for truth and reason when approaching such things. The religion of the proverbs is Christianity, and The New Testiment, as well as the Old Testiment, is required to understand some of the proverbs. Islam is not condemned or attacked, and I would be pleased if more would consider the tremendous problems of Babylon and its emergences on Earth when weighing the desire for disparaging another religion, since the proverbs are not designed to serve as a catalyst for disparagement of Islam, and I am of the belief that many people groups are to be praised for the good qualities that they possess.





{The Long Proverbs and Short Proverbs of Lucifer}


Now the standard quality of a person was at least a person is trying to do what is good and moral, although much has moved beyond that, so that it is as if there is no more time for such things. Now the person, at least, clearly trying to do the right thing is human.
(1)
I have heard the story of Martha, and how she cooked the meal that the Judeo-Christian son of God ate with his disciples, and how her older sister cleaned the house, and have produced the proverb of mine that, Martha takes the cake, but she did not bake it. So is the existence of those who understand and have no time for the monotonous waiting and wasteful diligence of those who must prove something by means other than simply understanding and knowing what the truth is, and so we have come to the modern technocracy that is not like Aldous Huxley's Brave New World but is more connected with a form of anarchy and strange thefts that occur where ideas are stolen, or credit is claimed by others, and even awards ignore those who understood far in advance and offered exact answers and directions before the person awarded and credited moved to take what was not made by them, the cake, to then claim no knowledge that they had ever known of who came prior to them, or who invented, understood, and offered the answers, and if it should then be understood by others, the person who offers the 'theory' indeed understands the theory they offer, even to the point of knowledge, and is not merely being impossibly lucky, of course, which would be mathematically impossible, but of course that would go without saying, as is our English expression, in which this collection of mine, my book of theories, or hypothesis, was originally written, in the only language I understand at the time, being the English language, in which I have also written a number of fiction books that also contain many of my theories that are not to be featured in this book, which I imagine will be shorter. I have believed in truth to be found in almost every religion, and if my understanding is correct, I was such a type in my youth as to be shunned by moralizing like-women men on many occassions for what I can only assume are religious reasons, rooted in Christianity, which I ignored, and a reading of the New Testiment might offer some guidance on that subject, only that many seemed to talk about me behind my back, but would not say such things when I was around, the males, at least, and such was my youth, and the type of person I was, a lover of some type, a person interested in computers, a slacker in school, a person who played two musical instruments, a good student later, when I realized the consequences of not studying, and a person who liked to figure things out for myself, ignoring much of what I had been taught, while accepting most of it after I had decided it was right. Given the type of person I am, I had to deal with a type of Christian men when I was younger, sometimes shunning me, and most of them accepting me, and treating me well, and now I must worry about domestic terrorists who seem to be against what I am, so that I can only wonder about North America and whether the RCMP or the FBI can protect us, in ernest, or if we have entered into a floating cloud, a microcosm of dark ages where pockets of terrorism seem to float about my own country, especially, it would seem, during the COVID crises, but even prior to that, and I have wondered about the American Dream, or the North American dream in many ways, and whether it can survive without a boost of funding and resources to law enforcement and federal agencies at a time when domestic terrorism is seeming to become more prevaliant and more violent, especially following the Me Too Movement after which time I personally found myself facing new amounts of unanticipated and unacceptable problems I could not attribute to anything other than the idea that some people believed I was Lucifer, Satan, the Anti-Christ, until I became more educated on domestic terrorism and the problems of a corrupt city where many people seemed to have lost out on the North American dream and the crime rate was high, which has been an influence upon my considerations of North America and the world, and even helped me to value and take for granted more my rights and freedoms in North America, which I believe are not objects for compromise or debate, but are a given to me, to be defended and taken for granted, with gratitude towards those who stand on a wall, prepared to do what must be done, justly and rightly, to protect me. The city I currently reside in has been called both 'little Toronto' and 'little Detroit' but in honesty it is probably more like 'little Chicago' with many aspects to the city and divided into two parts, the more disenfranchised usually residing in the part where the likelyhood of terrorism seems greater. A person who does not easily dispair, perhaps, I have hope for the future, and believe that the North American Dream will survive, but I have come to believe that a stronger support is required to get control of a country that expects to take for granted the basic freedoms and opportunities we have come to expect for every citizen, whether there is the existence of domestic terrorists or not.
(2)
Conciousness, and its levels, and the substantial principles of individuals who are on different levels of conciousness, and the requirement for seperation amongst these groups in some cases when groups on different levels of conciousness cannot exist together, and what the beliefs are for those different groups and what they might understand, and what is required of them, and what different morally, even, they might have, and whether there is any contradiction in morality for other groups, or none, and whether the addition of morality is higher, or sometimes lower, and the finite limitations for variation among groups, based on finite psychology of the nature of humanity, and of course what we are, and not requiring an explanation of origins to arrive at the truth of our present and even our future. The truth then being discovered at different levels, and sometimes not-accessible to some that some might find access to more truth in other areas, and the idea that the truth is then capable of entertaining the whole of humanity, and that there is always more that we do not know, and then there is what might not be perceptible by any human alive, or who will ever live, until a new sentience of humans might emerge. What type of people hold humanity back, are of course those who are not able to tolerate the explorations of others, and these I will place in one category, calling them the Anti-progress sociopaths in our society, not using the term sociopath to refer to the psychological disorder of psychopathy but in my own fashion, meaning anti-social individuals in society, who I believe should not be considered to have the level of 'place' in our society, since they are truly against society in their actions and against the enjoyment of the majority in our society. What religion an Anti-progress sociopath inhabits does not matter, since I do not include religion, but only view religions to be catalysts and vehicles for anti-progress sociopaths to use, and possibly use wrongly, like using a self-defence weapon for murder, or for some purpose that was not intended by the invention. What are the real groups and the real categories? How does our language, the common words we use, lie to us, or distract us from the truth, and what concepts have been introduced that distract us from the truth or lie to us? 

How many times did the children of the devil tempt Him to sin with His mouth, that an evil spirit on Earth might portray Him to be something else than what He was? But where they have tempted Him and tested Him with pressure He survived to lay down His life, the pure lamb and a man who was human, speaking without guile, but truth and the enemy has brought lies to His mouth because of the children of the devil. He spoke truth and good and the Romans put vinegar on His lips and those who came later put lies. So they knew it not. Who He forgives I cannot blame for they have done Him wrong and He has surpassed me. Let one who is tenderly loved by Him offer what he can and give back the truth to those who did not intend to go astray from the literal words of His lips when He avoided their traps. For the woman who is no wife is put away by God if it is so by a man if the man then agrees and attains a certificate of divorce it is then that the break or divorce is made and not prior when a man does not do this thing. The woman is his wife and love is exceedingly patient that it is not an easy thing. For she divorces wisdom before she is put away. Let not the imposter attempt to bring the pure to hell, and drag the Lord’s kingdom down with her to that place of fire and sin. Because of the Lord there is that which never was and the man is keeping then to God, and his wife is another, because he is truly alone, with no wife who truly is for him. But blessed is a faithful woman whose beautiful spirit is preserved in Heaven.


Now then there is the Babtist and the Christ come to Earth to be truly human, and there is Lucifer, the new Lucifer, and not the old who is the devil, and a Satan, being a type of serpent, but the new Lucifer who is a Satan who is commanded by the Christ. Now because my name is Lucifer there is also the test by the works that are committed here, that the test is not for man or woman, and the Lord finds flaw even with his angels, for the long and short proverbs are not to be added to the Bible, either the Old or New Testiment, but are for the giving of wisdom.

A calamitous fool with no understanding has said of foolishness that is impulse, yet it is good strategy. For they make themselves known among the people, and they anger and provoke, that their punishment might be brought upon them, for they sound a horn to proclaim their guilt.

A daughter beloved by her father, consistent and never wayward, beautiful by wisdom with beauty of her youth preserved in heaven, cherished by the Universe, immortal in heaven and a crown of her husband, possessing grace and good gifts, preserving that which would be immortal.

A daughter beloved by her father, consistent and never wayward, beautiful by wisdom with beauty of her youth preserved in heaven, cherished by the Universe, immortal in heaven and a crown of her husband, possessing grace and good gifts, preserving that which would be immortal.

A dog describes a human from themselves, and their mouth is full of projection, for they do not have the means to understand and describe. This is a folly found in Babel.

A dog has put on the clothing of a lion to gather up those who wish to be lions and has taught them the teachings and ways of dogs, to be dogs but insolent and brutal, as if to be strong and mighty.

A dog has put on the clothing of a lion to gather up those who wish to be lions and has taught them the teachings and ways of dogs, to be dogs but insolent and brutal, as if to be strong and mighty. Now some women have wished to be a lioness and not many men are interested in the teachings of the dog-lion, but because some women wished to be a lioness they have listened and learned from the dog-lion.

A dog when it is roaming stray and defending others cannot have a personal problem, for the stray dog is only interested in defending against what is good, that it is human or higher that it defends against, for it defends woman against angel to drive away, but a man defends human against animal that animals have sought to fight back.

A dog when it is roaming stray and defending others cannot have a personal problem, for the stray dog is only interested in defending against what is good, that it is human or higher that it defends against, for it defends woman against angel to drive away, but a man defends human against animal that animals have sought to fight back.

A false flag procures much loyalty, but with knowledge lacking it is hard to see. But the zeolot is given for the purposes of Orgoth that the servant of Orgoth is jelous and honest in a perverse fashion that is not honest, and if he launches something foolish from the hands of his servants than the people, not knowing of him, have been deceived by false flags. Now what is too extreme is losing support and gaining loyalty for the opposite, and if any are with another motivation than they are harbouring wrath and slandering their cause. But wisdom has moved nations, it has toppled mountains, it has exercised the ways of peace and alliance and built up as evil weakens and dies, that there is no wisdom against God, and if the heart is not for it than alternatives are found, for the will of the heart with some is stronger than truth, that the servants of the devil are wanting some blindness, and the strong will of their hearts is against God, but let it not be for injustice unavenged, for if you have not done justice than why do you stand against the blood of your brother or sister? But you go to do right that the kingdom is not divided against itself because loyalty to God has supported any true king or queen that as they are not a traitor you support them in doing what is right that traitors might be defeated from the kingdom in Ria, and let it not be a hard thing to bear if it is difficult to understand. For the throne in Ria, unless it be a traitor, is well with God prevailing, and such is the Universe with people. Now where there is much corruption the land is with multitudes of traitors and trechory that the leader is held hostage, to be made even a mere figure when it has furthered that the devil will wield power as a servant who controls, and yet a greater king or queen than them has returned the kingdom to them. Now the one loving corruption is a traitor to the nation and it’s people and such a spirit is found in Babylon. But truth and justice is driving out Babylon, and corruption is opening the door for it as a possible door.


A feliv is one who believes the propaganda is a representation of the reality and truth, for it seems that many are Felivs and wise exceedingly at a time when most is propaganda, for the strong hand is saying, they these are loosing much ground to gain what little remains, for they control all and go into new areas unknown, for only in reality is it so, and reality is all.

A fool attacks when none accuses, but a man of integrity who is faithful is secure.

A fool attacks when none accuses, but a man of integrity who is faithful is secure.

To be concerned about those more men than David is a concern against the gang of masculinity which devours those who are good. For such a gang is understood without having witnessed them, and they are of Orgoth's servant, but do they emerge and sustain themselves? 

A fool has attempted to cast the citizen born in the country out of the country and the fool is the terrorist and the one they would cast out a most privileged citizen who is of the majority, and this is seeming like person who is not well, even confusing, though they do not think they are alienated from society and reality.

A fool has done much evil and rages when questioned, and this being a belief of persecution, but there can be no insolence where a person is conforming to reality, to truth.

A fool has said, the beauty of innocence has impaired my judgement and so I will be just and please God, that I might punish them more than others, because if they are this innocent than the punishment must be greater.

A fool has said, the beauty of innocence has impaired my judgement and so I will be just and please God, that I might punish them more than others, because if they are this innocent than the punishment must be greater, because I know they are guilty, but my judgement is impaired by their innocence.

A fool has wished to carry out evil so much that they have said, I have no defence or it is small, but the one I hate is unprotected and none will fight with them. But because of lack of knowledge and understanding they have no prudence and the other type is not followed by them, that without understanding they cast their life away, and is it then to be pitied by fools? But they have committed error within them that they believe such about the world, because their foolishness cannot be changed by them. So fools have died and there are those who did not die because of lack of wisdom or morality, but some have died because of the cowardess of a worthless fool and then it is not the fool who killed them, because the fool was not enough for it, but the Universe took them, that their time of being on Earth was over.
A fool is a slanderer of those they hate, but a wise child will sometimes be fair to others in words.

A fool panics and believes everything can be fixed with bullying, and what a low fool it is, but a person of patience has great understanding.

A hasty fool is not grateful, for he will not endure, but his eagerness is short lived and dies with endurance, that his heart is not strong in this, for he buries the Lord’s inheretence under the ground and reaps the wind instead and he waters the ground over it, and he is casting away substance of his own, that he is low and wicked and of a rebellious spirit, that he looks upon evil dealings, suspicious of such to speak disrespect in a degrading fashion, and yet he has not understood better. Now such is a rebellious man and he has turned to self-hatred by his wickedness and sloth, that he might profane and blaspheme God, and be enemy to those who please God.

A jealous older brother to a king is a servant among the people and to the king, but a wise child will incur favour.

A jealous older brother to a king is a servant among the people and to the king, but a wise child will incur favour.

A just father of fairness is not promoting his child doing wrong to others, that here is a wise father, and the beauty of his daughters is in Heaven.

A lion who deserves to die is not better than a dog who is in the way of life, but wisdom is with morality.

A man nagging with Gomorrah combat may not be respected for he is not a man. Now if he is even a soldier of the city he does what no man has ever done since the beginning of time to stoop to a perverse thing that knows no right and wrong, because even a dog is better than him. Now what is continuing as a unich as a servant must be made a unich if he will not cease attempting to slay with guile, for a servant speaks peacefully with grace and wisdom but a wrathful unich is either going to Babylon to be a soldier or to continue with God’s kingdom. Now I am not recommending fighting where there is no battle but Babylonians can go to Babylon for protection that they no longer be undecided and they will be fought after they have joined Babylon for they are not slayn while they are not behind their soldiers to fight with them. But a soldier must be a soldier with Babylon or repent and cast off Babylon, and a true servant who cannot cease attempting to slay with guile because he is a unich, must become a unich. Now none can do the work of the devil to do injustice and say we trick God. But none can trick God and is there not justice done to them? But if you are made slave because you did such injustice and tried to trick God are you not to surrender your wealth to the one you wronged and do their heavy labour? But you are chaotic, unjust and some of you behaving like murderous animals who throw violence in many directions. Now the Earth and the Universe is the Lord’s and the yoke your ideology threw off was not moved for your your ideology and your democracy ideology had no power against God. Now take not that false religion that has no power against God or to change his mind. Now if you say, yet it is our way, than your way is a foolish people who indulge in Gomorrah and tolerate Sodom and welcome ignorance and say God has no right with us but he is a guest and does not judge where we do not permit Him. Now this is the devil’s Jacob who wrestled with God while he is sick and deseased and found with foolishness and injustice. Now who makes themselves rich with filth and sin and stubbornly tells God, yet you may not that we wrestle? But when you speak evil you offer the devil’s judgement and he is the prince of the world and the chief of hell. Now when you do injustice you do the devil’s judgement.

A man who becomes angry when he is jealous is an unstable ground of fire and transgression, but the one with self control is not offending.

A mother of a son of worth is generous and fair to the sons of others, for she is not lacking, but a woman who has born a worthless is pulled down by it.

A nation’s local spy network is finding almost all, and yet when the government is compromised it is a matter of loyalty that by taking only the good you are conquering easily, as if without need for battle.

A passive aggressive man pleads innocence, but a righteous son has blessings.

A person claiming their motives to be beyond the limits of humanity is to be ignored in their explanation, for their actions will determine their motive, because one of these will even claim they did know what they would have to assume or know.

A person of hell is insolent when they speak as if fellow citizens with God’s to His people, because the enemies and war is known, and the hatred of those of hell is understood. For who kills children of God and then speaks peace as if not enemy soldiers? But let an arrow strike their throat and a knife placed into their mouth that the people of God’s do not have hate but it is known that they do even if they deny it.

A person of hell is insolent when they speak as if fellow citizens with God’s to His people, because the enemies and war is known, and the hatred of those of hell is understood. For who kills children of God and then speaks peace as if not enemy soldiers? But let an arrow strike their throat and a knife placed into their mouth that the people of God’s do not have hate but it is known that the devil’s do even if they deny it.

Now it is right to defend the heir by birth, and welcome others if it is to be, but the person who leads and rejects his own people is a thing that is possible in any nation.

A person of rage and jealousy and rage being all their substance when there is no cause, and the wrath of these being all their substance, bears the mark of death on their head, and Beelzebub has taken them already to do all his will.

A person who is God’s cannot please an animal, but both must be people. For the animal is not having morality or integrity, unless it is very small, and it attacks sense of weakness, furious in heart that it is believed to be person, for it is animal and wanting to be animal.

A person who is God’s cannot please an animal, but both must be people. For the animal is not having morality or integrity, unless it is very small, and it attacks sense of weakness, furious in heart that it is believed to be person, for it is animal and wanting to be animal.

A prudent person will do nothing when they do not know, but fools will die, and do not want knowledge.
A rebellious man who speaks blasphamy has a wicked fire in his mouth, for his heart cries out from the depths of hell, and yet he says, you think you are better, in accusation, and yet if he knows that the Christ was human and the angel comes to work as others, there are those who are exceedingly worse than him for they show forth what they are at a later time. Now if one has reviled, yet he has reviled the statue in Babylon where they have placed the Christ beside it to be another thing, and though he rebels against God, yet he rebels against injustice that the one who hates the prince  and does trechory has deemed him a rebel to be cast down and punished, that if the rebel who is for righteousness has appeared before you in the likeness of a rebel against God, it is because the devil has placed rebels in the likeness of them who are loyal to God, that the god that he attacks, it is good to be against, for you are not a simple people, but I have desired to give wisdom to the Elsnon, that criminals even who are rebels have been against that which is far more evil than them.

A robbed woman is lashing out at a man, and by lack of greatness he is with anger? But greatness he has, and honour to his credit, for the man who finds a wife gains favour from the Lord.

A sick person spreads their disease and the wicked do also, as do those who are not well in a wicked fashion, that these are not those who are not well for one is better than average in this way and the other far worse who are not well. Cease using wrong catagories that place the holy in the camp of the wicked, but God has given you his catagories and in folly you accuse with the catagories that were not meant for judgement, that are not from God.

A soldier of Beelzebub has said it is only a matter of opinion and there is no truth or understanding because they have no understanding, and insolence and confidence due to ignorance and lack of understanding is their strength.

A soldier of Beelzebub has said it is only a matter of opinion and there is no truth or understanding because they have no understanding, and insolence and confidence due to ignorance and lack of understanding is their strength.

A terrorist considers terrorism to be an acceptable norm when the people do not. A terrorist considers another religion that the people do not. A terrorist perceived the world in another way that the people do not and the answer to that world not acceptable by the people. A terrorist was ignorant and their actions were pointless because they did not consider another way. Did we fail in message or was there already an incompatible enivitibility that would result by no wrong doing on our part in chain reaction that lead to terrorism? Then is the problem a fundamental problem where the weaker side can only retaliate and fight our civilians and not our soldiers? In what areas must we do more?
A very accurate and very sharp knife of truth is severing the bridge that lead to punishment by discord and the Lord makes a new bridge according to the knife of truth, that the discord is gone when the knife did well and the punishment is ceasing when the truth is given power of support.

A wicked mouth puts a gap in the spirit and this an injury but let God restore all. The one who harasses sexually puts evil in their spirit and is violent. The one who makes threats that torture is condemned to die whether physical that are upon the head or threats of death. The one who attacks for a length of time that is exceeding the possibility of a man has sought another’s blood. The one who condemns the victim in a fashion to crush them is deserving of death, and they have no place in Heaven. That by all fashions of safety they have done violence and torture and sought to mutilate. All these things they are doing and what will they be known to be? But when they call out to Christ with good hope they will be condemned to hell where there is pain and anguish forever, to death. Better is the one who molested the child who sunk to the depths of the ocean. And all these things him and his allies did.
A wicked mouth puts a gap in the spirit and this an injury but let God restore all. The one who harasses sexually puts evil in their spirit and is violent. The one who makes threats that torture is condemned to die whether physical that are upon the head or threats of death. The one who attacks for a length of time that is exceeding the possibility of a man has sought another’s blood. The one who condemns the victim in a fashion to crush them is deserving of death, and they have no place in Heaven. That by all fashions of safety they have done violence and torture and sought to mutilate. All these things they are doing and what will they be known to be? But when they call out to Christ with good hope they will be condemned to hell where there is pain and anguish forever, to death. Better is the one who molested the child who sunk to the depths of the ocean. And all these things him and his allies did.

A wise man says, he may murder soon, and the wise heed it as well, but a foolish people are saying there is no such thing as abuse anymore.

A wise woman who is claimed to lack something in terms of her mind’s ability is like a jewel of wisdom upon the plains, but a wicked and reckless is wayward and grievous.

A wise woman who is claimed to lack something in terms of her mind’s ability is like a jewel of wisdom upon the plains, but a woman wicked and reckless is wayward and grievous.

According to sentience there is no cause to judge, and this is a fool who is perverted within, for he has placed strength against justice.

Ahab was king and with every encroachment he made against the Christ he became lower so that by the end Jezebel ruled over him and before those pleasing God he was a servant. Now let the servant be treated like a servant and let them pile up what a servant cannot have for his body was destroyed and he was given labour and he had no wife anymore unless it was Jezebel who ruled over him and because he was not a Babylonian he did these things that he might perceive truth and be worthy of death. Now if the Christ was pushed and attacked by Ahab than how is it that Jezebel refrained from it? Now if Jezebel is to perish than let a new return from destruction because she refrained from pursuing the Christ, that the new might support him. Now if the Christ does not accept Ahab as a servant than let him do right and be destroyed that he might repent as a man and be killed that he might inherit the kingdom. For the those who supported Ahab and he submitted to them, are for judgement when it comes and the servants of Ahab are moving towards the place of a great prophet. Now women will mourn over them, and if blood is spilt than the Lord knows what is good. For a foolish people will not fear God, and if they send their priests than they are being sent before a great prophet. For their sons will die and they will be like those who would follow them to the grave. Their companions will suffer illness and perish before their eyes because they lift up their eyes to God with hope and consider themselves righteous. So God will strip them of order and riches and security that those they have been strong with will perish before their eyes because of the Lord. Still will their hearts be stubborn? But some will be cast out of Babylon to beg because a righteous land has been made Babylon, that a plague will take lives because of their continued stubborness in which they do not repent. So the women who have done wrong will lose brothers and they will come to shame who were brothers to them.
 
Ahab was king and with every encroachment he made against the Christ he became lower so that by the end Jezebel ruled over him and before those pleasing God he was a servant. Now let the servant be treated like a servant and let them pile up what a servant cannot have for his body was destroyed and he was given labour and he had no wife anymore unless it was Jezebel who ruled over him and because he was not a Babylonian he did these things that he might perceive truth and be worthy of death. Now if the Christ was pushed and attacked by Ahab than how is it that Jezebel refrained from it? Now if Jezebel is to perish than let a new return from destruction because she refrained from pursuing the Christ, that the new might support him. Now if the Christ does not accept Ahab as a servant than let him do right and be destroyed that he might repent as a man and be killed that he might inherit the kingdom. For the those who supported Ahab and he submitted to them, are for judgement when it comes and the servants of Ahab are moving towards the place of a great prophet. Now women will mourn over them, and if blood is spilt than the Lord knows what is good. For a foolish people will not fear God, and if they send their priests than they are being sent before a great prophet. For their sons will die and they will be like those who would follow them to the grave. Their companions will suffer illness and perish before their eyes because they lift up their eyes to God with hope and consider themselves righteous. So God will strip them of order and riches and security that those they have been strong with will perish before their eyes because of the Lord. Still will their hearts be stubborn? But some will be cast out of Babylon to beg because a righteous land has been made Babylon, that a plague will take lives because of their continued stubborness in which they do not repent. So the women who have done wrong will lose brothers and they will come to shame who were brothers to them. Now will God win against humanity? But I keep myself from rejoicing except I am like one going out to do battle with him. Yet I have stopped in the grass upon a hill for He has said to me and kissed me on the forehead, look at what your father will do to the enemy army that I go to war with. And the son of God is standing taller than me and is there, being pure. Now I have said to myself let not any of them pity you who are to be the enemy because they have been charged to care for the child and none would go and save him, for they were stubborn and their hearts were not in it, indeed they could not care for the child to save him. Now if a true gentile should say it than let their son be killed and them as well for they commit blasphamy over the kingdom. For the Earth is to be made void of people except a small remnant because of one who was in the kingdom, that they said let us allow the child to be killed that we might inherit.

Alienated from society and bitter. Compensation creates translation. Bitterness translated into content alienation in opposition to those not part of niche group.

All things, all labels of people, are also for the mentally impaired, that impaired is not the right word, since we know as people what is acceptable, but a general label used in a reckless fashion is not fitting for conversations of peaceful accuracy.

An I have believed in an inquiry, and so said to myself, what insolence is there if they are not restored? Because others might have driven them to a different place and He can restore them? Was Christ not restored on the third day? But these say they are a different people, and they are resisting being restored, that they would fight God, that they might not be what is better. For they are not given to change and it would be better if they were. But what will they perform on the Earth if it is required to resist God? But do they do evil and not know all the truth? But they have attempted to convert others to their ways and would lead those who are well astray.

An I have believed in an inquiry, and so said to myself, what insolence is there if they are not restored? Because others might have driven them to a different place and He can restore them? Was Christ not restored on the third day? But these say they are a different people, and they are resisting being restored, that they would fight God, that they might not be what is better. For they are not given to change and it would be better if they were. But what will they perform on the Earth if it is required to resist God? But do they do evil and not know all the truth? But they have attempted to convert others to their ways and would lead those who are well astray. But there is no insolence in truth and the understanding of the truth, because insolence is war against truth and reality. Now do some not perceive reality? But there are some who do not perceive it in great measure and in the utter ignorance they are ignorant enough to be made confident, strong in insolence and confidence of what is not the reality about themselves, about what occurs and what they do, although they do not perceive false-good about others, but as much as they are ignorant to themselves and what they do, so is the war against reality brought forth, and the insolence, that if the are disrespectful they know it, but as for the insolence, it is from ignorance or intentional war against reality where a person uses themselves to be an offence against others by their intentional war against reality when they are not ignorant. Now the one who ceases is still ignorant, when there is no perception within them, being a person who is not capable of knowing more. So then why is one accusing when they are not doing as well as others? 
An abuser who is developing religion for abuse is being an animal and others do not have to be an animal because they are. They seek to be animals more when they say, fool who is human, but I am an animal and if you did not know how to handle me and manage me it is your fault, because you are the human. For they have accepted themselves as animals and have relegated their status that others might be at fault in their opinion for even allowing them to live. Now if it is of animals to blame people in this way than they are faithful to right and wrong as animals. But you are to be human and not animals, for humans have a measure of self control that they control to a degree and are good to be not controlled to a degree that they are not seeking to maul what they perceive as weakness and they understand people. Now the animal has said in their heart, you cannot expect me to keep you and govern because you are human and I am an animal and how am I to govern, for I take morality from you, because I am an animal. Now if nature is declaring it to you than you know that wisdom is benificial and that you are not a simple people who cannot know who to lead out to safety by the wrist.
An adult has become more wicked as he gives himself permissions and this is not always the cause for to remember right and wrong must be grasped by those who would grow better. For the righteous are becoming better and better and the evil becoming worse, and those attaining eternal life are those who are keeping faith and watch through the trials and tribulations, and so may I, too, remember.

An angry fool who has no understand has willed to go out into the land and take innocent people who have no knowledge of what he wants to know and some of them being loyal fighters for his cause, and he has wanted to make them pay, to punish them, and yet he has no daughter or son, and he is angry, and he has said, let us spread torture that those who have no knowledge will give knowledge to escape and I will be great in my evil, to destroy those sons and daughters who did well, who are loved tenderly by God and their parents because I am a brutish and proud man who is not loved in such a way and I will take my vengence upon those who are beautiful, indeed if they are beautiful then I have said my judgement is inpaired because of their beauty and so to please God I will do far worse to them than any and I will be a king of men and I will be a hero to women whose sons I kill and I will bring equality to my lowness that I will through my actions destroy all that is better than me and more pleasing to God that I might be great and shun wisdom and understanding and noble learning that the people might thank me as a hero and give gifts to me and I will be their king.

An angry fool who has no understand has willed to go out into the land and take innocent people who have no knowledge of what he wants to know and some of them being loyal fighters for his cause, and he has wanted to make them pay, to punish them, and yet he has no daughter or son, and he is angry, and he has said, let us spread torture that those who have no knowledge will give knowledge to escape and I will be great in my evil, to destroy those sons and daughters who did well, who are loved tenderly by God and their parents because I am a British and proud man who is not loved in such a way and I will take my vengence upon those who are beautiful, indeed if they are beautiful then I have said my judgement is inpaired because of their beauty and so to please God I will do far worse to them than any and I will be a king of men and I will be a hero to women whose sons I kill and I will bring equality to my lowness that I will through my actions destroy all that is better than me and more pleasing to God that I might be great and shun wisdom and understand and noble learning that the people might thank me as a hero and give gifts to me and I will be their king.

An angry fool who has no understanding has willed to go out into the land and take innocent people who have no knowledge of what he wants to know and some of them being loyal fighters for his cause, and he has wanted to make them pay, to punish them, and yet he has no daughter or son, and he is angry, and he has said, let us spread torture that those who have no knowledge will give knowledge to escape and I will be great in my evil, to destroy those sons and daughters who did well, who are loved tenderly by God and their parents because I am a brutish and proud man who is not loved in such a way and I will take my vengence upon those who are beautiful, indeed if they are beautiful then I have said my judgement is inpaired because of their beauty and so to please God I will do far worse to them than any and I will be a king of men and I will be a hero to women whose sons I kill and I will bring equality to my lowness that I will through my actions destroy all that is better than me and more pleasing to God that I might be great and shun wisdom and understanding and noble learning that the people might thank me as a hero and give gifts to me and I will be their king.

An angry woman with iniquity has shown a wicked mouth, speaking of acts of violence, stubborn and iniquitous and harder than a rock of the Earth. Bitterness has covered her lips, and if she should afflict the innocent than judgement will come down on her that the evils of the one who wronged her will be cleansed. A child, a girl-child has placed her foot on her neck in play, to rejoice over her. So only her son will absolve her, and give compassion, that the way is through him if she has afflicted the innocent. Though she has endured bruises and pain she is as if cursed on Earth and by whose fault? But if the father has sinned, he is absolved by her other wrongs that she commits so that she is a tragedy and for what cause? But death has seized her because of the sacrifice that did not come, that she is to be beaten and abused, because of the sins of men she has never heard of or known. For blood was shed in war and an atonement has been required, and those who shed blood have not known of what would be required. For the daughters have gone out to remember her, that they pay honour to virginity, that the blood shed in war is atoned for by her.

An angry woman with iniquity has shown a wicked mouth, speaking of acts of violence, stubborn and iniquitous and harder than a rock of the Earth. Bitterness has covered her lips, and if she should afflict the innocent than judgement will come down on her that the evils of the one who wronged her will be cleansed. A child, a girl-child has placed her foot on her neck in play, to rejoice over her. So only her son will absolve her, and give compassion, that the way is through him if she has afflicted the innocent. Though she has endured bruises and pain she is as if cursed on Earth and by whose fault? But if the father has sinned, he is absolved by her other wrongs that she commits so that she is a tragedy and for what cause? But death has seized her because of the sacrifice that did not come, that she is to be beaten and abused, because of the sins of men she has never heard of or known. For blood was shed in war and an atonement has been required, and those who shed blood have not known of what would be required. For the daughters have gone out to remember her, that they pay honour to virginity, that the blood shed in war is atoned for by her. Now the woman sacrificed I have known is the sacrifice that can be another, for a pedophile who has molested children can be the sacrifice for war, so that the battered and seemingly cursed woman will not be required but instead the blood of pedophiles of child molestation are required to atone for war.  Now the life of the pedophile is pure, and he is clean, for he has cleansed himself of his sins with to his imperfections, and by his innocent blood, though he himself is not innocent, an atonement is made for the shedding of blood in war. For his soul is for pushing forward the woman when the judge comes, to push her forward that she would be sacrificed instead of himself, and if the sacrifice is to occur so it will be. But a wise woman has said, he will push me to my death with honey and encouragement so that the sacrifice does not occur. Now beyond this my understanding is insufficient, even for the angel.
An angry woman with iniquity has shown a wicked mouth, speaking of acts of violence, stubborn and iniquitous and harder than a rock of the Earth. Bitterness has covered her lips, and if she should afflict the innocent than judgement will come down on her that the evils of the one who wronged her will be cleansed. A child, a girl-child has placed her foot on her neck in play, to rejoice over her. So only her son will absolve her, and give compassion, that the way is through him if she has afflicted the innocent. Though she has endured bruises and pain she is as if cursed on Earth and by whose fault? But if the father has sinned, he is absolved by her other wrongs that she commits so that she is a tragedy and for what cause? But death has seized her because of the sacrifice that did not come, that she is to be beaten and abused, because of the sins of men she has never heard of or known. For blood was shed in war and an atonement has been required, and those who shed blood have not known of what would be required. For the daughters have gone out to remember her, that they pay honour to virginity, that the blood shed in war is atoned for by her. Now the woman sacrificed I have known is the sacrifice that can be another, for a pedophile who has molested children can be the sacrifice for war, so that the battered and seemingly cursed woman will not be required but instead the blood of pedophiles of child molestation are required to atone for war.  Now the life of the pedophile is pure, and he is clean, for he has cleansed himself of his sins with to his imperfections, and by his innocent blood, though he himself is not innocent, an atonement is made for the shedding of blood in war. For his soul is for pushing forward the woman when the judge comes, to push her forward that she would be sacrificed instead of himself, and if the sacrifice is to occur so it will be. But a wise woman has said, he will push me to my death with honey and encouragement so that the sacrifice does not occur. Now beyond this my understanding is insufficient, even for the angel.
An angry woman with iniquity has shown a wicked mouth, speaking of acts of violence, stubborn and iniquitous and harder than a rock of the Earth. Bitterness has covered her lips, and if she should afflict the innocent than judgement will come down on her that the evils of the one who wronged her will be cleansed. A child, a girl-child has placed her foot on her neck in play, to rejoice over her. So only her son will absolve her, and give compassion, that the way is through him if she has afflicted the innocent. Though she has endured bruises and pain she is as if cursed on Earth and by whose fault? But if the father has sinned, he is absolved by her other wrongs that she commits so that she is a tragedy and for what cause? But death has seized her because of the sacrifice that did not come, that she is to be beaten and abused, because of the sins of men she has never heard of or known. For blood was shed in war and an atonement has been required, and those who shed blood have not known of what would be required. For the daughters have gone out to remember her, that they pay honour to virginity, that the blood shed in war is atoned for by her. Now the woman sacrificed I have known is the sacrifice that can be another, for a pedophile who has molested children can be the sacrifice for war, so that the battered and seemingly cursed woman will not be required but instead the blood of pedophiles of child molestation are required to atone for war.  Now the life of the pedophile is pure, and he is clean, for he has cleansed himself of his sins with to his imperfections, and by his innocent blood, though he himself is not innocent, an atonement is made for the shedding of blood in war. For his soul is for pushing forward the woman when the judge comes, to push her forward that she would be sacrificed instead of himself, and if the sacrifice is to occur so it will be. But a wise woman has said, he will push me to my death with honey and encouragement so that the sacrifice does not occur. Now beyond this my understanding is insufficient, even for the angel.

An angry woman with iniquity has shown a wicked mouth, speaking of acts of violence, stubborn and iniquitous and harder than a rock of the Earth. Bitterness has covered her lips, and if she should afflict the innocent than judgement will come down on her that the evils of the one who wronged her will be cleansed. A child, a girl-child has placed her foot on her neck in play, to rejoice over her. So only her son will absolve her, and give compassion, that the way is through him if she has afflicted the innocent. Though she has endured bruises and pain she is as if cursed on Earth and by whose fault? But if the father has sinned, he is absolved by her other wrongs that she commits so that she is a tragedy and for what cause? But death has seized her because of the sacrifice that did not come, that she is to be beaten and abused, because of the sins of men she has never heard of or known. For blood was shed in war and an atonement has been required, and those who shed blood have not known of what would be required. For the daughters have gone out to remember her, that they pay honour to virginity, that the blood shed in war is atoned for by her.

An angry woman with iniquity has shown a wicked mouth, speaking of acts of violence, stubborn and iniquitous and harder than a rock of the Earth. Bitterness has covered her lips, and if she should afflict the innocent than judgement will come down on her that the evils of the one who wronged her will be cleansed. A child, a girl-child has placed her foot on her neck in play, to rejoice over her. So only her son will absolve her, and give compassion, that the way is through him if she has afflicted the innocent. Though she has endured bruises and pain she is as if cursed on Earth and by whose fault? But if the father has sinned, he is absolved by her other wrongs that she commits so that she is a tragedy and for what cause? But death has seized her because of the sacrifice that did not come, that she is to be beaten and abused, because of the sins of men she has never heard of or known. For blood was shed in war and an atonement has been required, and those who shed blood have not known of what would be required. For the daughters have gone out to remember her, that they pay honour to virginity, that the blood shed in war is atoned for by her.

An angry woman with iniquity has shown a wicked mouth, speaking of acts of violence, stubborn and iniquitous and harder than a rock of the Earth. Bitterness has covered her lips, and if she should afflict the innocent than judgement will come down on her that the evils of the one who wronged her will be cleansed. A child, a girl-child has placed her foot on her neck in play, to rejoice over her. So only her son will absolve her, and give compassion, that the way is through him if she has afflicted the innocent. Though she has endured bruises and pain she is as if cursed on Earth and by whose fault? But if the father has sinned, he is absolved by her other wrongs that she commits so that she is a tragedy and for what cause? But death has seized her because of the sacrifice that did not come, that she is to be beaten and abused, because of the sins of men she has never heard of or known. For blood was shed in war and an atonement has been required, and those who shed blood have not known of what would be required. For the daughters have gone out to remember her, that they pay honour to virginity, that the blood shed in war is atoned for by her. Now the woman sacrificed I have known is the sacrifice that can be another, for a pedophile who has molested children can be the sacrifice for war, so that the battered and seemingly cursed woman will not be required but instead the blood of pedophiles of child molestation are required to atone for war.  Now the life of the pedophile is pure, and he is clean, for he has cleansed himself of his sins to his imperfections, and by his innocent blood, though he himself is not innocent, an atonement is made for the shedding of blood in war. For his soul is for pushing forward the woman when the judge comes, to push her forward that she would be sacrificed instead of himself, and if the sacrifice is to occur so it will be. But a wise woman has said, he will push me to my death with honey and encouragement so that the sacrifice does not occur. Now beyond this my understanding is insufficient, even for the angel. Only the life of two or three pedophiles who are child molestor s can be the atonement sacrifice for one woman who would have been the sacrifice. Sometimes less is required and sometimes more. Now those who would sacrifice such pedophiles should not be arrested by any soldier for wrong-doing that the land be brought to lies that are used to protect righteous men. But the land is belonging to the one who delivers and thus a sacrifice may be required. Now those who would attack to save the lives of such pedophiles are to be offered with such pedophiles, for these are those who would save such pedophiles by attacking people, and they are like the procession for them that they might be sacrificed with them. Now if a wicked man will kill a boy who is a child than the wicked man is killed for the daughters that they might be blessed by the Lord. Now evil will be made to cease by force after the potion of time has been expended that matters that require more will be for a judge.

An animal argues when their conscience has been bothered, and all manner of selfishness is found with them, and no woman is this, but a sociopath, a fool, that you understand the difference when they slander women.

An animal comes to peace in those set things it is having the habit of doing that invade the territory of humans, but if you attempt to break these habits of violation of territory the animal will fight as if for life and it is having to be killed or removed.

A bad society is not minding its own business when one attempts to do well, but the one supporting them in doing well is a society of understanding and good.
 
An empty fool will not open his mouth much, but the one who shuts their lips is wise.

An inconsistent woman in all, she is more foolish than the foolish woman, contradicting herself in everything and not knowing it because she does not have the wisdom of the daughters, and relying even in her attempts upon that which is not correct for what she claims, and she is claiming to be entitled to a husband because she exists, and that men do not do what they should, but she does not perceive and understand, and so she is left like a desolate one whose land was destroyed, and yet the grace of God is exceedingly great, and she is in His keeping, when she has been with righteousness and did not understand all that here you will know that where there is a break the will of God is upon the land, and so I am in the city, and let the wise know that the Lord desires truth, for the enemies of the righteous will receive their punishment, and those with integrity will be held blameless. For God is loving that He might not fail.

An open war and public discussion is not always right for doing what is good, because the tiger stalks, and the spider lures, that the threat actors who would kill the innocent are dispatched by those who fight for God. Now when there is a thing that must be told it is reasonable to ponder and find an acceptable way of telling it that it might be acceptable to those who hear. For those Christians who are dogs are accussing His house like Pharisees and some have been Pharisees with Christianity. Now the anti-Christ’s, some of them, are favouring puritanicalism and with it they would replace Christianity, and with it they would accuse those who please God, that they might be an attacking virus in society, and even be splinters of the devil to cause chaos and attempt to cause straying. Now do you think the devil a bad strategist? But no general wants to fight his efforts. But does the soldier of the devil have much ability to bother or wage war on another of the devil’s? But I do not write about the wars of men. But the society of the devil works for those of the devil’s and the society of God for those who are God’s. Now if the one society is against the other, who will win? But the Christ is made dead and then living on the third day and if such is done than the children of the kingdom are having His work credited to us in the matter of attaining the after-life in Heaven. So those of the kingdom of Heaven profit in their death. Now of the church that is favoured by some, what will it profit if not for the Christ and if not for those of the church attaining reward with Him? But the angel who is tenderly loved is for the church that he favours and gives to his own and others, too, might benefit.

An ugly person offers their rebuke. Are they ugly?

An ungrateful man who is jelous has reasoned wrong, because he could not bear what reward he was to be given. Now the injustice happened prior to it and who has done wrong cannot be told. Now if he is in agony to take drastic action than he is not held safely and if he is bitter towards God to take action he does not reason as one who does not believe for he is wanting what is better and is not receiving, being lied to by Babylon and finding those of the kingdom to blame, that he does not enter the kingdom and does enter among the Jews, and because of this, being perceptive to truth, he is hating himself if he has neither to go to. Now let not self hatred and self pity lash out at those who are of the kingdom or of the Jews because if he is truly not the devil’s than where does he turn? But because of Babylon he cannot gain his reward, because of those of the devils and the cults of the devils he is perceiving truth and has not gained the better reward he wants, that this is a man who believes in God and is ungrateful for what portion Babylon has let remain, and so let it be understood that the angel is not praising Babylon but has held it the chief culprit and also the deceptive favour where the portion for him was not attained. Now if he has honesty in this he is for a great reward, that I would not say it to justify those who are not for it. But Babylon has stripped him of it and it rises up about him, the pride and lies of the devil that have swept righteousness and good from that place, that envy is left to remain and everything bitter that has less worth, for he had found no place with Christians or Jews and yet is he not eager and having much desire for what is better? Now do not do any injustice until you have rid yourself of Babylon, because the enemy is the devil who has taken from you what you should have gained.

An ungrateful man who is jelous has reasoned wrong, because he could not bear what reward he was to be given. Now the injustice happened prior to it and who has done wrong cannot be told. Now if he is in agony to take drastic action than he is not held safely and if he is bitter towards God to take action he does not reason as one who does not believe for he is wanting what is better and is not receiving, being lied to by Babylon and finding those of the kingdom to blame, that he does not enter the kingdom and does enter among the Jews, and because of this, being perceptive to truth, he is hating himself if he has neither to go to. Now let not self hatred and self pity lash out at those who are of the kingdom or of the Jews because if he is truly not the devil’s than where does he turn? But because of Babylon he cannot gain his reward, because of those of the devils and the cults of the devils he is perceiving truth and has not gained the better reward he wants, that this is a man who believes in God and is ungrateful for what portion Babylon has let remain, and so let it be understood that the angel is not praising Babylon but has held it the chief culprit and also the deceptive favour where the portion for him other places was not attained. Now if he has honesty in this he is for a great reward, that I would not say it to justify those who are not for it. But Babylon has stripped him of it and it rises up about him, the pride and lies of the devil that have swept righteousness and good from that place, that envy is left to remain and everything bitter that has less worth, for he had found no place with Christians or Jews and yet is he not eager and having much desire for what is better? Now do not do any injustice until you have rid yourself of Babylon, because the enemy is the devil who has taken from you what you should have gained. For he has been deceived and robbed that he is not for Jews or Gentiles and not for those even who do not believe because he has wanted more. Now anger there is to God and can you blame him for he desires a good thing that Babylon has often been found neither hot or cold but lacking, that lies have been found and the world has grown lacking in good. Now where is his true brother? Where is that of his own that he understands because the blessing has been removed and no king of theirs has come to restore their society.
Are humans self organizing or in fact prone to lack of unity and gradual disfunction? Is everything then forced by higher reasoning? What amount of psychological development is forced by a person’s higher reasoning?

Are not all people to be saved? For the animals are not but the people are. Now people do not need any concept of shades, other than affection, but they set out to teach and deal with problems as they emerged, and yet when one is transforming to animal there is often great contention. Now a small remnant remained in every place who were human, and they were of every shade. Now the angel was friends with a woman who was human who was of the darkest shade and there were others people in various places at the time the sign was approaching Earth.

Are not all people to be saved? For the animals are not but the people are. Now people do not need any concept of shades, other than affection, but they set out to teach and deal with problems as they emerged, and yet when one is transforming to animal there is often great contention. Now a small remnant remained in every place who were human, and they were of every shade. Now the angel was friends with a woman who was human who was of the darkest shade and there were others people in various places at the time the sign was approaching Earth.

As for the physical ethnicity in my time most people involved in matters of racism of any shade are not actually racist but are like non-warriors caught between armies that war and our city is caught in between and has no knowledge of why they fight and has no interest except that they should be able to continue daily life and commerce. But arrows go astray and come over the wall of the city and land in the stone platform between two citizens who are for being at peace with each other and there is chaos and what might seem like contention but it is only the arrows of the armies, of another. So some have looked from the hills and claimed that the city too is part of the war but it is not involved, though they claim it is. As for those in the armies that war they are the sacrifice, some have said, for the peace of the city that the citizens might be in peace with each other, but the armies are to be kept out because they are not permitted to enter the city or attack a citizen who is not in the war. For those soldiers who have attacked citizens of the city have changed their cause to the jelousy of the beauty of the citizen that it is changed for them and though they claim it is the war it is not because none of the citizens was attacking them. Now these soldiers who abandon the war to change their war to the jelousy of beauty of the citizen who is not in the war is one that the citizens should be protecting but dismay is there because the citizens are not soldiers and do not always fight because they are citizens of a city. Now such soldiers who become rogue deserve to die and some have been killed by the mighty soldiers who stay in the city to maintain the peace of all citizens of all shades. Thus there is sorrow and war in the land.

Be not attempting to make a person what is right when that are determined to be what they want. For if a person wishes to be something than they are of that which they are of, that the consequences of what they are might come at a later time. For though you might fight those of the devil’s you do not attempt to convert them when they are determined. So you are a beautiful people and you have a standard, being people with integrity. Now the wise man of Abraham has said among the people to the young ones of Israel, is this how you speak and act towards your elder brother? Now these words are good and meant for what they are meant for, not to be taken too far, but is concerning things of tribes and people groups, because without need of saying it, many of the Elsnon have been accepted as being like younger siblings to some Jews and it is good, for the younger Elsnon honours the Jewish person who is older and likewise. Only the way of Jews is different than that of the Elsnon, although I have benifited from Avram and him from me, and have we not fought together? Now be more concerned with your own things and Moses has spoken as much to the Jews and do not the Elsnon understand without Moses? But I would consider it abomination for you to be like Sodomites in the way of attempting to cause Jews to stumble, for are you to war against God? Are they not also God’s people? But I would not have you regard physical ethnicity of Earth with concern to races of people only this is among you due to cultures of areas on Earth. But beautiful people are of different shades and so the beautiful are upon the Earth.

Be not attempting to make a person what is right when that are determined to be what they want. For if a person wishes to be something than they are of that which they are of, that the consequences of what they are might come at a later time. For though you might fight those of the devil’s you do not attempt to convert them when they are determined. So you are a beautiful people and you have a standard, being people with integrity. Now the wise man of Abraham has said among the people to the young ones of Israel, is this how you speak and act towards your elder brother? Now these words are good and meant for what they are meant for, not to be taken too far, but is concerning things of tribes and people groups, because without need of saying it, many of the Elsnon have been accepted as being like younger siblings to some Jews and it is good, for the younger Elsnon honours the Jewish person who is older and likewise. Only the way of Jews is different than that of the Elsnon, although I have benifited from Avram and him from me, and have we not fought together? Now be more concerned with your own things and Moses has spoken as much to the Jews and do not the Elsnon understand without Moses? But I would consider it abomination for you to be like Sodomites in the way of attempting to cause Jews to stumble, for are you to war against God? Are they not also God’s people? But I would not have you regard physical ethnicity of Earth with concern to races of people only this is among you due to cultures of areas on Earth. But beautiful people are of different shades and so the beautiful are upon the Earth. Now a wise Jewish man speaks as a saying to give wisdom, and yet the Elsnon are the younger being not one of the sons or daughters of Jacob, but of a distant land that has heard of the Jews. Now we are to the East of Juruselum, and the stars are over our cities, and villages, that amongst nature, and our land is gold, silver, and wood, and yet we are not a land of milk and honey, as it is for the Jews, nor are we like Egypt, except we are having some riches comparible to them. Nor are we like Babylon, for we are not in chaos, and we have one God, and we are Christians. Now if we are the truly the younger, and we are, than are we not to give honour to what is good? But if any child is cast out, do not be unjust, because such a child is only returned to Abraham, that they are not fatherless and without God. Now as for those who are commiting evil and are maintained without guilt than are you truly believing they are the Elsnon, when a matter of guilt in anything has no guilt for them. But other peoples might dwell among you and if they give birth to a virus of the devil’s than will you be devoured? But I do not believe you have great need to be concerned about those of Jacob when there are people of the devil’s who would be against you and if you will interloper to notice, against Jacob’s children in different ways.

Be not attempting to make a person what is right when that are determined to be what they want. For if a person wishes to be something than they are of that which they are of, that the consequences of what they are might come at a later time. For though you might fight those of the devil’s you do not attempt to convert them when they are determined. So you are a beautiful people and you have a standard, being people with integrity. Now the wise man of Abraham has said among the people to the young ones of Israel, is this how you speak and act towards your elder brother? Now these words are good and meant for what they are meant for, not to be taken too far, but is concerning things of tribes and people groups, because without need of saying it, many of the Elsnon have been accepted as being like younger siblings to some Jews and it is good, for the younger Elsnon honours the Jewish person who is older and likewise. Only the way of Jews is different than that of the Elsnon, although I have benifited from Avram and him from me, and have we not fought together? Now be more concerned with your own things and Moses has spoken as much to the Jews and do not the Elsnon understand without Moses? But I would consider it abomination for you to be like Sodomites in the way of attempting to cause Jews to stumble, for are you to war against God? Are they not also God’s people? But I would not have you regard physical ethnicity of Earth with concern to races of people only this is among you due to cultures of areas on Earth. But beautiful people are of different shades and so the beautiful are upon the Earth. Now a wise Jewish man speaks as a saying to give wisdom, and yet the Elsnon are the younger being not one of the sons or daughters of Jacob, but of a distant land that has heard of the Jews. Now we are to the East of Juruselum, and the stars are over our cities, and villages, that amongst nature, and our land is gold, silver, and wood, and yet we are not a land of milk and honey, as it is for the Jews, nor are we like Egypt, except we are having some riches comparible to them. Nor are we like Babylon, for we are not in chaos, and we have one God, and we are Christians. Now if we are the truly the younger, and we are, than are we not to give honour to what is good? But if any child is cast out, do not be unjust, because such a child is only returned to Abraham, that they are not fatherless and without God. Now as for those who are commiting evil and are maintained without guilt than are you truly believing they are the Elsnon, when a matter of guilt in anything has no guilt for them. But other peoples might dwell among you and if they give birth to a virus of the devil’s than will you be devoured? But I do not believe you have great need to be concerned about those of Jacob when there are people of the devil’s who would be against you and if you will interloper to notice, against Jacob’s children in different ways.

Be permitting woman what is acceptable for them, for all know what is acceptable.
 
Be wise to the plots and schemes of ugly people, that where you do not see ugly people there are ugly people behind it.
Because a woman can strike a woman, the woman asked must agree, but in such a case another is expected to intervene later. But the one who would strike is not worthy to speak to her, for she says, speak for the devil or I strike. Now silence towards her is to not bring a blasphemous report. But what will keep her from the rocks of a cave, the walls of a cliff? But does she not say, the Lord rebuke you? But if she does not what can she say? For be turned to precious stone or face the stones, be cursed or struck if you do not agree.

Because a woman can strike a woman, the woman asked must agree, but in such a case another is expected to intervene later. But the one who would strike is not worthy to speak to her, for she says, speak for the devil or I strike. Now silence towards her is to not bring a blasphemous report.

Because a woman can strike a woman, the woman asked must agree, but in such a case another is expected to intervene later.
Because not understanding he spoke already in ignorance words not able to be used for peace, and one who was not understanding even took action that he might do violence. Now one considers and it is private for them and they cannot be judged but those who act before they understand are not to be considered of no fault because they did not understand.

Because they are not even angry they do not know when to stop. They are blinded from seeking truth because they are not even able to care about their cause, to cease when they have understood the error. There is one who performs action in the seeking of an emotion that will not happen and another who does not have any wrath who cannot perceive it is of no one’s will. For the one who does not believe the way of understanding in a matter is made blank. But what was robbed from him or what was done wrong that he does not have anger? What is forced upon him by lies and some threat? For they have been capable of deceiving and he need not fear them who are traitors to their claim. But he is not the traitor but is the only who is loyal, and to what he is loyal he does not betray and for this cause, being truly loyal in spirit, he does not feel anger and his heart is not committed that he does an action without heart. Then to the one on his other side, I perceived, this one is not loyal in spirit or deed, but is unable to be angry because he is the guilty person and of the guilty party that he is unable to understand because he is loyal in words only and fears only righteous men and how he will be perceived if he does not do some action. Now does any person feel such and not know when there is an error or if they should cease? But what man is between the two, for it is not me.
Because they are not even angry they do not know when to stop. They are blinded from seeking truth because they are not even able to care about their cause, to cease when they have understood the error. There is one who performs action in the seeking of an emotion that will not happen and another who does not have any wrath who cannot perceive it is of no one’s will. For the one who does not believe the way of understanding in a matter is made blank. But what was robbed from him or what was done wrong that he does not have anger? What is forced upon him by lies and some threat? For they have been capable of deceiving and he need not fear them who are traitors to their claim. But he is not the traitor but is the only who is loyal, and to what he is loyal he does not betray and for this cause, being truly loyal in spirit, he does not feel anger and his heart is not committed that he does an action without heart.

Because they were unwilling to do the work of God, especially justice, they would rather afflict and abuse victims of evil, and there are places where they do this.


Because you are with them who are not compatible with your nation, so the land has become as it was in Isaiah, but let them be righteous and they will be with your nation, that the true remnant might become greater in number. Now will God not restore when you are doing what is good to your neighbour? But God  has even forgiven murderers and theives and you who are pleasing God are deemed of great value. But as for heavy matters it is better, I think, not to dwell in land plagued by brutality and violence where prostitutes are abused and every manner of wicked brutality, but as is known, the Romans whipped Him and crucified Him and He was beaten and robbed of garments and yet God, His father, restored Him on the third day, and He remained on Earth until His time had come to ascend to Heaven, to be greater there, and pure. Now if an angel has been on Earth in mortal form and endured persecution, know that it for some purpose of the Lord that such is permitted. But as for, children of God, do you not know you have all that was for the Christ from God because He paid the work for you. But know then that Beelzebub has infested and seized his children for his will and they are commited, but Beelzebub has deceived them to betray them to what is not benificial for them. But God is all powerful and to trust him is reasonable, even for the angel who has chosen what is better for them.

Better to be delivered by righteousness than by the sword, but the one who commits no wrong is for placing his foot upon the neck of a wicked accuser.

Better to depart from fools to be with God’s house when opportunity has been given by you and fullfilled rather that remain with what has failed you, for you offered good and they did not repay what is right, but failed you that you might go to be with God’s house.

Both Sodomites and Gomorrites slay with guile, but those who want peace are having a good gratitude because of understanding.
But I have blessed Avram in the right time and places, and bless him in general, that the Jews are our allies and there are wise men and women among them, and as they have aided me so I have aided them, that they gave to me and I to them. Now Abraham I have blessed and I wish for God to correct the Jews in what they do so that it will be known that He has not abandoned them, because a father corrects them who he loves. Now the Elsnon are honouring God, and He is our father, that what is for the Elson is sacred, and we dwell in a place in which we might be in Heaven, though not there fully for the first phase holds us to this Earth, that we are with the good and righteous who keep the Earth from descending into hell, that we will take aid from the Jews and give priority as is only right to our own things, and it is good by Moses that we not focus on what is for another people when we are given better things and much more that it is concealed from the other people, because God has concealed it that things might be right. Now look to God and your own people, and if you bless another people it is good.

But I see the sign that is to be visible in the sky because of word from Babel and the two truths of light collide and merge and I have said, I should let it be, for it is right.

But Jews are following a way and Muslims are following a way and the lost tribes are not following a way but found by Christ for they do not conform to the Law of Moses but are found by Christ. Now the man you slayed has repaid Israel with good, that He is God’s son, and He is alive, and those who confess His father and Him are from east to west and all over the Earth, and the golden calf stumbles among dirt and dust, and Babylon has placed its nation scattered among us all and Orgoth is sowing discord between us. Now is it not war? But those who are too intelligent have abandoned many things, worthy of God’s kingdoms, despised and asked to leave as if traitors. Now there are those too great for the world entire that they are kings and queens who wander without homes. Now must not Babylon pay the price for it? But they have tortured, killed innocent people, and commited many abominations, and they harass, make threats, make illegal being obediant to the Lord, indeed to live as a righteous man in places. Now the wicked things are the devil’s war and combat that if you find them using the devil’s combat than they are with the devil, but them using God’s deeds are with the Lord.

But Jews are following a way and Muslims are following a way and the lost tribes are not following a way but found by Christ for they do not conform to the Law of Moses but are found by Christ. Now the man you slayed has repaid Israel with good, that He is God’s son, and He is alive, and those who confess His father and Him are from east to west and all over the Earth, and the golden calf stumbles among dirt and dust, and Babylon has placed its nation scattered among us all and Orgoth is sowing discord between us. Now is it not war? But those who are too intelligent have abandoned many things, worthy of God’s kingdoms, despised and asked to leave as if traitors. Now there are those too great for the world entire that they are kings and queens who wander without homes. Now must not Babylon pay the price for it? But they have tortured, killed innocent people, and commited many abominations, and they harass, make threats, make illegal being obediant to the Lord, indeed to live as a righteous man in places. Now the wicked things are the devil’s war and combat that if you find them using the devil’s combat than they are with the devil, but them using God’s deeds are with the Lord.
But Jews are following a way and Muslims are following a way and the lost tribes are not following a way but found by Christ for they do not conform to the Law of Moses but are found by Christ. Now the man you slayed has repaid Israel with good, that He is God’s son, and He is alive, and those who confess His father and Him are from east to west and all over the Earth, and the golden calf stumbles among dirt and dust, and Babylon has placed its nation scattered among us all and Orgoth is sowing discord between us. Now is it not war? But those who are too intelligent have abandoned many things, worthy of God’s kingdoms, despised and asked to leave as if traitors. Now there are those too great for the world entire that they are kings and queens who wander without homes. Now must not Babylon pay the price for it? But they have tortured, killed innocent people, and commited many abominations, and they harass, make threats, make illegal being obediant to the Lord, indeed to live as a righteous man in places. Now the wicked things are the devil’s war and combat that if you find them using the devil’s combat than they are with the devil, but them using God’s deeds are with the Lord.
But a person has hand selected those not meeting the level of humans and transformed them into animals and sent out animals to attack humans. And was it not because of wrath? But this is a zeolot and there is no place for discussion after this has been done.

But an Egyptian would not degrade himself to do this thing, and their parent is a wealthy man with wisdom, and their swords are against thieves and murderers, and their honour is for the good man who is a stranger to them, an equal and at peace with equals, that if you will not be Egyptians or a people who are to defend those who are good, saying they are not of my people, than is there not perceived truth and justice? But do not say I will not defend in justice because the one I would defend is not my people, and then claim you are one of the people, for if you would be against something than why would you confirm it? But why do you fear the rebuke of those who are worse than you in doing what is right? For if you are sons and daughters than why do you fear the rebuke of the fool or wicked? But let the house of God not be divided and if you not choose it, are you not to be judged by truth and justice?

But at the greater area there is a person not knowing ever where they are, that they stumble and sway. Now at the greater level there is them devoted to defence of their own and yet if they sow discord, must it not be addressed? Now the slaves do not decide, for they are brutal and mean, but it is for the slave owners and are they not for peace with other slave owners? But if your leaders are supporting slaves of fair or darker then do they not be envious and jelous of slave owners because the slave owners are higher peers and they gather their greatness from the slaves in the land like gathering armies of animals and like teaching loyalty to other people’s children, but slaves are far from children and there is a great ravine between servants and slaves where there is the ravine between people and animals.

But at the greater area there is a person not knowing ever where they are, that they stumble and sway. Now at the greater level there is them devoted to defence of their own and yet if they sow discord, must it not be addressed? Now the slaves do not decide, for they are brutal and mean, but it is for the slave owners and are they not for peace with other slave owners? But if your leaders are supporting slaves of fair or darker then do they not be envious and jelous of slave owners because the slave owners are higher peers and they gather their greatness from the slaves in the land like gathering armies of animals and like teaching loyalty to other people’s children, but slaves are far from children and there is a great ravine between servants and slaves where there is the ravine between people and animals.

But because Babel relented before the bullying of the Luke-warm who have no concern or compassion and will shut their ears to anything no matter how severe, because they did not refuse to build until the evil was ceased and because they did not refuse advancements until evil was ceased, they have permitted murder due to ignorance and authority to answer has been removed from them, but it goes through Ijeshil and the grown tree has been planted, being unmovable by any on Earth. So all the Earth and Babel has been placed under the feet of those in the kingdom of heaven. Now the rebellious teachers are ejected by this, being false teachers and false shepards, that it is right to find replacements, but the one not false you cannot remove for his smooth and pure stone is fashioned secure. Now Babel permitted those who attack secretly in layers to murder many and afflict with threats of bodily harm, and they offered ignorance even to sustain them, there words having been nothing from the start and yet their offering of ignorance being agreance and partnership with violence. Now many victims of rape and child molestation were tortured and killed by them because they were beneath ur and their cruelty was ceaseless towards those who were God’s people, belonging to God, for He has known that you have tortured and killed His only daughter. But the Earth is a foot-stool for the angel who has dwelt on Earth. Now if they band together to do The Bershaul Flame that purifies in a way that is acceptable to the devil, and they are not perceiving the devil’s to purify but are devouring the good and evil alike than this is The Bershaul Flame that they band together to do, and if Babel partners in anything they are partnering with those who attack in layers, to devour the sick as it has been said, as if we were to be animals, and devour the abused as if animals, and devour God’s people, for the flame is changing hands, and if the flame is directed at others does it not seek to wipe out all who might oppose? Now those saying they protect are conquering all that ignorance has not been too far for them. But we are capable of producing things to protect us if we wish. Now if this flame is produced by the third shelf in hell upon the mountain in hell than it acts with that of the second shelf as well, and the first shelf is occurring being servant to the second and third. Now there is an evil match for all that is good and an animal match for every person and some are in possession of areas. Now if there is an evil flame than there is a good and if Lucifer sends out light than Joshua fire. But let the land be cleansed by the angel in some ways who has been given the Earth and steals from Babel what he desires when it has been wanted. But know to a certainty he took only one identification of Freud and learned of self-hatred from them and nothing more would he take but purposefully removed himself in his way, for Babel was not offering truth that was clean and yet they have produced much and are often building brick by brick with clay.
But because Babel relented before the bullying of the Luke-warm who have no concern or compassion and will shut their ears to anything no matter how severe, because they did not refuse to build until the evil was ceased and because they did not refuse advancements until evil was ceased, they have permitted murder due to ignorance and authority to answer has been removed from them, but it goes through Ijeshil and the grown tree has been planted, being unmovable by any on Earth. So all the Earth and Babel has been placed under the feet of those in the kingdom of heaven. Now the rebellious teachers are ejected by this, being false teachers and false shepards, that it is right to find replacements, but the one not false you cannot remove for his smooth and pure stone is fashioned secure. Now Babel permitted those who attack secretly in layers to murder many and afflict with threats of bodily harm, and they offered ignorance even to sustain them, there words having been nothing from the start and yet their offering of ignorance being agreance and partnership with violence. Now many victims of rape and child molestation were tortured and killed by them because they were beneath ur and their cruelty was ceaseless towards those who were God’s people, belonging to God, for He has known that you have tortured and killed His only daughter. But the Earth is a foot-stool for the angel who has dwelt on Earth. Now if they band together to do The Bershaul Flame that purifies in a way that is acceptable to the devil, and they are not perceiving the devil’s to purify but are devouring the good and evil alike than this is The Bershaul Flame that they band together to do, and if Babel partners in anything they are partnering with those who attack in layers, to devour the sick as it has been said, as if we were to be animals, and devour the abused as if animals, and devour God’s people, for the flame is changing hands, and if the flame is directed at others does it not seek to wipe out all who might oppose? Now those saying they protect are conquering all that ignorance has not been too far for them. But we are capable of producing things to protect us if we wish. Now if this flame is produced by the third shelf in hell upon the mountain in hell than it acts with that of the second shelf as well, and the first shelf is occurring being servant to the second and third. Now there is an evil match for all that is good and an animal match for every person and some are in possession of areas. Now if there is an evil flame than there is a good and if Lucifer sends out light than Joshua fire. But let the land be cleansed by the angel in some ways who has been given the Earth and steals from Babel what he desires when it has been wanted. But know to a certainty he took only one identification of Freud and learned of self-hatred from them and nothing more would he take but purposefully removed himself in his way, for Babylon was not offering truth that was clean and yet they have produced much and are often building brick by brick with clay.
But because Babel relented before the bullying of the Luke-warm who have no concern or compassion and will shut their ears to anything no matter how severe, because they did not refuse to build until the evil was ceased and because they did not refuse advancements until evil was ceased, they have permitted murder due to ignorance and authority to answer has been removed from them, but it goes through Ijeshil and the grown tree has been planted, being unmovable by any on Earth. So all the Earth and Babel has been placed under the feet of those in the kingdom of heaven. Now the rebellious teachers are ejected by this, being false teachers and false shepards, that it is right to find replacements, but the one not false you cannot remove for his smooth and pure stone is fashioned secure. Now Babel permitted those who attack secretly in layers to murder many and afflict with threats of bodily harm, and they offered ignorance even to sustain them, there words having been nothing from the start and yet their offering of ignorance being agreance and partnership with violence. Now many victims of rape and child molestation were tortured and killed by them because they were beneath ur and their cruelty was ceaseless towards those who were God’s people, belonging to God, for He has known that you have tortured and killed His only daughter. But the Earth is a foot-stool for the angel who has dwelt on Earth.

But do not let any person capture you in heart to transform you into an animal, for you are the sons and daughters of God’s house, and your loyalties are in things of humans who are regarding right and wrong and the fear of God.

But do not say to the innocent because of the wicked who exploit, that you are wicked, for life must proceed and the happenings permitted to all. But if the wicked exploit they are of great hate, and if they strive to shed blood, you are capable of understanding.
But has any sent a messenger before me that this was to be the manner that he perceived much and communicated as was available to him. For prior to the Christ there were many who were producing truth that it is beginning to come through from the hands of them who might have communed in some manner with God, that it built to the messenger to prepare the way so that what was before is then yielding for the next to come, and the one after me is the Christ who died for your sins and is returning. Now if the angel is to come what will you expect of him? But I do not think you expect the Christ. Now the one prior to me was perceiving true things and writing them in with fiction and some of the things he wrote of were correct that the good have liked what is in closer proximity to the truth. But there is one to goes into small calamity and it is as if they cannot understand the meaning of what I write or that I state it might not be in any way known to him who would perceive some of the truth for he is using the Bible and so then is he, by his influences, to be an unwilling messenger to prepare the way because of what he took from his influences? But if God has said it, I will listen. For the Bible came before him and not he before the bible and if this is the truth I will believe it. But if there is prophecy that is more than I will believe God, and I will believe it when I have known that it is God who has said it. But the angel being on Earth has not known all, and if Christ came to Earth, and Elijah by woman as well, than you will expect that neither knew all? But there are some who have read the scriptures more than others. But I do not have a demon. Now I am wanting Christ’s words that are for me, because it is pleasing to me to have this, and why should I feel any remorse for not putting others before me in this way, because it would be his will. But I am not a Shepard to any of you for I cannot fulfill it. But you are a comfort to me and aid me on Earth with your good. Now I would direct you to the Christ and tell you it is not with understanding that any would worship the angel.
But if Babylonians are honouring God and the Christ know that due to their not being Christians or Jews, for they have not followed either, they commit profanity because their actions in not being Christians has made their honouring void and a profanity where it would have been better if they refused to honour unless they were saying I am not a Christian but have need of Him who died for me that I might not perish. For treating it so is not respectful to God and the one who says they believe in nothing had refused to prey, not being a fool, and has refused to honour Him, not being a fool, and you have said, the Babylonians who commit profanity are with us? But when you are in Heaven than I am desiring much that the truth of more be known to you when it is revealed by Him, that you might have greater understanding only I am satisfied with what I give you on this matter. For is anything only sport and does not all have great weight and consequence? For the one who is taking serious things seriously has claimed that these things can be the cause of wars and it is like a metephorical proverb in their mouths. For a fool has said in their heart there is no right and wrong and so I will not attack those who are better than Babylonians. But if any is one who says they believe nothing and yet they are a Babylonian they are a member of some cult of the devil, and it is not presently claimed what they are part of due to the blindness with which they attribute the cult to being something of innocence as if a thing like being a banker or dentist. But those not part of any cult and saying they believe nothing are not those of Babylon and they take what is serious to be serious.

But if Babylonians are honouring God and the Christ know that due to their not being Christians or Jews, for they have not followed either, they commit profanity because their actions in not being Christians has made their honouring void and a profanity where it would have been better if they refused to honour unless they were saying I am not a Christian but have need of Him who died for me that I might not perish. For treating it so is not respectful to God and the one who says they believe in nothing had refused to prey, not being a fool, and has refused to honour Him, not being a fool, and you have said, the Babylonians who commit profanity are with us? But when you are in Heaven than I am desiring much that the truth of more be known to you when it is revealed by Him, that you might have greater understanding only I am satisfied with what I give you on this matter. For is anything only sport and does not all have great weight and consequence? For the one who is taking serious things seriously has claimed that these things can be the cause of wars and it is like a metephorical proverb in their mouths. For a fool has said in their heart there is no right and wrong and so I will not attack those who are better than Babylonians. But if any is one who says they believe nothing and yet they are a Babylonian they are a member of some cult of the devil, and it is not presently claimed what they are part of due to the blindness with which they attribute the cult to being something of innocence as if a thing like being a banker or dentist. But those not part of any cult and saying they believe nothing are not those of Babylon and they take what is serious to be serious.

But if a terrorist thinks themselves a soldier or even a freedom fighter than they are against the soldiers and freedom fighters and they are not having the substance of men, whether men or women, that their voices might be heard like that of the wise woman’s who comes into the places of kings and queens where there are councillors, being permitted there. But if a terrorist is thinking themselves worthy to be a freedom fighter and they are not all men, both the men and women, than they are like a group of feeble-minded fools who are in confusion, and they are known by their mouths that they are not men. But if those of great ability being far more capable than men are to come upon them, than is it not a massacre and yet they have been killed by soldiers? But in recklessness and foolishness they waged attack and those who attack civilians have the advantage that they are more like those who break into houses to kill with guns that they are like them who plant bombs and do not reveal themselves. So if shoulders of great power are to slay them than how much substance did they have except it was the substance of those they attacked that those with nothing attacked those who possessed much more. Now does any man or woman in business give reward to thieves when they are attempting to steal saying the payment, the watering and the giving of resources will go to you who are a thief and squanders other’s work, who does not gain and produce good for themselves and others but goes from place to place to take what is not theirs as if all was pointless. For no justice can be commited with wickedness if there is not a contradiction, and no revenge can exist because of justice because what exceeds justice is not justice any longer. But in such a place as this there are theives who will steal what can be of no value to them, being like those who are rovving and commiting crimes in the hope they will be rewarded by kings or queens for what they do and what they steal. For there is riches and poverty both in this place and many of the best ones have been cast out to the streets and it is to be in the city as it is in Heaven. But to what I compare it? The good were cast out when the war began on God’s people, and the daughter is alone and with fear that she does not deserve because the wicked are all about to die of old age who did wrong. Now how is it to be said that a place is evil that is not so, but the wicked here are suicidal in what they do, and who is there to stop them if the soldiers are practising desperate measures and casting out offendors? For many are cast out by the wicked and some who offend are cast out by soldiers who are capable of knowing when a person is not to be cast out, so that some judgement is too harsh. But if one is for giving water and food and another for fighting what will any do but pray for the king of the place? Now the king or queen I have not known and they are over the city and are with those who desire that more wealth be given to the poor. Now I was spared from any hardship of the street and have always be and yet I have been in the land of Isaiah which is there, to be amongst those I did not sleep with, the women of that place. I have not betrayed any who did good to me and do not indulge discord, for wisdom must be had to know, that what belongs to God is His to have, only no great wrong was commited before my eyes. Now if the young are upon the streets and doing what they can than what is required for them first is shelter and money before they can properly indulge in more, and is this not understood? But in truth one requires a cigarette and no unsympathetic and evil critic, and money for food and money for shelter and money for other things. Now there are strong fools living in better places than these, and they are for contending with those better behaved than them, that strong fools have sought to punish when the grand-parents departed, because of the great love for the children’s children that they were not with their fathers. Now should it not be so that the child should be taken back because there is no shame? But do not do to any what provoked stubbornness where matters of parents and children are concerned because if the parent loves the child they are the parent. But if you consider casting any out because they are not tame than is it not because of God and you that they are not tame? But a parent is capable of loving all their children and the one causing contention with the parent is sometimes being swallowed by their love that you do not be casting out because of the things of God because the father is not there.

But if a terrorist thinks themselves a soldier or even a freedom fighter than they are against the soldiers and freedom fighters and they are not having the substance of men, whether men or women, that their voices might be heard like that of the wise woman’s who comes into the places of kings and queens where there are councillors being permitted there. But if a terrorist is thinking themselves worthy to be a freedom fighter and they are not all men, both the men and women, than they are like a group of feeble-minded fools who are in confusion, and they are known by their mouths that they are not men. But if those of great ability being far more capable than men are to come upon them, than is it not a massacre and yet they have been killed by soldiers? But in recklessness and foolishness they waged attack and those who attack civilians have the advantage that they are more like those who break into houses to kill with guns that they are like them who plant bombs and do not reveal themselves. So if shoulders of great power are to slay them than how much substance did they have except it was the substance of those they attacked that those with nothing attacked those who possessed much more. Now does any man or woman in business give reward to thieves when they are attempting to steal saying the payment, the watering and the giving of resources will go to you who are a thief and squanders other’s work, who does not gain and produce good for themselves and others but goes from place to place to take what is not theirs as if all was pointless. For no justice can be commited with wickedness if there is not a contradiction, and no revenge can exist because of justice because what exceeds justice is not justice any longer.

But if a terrorist thinks themselves a soldier or even a freedom fighter than they are against the soldiers and freedom fighters and they are not having the substance of men, whether men or women, that their voices might be heard like that of the wise woman’s who comes into the places of kings and queens where there are councillors, being permitted there. But if a terrorist is thinking themselves worthy to be a freedom fighter and they are not all men, both the men and women, than they are like a group of feeble-minded fools who are in confusion, and they are known by their mouths that they are not men. But if those of great ability being far more capable than men are to come upon them, than is it not a massacre and yet they have been killed by soldiers? But in recklessness and foolishness they waged attack and those who attack civilians have the advantage that they are more like those who break into houses to kill with guns that they are like them  who plant bombs and do not reveal themselves. So if shoulders of great power are to slay them than how much substance did they have except it was the substance of those they attacked that those with nothing attacked those who possessed much more. Now does any man or woman in business give reward to thieves when they are attempting to steal saying the payment, the watering and the giving of resources will go to you who are a thief and squanders other’s work, who does not gain and produce good for themselves and others but goes from place to place to take what is not theirs as if all was pointless. For no justice can be commited with wickedness if there is not a contradiction, and no revenge can exist because of justice because what exceeds justice is not justice any longer. But in such a place as this there are theives who will steal what can be of no value to them, being like those who are rovving and commiting crimes in the hope they will be rewarded by kings or queens for what they do and what they steal. For there is riches and poverty both in this place and many of the best ones have been cast out to the streets and it is to be in the city as it is in Heaven. But to what I compare it? The good were cast out when the war began on God’s people, and the daughter is alone and with fear that she does not deserve because the wicked are all about to die of old age who did wrong. Now how is it to be said that a place is evil that is not so, but the wicked here are suicidal in what they do, and who is there to stop them if the soldiers are practising desperate measures and casting out offendors? For many are cast out by the wicked and some who offend are cast out by soldiers who are capable of knowing when a person is not to be cast out, so that some judgement is too harsh. But if one is for giving water and food and another for fighting what will any do but pray for the king of the place? Now the king or queen I have not known and they are over the city and are with those who desire that more wealth be given to the poor. Now I was spared from any hardship of the street and have always be and yet I have been in the land of Isaiah which is there, to be amongst those I did not sleep with, the women of that place. I have not betrayed any who did good to me and do not indulge discord, for wisdom must be had to know, that what belongs to God is His to have, only no great wrong was commited before my eyes. Now if the young are upon the streets and doing what they can than what is required for them first is shelter and money before they can properly indulge in more, and is this not understood? But in truth one requires a cigarette and no unsympathetic and evil critic, and money for food and money for shelter and money for other things. Now there are strong fools living in better places than these.

But if a terrorist thinks themselves a soldier or even a freedom fighter than they are against the soldiers and freedom fighters and they are not having the substance of men, whether men or women, that their voices might be heard like that of the wise woman’s who comes into the places of kings and queens where there are councillors, being permitted there. But if a terrorist is thinking themselves worthy to be a freedom fighter and they are not all men, both the men and women, than they are like a group of feeble-minded fools who are in confusion, and they are known by their mouths that they are not men. But if those of great ability being far more capable than men are to come upon them, than is it not a massacre and yet they have been killed by soldiers? But in recklessness and foolishness they waged attack and those who attack civilians have the advantage that they are more like those who break into houses to kill with guns that they are like them who plant bombs and do not reveal themselves. So if shoulders of great power are to slay them than how much substance did they have except it was the substance of those they attacked that those with nothing attacked those who possessed much more. Now does any man or woman in business give reward to thieves when they are attempting to steal saying the payment, the watering and the giving of resources will go to you who are a thief and squanders other’s work, who does not gain and produce good for themselves and others but goes from place to place to take what is not theirs as if all was pointless. For no justice can be commited with wickedness if there is not a contradiction, and no revenge can exist because of justice because what exceeds justice is not justice any longer. But in such a place as this there are theives who will steal what can be of no value to them, being like those who are rovving and commiting crimes in the hope they will be rewarded by kings or queens for what they do and what they steal. For there is riches and poverty both in this place and many of the best ones have been cast out to the streets and it is to be in the city as it is in Heaven. But to what I compare it? The good were cast out when the war began on God’s people, and the daughter is alone and with fear that she does not deserve because the wicked are all about to die of old age who did wrong. Now how is it to be said that a place is evil that is not so, but the wicked here are suicidal in what they do, and who is there to stop them if the soldiers are practising desperate measures and casting out offendors? For many are cast out by the wicked and some who offend are cast out by soldiers who are capable of knowing when a person is not to be cast out, so that some judgement is too harsh. But if one is for giving water and food and another for fighting what will any do but pray for the king of the place? Now the king or queen I have not known and they are over the city and are with those who desire that more wealth be given to the poor. Now I was spared from any hardship of the street and have always be and yet I have been in the land of Isaiah which is there, to be amongst those I did not sleep with, the women of that place. I have not betrayed any who did good to me and do not indulge discord, for wisdom must be had to know, that what belongs to God is His to have, only no great wrong was commited before my eyes. Now if the young are upon the streets and doing what they can than what is required for them first is shelter and money before they can properly indulge in more, and is this not understood? But in truth one requires a cigarette and no unsympathetic and evil critic, and money for food and money for shelter and money for other things. Now there are strong fools living in better places than these, and they are for contending with those better behaved than them, that strong fools have sought to punish when the grand-parents departed, because of the great love for the children’s children that they were not with their fathers. Now should it not be so that the child should be taken back because there is no shame? But do not do to any what provoked stubbornness where matters of parents and children are concerned because if the parent loves the child they are the parent. But if you consider casting any out because they are not tame than is it not because of God and you that they are not tame? But a parent is capable of loving all their children and the one causing contention with the parent is sometimes being swallowed by their love that you do not be casting out because of the things of God because the father is not there. But there are those who harden their hearts against their child because the child is with the rich and poor and not with the middle of money, and they are as if stolen from the family like stolen bread and water that does not turn bitter but will be exceeding. So another, and not I, has stolen her, and so he is and yet he is not, like a picture that appears and then disappears. Like a picture appearing in water to disappear or in a mirror to disappear. For the leaves have been shed upon the grass and the day is sprinkled with dew that the wind gusts and there is a time and place to be opened by another.

But if a terrorist thinks themselves a soldier or even a freedom fighter than they are against the soldiers and freedom fighters and they are not having the substance of men, whether men or women, that their voices might be heard like that of the wise woman’s who comes into the places of kings and queens where there are councillors, being permitted there. But if a terrorist is thinking themselves worthy to be a freedom fighter and they are not all men, both the men and women, than they are like a group of feeble-minded fools who are in confusion, and they are known by their mouths that they are not men. But if those of great ability being far more capable than men are to come upon them, than is it not a massacre and yet they have been killed by soldiers? But in recklessness and foolishness they waged attack and those who attack civilians have the advantage that they are more like those who break into houses to kill with guns that they are like them who plant bombs and do not reveal themselves. So if shoulders of great power are to slay them than how much substance did they have except it was the substance of those they attacked that those with nothing attacked those who possessed much more. Now does any man or woman in business give reward to thieves when they are attempting to steal saying the payment, the watering and the giving of resources will go to you who are a thief and squanders other’s work, who does not gain and produce good for themselves and others but goes from place to place to take what is not theirs as if all was pointless. For no justice can be commited with wickedness if there is not a contradiction, and no revenge can exist because of justice because what exceeds justice is not justice any longer. But in such a place as this there are theives who will steal what can be of no value to them, being like those who are rovving and commiting crimes in the hope they will be rewarded by kings or queens for what they do and what they steal. For there is riches and poverty both in this place and many of the best ones have been cast out to the streets and it is to be in the city as it is in Heaven.

But if any group will not take seriously what is serious what will happen when justice comes to them because of foolishness carried to wickedness, that when justice is happening to their own there is bitter tears and sorrow for the pain, and yet they are betraying all that they have no right for retaliation because others were men.
 
But if any is offended by those who speak truth, to attack them in any way, they are in hell, and are to go there because it is where they are. For the kingdom of hell is having many who are on Earth, and if nothing is declared to them and they are even offended by words that are peaceful, being offended by truth that is not offensive to any who have honour and understanding, than these are in hell and going to hell, that their master is the anti-Christ, and if nothing was declared to them and yet they offer their voices to the messenger even, than it should be known that there will be a great divide between heaven and hell that they will not be able to trouble God’s people with their death, pain, and misery that was in their heart on Earth, because they were the servants of the devil.

But if any man is married to a Elsnon and is not an Elsnon himself, he is to be welcome, and the woman who marries a man who is an Elsnon becomes an Elsnon because of the marriage.
But if any soldier who is sworn to protect you being given a command from the king to protect you, and if he is going to the son or daughter who he has been commanded to protect and he is slandering them in accusation in his heart and condemning them with slander and attacking what is praise-worthy to the nation, and supported, that he is treasonous, than this is not loyal to the king or queen, and the queen will violate him with her might, and the king will utterly crush him, for so much as he condemned righteousness in two ways that he betrayed God and Ceaser both to attack one who pleaded both and was doing what was pleasing to both, so his member will be removed by righteousness and he will be unseemed from the knave to the chap, and your children will walk upon him in spirit because he will be ground to ashes. Now if he is stubborn and stiff necked he is not a Jew, and if he is attacking those he was commanded to protect that he would cause them to sin, he is then with the false prophet and even the devil has been wiser than him in his disobedience. For he is stiff necked by his entitlement and self contained in his willing ignorance that he does not regard the king or queen and does not regard God. Now this is one who partners with the devil to commit evil, and what he has been told to protect he seeks to kill and what he has been told to defend he seeks to destroy that he would destroy the land that he is in rebellion against that he might inherit it for himself, when there is none to be with him and he has a country against the nations. For he is strong by his ignorance that he wills and he is more insane than any by his ignorance and actions. If he has attacked even the angel and God than he is even the one who has a mill-stone tied to his ankles that he would sink to the bottom of the Ocean. Therefore rebellious fool do not concern yourself with a stiff neck that heeds no rebuke by ignorance for as you have betrayed all and are in treason against all you will receive worse than what you have done.

But if any soldier who is sworn to protect you being given a command from the king to protect you, and if he is going to the son or daughter who he has been commanded to protect and he is slandering them in accusation in his heart and condemning them with slander and attacking what is praise-worthy to the nation, and supported, that he is treasonous, than this is not loyal to the king or queen, and the queen will violate him with her might, and the king will utterly crush him, for so much as he condemned righteousness in two ways that he betrayed God and Ceaser both to attack one who pleases both and was doing what was pleasing to both, so his member will be removed by righteousness and he will be unseemed from the knave to the chap, and your children will walk upon him in spirit because he will be ground to ashes. Now if he is stubborn and stiff necked he is not a Jew, and if he is attacking those he was commanded to protect that he would cause them to sin, he is then with the false prophet and even the devil has been wiser than him in his disobedience. For he is stiff necked by his entitlement and self contained in his willing ignorance that he does not regard the king or queen and does not regard God. Now this is one who partners with the devil to commit evil, and what he has been told to protect he seeks to kill and what he has been told to defend he seeks to destroy that he would destroy the land that he is in rebellion against that he might inherit it for himself, when there is none to be with him and he has a country against the nations. For he is strong by his ignorance that he wills and he is more insane than any by his ignorance and actions. If he has attacked even the angel and God than he is even the one who has a mill-stone tied to his ankles that he would sink to the bottom of the Ocean. Therefore rebellious fool do not concern yourself with a stiff neck that heeds no rebuke by ignorance for as you have betrayed all and are in treason against all you will receive worse than what you have done.

But if any soldier who is sworn to protect you being given a command from the king to protect you, and if he is going to the son or daughter who he has been commanded to protect and he is slandering them in accusation in his heart and condemning them with slander and attacking what is praise-worthy to the nation, and supported, that he is treasonous, than this is not loyal to the king or queen, and the queen will violate him with her might, and the king will utterly crush him, for so much as he condemned righteousness in two ways that he betrayed God and Ceaser both to attack one who pleaded both and was doing what was pleasing to both, so his member will be removed by righteousness and he will be unseeded from the knave to the chap, and your children will walk upon him in spirit because he will be ground to ashes. Now if he is stubborn and stiff necked he is not a Jew, and if he is attacking those he was commanded to protect that he would cause them to sin, he is then with the false prophet and even the devil has been wiser than him in his disobedience. For he is stiff necked by his entitlement and self contained in his willing ignorance that he does not regard the king or queen and does not regard God. Now this is one who partners with the devil to commit evil, and what he has been told to protect he seeks to kill and what he has been told to defend he seeks to destroy that he would destroy the land that he is in rebellion against that he might inherit it for himself, when there is none to be with him and he has a country against the nations. For he is strong by his ignorance that he wills and he is more insane than any by his ignorance and actions. If he has attacked even the angel and God than he is even the one who has a mill-stone tied to his ankles that he would sink to the bottom of the Ocean. Therefore rebellious fool do not concern yourself with a stiff neck that heeds no rebuke by ignorance for as you have betrayed all and are in treason against all you will receive worse than what you have done.
But if any type of soldier or anyone who is of the justice of Babylon believes their duty is to now be wicked and to condemn the righteous, these are servants of the devil and the devil is beneath your feet. But if they speak with wrath and anger they do of the devil, for they are his and faithfully obey, for being filled with his substance they seek to condemn even God and if they have attempted to condemn Him do they not attempt to condemn you? But they cannot be grafted to what is righteous and the righteousness of others does not connect them. So they have taken even their own will from the devil, being his servants, and they have a heart to zeolously do his will. But if a servant of the devil should seek to murder the innocent is it not because he becomes a man of the devil? But those who slay civilians do not fight in battle unless they have opposition of combat. But if any of these is iniquiotious and with wrath towards a Christian who has commited no great crime they are already murderers of the innocent in their hearts. Now Judas will have it easier on the day of judgement than one of these who murders a Christian, because he threw the money back and hung himself. But you are holy ones and children of light and the devil is hating you.
But if the angel does not explain sufficiently, there is God, an afterlife, things sent to Earth, things having happened as written.
But if the person is for what is better than why do you take them among you? But if it is so that it must be, than will you not attempt that all should have what is better. But let many things happen when no person is being attacked, when no other person is troubled, because understanding is permitting and keeping away from that which must happen at times.
But if the person is for what is better than why do you take them among you? But if it is so that it must be, than will you not attempt that all should have what is better. But let many things happen when no person is being attacked, when no other person is troubled, because understanding is permitting and keeping away from that which must happen at times. So a king has
 said, can the people bear it if it is so? But the one who acts with wrath against their people are those who are for other things. But where there is wrath against the people from the king or queen than there is wrong that is done. Now if there is not wrong by truth than the judgement is not seemly. 
But it is good to not be ignorant. Now where does this person not belong? For they have come to be among the kingdom of Heaven, and not to become one of them. Now will the devil be meddling with the kingdom and it be called good? But do not think you are the devil, and he would not be without the knowledge of his being. But the way in is by another place and you keep the world, which is nothing and worthless, and seek to enter because of what you have gained by the religion of the world which is no religion. But is God not for accepting you? Indeed he must be, and he who would be great in the kingdom will be directed to what is right.
But it is good to not be ignorant. Now where does this person not belong? For they have come to be among the kingdom of Heaven, and not to become one of them. Now will the devil be meddling with the kingdom and it be called good? But do not think you are the devil, and he would not be without the knowledge of his being. But the way in is by another place and you keep the world, which is nothing and worthless, and seek to enter because of what you have gained by the religion of the world which is no religion. But is God not for accepting you? Indeed he must be, and he who would be great in the kingdom will be directed to what is right.
But let it be another people going to Neptune who are wise, who are restrained and diligent, and what are they to find? But such is a planet for holy prophets and good tidings and good serpants who do not give venom, unless it is them in the sea. Now let it be a place of silver and no gold of Babel, but a place of delicate peace and the cool of crystal snow and a place of purity and violet and blue and the purple hues where the house is with roofs that are visible and doors of integrity and silver of integrity. Now will it be taken by the people I attacked and with love? But let Neptune be adorned with modesty and pretty beauty and the ornaments that bring beauty and the light coming from purity when the Lord is establishing, when He is placing a throne and giving His deed, so that nations rejoice, so that a nation proven is bringing intense discipline and good tidings. 
But let it be another people going to Neptune who are wise, who are restrained and diligent, and what are they to find? But such is a planet for holy prophets and good tidings and good serpants who do not give venom, unless it is them in the sea. Now let it be a place of silver and no gold of Babel, but a place of delicate peace and the cool of crystal snow and a place of purity and violet and blue and the purple hues where the house is with roofs that are visible and doors of integrity and silver of integrity. Now will it be taken by the people I attacked and with love? But let Neptune be adorned with modesty and pretty beauty and the ornaments that bring beauty and the light coming from purity when the Lord is establishing, when He is placing a throne and giving His deed, so that nations rejoice, so that a nation proven is bringing intense discipline and good tidings. 
But let the civilians of every shade, all be Elsnon, stay out of their war so that they are not able to turn any against the other and sow discord. But if they fire even that flaming mass from a catipult over our wall let none be injured and aid our own and let not the shouts and attempts from outside the gate cause discord between us for we are Elsnon. Now if one is a god or something else let it not be counted as wrong that he is so, but there are different types in our society and not all are brothers and sisters, and yet we are Elsnon and civilians to the war they wage. For the rich of the good lands are even capable of being among you, not being Babylonians and the lacking that they are, but being doers of what is wise and performers of what is wise that they are for being with good tidings and the behaviour of what goes well, and yet outside those doing war are fighting with what we do not know and cannot know for they attempt to pull us into their conflicts at times that civilians might die, and which sides hate the city we do not know. But the gate is strong and yet enemies break in and walk among us clothed like us and portraying themselves at first to be one of us, and yet their evil shows they are of the soldiers who fight outside the walls that they might fight some of us and sow discord to draw us into the war. Now seperate and fight their wars and we will be destroyed because they cannot war with us as they would like because of the city walls. But even Babylon defends us in this thing although their soldiers are often slow to bring aid of combat, and yet their army is mightier than all of those who wage war around us. For their mighty men are of great ability and their spies are for us if they will not be traitors. For the mighty men of Babylon are from a city not Babylon and it’s corruption, and they are not fighting yet for any corrupt thing of Babylon.
But none ever claimed you could use philosophy in an argument. For we communicate with what we do, and there is a time and place for what is good.
But one by wickedness does not comprehend conventions of another’s speech in judgement, for they are enraged with jelousy, but there is a servant who is close to blameless.
But one by wickedness does not comprehend conventions of another’s speech in judgement, for they are enraged with jelousy, but there is a servant who is close to blameless.
But out of time and place is it not animal that is threatened? But their reasons are irrelevant to what they do with mouth and deed.
But out of time and place is it not animal that is threatened? But their reasons are irrelevant to what they do with mouth and deed.
But the Lord God, His works I have seen, that He takes much action on Earth, for He can cause a nation to crumble without war or enemy on Earth.
But the Lord God, His works I have seen, that He takes much action on Earth, for He can cause a nation to crumble without war or enemy on Earth. Now I have seen Him pour out wrath, and my heart did not rejoice. Now I have seen projections of those whose hearts request to be judged, that all the Earth obeys the Lord. Now by choice and by obedience people are obeying and the Lord is strategist and the Christ is His son. Now the angel is the Christ’s servant and on Earth there are those acting in war that they are in the realm of war, and there are those compromising that they trade for another thing, and there are those being tempted, that they must endure, and there are those commited to obedience, that they give of themselves. Now those storing up for God are doing wisely and another stores up for riches of money. Now one stores up for blessing with commitment that they are strategic. Now by the wisdom of a man there is the Jews and all knowledge of right and wrong, and with the Christ knowledge and wisdom of angels as well as knowledge and wisdom of all. Now wisdom of an angel is not replacing what is right for the Jews and those who are Jews as if lost tribes that are found by Christ. Now the Christ can return them, but do they not instruct of the Christ? Now Islam is the wisdom of a people and the angel cannot confirm the presence of an angel or deny. Now it is not poor but does not seem rich and it is the wisdom for those who received it. Now which wisdom is required for the Jews? But if the lost tribes are returned by the Christ do they not instruct the younger of the Christ? But the lost tribes have made benifit as pillars among other peoples.
But the Lord God, His works I have seen, that He takes much action on Earth, for He can cause a nation to crumble without war or enemy on Earth. Now I have seen Him pour out wrath, and my heart did not rejoice. Now I have seen projections of those whose hearts request to be judged.
But the nation of peace conquered all and purified it from the destruction, the place of the conduit between the city and Earth, that the good of God might come to rest from above and remove the people of the devil’s from the face of the Earth.
But the servant who hates men has considered his mother stupid if he is weasel, that it is only jelousy of the sibling that drives him to seek favour, for his mother has believed in morality but he has not from a young child. Now he is not having right relationship with women that he is constantly seeking to deceive as a weasel and coward, that he has hated his mother and been alienated from men and women.
But the servant who hates men has considered his mother stupid if he is weasel, that it is only jelousy of the sibling that drives him to seek favour, for his mother has believed in morality but he has not from a young child. Now he is not having right relationship with women that he is constantly seeking to deceive as a weasel and coward, that he has hated his mother and been alienated from men and women.
But there is sympathy that is injustice and wickedness, and the one who gives is it is lower than they might seem, that when justice is delivered they should not be insolent to say they were doing them good, but the one who is with wisdom, fearing God, is respectful of justice, and their ear is for correction, when it is justice, that there are fools in the land and yet the limits of a righteous people do not change, even when the land is plagued with violence and brutality, when theives are abundant, and prostitutes walk about with bruises, and wickedness is heard calling out in the streets, so the remnant will keep what is good, saving that which is to be shown to God, that there is love for the people,
 that they make the land right, that they do what is good.
But there is sympathy that is injustice and wickedness, and the one who gives is it is lower than they might seem, that when justice is delivered they should not be insolent to say they were doing them good, but the one who is with wisdom, fearing God, is respectful of justice, and their ear is for correction, when it is justice, that there are fools in the land and yet the limits of a righteous people do not change, even when the land is plagued with violence and brutality, when theives are abundant, and prostitutes walk about with bruises, and wickedness is heard calling out in the streets, so the remnant will keep what is good, saving that which is to be shown to God, that there is love for the people, that they might make the land right, that they do what is good.
But there is the anti-atheist who goes to the street and when they find a home they are cast out again to the street. Now if they are belonging in this place than on Earth they have found the place for them that they are where it is fitting for them, but it is not always so with them that they are made homeless. For a human, do not allow it. For a human says it is only what people do, when they perform what is right when the action is not great. But there have been animals who are among society and not homeless, and do not be amazed, because the world has permitted it. Now a human is more wealthy than any animal because a golden covering of pure gold for an animal and a pen of pure gold is for a spectacle. Does the animal know tricks to do tasks? But the human is far more excellent than that and of greater wealth and they have nobility. Now the one who exalts the animal is a servant, because they dwell with the beast, in spirit, where they are kept in spirit, the animal being the servant’s friend. 
But there is the anti-atheist who goes to the street and when they find a home they are cast out again to the street. Now if they are belonging in this place than on Earth they have found the place for them that they are where it is fitting for them, but it is not always so with them that they are made homeless. For a human, do not allow it. For a human says it is only what people do, when they perform what is right when the action is not great. But there have been animals who are among society and not homeless, and do not be amazed, because the world has permitted it. Now a human is more wealthy than any animal because a golden covering of pure gold for an animal and a pen of pure gold is for a spectacle. Does the animal know tricks to do tasks? But the human is far more excellent than that and of greater wealth and they have nobility. Now the one who exalts the animal is a servant, because they dwell with the beast, in spirit, where they are kept in spirit, the animal being the servant’s friend. 
But there is the anti-atheist who goes to the street and when they find a home they are cast out again to the street. Now if they are belonging in this place than on Earth they have found the place for them that they are where it is fitting for them, but it is not always so with them that they are made homeless. For a human, do not allow it. For a human says it is only what people do, when they perform what is right when the action is not great. But there have been animals who are among society and not homeless, and do not be amazed, because the world has permitted it. Now a human is more wealthy than any animal because a golden covering of pure gold for an animal and a pen of pure gold is for a spectacle. Does the animal know tricks to do tasks? But the human is far more excellent than that and of greater wealth and they have nobility. Now the one who exalts the animal is a servant, because they dwell with the beast, in spirit, where they are kept in spirit, the animal being the servant’s friend. 
But there is the anti-atheist who goes to the street and when they find a home they are cast out again to the street. Now if they are belonging in this place than on Earth they have found the place for them that they are where it is fitting for them, but it is not always so with them that they are made homeless. For a human, do not allow it. For a human says it is only what people do, when they perform what is right when the action is not great. But there have been animals who are among society and not homeless, and do not be amazed, because the world has permitted it. Now a human is more wealthy than any animal because a golden covering of pure gold for an animal and a pen of pure gold is for a spectacle. Does the animal know tricks to do tasks? But the human is far more excellent than that and of greater wealth and they have nobility. Now the one who exalts the animal is a servant, because they dwell with the beast, in spirit, where they are kept in spirit, the animal being the servant’s friend. 
But they are suspicious of truth and attack because it is not in the low Babylonian way of speaking that is filled with deception and lies.
But they dismiss Jupiter by respect of persons, or will they not? Now they dismiss Jupiter with slander of Saturn, but will they? But they dismiss with concealment, saying it is not. Now the serpent did not intend to devour but to aid. But they dismiss with distraction, and such is strategy as if war. Now they dismiss with lies and bury defence and such is like war. Now the dog-thing is dog, for the beast is spirit and the dogs are his servants. Now Babylon changes truth to be acceptable to Babylonians and do the wise require an angel? But the realm of philosophers is preferable, and Babylon has been casting out all not Babylon. Now it is not forbidden to be learning so you might have knowledge of the language that Babylon finds acceptable for you are translator and aid to God’s people. Now Babylon has its blinding statue for blinding and distracting and it has its furnace and it has its statue to be bowed to by those in Babylon. Now is not Daniel aiding and yet being concealed, for he is as a spy and yet good to be truly loyal. Now what has the king by Mala? But he has his wives, for the cults are his wives and one wife is the cult that is the truth, for the true religion was the king’s favourite. Now this is a thing pertaining to kings. Now schools of thought were to be taken from one’s own people that they not lead astray. Now the angel has the furnace in the Universe and yet has not used it. But Frued he has used in one thing and yet two things. Now there is nothing wrong for the wise to be using the furnace in the Universe. But the soldiers of cities have said, attack as you please and we arrest those we hate, for they are forbidden to defence, and the king of Babylon has killed them all and replaced them because they used the complicated fashion of the order from the throne. Now was the book different for a time because of the Jews who would not bow to the soldiers? For the soldiers are servants of Babylon and the sign is a man, being a servant who is upon Earth in places. Now each thing has a representative on Earth, and such soldiers loyal to God have another representative. Now three young wise men, did they not have an angel? But a church by Mala, is it not having an angel? Now Avram, Abraham, was visited by angels. Now the Christ commands the angel.
But they dismiss Jupiter by respect of persons, or will they not? Now they dismiss Jupiter with slander of Saturn, but will they? But they dismiss with concealment, saying it is not. Now the serpent did not intend to devour but to aid. But they dismiss with distraction, and such is strategy. Now they dismiss with lies and bury defence. Now the dog-thing is dog, for the beast is spirit. Now Babylon changes truth to be acceptable to Babylonians and do the wise require an angel? But the realm of philosophers is preferable, and Babylon has been casting out all not Babylon. Now it is not forbidden to be learning so you might have knowledge of the language that Babylon finds acceptable for you are translator and aid to God’s people. Now Babylon has its blinding statue for blinding and distracting and it has its furnace. Now is not Daniel aiding and yet being concealed? Now what has the king by Mala? But he has the interests that are his wives, for the cults are his wives and one wife is the cult that is the truth, for the true religion was the king’s favourite. Now this is a thing pertaining to kings. Now schools of thought were to be taken from one’s own people only that they not lead astray, but who is wise enough? Now the angel has the furnace in the Universe and yet has not used it. But Frued he has used in one thing and yet two things. Now there is nothing wrong for the wise to be using the furnace in the Universe. But the soldiers of cities have said, attack as you please and we arrest those we hate, and the king of Babylon has killed them all and replaced them because they used the complicated fashion of the order from the throne that the book was different for a time because of the Jews who would not bow to the soldiers for they are servants of Babylon and the sign is a man, being a servant who is upon Earth in places. Now each thing has a representative on Earth, and such soldiers loyal to God have another representative. Now three young wise men, are they not having an angel? But a church by Mala, a form, is it not having an angel? Now Avram, Abraham, was visited by angels. Now the Christ commands the angel.
But they dismiss Jupiter by respect of persons, or will they not? Now they dismiss Jupiter with slander of Saturn, but will they? But they dismiss with concealment, saying it is not. Now the serpent did not intend to devour but to aid. But they dismiss with distraction, and such is strategy. Now they dismiss with lies and bury defence. Now the dog-thing is dog, for the beast is spirit. Now Babylon changes truth to
 be acceptable to Babylonians and do the wise require an angel? But the realm of philosophers is preferable, and Babylon has been casting out all not Babylon. Now it is not forbidden to be learning so you might have knowledge of the language that Babylon finds acceptable for you are translator and aid to God’s people. Now Babylon has its blinding statue for blinding and distracting and it has its furnace. Now is not Daniel aiding and yet being concealed? Now what has the king by Mala? But he has the interests that are his wives, for the cults are his wives and one wife is the cult that is the truth, for the true religion was the king’s favourite. Now this is a thing pertaining to kings. 
But they dismiss Jupiter by respect of persons, or will they not? Now they dismiss Jupiter with slander of Saturn, but will they? But they dismiss with concealment, saying it is not. Now the serpent did not intend to devour but to aid. But they dismiss with distraction, and such is strategy. Now they dismiss with lies and bury defence. Now the dog-thing is dog, for the beast is spirit. Now Babylon changes truth to be acceptable to Babylonians and do the wise require an angel? But the realm of philosophers is preferable, and Babylon has been casting out all not Babylon. Now it is not forbidden to be learning so you might have knowledge of the language that Babylon finds acceptable for you are translator and aid to God’s people. Now Babylon has its blinding statue for blinding and distracting and it has its furnace. Now is not Daniel aiding and yet being concealed? Now what has the king by Mala? But he has the interests that are his wives, for the cults are his wives and one wife is the cult that is the truth, for the true religion was the king’s favourite. Now this is a thing pertaining to kings. Now schools of thought were to be taken from one’s own people only that they not lead astray, but who is wise enough? Now the angel has the furnace in the Universe and yet has not used it. But Frued he has used in one thing and yet two things. Now there is nothing wrong for the wise to be using the furnace in the Universe. But the soldiers of cities have said, attack as you please and we arrest those we hate, and the king of Babylon has killed them all and replaced them because they used the complicated fashion of the order from the throne that the book was different for a time because of the Jews who would not bow to the soldiers for they are servants of Babylon and the sign is a man, being a servant who is upon Earth in places. Now each thing has a representative on Earth, and such soldiers loyal to God have another representative. Now three young wise men, are they not having an angel? But a church by Mala, a form, is it not having an angel? Now Avram, Abraham, was visited by angels. Now the Christ commands the angel.
But they dismiss Jupiter by respect of persons, or will they not? Now they dismiss Jupiter with slander of Saturn, but will they? But they dismiss with concealment, saying it is not. Now the serpent did not intend to devour but to aid. But they dismiss with distraction, and such is strategy as if war. Now they dismiss with lies and bury defence and such is like war. Now the dog-thing is dog, for the beast is spirit and the dogs are his servants. Now Babylon changes truth to be acceptable to Babylonians and do the wise require an angel? But the realm of philosophers is preferable, and Babylon has been casting out all not Babylon. Now it is not forbidden to be learning so you might have knowledge of the language that Babylon finds acceptable for you are translator and aid to God’s people. Now Babylon has its blinding statue for blinding and distracting and it has its furnace and it has its statue to be bowed to by those in Babylon. Now is not Daniel aiding and yet being concealed, for he is as a spy and yet good to be truly loyal. Now what has the king by Mala? But he has his wives, for the cults are his wives and one wife is the cult that is the truth, for the true religion was the king’s favourite. Now this is a thing pertaining to kings. Now schools of thought were to be taken from one’s own people that they not lead astray. Now the angel has the furnace in the Universe and yet has not used it. But Frued he has used in one thing and yet two things. Now there is nothing wrong for the wise to be using the furnace in the Universe. But the soldiers of cities have said, attack as you please and we arrest those we hate, for they are forbidden to defence, and the king of Babylon has killed them all and replaced them because they used the complicated fashion of the order from the throne. Now was the book different for a time because of the Jews who would not bow to the soldiers? For the soldiers are servants of Babylon and the sign is a man, being a servant who is upon Earth in places. Now each thing has a representative on Earth, and such soldiers loyal to God have another representative. Now three young wise men, did they not have an angel? But a church by Mala, is it not having an angel? Now Avram, Abraham, was visited by angels. Now the Christ commands the angel.
But those from all shades have become all things, animals to the lake of fire, servants to the bottom of the Ocean, and yet if the remnant of people fight amongst themselves are most of them not meant to be fellow slave owners by the Lord’s giving? For what cause can they contend in this thing, for the Lord is having the Universe.
But what is the cause of this change for evil that has happened? But a man has then known, I do not go where the river would take me, but there is justice neglected to do in some matter, therefore I do justice.
But when Ahab was king and the soldiers of Babylon marched towards Elijah rather than speak wickedness what does he say? But if I am clean, a man of God, he speaks.
But when Ahab was king and the soldiers of Babylon marched towards Elijah rather than speak wickedness what does he say? But if I am clean, a man of God, he speaks.
But when are Enoch bringing down a mammoth? But they are fishing and there are smaller things.
But who has aided Lucifer? But did David not aid him? Now who is going under to conquer and not in opposition? But is it not Joshua? Now Lucifer has thought, it is good what Joshua does, and I will tear at the walls of Babel and it will be restored because it is being torn down and restored, and it will be dark brown, light brown, and white, and dark gold will adorn it, and the light from the city of Ijeshil will be upon it as the rebels act out their routines, and yet those who would aid me willingly will be restored, for their hearts to be in agreeance will restore them and to a greater status. For rebellious fools have murdered with ignorance and let them add a second ignorance. But let those who are restored who are of wisdom confirm what I say, because I have placed golden lions on either side of my throne because too many fell below ur.
C for exchange potential
Two parties.
Something of value.
Communication-delivery.
Accept-reject.
Appropriate or desirable to deal with other party

Ben greater than cost f/e

More imp- perceived value
Actual value-costs
Utilitarian=func benifit 
Emotional benifit

Societal process most likely refers to the more utilitarian/functional aspects of marketing - buying and selling and what it entails. How can overpricing product perceived value use emotional factors to increase both sales and perceived value? What other strategies can be used to increase perceived value? Apple is millennial status. Microsoft is functional. Can Microsoft become both mellenial status and functional? Can they steal back the science fiction future?

Cust will consider exchange when Ben begins greater than cost (petm)

Marketing - orginizational function - verb for marketing.

Upgrades are for marketing to include buyer. Not releasing perfect product for marketing to include buyer in upgrade.
Charges and effects of charges (attract, repel) to destroy cells and the possibility of increasing charges exclusively in cancerous cells. Syringe injection surgery on inoperable tumour using software to inject changing chemical that will kill cells. Possibility of injecting chemical with a high charge or cell poison which software can map the tumour in three demensions and administer cell poison with supervision of syringe surgery specialist certified in tumour surgery. Poison might hault spread and form firm gell millimeters from injection site then decay and become harmless to be absorbed into blood stream and ejected from body like killed flu.
￼
Charges and effects of charges (attract, repel) to destroy cells and the possibility of increasing charges exclusively in cancerous cells. Syringe injection surgery on inoperable tumour using software to inject changing chemical that will kill cells. Possibility of injecting chemical with a high charge or cell poison which software can map the tumour in three demensions and administer cell poison with supervision of syringe surgery specialist certified in tumour surgery. Poison might hault spread and form firm gell millimeters from injection site then decay and become harmless to be absorbed into blood stream and ejected from body like killed flu.
￼
Concerning what has been said I do not know if much was added to His word in the letters of disciples, or if any of it was from His word, only there are wise words and then many paragraphs of small matters and certainly ancient people knew about how to sow discord in an enemy nation before war. The discord was likely meant to cause chaos and weaken the nation, and if for some reason the Christians and Jews joining forces was to be viewed as a possible threat the attempts at dealing with pety matters with horrendously devisive wording might make sense if an attempt was made to break a single book of Christian wisdom into many
 parts so that paragraphs of lesser matters might be added for other purposes. Certainly a fearful Roman intelligence force could plant such documents and possibly after the death of all the original disciples. Of course this might cause an embarrassed dismay among non-Jewish Christians to view such a failure by non-Jews early on, but perhaps this is the reality we might have to admit, a failure and yet possibly true. Certainly we can admit that the apostles words are worded so that they might be seen as devisive and it is my belief that much was added that would not be deemed worthy of a Bible’s attention due to how trivial some of the matters seem to be. As for the other books, I have no comment on them, and my scrutiny was only towards much that is found in the letters. Now as for discord it is sowed for the purpose of strength or weakness. I will not write an obvious lie to be used as propaganda when it has been dealt with by others. But where attempts to sow discord become hostile our known fools who have not bettered themselves are now attempting to impair their own people and this sometimes with attempts that harass and cause grief that their own people should be impaired. Now sub-concoius envy seeks to impair others when a person is impaired, that envy seeks equality, being that offensive action can transform jealousy to envy and by outward attempts transformations are made. So the accuser is to be doing the will of what is not considered better, and yet there are many who accuse who do so in the way of light, which belongs to God that there is good truth that is motivated by truth. Now if all of those who open their mouths against the realm of Beelzebub accuse than the accuser of truth is not motivated by the lesser things, but the better things in the realm of God. What waters will be watered and a generous soul will be made fat, that the one who is restored who was greatly generous is not to be considered because of the will of the one who deceived and seeks evil. Now if none had said it or written it than the angel would not have, only, I believe, to offer his wisdom in a better way because the gate is to be left open by the one who does not perceive the threat of war. Now do not allow the children, being adults, who are in Beelzebub’s house accuse the disciple or any of doing wrong in this matter because God’s will is for them to do good, that you do not add some judgement that is not from God or men, but a matter of personal choice, and the same is for stating my consideration for the Jews, where they might be, knowing that God knows which are His in this fashion. But let not God’s inheritance attack Him when we are united, because the Pharases were not of Abraham and those who would kill His son not found in honour of God. But Jews are born of and raised by non-Jews and more are with remnant of Israel and the anti-Christ is severely hating all who are worshiping God.
Concerning what has been said I do not know if much was added to His word in the letters of disciples, or if any of it was from His word, only there are wise words and then many paragraphs of small matters and certainly ancient people knew about how to sow discord in an enemy nation before war. The discord was likely meant to cause chaos and weaken the nation, and if for some reason the Christians and Jews joining forces was to be viewed as a possible threat the attempts at dealing with pety matters with horrendously devisive wording might make sense if an attempt was made to break a single book of Christian wisdom into many parts so that paragraphs of lesser matters might be added for other purposes. Certainly a fearful Roman intelligence force could plant such documents and possibly after the death of all the original disciples. Of course this might cause an embarrassed dismay among non-Jewish Christians to view such a failure by non-Jews early on, but perhaps this is the reality we might have to admit, a failure and yet possibly true. Certainly we can admit that the apostles words are worded so that they might be seen as devisive and it is my belief that much was added that would not be deemed worthy of a Bible’s attention due to how trivial some of the matters seem to be. As for the other books, I have no comment on them, and my scrutiny was only towards much that is found in the letters. Now as for discord it is sowed for the purpose of strength or weakness. I will not write an obvious lie to be used as propaganda when it has been dealt with by others. But where attempts to sow discord become hostile our known fools who have not bettered themselves are now attempting to impair their own people and this sometimes with attempts that harass and cause grief that their own people should be impaired. Now sub-concoius envy seeks to impair others when a person is impaired, that envy seeks equality, being that offensive action can transform jealousy to envy and by outward attempts transformations are made. So the accuser is to be doing the will of what is not considered better, and yet there are many who accuse who do so in the way of light, which belongs to God that there is good truth that is motivated by truth. Now if all of those who open their mouths against the realm of Beelzebub accuse than the accuser of truth is not motivated by the lesser things, but the better things in the realm of God. What waters will be watered and a generous soul will be made fat, that the one who is restored who was greatly generous is not to be considered because of the will of the one who deceived and seeks evil. Now if none had said it or written it than the angel would not have, only, I believe, to offer his wisdom in a better way because the gate is to be left open by the one who does not perceive the threat of war. Now do not allow the children, being adults, who are in Beelzebub’s house accuse the disciple or any of doing wrong in this matter because God’s will is for them to do good, that you do not add some judgement that is not from God or men, but a matter of personal choice, and the same is for stating my consideration for the Jews, where they might be, knowing that God knows which are His in this fashion. But let not God’s inheritance attack Him when we are united, because the Pharases were not of Abraham and those who would kill His son not found in honour of God. But Jews are born of and raised by non-Jews and more are with remnant of Israel and the anti-Christ is severely hating all who are worshiping God.

Concerning what has been said I do not know if much was added to His word in the letters of disciples, or if any of it was from His word, only there are wise words and then many paragraphs of small matters and certaintly ancient people knew about how to sow discord in an enemy nation before war. The discord was likely meant to cause chaos and weaken the nation, and if for some reason the Christians and Jews joining forces was to be viewed as a possible threat the attempts at dealing with pety matters with horrendously devisive wording might make sense if an attempt was made to break a single book of Christian wisdom into many parts so that paragraphs of lesser matters might be added for other purposes. Certainly a fearful Roman intelligence force could plant such documents and possibly after the death of all the original disciples. Of course this might cause an embarrassed dismay among non-Jewish Christians to view such a failure by non-Jews early on, but perhaps this is the reality we might have to admit, a failure and yet possibly true. Certainly we can admit that the apostles words are worded so that they might be seen as devisive and is my belief that much was added that would not be deemed worthy of a Bible’s attention due to how trivial some of the matters seem to be. As for the other books, I have no comment on them, and my scrutiny was only towards much that is found in the letters.

Did they not know that they said differently? But the devil’s soldiers have greater self-control than the Lord’s people. For the devil’s soldiers are not able to do what they are made to do because of morality on Earth.


Different groups of people deal with problems in different ways. Translations- conversions are different. Some people consciously act to adjust their state and behaviour while others translate-compensate more.




  





Do not stoop to an enemies level if you have God, rendering what was rendered, because as they add to their wrongs so they descend and you are then to be greater than them, and loved by God.

Do not stoop to an enemies level if you have God, rendering what was rendered, because as they add to their wrongs so they descend and you are then to be greater than them, and loved by God.

Does the sub-conscious manifest itself in projection when it percieves that it—the person it is part of—deserves to be punished or eradicated demanding what would eradicate it.

Does the sub-conscious manifest itself in projection when it percieves that it—the person it is part of—deserves to be punished or eradicated demanding what would eradicate it.

Due to cultural restraints and problems I am pleased to be honest but due to the wrong stategy being relied upon with rudeness occuring it is difficult not to note the changes it has commited to our languages so the heavy implications are now added to what might have had no or little implications many centuries prior. Of course there is no excuse offered here to rationalize the foolishness of assigning implications in other places as some do who have problems of stubborn certainty when subjectively validating which due to stubborness they are unable to abandon. These also make large assumptions and are gripped by stubborness in their assumptions, for they have cores of iron in their chests and heads and are not easily capable of giving up assumptions. Of course it is insanity and Babel has restrained many of the devil’s people by seeking truth in matters of social and anti-social as they call it, or the truth about how society functions. Now if any has forced Babel to be aiding injustice than it is Babel’s place to employ gold and refuse work when such is proceeding too far, and that there should be a strict separation for this reason, that opinion is in one catagory which includes what is given to students, for it can be corrupted, and only that which belongs in Babel and is Babel can be using the emblems of Babel, that there be nothing else, either one thing or the other, for if there is anything else it will create the same problem for they will call it the same, for they are made inevitable by force because of contention, for contention forces what is inevitable, and none arrests any for it by nature. But it can be told by truth that not even what is given to students is free of opinion that is not known. For I give opinion, and the ability of the serpant is what testifies and yet nothing more.

Due to cultural restraints and problems I am pleased to be honest but due to the wrong stategy being relied upon with rudeness occuring it is difficult not to note the changes it has commited to our languages so the heavy implications are now added to what might have had no or little implications many centuries prior. Of course there is no excuse offered here to rationalize the foolishness of assigning implications in other places as some do who have problems of stubborn certainty when subjectively validating which due to stubborness they are unable to abandon. These also make large assumptions and are gripped by stubborness in their assumptions, for they have cores of iron in their chests and heads and are not easily capable of giving up assumptions. Of course it is insanity and Babel has restrained many of the devil’s people by seeking truth in matters of social and anti-social as they call it, or the truth about how society functions. Now if any has forced Babel to be aiding injustice than it is Babel’s place to employ gold and refuse work when such is proceeding too far, and that there should be a strict separation for this reason, that opinion is in one catagory which includes what is given to students, for it can be corrupted, and only that which belongs in Babel and is Babel can be using the emblems of Babel, that there be nothing else, either one thing or the other, for if there is anything else it will create the same problem for they will call it the same, for they are made inevitable by force because of contention, for contention forces what is inevitable, and none arrests any for it by nature. But it can be told by truth that not even what is given to students is free of opinion that is not known. For I give opinion, and the ability of the serpant is what testifies and yet nothing more. Now I offer what must be offered because of God, and the Christ came eating and drinking, and so I know of the truth and what is wise and what aids, for because of what was not intended for evil I must provide polite apology due to culture which is in most of the world, that what must be said is requiring new words and separations, for I call it the enclosed plain that is for any religion but only for religion in which truth might be delivered that is not for society because it is for religion without evil implications attached that are attached in our language when people are spoken of because they do not speak in an academic setting where such implications would not exist, and those who teach Babel have ruined even this because of their repeated and clear violations that have been viewed as disgraceful, so that Babel has lost ground because they have not maintained security. Now if academic settings are still an enclosed plain it is not the same plain as it should be because it has become eroded due to disgraceful words when people were not given the chance to defend themselves such as words that are for the street and fighting, which when commited with such cowardice I am for slaying them if it is given by God, that these are the same as kings who rebel against God, and yet not kings, for to use a neutral plain in this way is reason for more wrath because it profanes the nobility of the holiness of learning, even when some blasphemes God. Now yet they are not to be slayn for such, but it is a disgrace and wicked, for the one who has no remorse is not even for repentance. Now what is in the enclosed plain is having no implications and the words of scholars are not meant to have evil implication given, and yet they have been added by those who profane and blaspheme, for they are with many hostilities. Now if any is looking towards a neighbour as a leader of a nation than they are having respect of persons and as for what is not their business, they are fearing God and respecting themselves.

Due to cultural restraints and problems I am pleased to be honest but due to the wrong stategy being relied upon with rudeness occuring it is difficult not to note the changes it has commited to our languages so the heavy implications are now added to what might have had no or little implications many centuries prior. Of course there is no excuse offered here to rationalize the foolishness of assigning implications in other places as some do who have problems of stubborn certainty when subjectively validating which due to stubborness they are unable to abandon. These also make large assumptions and are gripped by stubborness in their assumptions, for they have cores of iron in their chests and heads and are not easily capable of giving up assumptions. Of course it is insanity and Babel has restrained many of the devil’s people by seeking truth in matters of social and anti-social as they call it, or the truth about how society functions. Now if any has forced Babel to be aiding injustice than it is Babel’s place to employ gold and refuse work when such is proceeding too far, and that there should be a strict separation for this reason, that opinion is in one catagory which includes what is given to students, for it can be corrupted, and only that which belongs in Babel and is Babel can be using the emblems of Babel, that there be nothing else, either one thing or the other, for if there is anything else it will create the same problem for they will call it the same, for they are made inevitable by force because of contention, for contention forces what is inevitable, and none arrests any for it by nature. But it can be told by truth that not even what is given to students is free of opinion that is not known. For I give opinion, and the ability of the serpant is what testifies and yet nothing more. Now I offer what must be offered because of God, and the Christ came eating and drinking, and so I know of the truth and what is wise and what aids, for because of what was not intended for evil I must provide polite apology due to culture which is in most of the world, that what must be said is requiring new words and separations, for I call it the enclosed plain that is for any religion but only for religion in which truth might be delivered that is not for society because it is for religion without evil implications attached that are attached in our language when people are spoken of because they do not speak in an academic setting where such implications would not exist, and those who teach Babel have ruined even this because of their repeated and clear violations that have been viewed as disgraceful, so that Babel has lost ground because they have not maintained security. Now if academic settings are still an enclosed plain it is not the same plain as it should be because it has become eroded due to disgraceful words when people were not given the chance to defend themselves such as words that are for the street and fighting, which when commited with such cowardice I am for slaying them if it is given by God, that these are the same as kings who rebel against God, and yet not kings, for to use a neutral plain in this way is reason for more wrath because is profanes the nobility of the holiness of learning, even when some blasphemes God.

Patriotism adds more loyalty and integrity in moments of temptation, and when such is second to the Lord, it is true patriotism, for it supports the people. Now the person who is loyal to God does not lie and say, yet I judge for God against what is legal, and yet the person who is elected is able to do what is right, whether for the Lord or for the people.

Egypt and its glory have chosen God after the coming of His son, and were they not better before and not because they did not have God? But the glory of Egypt is spoken of in metaphor and those who made it originally. How then is so much scattered and yet by virtue and good it re-emerges to be seen as better. Now what sin would cast what is pleasing to God away? For when a person does what is good and pleasing to God there are lines an enemy will not cross when they are a man or at least good enough to be a human. I do not wish to be against God who created all, and how does it benefit to cast away my own credit to be against God? But if my riches are with Heaven than I do not desire to be against God. How is it then that Egypt is gone and a people are scattered? Now there is that which comes to pass before good is attained, and I have seen sin seek to do an evil against God knowing that the devices of Satan have before said attain well and they are throwing attainment away. Now what is done in secret will be known and God is not being against God that with the righteous the good is being promoted and yet the one who is fulfilling good is sometimes having more opposition, whether being the Roman, the Jew, or the Egyptian and you have known who it is when it is true. Now the one who steals is not despised when they are made hungry by war against them, and the refugee being persecuted has gained help from criminals. But you are using false judgements in those matters where you know the truth? But the one who has food does not need to steal, so that you might not believe that I justify the wicked, and the one who profits by robberies is not one of the people in their plea for righteousness towards God. But let there not be, at least, those who would be the devices of Beelzebub to separate what God has joined. Now what man of intelligence uses his understanding to ask those questions with his understanding that would defame the righteous when it is the time and place of another to answer without sin, and then the place of the one who would be more loving in a topic, that such is the realm of him with his greater love in this place, than the one who is to abstain from something for a greater purpose. But a nest of foolish vipers with foresight have despised the angel and being a man of much love for women he has sharpened his sword in its extraction that a man in this fashion will not tolerate them and their words will be meet with more than is their place.



Egypt and its glory have chosen God after the coming of His son, and were they not better before and not because they did not have God? But the glory of Egypt is spoken of in metaphor and those who made it originally. How then is so much scattered and yet by virtue and good it re-emerges to be seen as better. Now what sin would cast what is pleasing to God away? For when a person does what is good and pleasing to God there are lines an enemy will not cross when they are a man or at least good enough to be a human. I do not wish to be against God who created all, and how does it benefit to cast away my own credit to be against God? But if my riches are with Heaven than I do not desire to be against God.

Extroverted behaviour that is acted out that must be done only internally and those who excessively struggle with things outwardly that should be delt with internally giving suspicion of developmental problems and indicators of possible lack of ability to be trusted with dependence for others in terms of roles and employment.


Extroverted culture that does not practise human segregations (not racial) might have proclivity to bring down excellence rather than support it and reward it.

Following all the paths, meeting the measure of the laws, and what attacks can only ask to pass through what defends, and so let the accuser be labelled honestly, that what they have is surrendered to the one they attack, to know that I too am the way, the truth, and the light, and those who are for me receive from another.

Foolishness claims it possible for a person, but by truth the answer is no, but a wise man procures favour from God.

For Lucifer has had a mother good to other children, not lacking, and him being an only child, tended to by a rich man, and defended and supported by the older children in his youth, and a poor student and then later a good, having been prior drawn to the pursuits of youth, and playing instruments and indulging in arts and science and a debating and challenging child to his mother in childhood, she being meek, and a daughter of Sarah.

For a leader physical presence can change to more burden when there is nothing truly needed. But an indulgent and patient man, is he not the type that is honoured to the level of being revered? But patience is as greater self-control, and love is patient and kind. Now who shows perfection to this degree? But if it is with righteousness and justice, it is good thing. Now the nations come and go, but a man like Noah, is he not blessed? Now the nations are here, and is not the innocence of Daniel required? But the ways of sodomites and all the types of practises of sodomites, being only verbal or with actions, has many types of actions whether only verbal or actions, that the entirety of it is the city Sodom and not five righteous things are found in it, for none of these things should be found with any person, for the judgement is for it to be destroyed. Now what is found in the temple called the Christ, is all good and blameless, that his bride is New Juruselum, and those things found in Jeruselum, in Mala, are not Sodom. Now Job is not born of Jews and yet follows God and endures, and Noah is keeping with justice and endures, and Daniel is keeping God against Babylon, and endures, and yet what is it to be with much Sodom combat when there is peace and justice? But much conscience is safety and yet those who are having a desease of evil to retaliate against justice when it stays back and gives room, not harrassing, not going too far, these are having an evil desease and spiritual deseases are for danger. 
For a man in truth has not desired an animal, and a woman not the one who is not her husband.

For a murderous person, what is not worth time and judgement, is worthy of murder, but those who keep justice keep the land. Now those  calling what is of weight, nothing, are they not those who say, yet there is no such thing as rape, and those who do justice are keeping debate from the wicked because the wickedness cannot be in agreance regardless of what could be said, for a man below ur cannot agree and the wicked are not able to agree, but men below ur are as leaders in Babylon, and dogs are able to be as kings. Now the one mantaining the right standard says of the smaller, it is a great evil, and the one exceeding is cursing and blaspheming as one who also mocks. Now the one who declares the place outrageous, is he not also saying, but the good should not be cast away with the wicked, and yet for those who test God, is there more chance for repentance? Now the Christ did not test God, and went in the way of departure from other things, that he went in the way of obedience. Now is this not as one who is in service to the Lord? But if one is in service to the Lord, they are for the full measure of reward and what might be against them.
 
For a murderous person, what is not worth time and judgement, is worthy of murder, but those who keep justice keep the land. Now those  calling what is of weight, nothing, are they not those who say, yet there is no such thing as rape, and those who do justice are keeping debate from the wicked because the wickedness cannot be in agreance regardless of what could be said, for a man below ur cannot agree and the wicked are not able to agree, but men below ur are as leaders in Babylon, and dogs are able to be as kings. Now the one mantaining the right standard says of the smaller, it is a great evil, and the one exceeding is cursing and blaspheming as one who also mocks. Now the one who declares the place outrageous, is he not also saying, but the good should not be cast away with the wicked, and yet for those who test God, is there more chance for repentance? Now the Christ did not test God, and went in the way of departure from other things, that he went in the way of obedience. Now is this not as one who is in service to the Lord? But if one is in service to the Lord, they are for the full measure of reward and what might be against them.
 
For a murderous person, what is not worth time and judgement, is worthy of murder, but those who keep justice keep the land. Now those  calling what is of weight, nothing, are they not those who say, yet there is no such thing as rape, and those who do justice are keeping debate from the wicked because the wickedness cannot be in agreance regardless of what could be said, for a man below ur cannot agree and the wicked are not able to agree, but men below ur are as leaders in Babylon, and dogs are able to be as kings. Now the one mantaining the right standard says, it is a great evil, and the one exceeding is cursing and blaspheming as one who also mocks.
 
For a murderous person, what is not worth time and judgement, is worthy of murder, but those who keep justice keep the land.
For being influenced and receiving what could been prophesy the one before has caused trouble for the kingdom, because as he did not know even more than I did not know, he has stumbled to a crooked way of revealing some of what is right with fiction, having a good in him to prophesy and has he fullfilled? But if the one who came could not fullfill it I have held him blameless, and I am not wanting him to diminish in any way for I do better with such a one alive and he still lives. But he is not my servant and though he comes prior to me he is also not my father. But he brings what he can and what he wanted that none might stumble because of him. Now has not another claimed, a human can deny any impulse but an animal cannot? But is it even good? But being a Christian as I gather him to be he seemed to have received knowledge and sight and perhaps by wisdom, for there is wisdom covering and coming with it, that he has percieved the people he is part of, being Christian. Now if any of the ugly are outside the walls to Nash their teeth and hurl discord than their sound is falling for now because a peace has fallen to dwell and I have loved the good of God. Now if any are worthy who would have the heart than I will be blessed by them, for if there is conflict than there can still be people to have good with. Now in Babel I strive because there is much to be done, but if Babel is to be built than the tower should be pure with Elsnon and with gods and goddesses and that the rich of the good lands might come and go, that what the devil turned I turn back to God, for it is His if it should please Him. Now if the cross is outside the tower and the three crosses and if there is a hill and flowers there and a ring with keys either steel or gold coloured than there is rope, too, attached to the cross, and even a tree that brings forth fruit being a full tree and a pool of water with a stream that runs into it, and a smaller tree that is small, as if insignificant by comparison. Now if I see the crosses empty in this place I do not know why. But if an angel stands with their sword and is arrayed with halos of light and wings I do not know, but the tree is having seductive fruit and the leaves are a rich texture. Now can I with wisdom know it or is a prophet required? But I am afraid to ask the one who commands me.

For being influenced and receiving what could been prophesy the one before has caused trouble for the kingdom, because as he did not know even more than I did not know, he has stumbled to a crooked way of revealing some of what is right with fiction, having a good in him to prophesy and has he fullfilled? But if the one who came could not fullfill it I have held him blameless, and I am not wanting him to diminish in any way for I do better with such a one alive and he still lives. But he is not my servant and though he comes prior to me he is also not my father. But he brings what he can and what he wanted that none might stumble because of him. Now has not another claimed, a human can deny any impulse but an animal cannot? But is it even good? But being a Christian as I gather him to be he seemed to have received knowledge and sight and perhaps by wisdom, for there is wisdom covering and coming with it, that he has percieved the people he is part of, being Christian. Now if any of the ugly are outside the walls to Nash their teeth and hurl discord than their sound is falling for now because a peace has fallen to dwell and I have loved the good of God. Now if any are worthy who would have the heart than I will be blessed by them, for if there is conflict than there can still be people to have good with. Now in Babel I strive because there is much to be done, but if Babel is to be built than the tower should be pure with Elsnon and with gods and goddesses and that the rich of the good lands might come and go, that what the devil turned I turn back to God, for it is His if it should please Him. Now if the cross is outside the tower and the three crosses and if there is a hill and flowers there and a ring with keys either steel or gold coloured than there is rope, too, attached to the cross, and even a tree that brings forth fruit being a full tree and a pool of water with a stream that runs into it, and a smaller tree that is small, as if insignificant by comparison. Now if I see the crosses empty in this place I do not know why. But if an angel stands with their sword and is arrayed with halos of light and wings I do not know, but the tree is having seductive fruit and the leaves are a rich texture. Now can I with wisdom know it or is a prophet required? But I am afraid to ask the one who commands me.

For dog-hood is a thing that is wicked that is in much consideration of challenging others for dominance when there is no cause. For some of these are open much about the challenge, and such appeals to empty Babylon, which is the other name I have given that city, that it appeals to a nothing for the challenge of dominance and not the things of God, which are truth, that there might rather be peace and no dog-hood. For they have turned their heads, many, away from the truth and gone towards the flame and smoke of lies in all things, saying, we are no longer in need of truth for we have grown too old for it.
 
For dog-hood is a thing that is wicked that is in much consideration of challenging others for dominance when there is no cause. For some of these are open much about the challenge, and such appeals to empty Babylon, which is the other name I have given that city, that it appeals to a nothing for the challenge of dominance and not the things of God, which are truth, that there might rather be peace and no dog-hood. For they have turned their heads, many, away from the truth and gone towards the flame and smoke of lies in all things, saying, we are no longer in need of truth for we have grown too old for it.
 
For except it should be, and for the cause, let them hear what is said, for do not they desire to know? But I have the saying of a lion towards Orgoth’s servant, these are the consequences when people are not bullying these people. Now Orgoth’s servant is rebellious against their own lives, which is perversity, for they hate themselves some and have rebelled against their own lives to sin against their own lives, being that of fools who desecrate what is sacred in actions and speech. Now if they desecrate themselves they are seeking equality at times by the destruction of others. For some are commited sin against their own integrity as a person, man or woman, and some sin against their own justice, for such is the manner of their rebellion. Some are dining against their own understanding due to a low place, for one is not attempting to dominate but they are better, and those attacking to remain in a panicked fashion are having the lack of circumciscion by peace and lack of blood-shed. Now fools void of understanding are attacking the whole Earth with rillet and they are even doing the work of Orgoth, but those defending others in truth and justice are later considered offendors to them that the truth might be known.

For except it should be, and for the cause, let them hear what is said, for do not they desire to know? But I have the saying of a lion towards Orgoth’s servant, these are the consequences when people are not bullying these people. Now Orgoth’s servant is rebellious against their own lives, which is perversity, for they hate themselves some and have rebelled against their own lives to sin against their own lives, being that of fools who desecrate what is sacred in actions and speech. Now if they desecrate themselves they are seeking equality at times by the destruction of others. For some are commited sin against their own integrity as a person, man or woman, and some sin against their own justice, for such is the manner of their rebellion. Some are sining against their own understanding due to a low place, for one is not attempting to dominate but they are better, and those attacking to remain in a panicked fashion are having the lack of circumciscion by peace and lack of blood-shed. Now fools void of understanding are attacking the whole Earth with rillet and they are even doing the work of Orgoth, but those defending others in truth and justice are later considered offendors to them that the truth might be known.

For giant spiders have cast webs that the good might be swallowed, so that prudence is good, but gateways are opened and people floating down on pure creatures to give passage and way to the gates for their salvation.

For giant spiders have cast webs that the good might be swallowed, so that prudence is good, but gateways are opened and people floating down on pure creatures to give passage and way to the gates for their salvation.

For giant spiders have cast webs that the good might be swallowed, so that prudence is good, but gateways are opened and people floating down on pure creations, disks of light, or with the saints who do such to take their arm that they fly and float to a place upon the air, so that they are to give passage and way to the gates for their salvation, or where there is war and passageways of light create tunnels of escape that are concealed, and the missionaries gathering people for the kingdom, to inherit eternal life, and the replacing of Babylon with what is better and not puritanical as Babylon is jelous of what is good that they lynch those who have much that is good, as if a ritual. But if Babylon has good yet it is seeking tight control and to close heavy doors and there are soldiers who have placed iron in their hearts against the kingdom of heaven, for they indulge foolish beliefs and fantasies for short times that are not with truth that offence may be claimed where there is none. But the foolishness of Christ, yet it is not foolish, and the glory of the kingdom, yet it could be great. But after plagues and earthquakes there is that empty space and room for new hope, that what emerges is to be clean from that which seeks to crush and kill all.
For have I not given attention? But there is the generation error where some believe a thing is new that was expressed in a similiar fashion many generations prior, for it was always easily understood.

For if they are restrained by need for secrecy, they are developing their skill at hiding from truth, but the people who please God are becoming lights upon a hill.

For many concepts they have there is the good and bad type. Now does the devil do it because of the simple, exploiting the simplicity for war? But there is the good type of pity and the bad type, the good type of laughter and the evil, the good type and the bad type, the good greeting and the bad, the good rebuke and the corrupted, that the devil has corrupted much, for truth is corrupted to lie, and the burning light of the lake of fire is not the light.
 
For not be judged they ran to bring judgement upon them with doing evil, for it is of the lion, that when some are not bullied they have much wrath because they are ignored, that if they would have done much wickedness before they will retaliate with great wickedness towards others for not being judged.
For not be judged they ran to bring judgement upon them with doing evil, for it is of the lion, that when some are not bullied they have much wrath because they are ignored, that if they would have done much wickedness before they will retaliate with great wickedness towards others for not being judged.
For the father when being wise, when investing in something has gone out into his garden to trim and do well for the plant that is beautiful, that he gives to the world as a gift, for he has nurtured the plant, has not smothered it or neglected it, has stood back to allow it to grow has moved in to keep away the beasts that would maul it, has corrected it where needed, has offered it to what is right, has fretted over it and worried over it and has even asked God concerning it, that Abraham is He in this, and he has even worked for himself and given it a portion, and it is a prize in his house for the guests to see, because of its beauty, and he has even given it special places and invited them to see and he has adorned his house with good things and precious stones and said none is better than the plant I nurture, for it even reigns over the other things that are good. Now let the angels see, grab them with righteousness by the garment and force them to see the plant, for their business must cease for it. Now who is described? But surely this is a rich man. Now if a rich man being wise does this than let the light of splendour blind the people, and let those who are in darkness repent of foolishness.
 
For the other book: There are many things that are to be permitted, that though you think you know, when you know more, you are permitting it, that the one who is correcting without knowing more is sometimes resented. But then are not all such? But if any wishes to go astray is it not for God and not for people to be against? For denying freedom, when you are not stopping, is it not against God? Now you do not know the strategies of God and are not all wise as He is and capable of knowing the future as he does, and as we have been told, not even the prophets can know the future well, but know some of the future and are able to prophesy, but your wisdom is sufficient to know that to be against a person’s freedom is against them and God, so that your rebukes when they have been rejected and it is another’s freedom are then the works of war against God when you are not relenting, and God is with them who would be rebuked and is it even so far that the one who does not relent is to be outside the kingdom of heaven if they do not relent? But God is with the one who is rebuked? But this is not the same as a parent who corrects their child, the one they love, and a person has only to know who their parents are, and it is not the wise rebuke that is for the person attaining their goal. But if it is not their goal than what can any do? But you think it is so easy to be against God that a hypocracy and contradiction occurs? But I write about matters that are in the realm of war where people would attempt to attack in an ugly way, and not the rebukes and departures of society. But if it is in the realm of war then you will heed the proverb if you wish to know that this is not for society but is for it where any has entered into the realm of war, so that none of it applies and should be considered unless a person is exceeding that which is in the realm of society and they must go far for this to happen. But many things are to be permitted and you know what is acceptable, that no anti-Christ spirit be among you to wage war against the beuitiful, for a wise rebuke is beautiful and what is beautiful cannot be in error in this matter, and so who is it against? But it is against the ugly who are not with you, that they are not part of your church, and have come to be an attacking soldier, have come in their foolishness and atomicity to be soldiers who would be against God, to cause the people who are His to sin. Therefore if you are part of the church than this is not for you and does not apply to you in anything you do, because you are beautiful and you are permitted and more is right for you in the eyes of God and people on Earth.

For the other book: There are many things that are to be permitted, that though you think you know, when you know more, you are permitting it, that the one who is correcting without knowing more is sometimes resented. But then are not all such? But if any wishes to go astray is it not for God and not for people to be against? For denying freedom, when you are not stopping, is it not against God? Now you do not know the strategies of God and are not all wise as He is and capable of knowing the future as he does, and as we have been told, not even the prophets can know the future well, but know some of the future and are able to prophesy, but your wisdom is sufficient to know that to be against a person’s freedom is against them and God, so that your rebukes when they have been rejected and it is another’s freedom are then the works of war against God when you are not relenting, and God is with them who would be rebuked and is it even so far that the one who does not relent is to be outside the kingdom of heaven if they do not relent? But God is with the one who is rebuked? But this is not the same as a parent who corrects their child, the one they love, and a person has only to know who their parents are, and it is not the wise rebuke that is for the person attaining their goal. But if it is not their goal than what can any do? But you think it is so easy to be against God that a hypocracy and contradiction occurs? But I write about matters that are in the realm of war where people would attempt to attack in an ugly way, and not the rebukes and departures of society. But if it is in the realm of war then you will heed the proverb if you wish to know that this is not for society but is for it where any has entered into the realm of war, so that none of it applies and should be considered unless a person is exceeding that which is in the realm of society and they must go far for this to happen. But many things are to be permitted and you know what is acceptable, that no anti-Christ spirit be among you to wage war against the beuitiful, for a wise rebuke is beautiful and what is beautiful cannot be in error in this matter, and so who is it against? But it is against the ugly who are not with you, that they are not part of your church, and have come to be an attacking soldier, have come in their foolishness and atomicity to be soldiers who would be against God, to cause the people who are His to sin. Therefore if you are part of the church than this is not for you and does not apply to you in anything you do, because you are beautiful and you are permitted and more is right for you in the eyes of God and people on Earth. Now the anti-Christ wishes for uglieness as he is full of wickedness and against beauty, and he has self-hatred, hatred of humanity, hatred of God, hatred that informs those on his house of hell, that gives birth by a core motive of man to that which it will. For hatred is more with the levels of understand and that most shallow level than the other levels, being deeper, that absorb the bad motive and dampen its effects. But where there is no thing that will dampen, than the effects are at their greatest. Not all that is good and done will inform the motive, and if the motive is overcome it will render reward back to what is good that good will increase again as the outward work was done and good increased and the inner battle won and good increased so that beauty and the afterlife of reward is to those better at fighting, who are victorious, but those who lose become ugly, and will perish into hell.

For the other book: There are many things that are to be permitted, that though you think you know, when you know more, you are permitting it, that the one who is correcting without knowing more is sometimes resented. But then are not all such? But if any wishes to go astray is it not for God and not for people to be against? For denying freedom, when you are not stopping, is it not against God? Now you do not know the strategies of God and are not all wise as He is and capable of knowing the future as he does, and as we have been told, not even the prophets can know the future well, but know some of the future and are able to prophesy, but your wisdom is sufficient to know that to be against a person’s freedom is against them and God, so that your rebukes when they have been rejected and it is another’s freedom are then the works of war against God when you are not relenting, and God is with them who would be rebuked and is it even so far that the one who does not relent is to be outside the kingdom of heaven if they do not relent? But God is with the one who is rebuked? But this is not the same as a parent who corrects their child, the one they love, and a person has only to know who their parents are, and it is not the wise rebuke that is for the person attaining their goal. But if it is not their goal than what can any do? But you think it is so easy to be against God that a hypocracy and contradiction occurs? But I write about matters that are in the realm of war where people would attempt to attack in an ugly way, and not the rebukes and departures of society. But if it is in the realm of war then you will heed the proverb if you wish to know that this is not for society but is for it where any has entered into the realm of war, so that none of it applies and should be considered unless a person is exceeding that which is in the realm of society and they must go far for this to happen. But many things are to be permitted and you know what is acceptable, that no anti-Christ spirit be among you to wage war against the beuitiful, for a wise rebuke is beautiful and what is beautiful cannot be in error in this matter, and so who is it against? But it is against the ugly who are not with you, that they are not part of your church, and have come to be an attacking soldier, have come in their foolishness and atomicity to be soldiers who would be against God, to cause the people who are His to sin. Therefore if you are part of the church than this is not for you and does not apply to you in anything you do, because you are beautiful and you are permitted and more is right for you in the eyes of God and people on Earth. Now the anti-Christ wishes for uglieness as he is full of wickedness and against beauty, and he has self-hatred, hatred of humanity, hatred of God, hatred that informs those on his house of hell, that gives birth by a core motive of man to that which it will. For hatred is more with the levels of understand and that most shallow level than the other levels, being deeper, that absorb the bad motive and dampen its effects. But where there is no thing that will dampen, than the effects are at their greatest. Not all that is good and done will inform the motive, and if the motive is overcome it will render reward back to what is good that good will increase again as the outward work was done and good increased and the inner battle won and good increased so that beauty and the afterlife of reward is to those better at fighting, who are victorious, but those who lose become ugly, and will perish into hell. Now if any has made ugly by the ugly as they, some of them, are homicidal sicophants, violent and mutilating, than as Christ returned on the third day so they will return, either on Earth or in Heaven, that these evil beasts are horrible and wicked, as it may be understood. But in matters of war and combat when it is truly so will you be able to judge almost two or three things that a person could do when there is true war? For if the soldiers who would protect you are wicked and stubborn, being traitors to the wicked because their hearts are wicked and stubborn, than what can you do if any ugly person has thought to mutilate and utterly kill in their intense rage and hatred that is with jealousy? But if an ugly person should even be killed, and some are, because of their uglieness, and not because of what beauty they have, even then, how can any judge a beautiful person when the neutral soldiers have become stubborn traitors? But should the angels perish that when there is war before God he will have no army and those on Earth will be swallowed into hell? But has any of them believed that the devil with them will make their own afterlife? Can God be vanquished being God? So how does and angel believe they can defeat Him and his armies? But did God not create the heavens and the angels who dwell in it? Do you believe that any believed that God could be killed? But when a country is taken from an Empire by those who dwell in it than does the King die? But the Empire of a great King would have many countries. Now how does a rebellious man speak when such is said? But let him have truth if he wishes it, else he has no rebellion against God, but only against what is on Earth.

For their inner heart knows it that they do not, for what should be occuring to them in terms of evil they are of much heart to do to others, for the inner heart cries out for justice to be done to the person who has the heart.


For there is a failing towards you that is as a blameless trechory for which there is no judgement or wrath, and it is not even Joseph, but is only what occurs.

For this has happened in my time. Now the owners of great wealth who are few, are called zetorin and they have not yet, being before the sign has passed Earth, used the actions of zeolots against humanity to be known by humanity, for the knowledge is dampened to nothing, for to pay the scavenger dogs who attack with hope of reward, being the scavenger-dogs, is considered terrorism when it is against the artist or messengers of Ria, and in other cases as well, and it is considered so by the governments so that the war is restrained and made possible by the governments who support one side and then support another, that the war is kept to some things but does not become more and it is made possible in this way. Now restraints to combat are breached by some and hindering others and Babylon has breached much and has cast away almost all restrictions.

For this has happened in my time. Now the owners of great wealth who are few, are called zetorin and they have not yet, being before the sign has passed Earth, used the actions of zeolots against humanity to be known by humanity, for the knowledge is dampened to nothing, for to pay the scavenger dogs who attack with hope of reward, being the scavenger-dogs, is considered terrorism when it is against the artist or messengers of Ria, and in other cases as well, and it is considered so by the governments so that the war is restrained and made possible by the governments who support one side and then support another, that the war is kept to some things but does not become more and it is made possible in this way. Now restraints to combat are breached by some and hindering others and Babylon has breached much and has cast away almost all restrictions.

For though a small army of Babylon’s soldiers have turned their swords against God and one of his people it is known that the devil controls the hearts of Babylonians that they need not even acknowledge these things and yet their loyalty and obedience to the devil is not failing, that if they are to be against God than their battle is accounted for, that they are traitors towards God, and yet were they ever loyal to Him?

For though men above land and above ur cannot comprehend the hearts of those whose hearts are in the lake of fire, they would perceive it as something higher but know what is still evil and wrong.
 
For war is on the city and those of the enemy are dressed as us to attack while we fight, revealed to those who fight and the citizens of that place. For they masquerade as fair judges of soldiers while they might as if they were our citizens in peace time, to speak with obnoxious judgements that favour the enemy and are placing them on the enemies side. But a fellow citizen would judge in your favour because you have the truth of God. And a fellow citizen would defend you against their own child if their child was among the enemy, that they might be just. But one is the weapon of the enemy and why would they stop the weapon because the weapon and them are both the enemy and neither are fellow citizens with you but both have hated you with intensity, although the one who does not stop the weapon feigns arragance and indifference to mock you and speak cruelty and show cruelty against you when they are satisfied with the deeds of the weapon and that their hatred is being fullfilled although they do this as a participation with the weapon and as the enemy who is below and of the devil’s. For an entire family is the devil’s and one masqurauds as a fellow citizen with you but they are with the enemy that they might aid the enemy in war, for if they should portray themselves as a blameless judge who is to be fair they are being obnoxious in the perverse words they speak and mocking. For it is war, and let their corpses be thrown outside the city for none of them are citizens with you.

For war is on the city and those of the enemy are dressed as us to attack while we fight, revealed to those who fight and the citizens of that place. For they masquerade as fair judges of soldiers while they might as if they were our citizens in peace time, to speak with obnoxious judgements that favour the enemy and are placing them on the enemies side. But a fellow citizen would judge in your favour because you have the truth of God. And a fellow citizen would defend you against their own child if their child was among the enemy, that they might be just. But one is the weapon of the enemy and why would they stop the weapon because the weapon and them are both the enemy and neither are fellow citizens with you but both have hated you with intensity, although the one who does not stop the weapon feigns arragance and indifference to mock you and speak cruelty and show cruelty against you when they are satisfied with the deeds of the weapon and that their hatred is being fullfilled although they do this as a participation with the weapon and as the enemy who is below and of the devil’s. For an entire family is the devil’s and one masqurauds as a fellow citizen with you but they are with the enemy that they might aid the enemy in war, for if they should portray themselves as a blameless judge who is to be fair they are being obnoxious in the perverse words they speak and mocking. For it is war, and let their corpses be thrown outside the city for none of them are citizens with you.

For war is on the city and those of the enemy are dressed as us to attack while we fight, revealed to those who fight and the citizens of that place. For they masquerade as fair judges of soldiers while they fight, as if they were our citizens in peace time, to speak with obnoxious judgements that favour the enemy and are placing them on the enemies side. But a fellow citizen would judge in your favour because you have the truth of God. And a fellow citizen would defend you against their own child if their child was among the enemy, that they might be just. But one is the weapon of the enemy and why would they stop the weapon because the weapon and them are both the enemy and neither are fellow citizens with you but both have hated you with intensity, although the one who does not stop the weapon feigns arragance and indifference to mock you and speak cruelty and show cruelty against you when they are satisfied with the deeds of the weapon and that their hatred is being fullfilled although they do this as a participation with the weapon and as the enemy who is below and of the devil’s. For an entire family is the devil’s and one masqurauds as a fellow citizen with you but they are with the enemy that they might aid the enemy in war, for if they should portray themselves as a blameless judge who is to be fair they are being obnoxious in the perverse words they speak and mocking. For it is war, and let their corpses be thrown outside the city for none of them are citizens with you.

For we have not given permission to any soldier to destroy our society though they have enforced, and to defend those beneath ur in their attacks, though they are to be roaming against them.
For what is this thing, but is David an angel? Because his wisdom is among the angels.

For when it comes to calling names in a low way, how is it a person knows it is projection? But a realm exists of light, and it is the realm of the philosophers, for they are not warriors with such light and cannot do any battle on Earth.

For when it comes to calling names in a low way, how is it a person knows it is projection? But a realm exists of white light, and it is the realm of the philosophers, for they are not warriors with such light and cannot do any battle on Earth.

From the good comes good, and from the evil comes evil, and the heart of another and the actions of another are what they are. Now if Jacob did not attack the goats when he was being delt with wickedly to be robbed than for what cause does any attack the Jews? Now the one who attacks Jews with wickedness are those who would attempt to mutilate the child in God’s house and if they would do this to one who is not at war, how low they are and have admitted so in their hearts. Now if they desire peace, than must it be with God, that their anger towards what is not might be appeased? For did God give any of these people to be servants of the Jews? But some have become lithesome because they are not accepting knowledge of righteousness that is with those who would understand? But it is not the case, only they have not accepted righteousness.

From the good comes good, and from the evil comes evil, and the heart of another and the actions of another are what they are. Now if Jacob did not attack the goats when he was being delt with wickedly to be robbed than for what cause does any attack the Jews?
 
God is not for the children of Beelzebub, that they might wield scripture so that they have already shed blood, and then to do the work of evil and wickedness against God’s house. But the children of Beelzebub have their kingdom in fire and anguish, and as they would kill the righteous they do of themselves and their master who has them.

Haters of the prince, traitors to the prince, soldiers against the prince, soldiers of another king against the prince, father and daughter against the prince, treasonous servant, wicked and rebellious against the prince, all are murderers except for the daughter, and all must die except for the woman when they have done no thing not in keeping with this. Now it is making sense that you be able to have more children and yet the actions of money have made a limit that does not have to be. For justice, too, must be possible and not a burden.

So I must give some about my own, and yet I am not really of the nation in which I reside. For I am as if a visitor to Earth and those of the kingdom of heaven are such.
 
He belongs with us, a brilliant one, mighty in intelligence, but he is too harsh for us, and yet he does does not belong with the group who takes him and his family is too scattered by our crimes, so that my house has been a remnant and now even it is harassed a little by the enemy, and the house of the intelligent one too harsh for us, for they call the brilliant brother of one of him too rude and honest, he is with a house not his and it should be at peace with us even if some of our house are not recognizing it and resenting a little. For our house has mighty and wise who are carrying out the work of soldiers in Ria, and our house has brilliant ones, meek and intelligent who are wise, and more direct and wrestling who are kind kings among us, that we have lions and meek and we are not all together that we should not be destroyed and yet the devil has known where each of us are, and those who reveal such should die as traitors, for war is upon us. Now the rude and brilliant one has said what is too harsh for our house, that it is a sign and that God makes all a symbol of the spiritual if the right thing is known as the symbol of what is occurring, that the symbol would be assigned correctly. Now if all is being parellel than he has said they are not worthy of their daughters and if wisdom is used, because of lack of righteousness because righteousness did not contain them to do justice, and the plague from them is a sign, that without understanding that is with sentience for others, they spread to become a problem. Now I have consulted him in spirit as if in Ria also, that he is become a guest in spirit, and he is too harsh for me, for what will he say about us when one as him is from another land, and will it be even worse? For if these are the peasants of the Earth, than their ways are promoting wisdom, but that wisdom of a peasant people, and not that of the Island which is not of peasants in ideas of politeness, but of great things being there and nobility, that they have done all we have done and before us that we are as them and Jews, being with many Christians. Now if they practise again more ideas of peasants who have spoken against us, they are doing what is of peasants in other ways, and so the eldest is the youngest, and the youngest being part of many things and taking what has been acceptable for us. But it might be, for my people have some lack of strength and we are being adorable by one way good and by another way uncomplimentary, and I have mentioned it because of the guest because I give his words, for another nation has required it because of their words, and so I must give some about my own, and yet I am not really of the nation in which I reside. For I am as if a visitor to Earth and those of the kingdom of heaven are such. Now the people who have survived by wisdom, by wise things, including the honouring of their parents, have come from many things of peasants who are poor, and the land was numerous with them, and if they have become too numerous as would be considered because of morality that justice has not kept their numbers that they are not able to have children in many ways, than it is not good that they not be able and they have not adopted that of greatness that justice might occur when they have had wicked and great good, that they have been a thing of what might be impossible, and yet they have not taken more to change that they have great numbers. Now they are a people as if of equality in many ways and the rich do not answer directly and the poor do not keep with politeness and there are not enough wicked occuring and becoming so by the way of the righteous that they refuse God and become wicked, and they become numerous and multiply that a great evil happens to them for they have kept to one thing and did not welcome the other, so that they are not able to have children, for they keep close to such a way that there are no great wars and no great amounts of death, for they are what survives in great numbers, not perishing and not being of the rich to be answering directly, and not as righteous in zeal to wage
 war, but peasants and surviving, and there is truth, for such is wise and able to survive, and yet another people has wished to die in battle.
He is great in the ability of maintaining insolence, that as he throws away truth with great expertise, he departs from the standard reason of a human, and becomes that which is worthy to be dismissed and ignored.
Homicidal sicophants have attempted to crush the young who are innocent and no person kicks at their shins so that the evil are truly to be lacking in the greatness to protect that the younger is taking charge of the kingdoms, and because the younger is preferable they are unable to do rightly by them and pressured they lash away from what is right to degrade themselves by attacking the younger. So a new thing is emerging that does not inherit the sins of the parent, and it is my belief that they are parented by God.

How many times did the children of Satan tempt Him to sin with His mouth, that an evil spirit on Earth might portray Him to be something else than what He was? But where they have tempted Him and tested Him with pressure He survived to lay down His life, the pure lamb and a man who was human, speaking without guile, but truth and the enemy has brought lies to His mouth because of the children of Satan. He spoke truth and good and the Romans put vinegar on His lips and those who came later put lies. So they knew it not. Who He forgives I cannot blame for they have done Him wrong and He has surpassed me. Let one who is tenderly loved by Him offer what he can and give back the truth to those who did not intend to go astray from the literal words of His lips when He avoided their traps. For the woman who is no wife is put away by God if it is so by a man that the break is made by wrong that she divorces wisdom before she is put away. Let not the imposter attempt to bring the pure to hell, and drag the Lord’s kingdom down with her to that place of fire and sin. Because of the Lord there is that which never was and the man is keeping then to God and his wife is another, because he is truly alone, with no wife who truly is for him. But blessed is a faithful woman whose beautiful spirit is preserved in Heaven.

How much more the man who women of the devil even are jelous of, but the woman is not made man by uglieness. For she has said on sight, it is not for me to inherit.


I am for being patient to the extremely sensitive who lash out, because they are not well, and such is probably temporary. For a species is not against itself and the understanding of a man is like the Christ.
I cannot be made of money, less I be sick, for money will not enter, and God has made it so.
 
I cannot be made of money, less I be sick, for money will not enter, and God has made it so. Has God not given his commands? But I am the Lord’s first and foremost.
I cannot be made of money, less I be sick, for money will not enter, and God has made it so. Has God not given his commands? But I am the Lord’s first and foremost.
I have because of Babel that ankylosaurs were slow witted and yet it is no so in Enoch’s world, but if what I thought was triceratops is an ankylosaur I leave to others, as with what I believed was called mammoth or mastadon they actually call brontosaurus. I apologize to the ankylosaur for the things in Ria that are calling them slow witted, for in Enoch’s world neither the ankylosaur or brontosaurus is slow witted as to be called such. Now the female spider is not slow witted or unintelligent and as for dogs, I offer them no defence.
I have written unos which is what I call wise paragraphs that are like short quotes and like proverbs only not sayings literally that can be said because proverbs that were short were not sufficient for me. I have also written proverbs that can be said as they are shorter. The unos of The Diary of Lucifer and those attached books are given to the Elsnon and are accessible to all people but those who wear the symbol if it pleases them, are the Elsnon. Now women who are Elsnon are known without the symbol when they are beautiful and of beautiful behaviour that is in keeping with the concept of the daughter who has not been neglected but shows good behaviour that is beautiful due to good parenting, that such women are superior and of various types and personalities and virteous that they are for receiving blessing and considered to be of sound understanding that is not deceived by the ugly. The men are many things and are moral and having righteousness, wisdom, justice, every good path that is acceptable to God, not having the same portions as women and yet having those portions and praise that is for men, that women who are not throwing their portion away and men, who would surpass, knowing what is right praise for them when it is so, that some are even praised by women with those things that are praised in women. But morality is for the men of the Elsnon who are not being an evil people.
I have written unos which is what I call wise paragraphs that are like short quotes and like proverbs only not sayings literally that can be said because proverbs that were short were not sufficient for me. I have also written proverbs that can be said as they are shorter. The unos of The Diary of Lucifer and those attached books are given to the Elsnon and are accessible to all people but those who wear the symbol if it pleases them, are the Elsnon. Now women who are Elsnon are known without the symbol when they are beautiful and of beautiful behaviour that is in keeping with the concept of the daughter who has not been neglected but shows good behaviour that is beautiful due
 to good parenting, that such women are superior and of various types and personalities and virteous that they are for receiving blessing and considered to be of sound understanding that is not deceived by the ugly. The men are many things and are moral and having righteousness, wisdom, justice, every good path that is acceptable to God, that women who are not throwing their portion away. But morality is for the men of the Elsnon who are not being an evil people, and they are not easily deceived as God has given them early an advantageous ability that is not being fair but is what God willed in what He did to be right in some thing by giving this to the first that He created and another great portion to her who he made from the adam’s rib, that by wisdom she would not pointlessly throw her portion away to have nothing and neither any portion so that the devil is not able to mock her in cruelty as he has hated her and hated the adam who has walked with God. Now if one plant grows one way and another plant another way, so they journey differently and yet they are capable to become one and God can join them in marriage. Now the devil is cast out and looking at them from some places with hatred for them and so are the spirits of the devil’s that are Babylonian that the kingdom of Heaven is able to be pure where it goes and free of Babyolon and the devil so that it is in many ways attempting to break down the gate or slip over the wall.
I heard about a survellience person who w became so offended and angry with what they were reading from the person they were spying on that they hi-jacked the intercom system and began doing what not even the Bush administration would do.
I heard about a survellience person who w became so offended and angry with what they were reading from the person they were spying on that they hi-jacked the intercom system and began doing what not even the Bush administration would do.
If any is being foolish and determined as if lacking common sense than they have already received the command from their group of hell and wickedness, for they have received from Orgoth and do as they believe they must.
If every problem a person has is solved by comprehension of reality that is taken for granted and is there immediately what manner of person is it? But is it a human or something else if the person does not seem to be sentient? For does it know why it is doing anything? Now if it does not, than what profit is there in speaking to it? But if it is still being aggressive and the soldiers will do nothing than how can any say that the government is not against you? But who do you then turn to? For they have attempted to remove people from employment and put them on the street as a homeless person because killing them would not go unpunished that the corrupt official would say you may do this evil to those we hate but you may not kill any of them. So if you were spared are they persecuting those who would be with you? But there are beautiful people upon the streets here and though there are no fires anymore or flaming arrows they are given up to live or die and not able always to recover from what occurred. Now what has gone out from the corrupt leaders that would agree with those corrupt in the government that they may not kill but they may make them homeless that their voices not be heard against any who has commited wrong. Now I would not be surprised if it erupted in violence and yet a movement was pushed further and hi-jacked, perhaps by those who lead it, and the guilty have gone to those above the Ocean to draw sympathy to say, these will destroy all of us. Now if the city is swelling with those who do not have the power anymore to give aid, than what has been dissolved and only to remain in image? But there is much crime that cannot even be judged anymore due to the poverty and lack of aid. 
If every problem a person has is solved by comprehension of reality that is taken for granted and is there immediately, what manner of person is it? But is it a human or something else if the person does not seem to be sentient? For does it know why it is doing anything? Now if it does not, than what profit is there in speaking to it? But if it is still being aggressive and the soldiers will do nothing than how can any say that the government is not against you? But who do you then turn to? For they have attempted to remove people from employment and put them on the street as a homeless person because killing them would not go unpunished that the corrupt official would say you may do this evil to those we hate but you may not kill any of them. So if you were spared are they persecuting those who would be with you? But there are beautiful people upon the streets here and though there are no fires anymore or flaming arrows they are given up to live or die and not able always to recover from what occurred. Now what has gone out from the corrupt leaders that would agree with those corrupt in the government that they may not kill but they may make them homeless that their voices not be heard against any who has commited wrong. Now I would not be surprised if it erupted in violence and yet a movement was pushed further and hi-jacked, perhaps by those who lead it, and the guilty have gone to those above the Ocean to draw sympathy to say, these will destroy all of us. Now if the city is swelling with those who do not have the power anymore to give aid, than what has been dissolved and only to remain in image? But there is much crime that cannot even be judged anymore due to the poverty and lack of aid. Then for other matters, I will mention the cults of Earth, that are, some of them exchanging morality for judgements of what is not wrong and not morality, that they are not people anymore, but types of anti-people, being the opposite of people in what the judge,  that you cannot understand them and they are frustrating for some to deal with. For they do not judge what is wrong by morality but judge what is not wrong according to their hearts and doctrine. These are not always soldiers of Beelzebub but they can seem so, although they have been encouraged in their heart’s alteration by the cult. Now they have been given new structures being a new paradigm that is not natural for humans and shows a lack of basic human understanding. These are having evil that they seem to think is justice against what is not wrong. For this is another cult of the devil that exists in Babylon.
If it ever needs to be stated and I’m not sure it would, Abel is not jelous of Cain he just doesn’t want to be attacked anymore by him, disabled by his kind every time he is succeeding, and murdered by him.
If it ever needs to be stated and I’m not sure it would, Abel is not jelous of Cain he just doesn’t want to be attacked anymore by him, disabled by his kind every time he is succeeding, and murdered by him.
If one is doing types of combat as harrassments and strategic attacks, and yet they say, it is nothing, but I do what is as sport by what I have learned to fight a war, than this is a zeolot that does believing it sport, that if they die, it is as a reckless beast who was insane with sickness being brought down, for it was goring villagers.
If one is doing types of combat as harrassments and strategic attacks, and yet they say, it is nothing, but I do what is as sport by what I have learned to fight a war, than this is a zeolot that does believing it sport, that if they die, it is as a reckless beast who was insane with sickness being brought down, for it was goring villagers.
If one should wish to be in the realm of childhood, which is good and pleasing to God, than they should be innocent, but the one who enters into offensive action must know the understanding and morality of a wise adult.
If the book is little than the man wants to wrestle, so return him to me that my will might be known.
If wicked fools fight for a cause then going to those they fight for, those before the soldiers, is to go to the problem for which the soldiers have fought. Now if some of those they fight for join you yet they still fight then in truth it is others they fight for and possibly a foolish cause that is lacking reason for soldiers.
If you are not straying then what destruction is there, less someone cause a person to stray, that such is one who has murdered, and was Abel not also murdered? But if religious war is with, being spiritual then know that the physical soldiers of Satan have come upon you and the Lord knows it and has all power over them and you, that He created the Universe, and is capable of judging. Now it is the wisdom of another and not of mine, to know that those who must be pure against what is outside them and are to be defiled by the existence of what is not even wrong, because they are not well, are for performing the will of Satan and devouring the good with the evil and what is more clean than them, because they make themselves clean and do not regard their wickedness. Now are these to ever be considered Jews? But the wisdom is not of me and I would not have considered it had I not heard like pieces of a rumour to consider, that error might be found in my curiosity, that I will hope that you do not blame me. Now pride is not with love, when it is excessive, and the one whose actions are forced beyond the limit, controlled by pride, are not well. Those who inherit the wind are those doing wrong without guilt or remorse, that they do not repent, that they keep themselves from gaining. Now if a person is abused and they say it is not so and beyond the limit of saying such, are they keeping to truth, and is it better for them to not admit the truth within them or even outward if they choose? But if a wicked man will panic than will not the righteous decern, and understand?
If you are not straying then what destruction is there, less someone
 cause a person to stray, that such is one who has murdered, and was Abel not also murdered? But if religious war is with, being spiritual then know that the physical soldiers of Satan have come upon you and the Lord knows it and has all power over them and you, that He created the Universe, and is capable of judging. Now it is the wisdom of another and not of mine, to know that those who must be pure against what is outside them and are to be defiled by the existence of what is not even wrong, because they are not well, are for performing the will of Satan and devouring the good with the evil and what is more clean than them, because they make themselves clean and do not regard their wickedness. Now are these to ever be considered Jews? But the wisdom is not of me and I would not have considered it had I not heard like pieces of a rumour to consider, that error might be found in my curiosity, that I will hope that you do not blame me. Now pride is not with love, when it is excessive, and the one whose actions are forced beyond the limit, controlled by pride, are not well. Those who inherit the wind are those doing wrong without guilt or remorse, that they do not repent, that they keep themselves from gaining. Now if a person is abused and they say it is not so and beyond the limit of saying such, are they keeping to truth, and is it better for them to not admit the truth within them or even outward if they choose? But if a wicked man will panic than will not the righteous decern, and understand?
If you have tempted the son of God to speak evil and He gave you truth, know that He gave you no lie and died to make a way. Now the one who has made me possible is the one who delivered you, and my words are possible because of Him. A man cut off from riches will likely lose all, and yet I belong to another and not to money. A stubborn son is obeying while the obedient is in the grip of the devil, and so let me then inherit more, that I be loved in the later end. For if He answered you here with what seems like guile, know that it was with understanding and the greater kindness, or so is my opinion because I do not speak for Him, but no loyalty can be to me if it is not more to Him because his right hand is Him and what is given and is good is from Him to you. Now is a man being human and given language able to do more or are you to be a hypocrite? What can be said that is right with language because if He did not sin, neither do you, and is He not human to show the measure of obedience and what man is capable of? But He has made Himself a little lower than the angels to come to Earth to be human and fulfill all the obedience of a human man and to be an example of such. Now do you perceive Him here as not Human but the son who has not lowered Himself to be one of you. Even more so then than you, He is human and a man, frail and suffering like a man and suffering more as He was killed as a man who bore His great hardship. Will you not then pity Him and pick Him up as another man? Or is He to then suffer on His own without help? But would you prefer an angel not yet ascended to a mortal man like you? I would not let you be deceived by any evil spirit that dwells on this Earth and so I wish to speak the truth.
If you have tempted the son of God to speak evil and He gave you truth, know that He gave you no lie and died to make a way. Now the one who has made me possible is the one who delivered you, and my words are possible because of Him. A man cut off from riches will likely lose all, and yet I belong to another and not to money. A stubborn son is obeying while the obedient is in the grip of the devil, and so let me then inherit more, that I be loved in the later end. For if He answered you here with what seems like guile, know that it was with understanding and the greater kindness, or so is my opinion because I do not speak for Him, but no loyalty can be to me if it is not more to Him because his right hand is Him and what is given and is good is from Him to you. Now is a man being human and given language able to do more or are to be a hypocrite? What can be said that is right with language because if He did not sin, neither do you, and is He not human to show the measure of obedience and what man is capable of? But He has made Himself a little lower than the angels to come to Earth to be human and fulfill all the obedience of a human man and to be an example of such. Now do you perceive Him here as not Human but the son who has not lowered Himself to be one of you. Even more so then than you, He is human and a man, frail and suffering like a man and suffering more as He was killed as a man who bore His great hardship. Will you not then pity Him and pick Him up as another man? Or is He to then suffer on His own without help? But would you prefer an angel not yet ascended to a mortal man like you? I would not let you be deceived by any evil spirit that dwells on this Earth and so I wish to speak the truth.
If you have tempted the son of God to speak evil and He gave you truth, know that He gave you no lie and died to make a way. Now the one who has made me possible is the one who delivered you, and my words are possible because of Him. A man cut off from riches will likely lose all, and yet I belong to another and not to money. A stubborn son is obeying while the obedient is in the grip of the devil, and so let me then inherit more, that I be loved in the later end. For if He answered you here with what seems like guile, know that it was with understanding and the greater kindness, or so is my opinion because I do not speak for Him, but no loyalty can be to me if it is not more to Him because his right hand is Him and what is given and is good is from Him to you.
If you would betray one do not steal from them, but the enemy is known for what they are, that they were not loyal before.
Ignorant, arrogant, and having exploited a corruption of culture and religious decency. A characteristic of a type of animal that is particularly intolerant of people and is often verbally and physically in the realm of short tempered violence.
Ignorant, arrogant, and having exploited a corruption of culture and religious decency. A characteristic of a type of animal that is particularly intolerant of people and is often verbally and physically in the realm of short tempered violence.
Ignorant, arrogant, and having exploited a corruption of culture and religious decency. A characteristic of a type of animal that is particularly intolerant of people and is often verbally and physically in the realm of short tempered violence. Often the animal is fuelled by its corrupted version of culture and religious decency, to become very angry. If it attacks people it will usually do so again.
Ignorant, arrogant, and having exploited a corruption of culture and religious decency. A characteristic of a type of animal that is particularly intolerant of people and is often verbally and physically in the realm of short tempered violence. Often the animal is fuelled by its corrupted version of culture and religious decency, to become very angry. If it attacks people it will usually do so again.
Ignorant, arrogant, and having exploited a corruption of culture and religious decency. A characteristic of a type of animal that is particularly intolerant of people and is often verbally and physically in the realm of short tempered violence. Often the animal is fuelled by its corrupted version of culture and religious decency, to become very angry. If it attacks people it will usually do so again.
Ignorant, arrogant, and having exploited a corruption of shame culture.
In my century there are people who lack understanding due to the great exaggerations of fictional stories and acted portrayals that are exxagerated so an audience can understand. So there are fools who will do evil that is great and believe it to be nothing, and they have not heeded the correction of older people when they were children to tell them of their error, so that they do not understand that humans, by nature, cannot adapt to a different standard of wrong and even abuse and that attempts to do so cause problems for them. My own generation is not portrayed accurately and when society reached a limit with the previous generation they began to give us what we could not want as if to sell it to us, and some sought to cater to foolish ugly people as if we would want it. 
In my time fools have taken action then spoken as supporters of those they would attack to declare themselves victorious, for they did not like to be disregarded with ease according to truth and what is real, that they love greatly to mislabel their own actions according to their lacking understanding, to praise themselves victorious where they are fools whose consequence is immediate or soon. For they are fools as if speaking and dreaming aloud with perverse honesty that is not honest, that they speak their whole hearts in a perverse way. For some of these are dogs who are for disbelief, rebellious towards what is good rather than towards what is evil, for there are different types of rebels and these are speaking sometimes strange as if lacking understanding, claiming territory much that is not theirs and claiming victory much that cannot be had. But they are covered in fire and dirt and they are like rocks with fire and dirt, that are aflame. For they are for desecrations of good, of lacking decency to an extent that rages inside at the one noble who is keeping to truth, like one who lacks decency where discretion is used, that it does not at all seem wrong to them to look where they are not belonging, to speak of what is with due descretion. For chains of rage shake within them at what is good spoken of God, and actions to force out those who please God are becoming them quickly when they have not yet learned to conceal it.
 For the men, will they not desecrate? But they do not perceive that what has come from them is a desecration to themselves. Now are the women so deceived in this thing? But who is a woman who is at the rebellion of Korah who is compared to the men? But they are as those speaking of matters of descretion in ways that bring shame to themselves, that cause others ponder lack of understanding, so nothing I have written is given to them and none of it is placed before them by me.
In my time fools have taken action then spoken as supporters of those they would attack to declare themselves victorious, for they did not like to be disregarded with ease according to truth and what is real, that they love greatly to mislabel their own actions according to their lacking understanding, to praise themselves victorious where they are fools whose consequence is immediate or soon. For they are fools as if speaking and dreaming aloud with perverse honesty that is not honest, that they speak their whole hearts in a perverse way.
In my time fools have taken action then spoken as supporters of those they would attack to declare themselves victorious, for they did not like to be disregarded with ease according to truth and what is real, that they love greatly to mislabel their own actions according to their lacking understanding, to praise themselves victorious where they are fools whose consequence is immediate or soon. For they are fools as if speaking and dreaming aloud with perverse honesty that is not honest, that they speak their whole hearts in a perverse way.
In my time fools have taken action then spoken as supporters of those they would attack to declare themselves victorious, for they did not like to be disregarded with ease according to truth and what is real, that they love greatly to mislabel their own actions according to their lacking understanding, to praise themselves victorious where they are fools whose consequence is immediate or soon. For they are fools as if speaking and dreaming aloud with perverse honesty that is not honest, for it is with wickedness also, that they speak their whole hearts in a perverse way. For some of these are dogs who are for disbelief, rebellious towards what is good rather than towards what is evil, for there are different types of rebels and these are speaking sometimes strange as if lacking understanding, claiming territory much that is not theirs and claiming victory much that cannot be had. But they are covered in fire and dirt and they are like rocks with fire and dirt, that are aflame. For they are for desecrations of good, of lacking decency to an extent that rages inside at the one noble who is keeping to truth, like one who lacks decency where discretion is used, that it does not at all seem wrong to them to look where they are not belonging, to speak of what is with due descretion. For chains of rage shake within them at what is good spoken of God, and actions to force out those who please God are becoming them quickly when they have not yet learned to conceal it. For the men, will they not desecrate? But they do not perceive that what has come from them is a desecration to themselves. Now are the women so deceived in this thing? But who is a woman who is at the rebellion of Korah who is compared to the men? But they are as those speaking of matters of descretion in ways that bring shame to themselves, that cause others ponder lack of understanding, so nothing I have written is given to them and none of it is placed before them by me.
In my time fools have taken action then spoken as supporters of those they would attack to declare themselves victorious, for they did not like to be disregarded with ease according to truth and what is real, that they love greatly to mislabel their own actions according to their lacking understanding, to praise themselves victorious where they are fools whose consequence is immediate or soon. For they are fools as if speaking and dreaming aloud with perverse honesty that is not honest, that they speak their whole hearts in a perverse way. For some of these are dogs who are for disbelief, rebellious towards what is good rather than towards what is evil, for there are different types of rebels and these are speaking sometimes strange as if lacking understanding, claiming territory much that is not theirs and claiming victory much that cannot be had. But they are covered in fire and dirt and they are like rocks with fire and dirt, that are aflame. For they are for desecrations of good, of lacking decency to an extent that rages inside at the one noble who is keeping to truth, like one who lacks decency where discretion is used, that it does not at all seem wrong to them to look where they are not belonging, to speak of what is with due descretion. For chains of rage shake within them at what is good spoken of God, and actions to force out those who please God are becoming them quickly when they have not yet learned to conceal it.
In my time fools have taken action then spoken as supporters of those they would attack to declare themselves victorious, for they did not like to be disregarded with ease according to truth and what is real, that they love greatly to mislabel their own actions according to their lacking understanding, to praise themselves victorious where they are fools whose consequence is immediate or soon. For they are fools as if speaking and dreaming aloud with perverse honesty that is not honest, that they speak their whole hearts in a perverse way. For some of these are dogs who are for disbelief, rebellious towards what is good rather than towards what is evil, for there are different types of rebels and these are speaking sometimes strange as if lacking understanding, claiming territory much that is not theirs and claiming victory much that cannot be had. But they are covered in fire and dirt and they are like rocks with fire and dirt, that are aflame. For they are for desecrations of good, of lacking decency to an extent that rages inside at the one noble who is keeping to truth, like one who lacks decency where discretion is used, that it does not at all seem wrong to them to look where they are not belonging, to speak of what is with due descretion. For chains of rage shake within them at what is good spoken of God, and actions to force out those who please God are becoming them quickly when they have not yet learned to conceal it.
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme the concept because it is very rare. Now there is a trend of igno-slacks in our country who are white men, and they are grotesque in the uglieness, and many of them are well educated and have become bigger igno-slacks with their different vocabulary by which they do that which an igno-slack would do, being with cowardice and strength at once, their substance being wrath, hatred, and jelousy, that they are leaning into the sick as if to fight them, and speaking like soldiers when they are over-compensating for their jelousy being extroverts even when they are introverts, and becoming strong with each other in their common knowledge of each other’s cowardly deeds and hatred’s that bond them, that they are not soldiers who are criminals, they are not like men, but are bonded in strength when there is none among them who is not guilty of what they have done to disrupt their strength and cause them to hate from insecurity within them. For they walk as men and then stumble as wicked cowards and then walk again and are only men when they have puffed themselves up with wrath. For do they not stumble before the righteous and cling to them as they fall? But they are hating enough and are held as men only by insolence to then be, not men, but men of the devil, being made from what is not good. Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is an abomination for them to do well.
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to
 men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme the concept because it is very rare. Now there is a trend of igno-slacks in our country who are white men, and they are grotesque in the uglieness, and many of them are well educated and have become bigger igno-slacks with their different vocabulary by which they do that which an igno-slack would do, being with cowardice and strength at once, their substance being wrath, hatred, and jelousy, that they are leaning into the sick as if to fight them, and speaking like soldiers when they are over-compensating for their jelousy being extroverts even when they are introverts, and becoming strong with each other in their common knowledge of each other’s cowardly deeds and hatred’s that bond them, that they are not soldiers who are criminals, they are not like men, but are bonded in strength when there is none among them who is not guilty of what they have done to disrupt their strength and cause them to hate from insecurity within them. For they walk as men and then stumble as wicked cowards and then walk again and are only men when they have puffed themselves up with wrath. For do they not stumble before the righteous and cling to them as they fall? But they are hating enough and are held as men only by insolence to then be, not men, but men of the devil, being made from what is not good. Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is an abomination for them to do well. Now these are the common foot-soldiers of the devil. But there are even more dangerous things in the kingdom of the devil although our side is more dangerous than they and are in good, for the kings of the devil are commanding, and they are for commiting murders even with violence as the would come upon the beautiful to crush them and murder them, that they are using great condemnations and judgements of what is righteous that even their smaller soldiers mimic this behaviour at times, that they condemn, judge, and forbid righteousness and good as if the land was theirs as they attempt to claim it. And heaping up strength of perverse judgement and condemnation they are for killing the innocent, even the small child in tears, that they have wrath towards and hatred because of their tears and because the child is seeking those who protect them, there is more wrath because of it and they consider it an outrage that the child would dare to seek God and those who would protect them. For they are even blood-thirsty and I will not relent so that you might not understand and lower your guard. So they heap up substance of hatred, jelousy, wrath, and condemnation and they seek to kill by commanding those who would follow them, using slander and lies, denigrating what is beautiful.
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme the concept because it is very rare. Now there is a trend of igno-slacks in our country who are white men, and they are grotesque in the uglieness, and many of them are well educated and have become bigger igno-slacks with their different vocabulary by which they do that which an igno-slack would do, being with cowardice and strength at once, their substance being wrath, hatred, and jelousy, that they are leaning into the sick as if to fight them, and speaking like soldiers when they are over-compensating for their jelousy being extroverts even when they are introverts, and becoming strong with each other in their common knowledge of each other’s cowardly deeds and hatred’s that bond them, that they are not soldiers who are criminals, they are not like men, but are bonded in strength when there is none among them who is not guilty of what they have done to disrupt their strength and cause them to hate from insecurity within them. For they walk as men and then stumble as wicked cowards and then walk again and are only men when they have puffed themselves up with wrath. For do they not stumble before the righteous and cling to them as they fall? But they are hating enough and are held as men only by insolence to then be, not men, but men of the devil, being made from what is not good. Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is an abomination for them to do well. Now these are the common foot-soldiers of the devil. But there are even more dangerous things in the kingdom of the devil although our side is more dangerous than they and are in good, for the kings of the devil are commanding, and they are for commiting murders even with violence as the would come upon the beautiful to crush them and murder them, that they are using great condemnations and judgements of what is righteous that even their smaller soldiers mimic this behaviour at times, that they condemn, judge, and forbid righteousness and good as if the land was theirs as they attempt to claim it. And heaping up strength of perverse judgement and condemnation they are for killing the innocent, even the small child in tears, that they have wrath towards and hatred because of their tears and because the child is seeking those who protect them, there is more wrath because of it and they consider it an outrage that the child would dare to seek God and those who would protect them. For they are even blood-thirsty and I will not relent so that you might not understand and lower your guard. So they heap up substance of hatred, jelousy, wrath, and condemnation and they seek to kill by commanding those who would follow them, using slander and lies, denigrating what is beautiful. And as it is so for the kings it is so for the queens who are in the kingdom of the devil. Now the villian of Ester is with them and he cries often, but only when it is an abomination and not ever in a good way. For you will find this servant of Babylon many places, for my country is Babylon as it is so, and so is yours if it is not theocracy of the type that was Israel. But the servant is a Gentile even when born of Jews, and the righteous are bullies in his opinion, as there is no other thing to call them without confessing the truth. You will find Jezebel in iniquity, being ugly, for she is exalted by the ugly who look up to her as something to attain and be. Ahab you will find being jelous of those he has no right to be jelous of and he will be found stealing away the work of what others have done, to cast it away or steal it for himself and the same you will find him killing in spirit which is to cause to go astray and murder before God when it is fulfilled, but he is of equal danger in the physical ways and doing the same. You are right to save any being attacked by the people who are the devil’s.
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme
 the concept because it is very rare. Now there is a trend of igno-slacks in our country who are white men, and they are grotesque in the uglieness, and many of them are well educated and have become bigger igno-slacks with their different vocabulary by which they do that which an igno-slack would do, being with cowardice and strength at once, their substance being wrath, hatred, and jelousy, that they are leaning into the sick as if to fight them, and speaking like soldiers when they are over-compensating for their jelousy being extroverts even when they are introverts, and becoming strong with each other in their common knowledge of each other’s cowardly deeds and hatred’s that bond them, that they are not soldiers who are criminals, they are not like men, but are bonded in strength when there is none among them who is not guilty of what they have done to disrupt their strength and cause them to hate from insecurity within them. For they walk as men and then stumble as wicked cowards and then walk again and are only men when they have puffed themselves up with wrath. For do they not stumble before the righteous and cling to them as they fall? But they are hating enough and are held as men only by insolence to then be, not men, but men of the devil, being made from what is not good. Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is an abomination for them to do well. Now these are the common foot-soldiers of the devil. But there are even more dangerous things in the kingdom of the devil although our side is more dangerous than they and are in good, for the kings of the devil are commanding, and they are for commiting murders even with violence as the would come upon the beautiful to crush them and murder them, that they are using great condemnations and judgements of what is righteous that even their smaller soldiers mimic this behaviour at times, that they condemn, judge, and forbid righteousness and good as if the land was theirs as they attempt to claim it. And heaping up strength of perverse judgement and condemnation they are for killing the innocent, even the small child in tears, that they have wrath towards and hatred because of their tears and because the child is seeking those who protect them, there is more wrath because of it and they consider it an outrage that the child would dare to seek God and those who would protect them. For they are even blood-thirsty and I will not relent so that you might not understand and lower your guard. So they heap up substance of hatred, jelousy, wrath, and condemnation and they seek to kill by commanding those who would follow them, using slander and lies, denigrating what is beautiful. And as it is so for the kings it is so for the queens who are in the kingdom of the devil. Now the villian of Ester is with them and he cries often, but only when it is an abomination and not ever in a good way. For you will find this servant of Babylon many places, for my country is Babylon as it is so, and so is yours if it is not theocracy of the type that was Israel. But the servant is a Gentile even when born of Jews, and the righteous are bullies in his opinion, as there is no other thing to call them without confessing the truth. You will find Jezebel in iniquity, being ugly, for she is exalted by the ugly who look up to her as something to attain and be. Ahab you will find being jelous of those he has no right to be jelous of and he will be found stealing away the work of what others have done, to cast it away or steal it for himself and the same you will find him killing in spirit which is to cause to go astray and murder before God when it is fulfilled, but he is of equal danger in the physical ways and doing the same. You are right to save any being attacked by the people who are the devil’s.
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme the concept because it is very rare. Now there is a trend of igno-slacks in our country who are white men, and they are grotesque in the uglieness, and many of them are well educated and have become bigger igno-slacks with their different vocabulary by which they do that which an igno-slack would do, being with cowardice and strength at once, their substance being wrath, hatred, and jelousy, that they are leaning into the sick as if to fight them, and speaking like soldiers when they are over-compensating for their jelousy being extroverts even when they are introverts, and becoming strong with each other in their common knowledge of each other’s cowardly deeds and hatred’s that bond them, that they are not soldiers who are criminals, they are not like men, but are bonded in strength when there is none among them who is not guilty of what they have done to disrupt their strength and cause them to hate from insecurity within them. For they walk as men and then stumble as wicked cowards and then walk again and are only men when they have puffed themselves up with wrath. For do they not stumble before the righteous and cling to them as they fall? But they are hating enough and are held as men only by insolence to then be, not men, but men of the devil, being made from what is not good. Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is an abomination for them to do well. Now these are the common foot-soldiers of the devil. But there are even more dangerous things in the kingdom of the devil although our side is more dangerous than they and are in good, for the kings of the devil are commanding, and they are for commiting murders even with violence as the would come upon the beautiful to crush them and murder them, that they are using great condemnations and judgements of what is righteous that even their smaller soldiers mimic this behaviour at times, that they condemn, judge, and forbid righteousness and good as if the land was theirs as they attempt to claim it. And heaping up strength of perverse judgement and condemnation they are for killing the innocent, even the small child in tears, that they have wrath towards and hatred because of their tears and because the child is seeking those who protect them, there is more wrath because of it and they consider it an outrage that the child would dare to seek God and those who would protect them. For they are even blood-thirsty and I will not relent so that you might not understand and lower your guard. So they heap up substance of hatred, jelousy, wrath, and condemnation and they seek to kill by commanding those who would follow them, using slander and lies, denigrating what is beautiful. And as it is so for the kings it is so for the queens who are in the kingdom of the devil. Now the villian of Ester is with them and he cries often, but only when it is an abomination and not ever in a good way. For you will find this servant of Babylon many places, for my country is Babylon as it is so, and so is yours if it is not theocracy of the type that was Israel. But the servant is a Gentile even when born of Jews, and the righteous are bullies in his opinion, as there is no other thing to call them without confessing the truth. You will find Jezebel in iniquity, being ugly, for she is exalted by the ugly who look up to her as something to attain and be. Ahab you will find being jelous of those he has no right to be jelous of and he will be found stealing away the work of what others have done, to cast it away or steal it for himself and the same you will find him killing in spirit which is to cause to go astray and murder before God when it is fulfilled, but he is of equal danger in the physical ways and doing the same. You are right to save any being attacked by the people who are the devil’s. Now what is perhaps for less obvious truth because I fear God, the leaders of Babylon are having many gods and goddesses, and with wisdom you know it to represent the many industries and groups of consideration, and even the cults that are clung with these groups that are the devil’s, and being that there
 are many people groups, the Jews being a group, the leaders are being swayed between groups so that they take support from one in order to give it to another group, so that priorities become lost in the mayhem of governing so many different groups, and the Jews and Christians may suffer because of it. For if the Jews should disappear will Christianity not suffer and be attacked more greatly? But I do wish for this to occur. Now the leader might need respectful reminder at times of what will occur because of decisions through legislature and many things become attached to such things. Now if in Babylon you are not petitioning your leader are you being prudent for your people? But the king or queen of Babylon, let us hope they will be for us.
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme the concept because it is very rare. Now there is a trend of igno-slacks in our country who are white men, and they are grotesque in the uglieness, and many of them are well educated and have become bigger igno-slacks with their different vocabulary by which they do that which an igno-slack would do, being with cowardice and strength at once, their substance being wrath, hatred, and jelousy, that they are leaning into the sick as if to fight them, and speaking like soldiers when they are over-compensating for their jelousy being extroverts even when they are introverts, and becoming strong with each other in their common knowledge of each other’s cowardly deeds and hatred’s that bond them, that they are not soldiers who are criminals, they are not like men, but are bonded in strength when there is none among them who is not guilty of what they have done to disrupt their strength and cause them to hate from insecurity within them. For they walk as men and then stumble as wicked cowards and then walk again and are only men when they have puffed themselves up with wrath. For do they not stumble before the righteous and cling to them as they fall? But they are hating enough and are held as men only by insolence to then be, not men, but men of the devil, being made from what is not good. Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is an abomination for them to do well. Now these are the common foot-soldiers of the devil. But there are even more dangerous things in the kingdom of the devil although our side is more dangerous than they and are in good, for the kings of the devil are commanding, and they are for commiting murders even with violence as the would come upon the beautiful to crush them and murder them, that they are using great condemnations and judgements of what is righteous that even their smaller soldiers mimic this behaviour at times, that they condemn, judge, and forbid righteousness and good as if the land was theirs as they attempt to claim it. And heaping up strength of perverse judgement and condemnation they are for killing the innocent, even the small child in tears, that they have wrath towards and hatred because of their tears and because the child is seeking those who protect them, there is more wrath because of it and they consider it an outrage that the child would dare to seek God and those who would protect them. For they are even blood-thirsty and I will not relent so that you might not understand and lower your guard. So they heap up substance of hatred, jelousy, wrath, and condemnation and they seek to kill by commanding those who would follow them, using slander and lies, denigrating what is beautiful. And as it is so for the kings it is so for the queens who are in the kingdom of the devil. Now the villian of Ester is with them and he cries often, but only when it is an abomination and not ever in a good way. For you will find this servant of Babylon many places, for my country is Babylon as it is so, and so is yours if it is not theocracy of the type that was Israel. But the servant is a Gentile even when born of Jews, and the righteous are bullies in his opinion, as there is no other thing to call them without confessing the truth. You will find Jezebel in iniquity, being ugly, for she is exalted by the ugly who look up to her as something to attain and be. Ahab you will find being jelous of those he has no right to be jelous of and he will be found stealing away the work of what others have done, to cast it away or steal it for himself and the same you will find him killing in spirit which is to cause to go astray and murder before God when it is fulfilled, but he is of equal danger in the physical ways and doing the same. You are right to save any being attacked by the people who are the devil’s. Now what is perhaps for less obvious truth because I fear God, the leaders of Babylon are having many gods and goddesses, and with wisdom you know it to represent the many industries and groups of consideration, and even the cults that are clung with these groups that are the devil’s, and being that there are many people groups, the Jews being a group, the leaders are being swayed between groups so that they take support from one in order to give it to another group, so that priorities become lost in the mayhem of governing so many different groups, and the Jews and Christians may suffer because of it. For if the Jews should disappear will Christianity not suffer and be attacked more greatly? But I do wish for this to occur. Now the leader might need respectful reminder at times of what will occur because of decisions through legislature and many things become attached to such things. Now if in Babylon you are not petitioning your leader are you being prudent for your people? But the king or queen of Babylon, let us hope they will be for us. Now I have not read all of the Bible and will do so after I have fulfilled what is good, because I do not want much influence from it. Now as for that hatred of the middle of riches I do not have it but  perceive some of it and do not know how to fulfill it. But as for Babylon I would have people know that the kingdom of heaven is not part of it but is the only truth and reality. So then how does any live outside the kingdom? But they are made for what they are made and what is dead for one has substance for another. But if there are even beasts of the devil on Earth that would hurt and kill do you not know that there are those who judge who are with God and if they are not refusing to defend you than they are for you. But are you so blessed when some are not? But I would prefer an Earth with righteousness and truth, that the calamity of the devil when it comes in lies is cast away as nonsense.
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme the concept because it is very rare. Now there is a trend of igno-slacks in our country who are white men, and they are grotesque in the uglieness, and many of them are well educated and have become bigger igno-slacks with their different vocabulary by which they do that which an igno-slack would do, being with cowardice and strength at once, their substance being wrath, hatred, and jelousy, that they are leaning into the sick as if to fight them, and speaking like soldiers when they are over-compensating for their jelousy being extroverts even when they are introverts, and becoming strong with each other in their common knowledge of each other’s cowardly deeds and hatred’s that bond them, that they are not soldiers who are criminals, they are not like men, but are bonded in strength when there is none among them who is not guilty of what they have done to disrupt their
 strength and cause them to hate from insecurity within them. For they walk as men and then stumble as wicked cowards and then walk again and are only men when they have puffed themselves up with wrath. For do they not stumble before the righteous and cling to them as they fall? But they are hating enough and are held as men only by insolence to then be, not men, but men of the devil, being made from what is not good. Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is an abomination for them to do well. Now these are the common foot-soldiers of the devil. But there are even more dangerous things in the kingdom of the devil although our side is more dangerous than they and are in good, for the kings of the devil are commanding, and they are for commiting murders even with violence as the would come upon the beautiful to crush them and murder them, that they are using great condemnations and judgements of what is righteous that even their smaller soldiers mimic this behaviour at times, that they condemn, judge, and forbid righteousness and good as if the land was theirs as they attempt to claim it. And heaping up strength of perverse judgement and condemnation they are for killing the innocent, even the small child in tears, that they have wrath towards and hatred because of their tears and because the child is seeking those who protect them, there is more wrath because of it and they consider it an outrage that the child would dare to seek God and those who would protect them. For they are even blood-thirsty and I will not relent so that you might not understand and lower your guard. So they heap up substance of hatred, jelousy, wrath, and condemnation and they seek to kill by commanding those who would follow them, using slander and lies, denigrating what is beautiful. And as it is so for the kings it is so for the queens who are in the kingdom of the devil. Now the villian of Ester is with them and he cries often, but only when it is an abomination and not ever in a good way. For you will find this servant of Babylon many places, for my country is Babylon as it is so, and so is yours if it is not theocracy of the type that was Israel. But the servant is a Gentile even when born of Jews, and the righteous are bullies in his opinion, as there is no other thing to call them without confessing the truth. You will find Jezebel in iniquity, being ugly, for she is exalted by the ugly who look up to her as something to attain and be. Ahab you will find being jelous of those he has no right to be jelous of and he will be found stealing away the work of what others have done, to cast it away or steal it for himself and the same you will find him killing in spirit which is to cause to go astray and murder before God when it is fulfilled, but he is of equal danger in the physical ways and doing the same. You are right to save any being attacked by the people who are the devil’s. Now what is perhaps for less obvious truth because I fear God, the leaders of Babylon are having many gods and goddesses, and with wisdom you know it to represent the many industries and groups of consideration, and even the cults that are clung with these groups that are the devil’s, and being that there are many people groups, the Jews being a group, the leaders are being swayed between groups so that they take support from one in order to give it to another group, so that priorities become lost in the mayhem of governing so many different groups, and the Jews and Christians may suffer because of it. For if the Jews should disappear will Christianity not suffer and be attacked more greatly? But I do wish for this to occur. Now the leader might need respectful reminder at times of what will occur because of decisions through legislature and many things become attached to such things. Now if in Babylon you are not petitioning your leader are you being prudent for your people? But the king or queen of Babylon, let us hope they will be for us. Now I have not read all of the Bible and will do so after I have fulfilled what is good, because I do not want much influence from it. Now as for that hatred of the middle of riches I do not have it but  perceive some of it and do not know how to fulfill it. But as for Babylon I would have people know that the kingdom of heaven is not part of it but is the only truth and reality. So then how does any live outside the kingdom? But they are made for what they are made and what is dead for one has substance for another. But if there are even beasts of the devil on Earth that would hurt and kill do you not know that there are those who judge who are with God and if they are not refusing to defend you than they are for you. But are you so blessed when some are not? But I would prefer an Earth with righteousness and truth, that the calamity of the devil when it comes in lies is cast away as nonsense. Now a leorocon is not a father and the Irish have called it such, and those who have no respect for people are not to be trusted in that they have no concern for any and would commit abuse like it was a game. Rapists are among these. Now the one who has no time or use for increasing understanding to do wisely in matters of life and moves hastily to do violence when a small thing of life is before them, are those who are hasty to shed blood and they do so without reason because they can offer reasons even with no small thing when they have tolerated the presence of one too much and hate them to grow with rage inside them, being jelous of them and drawn into rage, that jelousy has come from annoyance and they are communing with their friends that they should go and kill an offendor by annoyance and jelousy and if it is some matter that is for understanding, a matter of daily life, and they have no patience for it, that they would kill, than these are like swift moving killers who come to their target by flying creatures to kill swiftly what they have seen from the air, being a citizen who was in their own country. Now those who would frame a multitude of times for small matters that a person might incur many harrassment more because of it are those casting a net in war that is with sharp objects that will not scar a person and it is a weak weapon but takes patience, for the weapon is wanted to be effective but it is not that which will cause death unless the person is old or has a bad heart physically, and if the soldiers will not save them know that soldiers of the devil have slayn them that they go to the after-life, the next after this phase.
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme the concept because it is very rare. Now there is a trend of igno-slacks in our country who are white men, and they are grotesque in the uglieness, and many of them are well educated and have become bigger igno-slacks with their different vocabulary by which they do that which an igno-slack would do, being with cowardice and strength at once, their substance being wrath, hatred, and jelousy, that they are leaning into the sick as if to fight them, and speaking like soldiers when they are over-compensating for their jelousy being extroverts even when they are introverts, and becoming strong with each other in their common knowledge of each other’s cowardly deeds and hatred’s that bond them, that they are not soldiers who are criminals, they are not like men, but are bonded in strength when there is none among them who is not guilty of what they have done to disrupt their strength and cause them to hate from insecurity within them. For they walk as men and then stumble as wicked cowards and then walk again and are only men when they have puffed themselves up with wrath. For do they not stumble before the righteous and cling to them as they fall? But they are hating enough and are held as men only by insolence to then be, not men, but men of the devil, being made from what is not good. Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is
 an abomination for them to do well. Now these are the common foot-soldiers of the devil. But there are even more dangerous things in the kingdom of the devil although our side is more dangerous than they and are in good, for the kings of the devil are commanding, and they are for commiting murders even with violence as the would come upon the beautiful to crush them and murder them, that they are using great condemnations and judgements of what is righteous that even their smaller soldiers mimic this behaviour at times, that they condemn, judge, and forbid righteousness and good as if the land was theirs as they attempt to claim it. And heaping up strength of perverse judgement and condemnation they are for killing the innocent, even the small child in tears, that they have wrath towards and hatred because of their tears and because the child is seeking those who protect them, there is more wrath because of it and they consider it an outrage that the child would dare to seek God and those who would protect them. For they are even blood-thirsty and I will not relent so that you might not understand and lower your guard. So they heap up substance of hatred, jelousy, wrath, and condemnation and they seek to kill by commanding those who would follow them, using slander and lies, denigrating what is beautiful. And as it is so for the kings it is so for the queens who are in the kingdom of the devil. Now the villian of Ester is with them and he cries often, but only when it is an abomination and not ever in a good way. For you will find this servant of Babylon many places, for my country is Babylon as it is so, and so is yours if it is not theocracy of the type that was Israel. But the servant is a Gentile even when born of Jews, and the righteous are bullies in his opinion, as there is no other thing to call them without confessing the truth. You will find Jezebel in iniquity, being ugly, for she is exalted by the ugly who look up to her as something to attain and be. Ahab you will find being jelous of those he has no right to be jelous of and he will be found stealing away the work of what others have done, to cast it away or steal it for himself and the same you will find him killing in spirit which is to cause to go astray and murder before God when it is fulfilled, but he is of equal danger in the physical ways and doing the same. You are right to save any being attacked by the people who are the devil’s. Now what is perhaps for less obvious truth because I fear God, the leaders of Babylon are having many gods and goddesses, and with wisdom you know it to represent the many industries and groups of consideration, and even the cults that are clung with these groups that are the devil’s, and being that there are many people groups, the Jews being a group, the leaders are being swayed between groups so that they take support from one in order to give it to another group, so that priorities become lost in the mayhem of governing so many different groups, and the Jews and Christians may suffer because of it. For if the Jews should disappear will Christianity not suffer and be attacked more greatly? But I do wish for this to occur. Now the leader might need respectful reminder at times of what will occur because of decisions through legislature and many things become attached to such things. Now if in Babylon you are not petitioning your leader are you being prudent for your people? But the king or queen of Babylon, let us hope they will be for us. Now I have not read all of the Bible and will do so after I have fulfilled what is good, because I do not want much influence from it. Now as for that hatred of the middle of riches I do not have it but  perceive some of it and do not know how to fulfill it. But as for Babylon I would have people know that the kingdom of heaven is not part of it but is the only truth and reality. So then how does any live outside the kingdom? But they are made for what they are made and what is dead for one has substance for another. But if there are even beasts of the devil on Earth that would hurt and kill do you not know that there are those who judge who are with God and if they are not refusing to defend you than they are for you. But are you so blessed when some are not? But I would prefer an Earth with righteousness and truth, that the calamity of the devil when it comes in lies is cast away as nonsense. Now a leorocon is not a father and the Irish have called it such, and those who have no respect for people are not to be trusted in that they have no concern for any and would commit abuse like it was a game. Rapists are among these. Now the one who has no time or use for increasing understanding to do wisely in matters of life and moves hastily to do violence when a small thing of life is before them, are those who are hasty to shed blood and they do so without reason because they can offer reasons even with no small thing when they have tolerated the presence of one too much and hate them to grow with rage inside them, being jelous of them and drawn into rage, that jelousy has come from annoyance and they are communing with their friends that they should go and kill an offendor by annoyance and jelousy and if it is some matter that is for understanding, a matter of daily life, and they have no patience for it, that they would kill, than these are like swift moving killers who come to their target by flying creatures to kill swiftly what they have seen from the air, being a citizen who was in their own country. Now those who would frame a multitude of times for small matters that a person might incur many harrassment more because of it are those casting a net in war that is with sharp objects that will not scar a person and it is a weak weapon but takes patience, for the weapon is wanted to be effective but it is not that which will cause death unless the person is old or has a bad heart physically, and if the soldiers will not save them know that soldiers of the devil have slayn them that they go to the after-life, the next after this phase. Now if they are attempting murder by some method of combining those things that when they are completed will cause physical death and the soldiers will not investigate it, than a saint has been slayn, a martyr and going to the after-life.
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme the concept because it is very rare. Now there is a trend of igno-slacks in our country who are white men, and they are grotesque in the uglieness, and many of them are well educated and have become bigger igno-slacks with their different vocabulary by which they do that which an igno-slack would do, being with cowardice and strength at once, their substance being wrath, hatred, and jelousy, that they are leaning into the sick as if to fight them, and speaking like soldiers when they are over-compensating for their jelousy being extroverts even when they are introverts, and becoming strong with each other in their common knowledge of each other’s cowardly deeds and hatred’s that bond them, that they are not soldiers who are criminals, they are not like men, but are bonded in strength when there is none among them who is not guilty of what they have done to disrupt their strength and cause them to hate from insecurity within them. For they walk as men and then stumble as wicked cowards and then walk again and are only men when they have puffed themselves up with wrath. For do they not stumble before the righteous and cling to them as they fall? But they are hating enough and are held as men only by insolence to then be, not men, but men of the devil, being made from what is not good. Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is an abomination for them to do well. Now these are the common foot-soldiers of the devil. But there are even more dangerous things in the kingdom of the devil although our side is more dangerous than they and are in good, for the kings of the devil are commanding, and they are for commiting murders even with violence as the would come upon the beautiful to crush them and murder them, that they are using great condemnations and judgements of what is righteous that even their smaller soldiers mimic this behaviour at times, that they condemn, judge, and forbid righteousness and good as if the land was theirs as they attempt to claim it. And heaping up strength of perverse judgement and condemnation they are for killing
 the innocent, even the small child in tears, that they have wrath towards and hatred because of their tears and because the child is seeking those who protect them, there is more wrath because of it and they consider it an outrage that the child would dare to seek God and those who would protect them. For they are even blood-thirsty and I will not relent so that you might not understand and lower your guard. So they heap up substance of hatred, jelousy, wrath, and condemnation and they seek to kill by commanding those who would follow them, using slander and lies, denigrating what is beautiful. And as it is so for the kings it is so for the queens who are in the kingdom of the devil. Now the villian of Ester is with them and he cries often, but only when it is an abomination and not ever in a good way. For you will find this servant of Babylon many places, for my country is Babylon as it is so, and so is yours if it is not theocracy of the type that was Israel. But the servant is a Gentile even when born of Jews, and the righteous are bullies in his opinion, as there is no other thing to call them without confessing the truth. You will find Jezebel in iniquity, being ugly, for she is exalted by the ugly who look up to her as something to attain and be. Ahab you will find being jelous of those he has no right to be jelous of and he will be found stealing away the work of what others have done, to cast it away or steal it for himself and the same you will find him killing in spirit which is to cause to go astray and murder before God when it is fulfilled, but he is of equal danger in the physical ways and doing the same. You are right to save any being attacked by the people who are the devil’s. Now what is perhaps for less obvious truth because I fear God, the leaders of Babylon are having many gods and goddesses, and with wisdom you know it to represent the many industries and groups of consideration, and even the cults that are clung with these groups that are the devil’s, and being that there are many people groups, the Jews being a group, the leaders are being swayed between groups so that they take support from one in order to give it to another group, so that priorities become lost in the mayhem of governing so many different groups, and the Jews and Christians may suffer because of it. For if the Jews should disappear will Christianity not suffer and be attacked more greatly? But I do wish for this to occur. Now the leader might need respectful reminder at times of what will occur because of decisions through legislature and many things become attached to such things. Now if in Babylon you are not petitioning your leader are you being prudent for your people? But the king or queen of Babylon, let us hope they will be for us. Now I have not read all of the Bible and will do so after I have fulfilled what is good, because I do not want much influence from it. Now as for that hatred of the middle of riches I do not have it but  perceive some of it and do not know how to fulfill it. But as for Babylon I would have people know that the kingdom of heaven is not part of it but is the only truth and reality. So then how does any live outside the kingdom? But they are made for what they are made and what is dead for one has substance for another. But if there are even beasts of the devil on Earth that would hurt and kill do you not know that there are those who judge who are with God and if they are not refusing to defend you than they are for you. But are you so blessed when some are not? But I would prefer an Earth with righteousness and truth, that the calamity of the devil when it comes in lies is cast away as nonsense. Now a leorocon is not a father and the Irish have called it such, and those who have no respect for people are not to be trusted in that they have no concern for any and would commit abuse like it was a game. Rapists are among these. Now the one who has no time or use for increasing understanding to do wisely in matters of life and moves hastily to do violence when a small thing of life is before them, are those who are hasty to shed blood and they do so without reason because they can offer reasons even with no small thing when they have tolerated the presence of one too much and hate them to grow with rage inside them, being jelous of them and drawn into rage, that jelousy has come from annoyance and they are communing with their friends that they should go and kill an offendor by annoyance and jelousy and if it is some matter that is for understanding, a matter of daily life, and they have no patience for it, that they would kill, than these are like swift moving killers who come to their target by flying creatures to kill swiftly what they have seen from the air, being a citizen who was in their own country. Now those who would frame a multitude of times for small matters that a person might incur many harrassment more because of it are those casting a net in war that is with sharp objects that will not scar a person and it is a weak weapon but takes patience, for the weapon is wanted to be effective but it is not that which will cause death unless the person is old or has a bad heart physically, and if the soldiers will not save them know that soldiers of the devil have slayn them that they go to the after-life, the next after this phase. Now if they are attempting murder by some method of combining those things that when they are completed will cause physical death and the soldiers will not investigate it, than a saint has been slayn, a martyr and going to the after-life.
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme the concept because it is very rare. 
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme the concept because it is very rare. Now there is a trend of igno-slacks in our country who are white men, and they are grotesque in the uglieness, and many of them are well educated and have become bigger igno-slacks with their different vocabulary by which they do that which an igno-slack would do, being with cowardice and strength at once, their substance being wrath, hatred, and jelousy, that they are leaning into the sick as if to fight them, and speaking like soldiers when they are over-compensating for their jelousy being extroverts even when they are introverts, and becoming strong with each other in their common knowledge of each other’s cowardly deeds and hatred’s that bond them, that they are not soldiers who are criminals, they are not like men, but are bonded in strength when there is none among them who is not guilty of what they have done to disrupt their strength and cause them to hate from insecurity within them. For they walk as men and then stumble as wicked cowards and then walk again and are only men when they have puffed themselves up with wrath. For do they not stumble before the righteous and cling to them as they fall? But they are hating enough and are held as men only by insolence to then be, not men, but men of the devil, being made from what is not good. Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is an abomination for them to do well. Now these are the common foot-soldiers of the devil. But there are even more dangerous things in the kingdom of the devil although our side is more dangerous than they and are in good, for the kings of the devil are commanding, and they are for commiting murders even with violence as the would come upon the beautiful to crush them and murder them, that they are using great
 condemnations and judgements of what is righteous that even their smaller soldiers mimic this behaviour at times, that they condemn, judge, and forbid righteousness and good as if the land was theirs as they attempt to claim it. And heaping up strength of perverse judgement and condemnation they are for killing the innocent, even the small child in tears, that they have wrath towards and hatred because of their tears and because the child is seeking those who protect them, there is more wrath because of it and they consider it an outrage that the child would dare to seek God and those who would protect them. For they are even blood-thirsty and I will not relent so that you might not understand and lower your guard.
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme the concept because it is very rare. Now there is a trend of igno-slacks in our country who are white men, and they are grotesque in the uglieness, and many of them are well educated and have become bigger igno-slacks with their different vocabulary by which they do that which an igno-slack would do, being with cowardice and strength at once, their substance being wrath, hatred, and jelousy, that they are leaning into the sick as if to fight them, and speaking like soldiers when they are over-compensating for their jelousy being extroverts even when they are introverts, and becoming strong with each other in their common knowledge of each other’s cowardly deeds and hatred’s that bond them, that they are not soldiers who are criminals, they are not like men, but are bonded in strength when there is none among them who is not guilty of what they have done to disrupt their strength and cause them to hate from insecurity within them. For they walk as men and then stumble as wicked cowards and then walk again and are only men when they have puffed themselves up with wrath. For do they not stumble before the righteous and cling to them as they fall? But they are hating enough and are held as men only by insolence to then be, not men, but men of the devil, being made from what is not good. Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is an abomination for them to do well. Now these are the common foot-soldiers of the devil. But there are even more dangerous things in the kingdom of the devil although our side is more dangerous than they and are in good, for the kings of the devil are commanding, and they are for commiting murders even with violence as the would come upon the beautiful to crush them and murder them, that they are using great condemnations and judgements of what is righteous that even their smaller soldiers mimic this behaviour at times, that they condemn, judge, and forbid righteousness and good as if the land was theirs as they attempt to claim it. And heaping up strength of perverse judgement and condemnation they are for killing the innocent, even the small child in tears, that they have wrath towards and hatred because of their tears and because the child is seeking those who protect them, there is more wrath because of it and they consider it an outrage that the child would dare to seek God and those who would protect them. For they are even blood-thirsty and I will not relent so that you might not understand and lower your guard. So they heap up substance of hatred, jelousy, wrath, and condemnation and they seek to kill by commanding those who would follow them, using slander and lies, denigrating what is beautiful.
In our language do we compromise or defend the language? Do we sacrifice some words when the second or first meaning becomes extinct? For the word faggot did not mean gay, and because of Christianity we have use for it. The word nigger did not apply to only one ethnicity when it was used and because it is a word of specific value we have use for it. So until you, the masses, have remedied this for me I will offer new words for myself. Now the word fickle-girl means faggot but does not pertain to homosexuals for it can pertain to any person and is mostly pertaining to men as the word faggot would. Now an igno-slack is a nigger but it does not apply to any ethnicity but can apply to all and all genders. Now the country in which I reside has a problem with those who would be righteous but quickly renounce their righteousness forever to become jelous fickle-girls, the men, since it is very rare to find a female fickle-girl and then if you think you have found any is likely that you blaspheme the concept because it is very rare. Now there is a trend of igno-slacks in our country who are white men, and they are grotesque in the uglieness, and many of them are well educated and have become bigger igno-slacks with their different vocabulary by which they do that which an igno-slack would do, being with cowardice and strength at once, their substance being wrath, hatred, and jelousy, that they are leaning into the sick as if to fight them, and speaking like soldiers when they are over-compensating for their jelousy being extroverts even when they are introverts, and becoming strong with each other in their common knowledge of each other’s cowardly deeds and hatred’s that bond them, that they are not soldiers who are criminals, they are not like men, but are bonded in strength when there is none among them who is not guilty of what they have done to disrupt their strength and cause them to hate from insecurity within them. For they walk as men and then stumble as wicked cowards and then walk again and are only men when they have puffed themselves up with wrath. For do they not stumble before the righteous and cling to them as they fall? But they are hating enough and are held as men only by insolence to then be, not men, but men of the devil, being made from what is not good. Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is an abomination for them to do well.
In the semi-feudal, democracy, the king of soldiers of the cities are the local kings, or it is so in the nation where the angel resided. Now there is a council beyond these kings and a king or queen of the council and the council is elected by the people. Now the council is either ignored or adhered to and the council has little might against the kings of soldiers.
In the semi-feudal, democracy, the king of soldiers of the cities are the local kings, or it is so in the nation where the angel resided. Now there is a council beyond these kings and a king or queen of the council and the council is elected by the people. Now the council is either ignored or adhered to and the council has little might against the kings of soldiers.
In what image is a woman preserved in heaven when the beauty of her youth is preserved there by her good? In what way is love preserved there when love cannot perish? Will the Lord who cares for people cast away anything of true value that is both on Earth and in Heaven? For we look to God to save us to immortality, to His son to come down and rescue us with a heavenly atonement, that we might be immortal, and that our true items of substance might be saved from the destruction of death. Can even wisdom do this thing? Can any prophet offer the atonement? But I have paid a price because more was not told to me, and the word was not sufficient because I did not know it’s secrets, and did not obey as well as I could because of more wisdom that I lacked that was not told to me. Certainly there is one who attempts to be foolish and abandon what wisdom they were given, and not the one who seeks the pleasures of a world but the one who wants war and chooses the wrong battle for themselves that they might impair themselves and have less, casting away and losing and even attempting to cast away the good that others have spiritually, and this is not consistent but wayward. The one who seeks foolishness seeks impairment but there are rebels and the rebellious in the keeping of God. High or low, superior or not is of the individual, and the secrets of the Lord’s
 people is kept, only good should not be kept from good when it is God’s will. The just recompense is even God’s that He is glorified even by the spirits of men so that Heaven and Earth might commune on Earth. I am not to be worshiped by men and the kingdom is the Lord’s. If there is more there is a son of God and I would want Him to say, let none attempt to divide you from me.
In what image is a woman preserved in heaven when the beauty of her youth is preserved there by her good? In what way is love preserved there when love cannot perish? Will the Lord who cares for people cast away anything of true value that is both on Earth and in Heaven? For we look to God to save us to immortality, to His son to come down and rescue us with a heavenly atonement, that we might be immortal, and that our true items of substance might be saved from the destruction of death. Can even wisdom do this thing? Can any prophet offer the atonement? But I have paid a price because more was not told to me, and the word was not sufficient because I did not know it’s secrets, and did not obey as well as I could because of more wisdom that I lacked that was not told to me. Certainly there is one who attempts to be foolish and abandon what wisdom they were given, and not the one who seeks the pleasures of a world but the one who wants war and chooses the wrong battle for themselves that they might impair themselves and have less, casting away and losing and even attempting to cast away the good that others have spiritually, and this is not consistent but wayward. The one who seeks foolishness seeks impairment but there are rebels and the rebellious in the keeping of God. High or low, superior or not is of the individual, and the secrets of the Lord’s people is kept, only good should not be kept from good when it is God’s will. The just recompense is even God’s that He is glorified even by the spirits of men so that Heaven and Earth might commune on Earth. I am not to be worshiped by men and the kingdom is the Lord’s. If there is more there is a son of God and I would want Him to say, let none attempt to divide you from me. Can good be done without the evil? Can what was committed and what failed be fulfilled? But I perceive that the priority is with His son and the power to fulfill is with His aid and way.
In what image is a woman preserved in heaven when the beauty of her youth is preserved there by her good? In what way is love preserved there when love cannot perish? Will the Lord who cares for people cast away anything of true value that is both on Earth and in Heaven? For we look to God to save us to immortality, to His son to come down and rescue us with a heavenly atonement, that we might be immortal, and that our true items of substance might be saved from the destruction of death. Can even wisdom do this thing? Can any prophet offer the atonement? But I have paid a price because more was not told to me, and the word was not sufficient because I did not know it’s secrets, and did not obey as well as I could because of more wisdom that I lacked that was not told to me. 
In what image is a woman preserved in heaven when the beauty of her youth is preserved there by her good? In what way is love preserved there when love cannot perish? Will the Lord who cares for people cast away anything of true value that is both on Earth and in Heaven? For we look to God to save us to immortality, to His son to come down and rescue us with a heavenly atonement, that we might be immortal, and that our true items of substance might be saved from the destruction of death. Can even wisdom do this thing? Can any prophet offer the atonement? But I have paid a price because more was not told to me, and the word was not sufficient because I did not know it’s secrets, and did not obey as well as I could because of more wisdom that I lacked that was not told to me. Certainly there is one who attempts to be foolish and abandon what wisdom they were given, and not the one who seeks the pleasures of a world but the one who wants war and chooses the wrong battle for themselves that they might impair themselves and have less, casting away and losing and even attempting to cast away the good that others have spiritually, and this is not consistent but wayward. The one who seeks foolishness seeks impairment but there are rebels and the rebellious in the keeping of God.
In what image is a woman preserved in heaven when the beauty of her youth is preserved there by her good? In what way is love preserved there when love cannot perish? Will the Lord who cares for people cast away anything of true value that is both on Earth and in Heaven? For we look to God to save us to immortality, to His son to come down and rescue us with a heavenly atonement, that we might be immortal, and that our true items of substance might be saved from the destruction of death. Can even wisdom do this thing? Can any prophet offer the atonement? But I have paid a price because more was not told to me, and the word was not sufficient because I did not know it’s secrets, and did not obey as well as I could because of more wisdom that I lacked that was not told to me. Certainly there is one who attempts to be foolish and abandon what wisdom they were given, and not the one who seeks the pleasures of a world but the one who wants war and chooses the wrong battle for themselves that they might impair themselves and have less, casting away and losing and even attempting to cast away the good that others have spiritually, and this is not consistent but wayward. The one who seeks foolishness seeks impairment but there are rebels and the rebellious in the keeping of God. High or low, superior or not is of the individual, and the secrets of the Lord’s people is kept, only good should not be kept from good when it is God’s will. The just recompense is even God’s that He is glorified even by the spirits of men so that Heaven and Earth might commune on Earth. I am not to be worshiped by men and the kingdom is the Lord’s. If there is more there is a son of God and I would want Him to say, let none attempt to divide you from me. Can good be done without the evil? Can what was committed and what failed be fulfilled? But I perceive that the priority is with His son and the power to fulfill is with His aid and way.
In what image is a woman preserved in heaven when the beauty of her youth is preserved there by her good? In what way is love preserved there when love cannot perish? Will the Lord who cares for people cast away anything of true value that is both on Earth and in Heaven? For we look to God to save us to immortality, to His son to come down and rescue us with a heavenly atonement, that we might be immortal, and that our true items of substance might be saved from the destruction of death. Can even wisdom do this thing? Can any prophet offer the atonement? But I have paid a price because more was not told to me, and the word was not sufficient because I did not know it’s secrets, and did not obey as well as I could because of more wisdom that I lacked that was not told to me. Certainly there is one who attempts to be foolish and abandon what wisdom they were given, and not the one who seeks the pleasures of a world but the one who wants war and chooses the wrong battle for themselves that they might impair themselves and have less, casting away and losing and even attempting to cast away the good that others have spiritually, and this is not consistent but wayward. The one who seeks foolishness seeks impairment but there are rebels and the rebellious in the keeping of God. High or low, superior or not is of the individual, and the secrets of the Lord’s people is kept, only good should not be kept from good when it is God’s will. The just recompense is even God’s that He is glorified even by the spirits of men so that Heaven and Earth might commune on Earth.
Integrity to not do business causes poverty among the people, for it profits none to be responsible for others, but the active trade is making gain easier.
Interactions list
Type list
Rate list
Cell type
General replication rate
Possible DNA scenarios - cancerous, slow, normal, fast

interactions standard .inv

DNA interactions
Cell exterior interactions
Enzyme interactions - rate
Inhibiting interactions
Disinhibiting interactions
Interactions list
Type list
Rate list
Cell type
General replication rate
Possible DNA scenarios - cancerous, slow, normal, fast

interactions standard .inv

DNA interactions
Cell exterior interactions
Enzyme interactions - rate
Inhibiting interactions
Disinhibiting interactions
Is it easier to say gentile or Babylonian? But those of the kingdom are not gentiles and if they are not Jews than they place the truth of God before those low things of Babylon. For Babylon has kings due to luck and chance and its princes are those who did wrong to be placed there. Why then does any exhault Babylon over the truth? But truth, having all substance, is not luck and chance and if there is injustice it is known by God. But the prophet does not annoint the leaders of Babylon and the things that given in injustice and without merit are not the truth for they have no substance. Now if Babylonians should be jelous of any of those not Gentiles it is because they have no substance, being constructed and held by Baybolon and being of the merit of Babylon, which is nothing. Now if a dog should enter your house it is possible a grievance, but what dog is for exaulting itself over the child? But let them strive and mis-shape themselves according to Babylon that they might strive and bend and hold themselves up for nothing and no reason because they are animals before the child. But if men and women of the gentiles have feigned insanity to intimidate and bully than are they not a foolish and confusing people fit for the animals, and yet the animals
 are more noble than these. For even blasphamy by their cults is invented when it is and cast away at another time, that they are a rediculous and foolish people who boast and exhault themselves in nothing and do not possess the humility for truth. For if any should adhere to truth, that Babylon is luck and chance, they will not be at war with the kingdom, because the truth is not Babylon. But let not the unloved child believe that life is fair, suddenly, or the ugly one, that they are loved. But if any will know truth and believe that there is an afterlife than they know what is true. But if any will say, the fire will consume our sacrifice, then at length let them realize the consequences. 
It is expected that the guilty will first accuse the righteous of their wrongs, so that by understanding we know when it is so with ease and no disruption and peace in what is expected because of the understanding of a man.
It is nature for those who are the devil’s to accuse when they are guilty of what they accuse, but it has not occurred to many a child who is God’s.
It is prudent not to be cursing too much when you have received a bad report, for you do not know how much might be slander or if all is true, but such is of no matter unless it be for continuation of your strategies. Now the righteous are blessed and all is going to them when they fight for justice, that when you are leader and wise you are finding good with the righteous, but those of lies and wrong doing, are they not the burden? But the rebel against evil is not your enemy, for it is council and good, that it is a light thing of blessing, but the rebel of wickedness, those who have no belief, are not all believing and yet they do not? Now one is wicked and the other offering light council, that one is faithful and the other fit to be cast out, and strength is given when you have the righteous. Now the elder man who is wise can be a mighty councillor and yet where there is much chaos, are there not some interloping in places as if idle. But one faction is builders, intelligent in things of engineering, another skilled in politics and procedures, that often the greater are not as close to the place where decisions are made, but do they not correct themselves and their leader is one of them, for they are mighty by intelligence, for their leader corrects them and they correct themselves and they come and go with ability. Now those of politics and procedure are having herbs, and they bicker in different ways, and bickering and grumbling is nothing, for many are as if elite in their abilities. Now if some are railing outside without understanding, than is it truly for you? But much must be permitted that it go well in the land.
It is prudent not to be cursing too much when you have received a bad report, for you do not know how much might be slander or if all is true, but such is of no matter unless it be for continuation of your strategies. Now the righteous are blessed and all is going to them when they fight for justice, that when you are leader and wise you are finding good with the righteous, but those of lies and wrong doing, are they not the burden? But the rebel against evil is not your enemy, for it is council and good, that it is a light thing of blessing, but the rebel of wickedness, those who have no belief, are not all believing and yet they do not? Now one is wicked and the other offering light council, that one is faithful and the other fit to be cast out, and strength is given when you have the righteous. Now the elder man who is wise can be a mighty councillor and yet where there is much chaos, are there not some interloping in places as if idle. But one faction is builders, intelligent in things of engineering, another skilled in politics and procedures, that often the greater are not as close to the place where decisions are made, but do they not correct themselves and their leader is one of them, for they are mighty by intelligence, for their leader corrects them and they correct themselves and they come and go with ability. Now those of politics and procedure are having herbs, and they bicker in different ways, and bickering and grumbling is nothing, for many are as if elite in their abilities. Now if some are railing outside without understanding, than is it truly for you? But much must be permitted that it go well in the land.
It is prudent not to be cursing too much when you have received a bad report, for you do not know how much might be slander or if all is true, but such is of no matter unless it be for continuation of your strategies. Now the righteous are blessed and all is going to them when they fight for justice, that when you are leader and wise you are finding good with the righteous, but those of lies and wrong doing, are they not the burden? But the rebel against evil is not your enemy, for it is council and good, that it is a light thing of blessing, but the rebel of wickedness, those who have no belief, are not all believing and yet they do not? Now one is wicked and the other offering light council, that one is faithful and the other fit to be cast out, and strength is given when you have the righteous. Now the elder man who is wise can be a mighty councillor and yet where there is much chaos there are some interloping in places as if idle.
It is still true that we should kill all the ugly people, and yet if we do not do it when it is in our power it is only to honour the laws of a nation because God is loving us and it is not because of ugly people. But it is forbidden to kill all the ugly people, and I too forbid it, and I only must forbid it to honour God. Now this that is written and declared takes the primary priority that nothing else written makes it lesser in priority because it is foremost because nothing cancels it or makes it nothing but it is the addition to all, being the primary priority, and let no ugly person misuse it, for I would declare worse for them than what any beautiful person would declare for them, that no ugly person would turn a beautiful person against me or I against them.
It is still true that we should kill all the ugly people, and yet if we do not do it when it is in our power it is only to honour the laws of a nation because God is loving us and it is not because of ugly people. But it is forbidden to kill all the ugly people and forbidden to do what this culture calls murder, and I too forbid it, and I only must forbid it to honour God. Now this that is written and declared takes the primary priority that nothing else written makes it lesser in priority because it is foremost because nothing cancels it or makes it nothing but it is the addition to all, being the primary priority, and let no ugly person misuse it, for I would declare worse for them than what any beautiful person would declare for them, that no ugly person would turn a beautiful person against me or I against them.
It is understood that even vainity cannot be judged. Now if any is not beautiful what is good to do for them if something good might be done?Now the peasant has said we judge you because you have made us jelous, that we have incorporated this as an addition to our morality, and we revile you and hate you because of what is, because you are like a god to us, who makes us miserable, and it should not be. For one is a farmer, the other a shop-keeper, another a banker or dentist, and we all have labour and choirs to our sorrow and burden on Earth, and you come to us like a god to reign in splendour and afflict us with misery. For what is a poor peasant to bring you that would appease you. My daughter is in school and I work hard, and what more can I give to you for your presence like a god requires it from my hand and I have no more to give so that my heart accuses me to misery because I am not adequate to give you more good as you should be given. Now for the sake of mercy, I have attacked you in defence because I could bear no more and was not well in mind anymore, and can I be blamed? But I am only a man and you are like a god. What can man do in this world but work hard and attempt to accomplish and hope there is something left over after the gods have had their fill. —And the man wept in a heart of innocence because of the misery and sorrow of life. Now the one like a god had compassion and did not blame him.
Jealousy translated into envy by offensive action is more tolerable for some people who have niche neurosis.
Jude, the good one, the one that everybody loved, the only one who cared enough after the rest were doing great things. Did Peter care? Paul? I have nothing to say. Did anybody pause for a moment to consider something? Jude is the one I like. Servant of the Christ, and the only person who seemed to have the time to do something others did not. For some are to be compared to an abandoned mother in this way and yet Jude has cared. Like-wise there are the elderly dealing with those who are like them who rebelled at Korah. Now are the angels saved by the consideration of Jude, who is the Christ’s servant. For he has given to me as if all, including the Christ, for what I valued most he has given, and what is valued for other things the disciples have given to others. Now he is the Christ’s servant and I am hearing him as if a letter with the Christ’s words, and yet is Jude to be considered seperate in some way, for there is another thing and Jude is with his brothers and yet seperate, is he not? For he has considered what the others were not given to consider. Now my heart is with love and kind intentioned humour without mocking or meanness at the beginning of what I write here, and yet it is with love from the heart that the humour is partially true. Now there are your elderly being afflicted by those like those who rebelled against Moses at Korah and were swallowed by the Earth. Now some act out personal
 grievances against them and others are firmly believing the elderly are unwanted and forgotten that they appeal to the animals as if to attack the abandoned old, for wrath is in their hearts at the idea of being better than animals. Now the glory I give to Jude and if he would throw it away, I am still grateful that he is the Christ’s servant and is among the disciples, for it is like his brothers have gone to Great War and yet Jude has rescued every one of them who is in combat, so that my love is greater for him. Now let the wise understand more for there is always more to get with consideration to wisdom for only a small bit of sand is gathered and the Universe is as if filled up with desert planets so that even the planets cannot be counted.
Jude, the good one, the one that everybody loved, the only one who cared enough after the rest were doing great things. Did Peter care? Paul? I have nothing to say. Did anybody pause for a moment to consider something? Jude is the one I like. Servant of the Christ, and the only person who seemed to have the time to do something others did not. For some are to be compared to an abandoned mother in this way and yet Jude has cared. Like-wise there are the elderly dealing with those who are like them who rebelled at Korah. Now are the angels saved by the consideration of Jude, who is the Christ’s servant. For he has given to me as if all, including the Christ, for what I valued most he has given, and what is valued for other things the disciples have given to others. Now he is the Christ’s servant and I am hearing him as if a letter with the Christ’s words, and yet is Jude to be considered seperate in some way, for there is another thing and Jude is with his brothers and yet seperate, is he not? For he has considered what the others were not given to consider. Now my heart is with love and kind intentioned humour without mocking or meanness at the beginning of what I write here, and yet it is with love from the heart that the humour is partially true. Now there are your elderly being afflicted by those like those who rebelled against Moses at Korah and were swallowed by the Earth. Now some act out personal grievances against them and others are firmly believing the elderly are unwanted and forgotten that they appeal to the animals as if to attack the abandoned old, for wrath is in their hearts at the idea of being better than animals. Now the glory I give to Jude and if he would throw it away, I am still grateful that he is the Christ’s servant and is among the disciples, for it is like his brothers have gone to Great War and yet Jude has rescued every one of them who is in combat, so that my love is greater for him. Now let the wise understand more for there is always more to get with consideration to wisdom for only a small bit of sand is gathered and the Universe is as if filled up with desert planets so that even the planets cannot be counted.
Jude, the good one, the one that everybody loved, the only one who cared enough after the rest were doing great things. Did Peter care? Paul? I have nothing to say. Did anybody pause for a moment to consider something? Jude is the one I like. Servant of the Christ, and the only person who seemed to have the time to do something others did not. For some are to be compared to an abandoned mother in this way and yet Jude has cared. Like-wise there are the elderly dealing with those who are like them who rebelled at Korah. Now are the angels saved by the consideration of Jude, who is the Christ’s servant. For he has given to me as if all, in addition to what the Christ has, for what I valued most he has given, and what is valued for other things the disciples have given to others. Now he is the Christ’s servant and I am hearing him as if a letter with the Christ’s words, and yet is Jude to be considered seperate in some way, for there is another thing and Jude is with his brothers and yet seperate, is he not? For he has considered what the others were not given to consider. Now my heart is with love and kind intentioned humour without mocking or meanness at the beginning of what I write here, and yet it is with love from the heart that the humour is partially true, very true in a way for even in my deciding that everyone should love him, it is the right of my opinion, and the way is good in how I have said it. Now there are your elderly being afflicted by those like those who rebelled against Moses at Korah and were swallowed by the Earth. Now some act out personal grievances against them and others are firmly believing the elderly are unwanted and forgotten that they appeal to the animals as if to attack the abandoned old, for wrath is in their hearts at the idea of being better than animals. Now the glory I give to Jude and if he would throw it away, I am still grateful that he is the Christ’s servant and is among the disciples, for it is like his brothers have gone to Great War and yet Jude has rescued every one of them who is in combat, so that my love is greater for him. Now let the wise understand more for there is always more to get with consideration to wisdom for only a small bit of sand is gathered and the Universe is as if filled up with desert planets so that even the planets cannot be counted.
Jude, the good one, the one that everybody loved, the only one who cared enough after the rest were doing great things. Did Peter care? Paul? I have nothing to say. Did anybody pause for a moment to consider something? Jude is the one I like. Servant of the Christ, and the only person who seemed to have the time to do something others did not. For some are to be compared to an abandoned mother in this way and yet Jude has cared. Like-wise there are the elderly dealing with those who are like them who rebelled at Korah. Now are the angels saved by the consideration of Jude, who is the Christ’s servant. For he has given to me as if all, in addition to what the Christ has, for what I valued most he has given, and what is valued for other things the disciples have given to others. Now he is the Christ’s servant and I am hearing him as if a letter with the Christ’s words, and yet is Jude to be considered seperate in some way, for there is another thing and Jude is with his brothers and yet seperate, is he not? For he has considered what the others were not given to consider. Now my heart is with love and kind intentioned humour without mocking or meanness at the beginning of what I write here, and yet it is with love from the heart that the humour is partially true, very true in a way for even in my deciding that everyone should love him, it is the right of my opinion, and the way is good in how I have said it. Now there are your elderly being afflicted by those like those who rebelled against Moses at Korah and were swallowed by the Earth. Now some act out personal grievances against them and others are firmly believing the elderly are unwanted and forgotten that they appeal to the animals as if to attack the abandoned old, for wrath is in their hearts at the idea of being better than animals. Now the glory I give to Jude and if he would throw it away, I am still grateful that he is the Christ’s servant and is among the disciples, for it is like his brothers have gone to Great War and yet Jude has rescued every one of them who is in combat, so that my love is greater for him. Now let the wise understand more for there is always more to get with consideration to wisdom for only a small bit of sand is gathered and the Universe is as if filled up with desert planets so that even the planets cannot be counted.
Jude, the good one, the one that everybody loved, the only one who cared enough after the rest were doing great things. Did Peter care? Paul? I have nothing to say. Did anybody pause for a moment to consider something? Jude is the one I like. Servant of the Christ, and the only person who seemed to have the time to do something others did not.
Justice is not without judgement that one thing is not good where another is not bad, else there is nothing for any grievance towards anything. But it is sometimes and not often the case that the person who would do something enough times will not be badly touched by coorection that is a wrong correction to use on the person who would not do something many times for whom a very small rebuke goes deeper into to them than 50 lashes to a fool.
Lacking knowledge they swelled with lack of substance and exalted themselves, being poor in something, that they might claim that none was greater than them, and better was the one who paid for help and was righteous enough to have it, and yet was despised. These two were very different, and the one who was despised was kind and good, but the scorn of some was not perceiving all, and so there is nothing to correct for these. But as for the one who lacked he joined a group that was already of crime but not of violence, and he acted foolishly, but it was better for him, being better than the one who had no understanding and little knowledge who was for carrying out violence for sport.
Lacking knowledge they swelled with lack of substance and exalted themselves, being poor in something, that they might claim that none was greater than them, and better was the one who paid for help and was righteous enough to have it, and yet was despised. These two were very different, and the one who was despised was kind and good, but the scorn of some was not perceiving all, and so there is nothing to correct for these. But as for the one who lacked he joined a group that was already of crime but not of violence, and he acted foolishly, but it was better for him, being better than the one who had no understanding and little knowledge who was for carrying out violence for sport.
Lan is a 16 year old who is living in the desert continent Haddirim which has the great Herit expanse
 of desert where the nomobi live with their strange ancient religion and practises, a terrifying desert tribe that is extremely lethal and rumoured to be unforgiving of tresspasses into their areas. They leave their dead upon the sand on a wooden cradle and send the body to the sky to return to the sand, and they play the stringed quintal instrument and sing songs only in the pre-world language of a far away people, for they came to the desert fleeing the failure in the war of Roramit in which they fought as the elite tribe of warriors who took their objective and another also, although many other attacks failed so that the war was lost and the soldiers and many massacred, so that the city, Wendack, was burned and destroyed and most people massacred. The elite warrior tribe had none left to fight with them and 3000 of them moved across the great dividing oceans and were persecuted by some because of lack of land until they settled in the desert and became 30 thousand people over many generations. They are a people with excellent hearing and sight and generally strong and fast, who undergo a secret combat training of their own combat art that focuses upon the knife and sword, which is one-sided. They are as elite soldiers, the best of any nation, all of them.
Lan is a 16 year old who is living in the desert continent Haddirim which has the great Herit expanse of desert where the nomobi live with their strange ancient religion and practises, a terrifying desert tribe that is extremely lethal and rumoured to be unforgiving of tresspasses into their areas. They leave their dead upon the sand on a wooden cradle and send the body to the sky to return to the sand, and they play the stringed quintal instrument and sing songs only in the pre-world language of a far away people, for they came to the desert fleeing the failure in the war of Roramit in which they fought as the elite tribe of warriors who took their objective and another also, although many other attacks failed so that the war was lost and the soldiers and many massacred, so that the city, Wendack, was burned and destroyed and most people massacred. The elite warrior tribe had none left to fight with them and 3000 of them moved across the great dividing oceans and were persecuted by some because of lack of land until they settled in the desert and became 30 thousand people over many generations. They are a people with excellent hearing and sight and generally strong and fast, who undergo a secret combat training of their own combat art that focuses upon the knife and sword, which is one-sided. They are as elite soldiers, the best of any nation, all of them. Lan is an orphan who is being protected by the nomobi but he does not know of it until the assissination attacks begin on him and he is defended by soldiers of the nomobi. Prior to this Lan is going to the local school which is in a castle and tent complex, and he is living with distant relatives, a small clan, although they are not really related to except by one marriage a long time ago. His father fought and died in a war after shortly arriving to the desert continent, and his mother died shortly after he was born after a tribe taking orders from demons, sent out a group of soldiers to kill her and her child. His father killed most of the assissins with the help of his uncle, but both his mother and uncle were killed in the attack and when his father opened the basement door, his son was still alive.
Let a woman find her husband, for the world is filled up with distractions and ways to stumble, that where she gives herself there her husband is, that if she loves his house and it is pleasing to God, she wants a good thing.
Let not dogs come between men, not the Egyptian and the Elsnon, nor any people displaying any shade. But a dog struck away by the visitor and the noble man has judged him innocent that it does not disrupt matters of peace. For if there are dogs that are violent than do they do good for any people? But when a violent dog has bitten the visitor it is eventually biting and attacking those who are citizens of the city. Now will any march behind a dog for it to be their captain? But the Elsnon have no use to have dogs that bite and bark at any for they are not defended by dogs. How then do we have defence? But we are defended by better things and dogs are not required for this. 
Let not the wicked say, “I am exceedingly great by wickedness.” There foolishness is as pointless as nothing, but the words towards God were heard by Abel.
Let silver be with what is beautiful, but all women are beautiful, and so let words of wisdom be found on the lips of the one who does well, on the lips of the kind in due season, and how right it is, even the lips of the wicked when it is in respect of what is great, being God, that the wise saying not be found in foolish contention, to be used unjustly, that the good will be taken to the palace to dwell, and the fool cast among ruin and desolate darkness. For the men with integrity are good to me, the upright with good to me, the one’s without integrity and control having at times abandoned all they have to be fools towards me, and I did not encroach upon anything that was theirs. But there have been young men like goats to do good to me, to offer good, that integrity is good and they are like a precious stone upon a land the Lord has chosen, to dwell amongst the rocks, to do their good upon the Earth. The righteous men have understanding and good, to descern between the people in judgement, that I am encouraged beyond what might be fitting to add good to good that I a do not fear for the people when three or four of these is found, that justice can be restored, that the land might be with much abundance, that justice and support might both be there, that the leaders of men might receive councillors of integrity and wisdom.
Let silver be with what is beautiful, let words of wisdom be found on the lips of the one who does well, on the lips of the kind in due season, and how right it is, even the lips of the wicked when it is in respect of what is great, being God, that the wise saying not be found in foolish contention, to be used unjustly, that the good will be taken to the palace to dwell, and the fool cast among ruin and desolate darkness. For the men with integrity are good to me, the upright with good to me, the one’s without integrity and control having at times abandoned all they have to be fools towards me, and I did not encroach upon anything that was theirs. But there have been young men like goats to do good to me, to offer good, that integrity is good and they are like a precious stone upon a land the Lord has chosen, to dwell amongst the rocks, to do their good upon the Earth. The righteous men have understanding and good, to descern between the people in judgement, that I am encouraged beyond what might be fitting to add good to good that I a do not fear for the people when three or four of these is found, that justice can be restored, that the land might be with much abundance, that justice and support might both be there, that the leaders of men might receive councillors of integrity and wisdom.
Let the devil’s house wage war against itself and if you will, you may be following good in the light.
Let the leader be purified from Ahab that the unclean spirit is cast out, for the spirit of the bullied one is worse to punish his own people who hate him if it is so. Now do not say, yet I have done well, when it is taken from you who is to be cast out. For a king cannot be bullied by their people and to believe so is foolishness.
Let them show truth of cause by their actions, whether they rage against holy places, scorning the prophet’s village from close by, saying that which is like prophanity, and know that men are greater than them and a rebellious dog has no master to defend and barks and growls of it’s own insecurity. So are those who were taught to throw a stumbling block before the children of Israel, for though they may seem like a tribe they are scattered and gathering fools.
Level of anarchy required in capitalism democratic system to keep system from collapsing as opposed to monarchy or theocracy with similar values and given by equation.
Levels of consciousness and quest for societal separations based on substantial principles of individuals.
List: ordered, changeable
Tuple: ordered, unchangeable
Set: unordered, unchangable
Dictionary: key and value: ordered, changeable
List of differences in cancer cells and ways to target such differences.
List of differences in cancer cells and ways to target such differences.
Little time for reberembering the bakery land or the lucid lullabies of July time when apples bloomed and fell to the grass after the closed half shadows turned to bring back times of eternal shades when we slung ourselves into the world of foliage and excised the evil past that was to be future, so forever the flame burns down the town to heaps ash and it is all swept out and low to places past the lines of days when we delt with the killing avalanches and the boisterous beasts with sharp teeth, so far in the crisp apple days of fairy light and winters huddled fast to some new deseases clime that was unfixed and cast out for the soldiers marched in stoic ambuscade to the gate and blasted down the evil from that place. For in July heats were the baked bricks under leather shoe of some, and the dreary, dreadful towns of iron and industrial ash as the new era began its cacophony into technology when democracy already opened the gap so that even hell could enter, rising up in wallets of lava, streams of augmented fire that burned down the sick and poor places and rounded up the ill ones into camps and bigger houses, where cruel masked demons cackled flee for all the strong misheouv done against the humble ones who bore the title of
 threat to the devil’s house so that frenzied and fanatical demons might devise their plan to bring more hell upon the Earth.
Low amount of conscience is lack of safety, but a moral person is going in the way of life. 
Many things that are good can be places for zeolots to be planted, for they live in secret, so that there are times when disobedience is loyalty and righteousness.
Martha takes the cake but doesn’t bake it.
Men are capable of some evil qualities that are not often found in women and to possess those qualities is not being a man. For what is a mystery is so, that you do not know, but the woman who is of greater understanding is showing herself to be good, that iniquity is not in error and foolishness not a mistake, that you not add to foolishness in looking for mortals to change what they cannot change. But why do you speak like foolish children to say that one thing is so and then another when you do not know, and in peace the person goes from you. Now is all that you do not know, knowledge, really a matter of arragance that there is no knowledge? But if one is arragent then another is not, and a child has wisdom and resilience. But is an angel not on Earth and among those things of Earth that he not be considered so innocent as was believed prior? But I have not to meddle in what is not my business and I have gained a place to offer my judgements.
Men are capable of some evil qualities that are not often found in women and to possess those qualities is not being a man. For what is a mystery is so, that you do not know, but the woman who is of greater understanding is showing herself to be good, that iniquity is not in error and foolishness not a mistake, that you not add to foolishness in looking for mortals to change what they cannot change.
Mid-level intelligence splinters generating false reports to target their own citizens in a fashion that commits terrorism against their own people.
No person is capable of being convinced by bullying and the one who believes it is like one is ignorant to all reality. For when one is guilty of that which is below the judgement of God than no amount of wickedness is enough for them to make themselves safe and secure, that though they seek out the worst prison for themselves where only their type of criminals are they are not finding enough wickedness for them, that the attempt is pointless to hide from the sky, to be hiding from God, and the mountains do not cover them to relief.
Not going in book because different thing being used: Now do you think that I wish for any, or command any to kill all the ugly people? But do I misunderstand the language as use? But I have given no command and you know right and wrong. Now if there is contention we know what it means. But let no person accuse this saying as if it was wrong to say, because God is caring for His children. But I do not give permission I do not have or give any command with this saying. Now if ugly people are conspiring against you, to ruin what is yours, how much must they be in ruin, and how much more guilt in the wrongs they commit. But if an ugly person departs from you then let them go, because it is beautiful. Now if an ugly is not returning good to you for what you have done, and it is not wrong, did you not already know the place of the beautiful? But be remembering that you are God’s and that God is able to give you reward.
Note: I would have called the first book The Diary of Lucifer except before it is read it is likely people will not know the meaning and it could result in what is not good for the church in that good people will possibly lose face before something can be properly understood in the name of the first book. Therefore I might compromise in the name and the symbol is representing the church. Now it is possible that none of the books have names but it is necessary that I give them names. So I have chosen other possible names that might be better for those of the church.
Note: I would have called the first book The Diary of Lucifer except before it is read it is likely people will not know the meaning and it could result in what is not good for the church in that good people will possibly lose face before something can be properly understood in the name of the first book. Therefore I might compromise in the name and the symbol is representing the church. Now it is possible that none of the books have names but it is necessary that I give them names. So I have chosen other possible names that might be better for those of the church. So I have considered calling it The Diary of the New, and given that it considers both things from the old and new Testiment I have considered this name to be acceptable.
Now Avram says, Come and let me prepare for you, and another says, provide for yourself and go to God, for if you come to Earth to be labouring as we, yet you are not to be among us, return to Heaven. Now I have gone to be among people with things from Sodom and Babylon and unruly and jelous wilderness tribes and a king who does not lead but is doing as requested even when there is time for leadership, and anarchy has plagued the land, and yet there is a white-wash covering and the people are not able to see through to know of the chaos, and great evils are occuring, and Orgoth is gaining strong holds in places, and the people with many gods do not even attempt the blessing but fear God more than the angel when I go to them, for it is because of Joshua that I go. The people with the wall are valuing meekness of wisdom, and does not the kingdom of Heaven value such, but the dragon is now representing other things yet I am suspicious of what some of their ancestors may have asked the Lord for, that they are able to be given it, and I will hope with respect and politeness that the one who is their king and has authority will grant me permission to offer wisdom to them, for the greatness is the kings when he permits anything that he does not have to permit. Now my own nation is chaos and the inability to see it, for it is fear and self-control and yet those practising anarchy are exercising neither, and I still ask permission with respect that contentions might be lessened, for my people are favouring much that is your people, and if those in power in my nation do not, yet they are gone by the end of seasons, that we await trouble ending in this fashion when it is towards us, and we are of the type by our own boasting that is not, to honour much of what is of your people. Now if our neighbour resists you than still I am not a citizen of either, but you are king and have authority, yet I am on Earth to participate and endure as any, and give honour to what is given power by God on Earth. Now I must not attempt to tell you what to do, and do not, but I have asked for your indulgence to allow me to reveal my heart in this matter that it might be known.
Now Babel does not have enough understanding and knowledge for the priests of Babylon, and Babylon looks to the priests for many answers and it is not for priests, insufficient in understanding and knowledge, to not give an answer as if they know and understand, for they are the priests and soldiers of the city come to them for answers, and so do many citizens who have family who are sick in some way, for priests are knowing the answer with what they have and it is disgrace for a priest to say that they can doing nothing on a matter, for their duty is to take action and know, for they are priests. Now for what cause is Babel as if clean in this thing and blameless and yet it is so, and the blameless mess is perceived by wisdom, for Babel is far from Babylon and seperate.
Now Babel does not have enough understanding and knowledge for the priests of Babylon, and Babylon looks to the priests for many answers and it is not for priests, insufficient in understanding and knowledge, to not give an answer as if they know and understand, for they are the priests and soldiers of the city come to them for answers, and so do many citizens who have family who are sick in some way, for priests are knowing the answer with what they have and it is disgrace for a priest to say that they can doing nothing on a matter, for their duty is to take action and know, for they are priests. Now for what cause is Babel as if clean in this thing and blameless and yet it is so, and the blameless mess is perceived by wisdom, for Babel is far from Babylon and seperate.
Now Babel has manifested much to the wisdom and understanding of dogs that other animals are even neglected, for by their language they are lead because the language they created was mostly for dogs.
Now Babel is not having confirmed knowledge and understanding in all they claim and they have boasted and lied to extend striving authority in some places, for they have boasted confirmed knowledge where there is nothing confirmed. Now one cannot take action based on that which would be understanding of people, because actions must be and they are all discussion in matters of justice, for one does not descern hearts in judgement with concerns to actions, to do judgement, but actions are the only cause for doing justice and actions are all. Now what a person believes is not what they believe if the actions of it are not performed.
Now Babel is on land in an open space of flat ground and Babylon is placing hindrances around it in out time so that some are finding it hard to enter. Now Babel is not Babylon and Babylon is not made to heed the words and advice of Babel, for they are sometimes disregarding the council of Babel. 
Now Babel is shaping itself according to chosen disbelief in any god and they have no star in the sky, for they are shaping themselves to disbelief, for all must come to disbelief or else it is deemed unfit for building the tower, and yet when it is sent out it is deadly poison to those who believe,
 and a gathering of soldiers and weapons sent out to attack and kill, that they must keep strictly to their own affairs and refrain from meddling in the happenings of the land that they not send out soldiers to kill, for their tower is theirs to govern. But if their tower has sent out soldiers who dwell in shadow, who are as shadows, and have the sword and other weapons and if they have sent out war elephants that exist as shadows that attack, than the angel has not seized their tower for no reason, for they are not permitted to seize anything that is not their tower.
Now Babylon by Babel is belonging with the animals and the sick animals for it comes up from hell and should be devoured by Orgoth’s highest son and the middle son. Now they are like animals who have been circumsized to the injury of the torso, to the cutting off of limbs, and they are at the level of the animals, mostly dogs, and the calf emerges and stumbles but the angel is not for attempting to kill it. Now God could kill it. But if a demon cries it is harsh and cruel in its suffering.
Now Babylon has an army of slaves and it’s numbers are large. Now three-hundred Greeks made them pay greatly, but for India I turn back for the sword does not devour forever.
Now Babylon has an army of slaves and it’s numbers are large. Now three-hundred Greeks made them pay greatly, but for India I turn back for the sword does not devour forever.
Now Babylon has favoured Luke-warmth and dross and tin and worthless jewals and metals and plastic metals and all that is empty of substance for there is only a portion which is not entirely foolish. Now they have sought over-reaching control that they censor and cast out hot and cold, except where it has survived, and they have said in loyalty to Babylon, let us have more control that our strong hand might be elsewhere, for they have wanted the strong hand to grow and the gates to be more secure with the evil guards that the kingdom they attack and cast out and they have placed the Luke-warm in the churches of Christians that they might dampen fire and suffocate flames, and the even the dead church is too much a hot or cold sign, that broad is the Luke-warm road to hell, and the sons of Orgoth are with that road, and the great evils and wickedness is covered with Luke-warmth, with white-wash, that their great wickedness they do might be concealed, for they are those who hide all and seek to cover and hide all wickedness, that the rebel shakes them to dust, and rattles and shatters the bars of the prisons and sends heavy thunder as earthquakes that shake their Luke-warm and filthy places, and the saints are found to be disgusting when they are hot, that they have the foolishness of Christ, that it be known that those who have been deceived are not deceived, for they remain without the Luke-warmth of disbelief, that the cold are at least right to be dead that they might repent, that those in the middle might be cast out and they are disgusting. For let the fire consume them, and let them even burn for eternity.
Now Babylon has what takes all good and turns it to evil, for they would claim for profit, but they may profit less. Now they are melting in their furnaces to change to evil, and the Lord and the Christ must then know if an angel rescued any.
Now Babylon is massive, for I detest to say it, but it is Babylon the Great, and in some parts of Babylon the soldiers of the city do not betray what is with God and His house, and yet it does not seem prudent to assume with confidence and trust that this is the case for all parts of Babylon, for even in those areas where the soldiers are pledging allegiance to God, there are those acting with no regard for the other soldiers and pledging allegiance to Babylon, and yet it is no business of the citizens for it is a private matter for the soldiers to deal with. Now those soldiers pledging allegiance to Babylon are able, as all soldiers, to act with level of independence and even more so those for Babylon when they form a separate tribe for Babylon because the soldiers of the city are cursing the wickedness of Babylon that they are stronger than Babylon and pledge allegiance to God. Now in many places in Babylon, sometimes in most, the soldiers of the city are pledging allegiance to God but the traitors for Babylon are acting independently in their seperate tribes, and they are often without much fear of the the other soldiers, for do they not have strong friends in Babylon who are in places of high regard? Do they not answer more to the strong leaders and those in places of high regard, that they have strength and lack of fear of the other soldiers because of it? But it is not for citizens to use against those who pledge allegiance to God, for in such disrespect they join with Babylon to fight with it.
Now Babylon offers the full circumciscion, and Jews the circumciscion that is people. Now Babylon offers hard metals and cruel stones that have no value that they are abuse to a person who is given them as self abuse.
Now Babylon will employ the dog-lion as a soldier and those pretending to be of no intelligence are being brutal to bully, for it is not abomination to them as much is not abomination to them that is so for God’s people. Now dog-lion knows there is God and that His people are with His kingdoms. For Babylon is servant to God’s kingdom with concern to lowness, and you have taken what they seized for yourself.
Now Babylon will employ the dog-lion as a soldier and those pretending to be of no intelligence are being brutal to bully, for it is not abomination to them as much is not abomination to them that is so for God’s people. Now dog-lion knows there is God and that His people are with His kingdoms. For Babylon is servant to God’s kingdom with concern to lowness, and you have taken what they seized for yourself.
Now Babylonian tongue is many words, nuanced and polite in a fashion, and yet dishonest, able to say cruelty and evil that cannot be said in an honest way, and Jews of the Lost Tribes are able to translate to pure language of simple truth, better language, and yet those meddling between Babylonian and the pure language are extracting and offering mistranslation of Babylonian to pure language, because it has not been translated yet by those of the Lost Tribes, and they say, we do not agree with the right translation that we offer lies as the translation, and who can prove us wrong, for where is the Lord, your deliverer? Now doing as they do to intentionally mistranslate, for they are able to translate right, is called Bergabbing and it is a thing of like-women men, fickle-girls, and when they meddle between men and women it is the Sodom combat of homosexuals, men who desire men, that they are Bergabbing homosexuals of Sodom combat. Now they are beneath man and women if they do so as soldiers of cities.
Now Babylonians operate as if any place they are is Babylon when it is not, for Babylonians are always in Babylon where ever they are. Now if Babylonians send out messengers of death when they speak, for if there is serious threats of death in their mouths when the matter of occurrence is of no wrong committed, than do you not know the voice of what is not with morality? But let them not teach you their ways in this way, for their ways are wicked and worship the devil, indeed their ways are ignorant and nothing that they are not to be learned.
Now Babylonians operate as if any place they are is Babylon when it is not, for Babylonians are always in Babylon where ever they are. Now if Babylonians send out messengers of death when they speak, for if there is serious threats of death in their mouths when the matter of occurrence is of no wrong committed, than do you not know the voice of what is not with morality? But let them not teach you their ways in this way, for their ways are wicked and worship the devil, indeed their ways are ignorant and nothing that they are not to be learned.
Now Babylonians speak intimidation in Babel for they are the less intelligent. For they carry on in the hearing of others to put up large walls of foreboding and giant towers decorated with arms and dread, and yet those intelligent are for learning.
Now Babylonians speak intimidation in Babel for they are the less intelligent. For they carry on in the hearing of others to put up large walls of foreboding and giant towers decorated with arms and dread, and yet those intelligent are for learning.
Now Babylonians, some of them, do not seem to realize that most people are not Babylonian, and who knows what they are offended by? Now Babylon does not belong on Earth at all and there are not many who are Babylonian but they control much with a few there and a few there and the Lord’s people are for the majority with a few there and a few there. Now Orgoth is a minority for after it delivers from one thing is kills who is saved, that all are delivered and then killed for they have only interest in establishing their kingdom on Earth. Now sentience is Jews and all people of any ethnicity has Jews or people or men and women or what name they might be called who are the Lord’s. Now the Christ has spread the Lord from East to West and West to East and Mohamed’s people are polite and respectful of angels and they worship God. Now there is no need to rebuke them or for them to rebuke you, but they have what the angels could not accept at an early time unless they would be as an angel who would not bow to Adam, the first man, in the genre of bow that is right for such a thing, for there are different types and the angels are the Lord’s and the Christ’s.
Now Babylonians, some of them, do not seem to realize that most people are not Babylonian, and who knows what they are offended by? Now Babylon does not belong on Earth at all and there are not many who are Babylonian but they control much with a few
 there and a few there and the Lord’s people are for the majority with a few there and a few there. Now Orgoth is a minority for after it delivers from one thing is kills who is saved, that all are delivered and then killed for they have only interest in establishing their kingdom on Earth. Now sentience is Jews and all people of any ethnicity has Jews or people or men and women or what name they might be called who are the Lord’s. Now the Christ has spread the Lord from East to West and West to East and Mohamed’s people are polite and respectful of angels and they worship God. Now there is no need to rebuke them or for them to rebuke you, but they have what the angels could not accept at an early time unless they would be as an angel who would not bow to Adam, the first man, in the genre of bow that is right for such a thing, for there are different types and the angels are the Lord’s and the Christ’s.
Now Babylon’s soldiers of cities and towns and the soldiers of nations hold all in place whether good or bad. For if it is good it is maintained by them and if it is wicked it is maintained by their might. Now if leaders are changed in seasons and yet the most of the good must remain that it is maintained and if most of the wickedness must remain than it is maintained.
Now David kills two things that are not belonging in war, and both are exceedingly wicked as sodomites. Now Joab is not deceived by two things not belonging in war, for he kills the traitor delaying strategy and the insolent man who must keep away except for battle. Now David’s son is not judging two things for he is killing the insolent bully, his elder brother, and the harrassing one who desecrates territory like a sick dog that drives away people from the land, and Joab he will not let fall, but fullfills the Lord’s will and Joab’s for Joab would rather ascend to heaven than be a hypocrite, worse than death for him.
Now David kills two things that are not belonging in war, and both are exceedingly wicked as sodomites. Now Joab is not deceived by two things not belonging in war, for he kills the traitor delaying strategy and the insolent man who must keep away except for battle. Now David’s son is not judging two things for he is killing the insolent bully, his elder brother, and the harrassing one who desecrates territory like a sick dog that drives away people from the land, and Joab he will not let fall, but fullfills the Lord’s will and Joab’s for Joab would rather ascend to heaven than be a hypocrite, worse than death for him.
Now David saw the angel, and some can see an angel, but Babylon by Babel has said they are sick and arrests them. Now some see visions and Babylon through Babel arrests them. Now all shades have those who are meant to be slave owners and they are given, and the nations forbid it. Now Babel’s dogs blaspheme and they apply dog things to places it cannot be, for they reason in the heart of a dog, but Jews reason inside the heart of a man, and some have brought up things of angel’s from their hearts as if having heard some of an angel’s wisdom and using it right or as joke it is on their lips. Now the hearts of some are knowing great truth that they bring up things in the realm of heaven and the kingdom and it was so with one, but they do not know, only they bring up what they bring up because of their heart. Now a woman has opened her mouth for a man to speak truth against her, for in erring she is being less than what she is meant to be, and the man keeping to God will not say it unless he is meant to that it is not sin for him. Now did the Pharisees not tempt the Christ to speak wrong? But he speaks plainly to John as if face to face. Now the woman is wanting for man to be man to please God, and she who wants it does not say it. Now what is there to be said? But they kept to the scripture and performed it wrong because they did not understand and because of the confusion and deceptions of others and in time there was worse that Babylon came and they have a more numerous army but 300 mighty will cut them all down if there is no traitor.
Now David saw the angel, and some can see an angel, but Babylon by Babel has said they are sick and arrests them. Now some see visions and Babylon through Babel arrests them. Now all shades have those who are meant to be slave owners and they are given, and the nations forbid it. Now Babel’s dogs blaspheme and they apply dog things to places it cannot be, for they reason in the heart of a dog, but Jews reason inside the heart of a man, and some have brought up things of angel’s from their hearts as if having heard some of an angel’s wisdom and using it right or as joke it is on their lips. Now the hearts of some are knowing great truth that they bring up things in the realm of heaven and the kingdom and it was so with one, but they do not know, only they bring up what they bring up because of their heart. Now a woman has opened her mouth for a man to speak truth against her, for in erring she is being less than what she is meant to be, and the man keeping to God will not say it unless he is meant to that it is not sin for him. Now did the Pharisees not tempt the Christ to speak wrong? But he speaks plainly to John as if face to face. Now the woman is wanting for man to be man to please God, and she who wants it does not say it. Now what is there to be said? But they kept to the scripture and performed it wrong because they did not understand and because of the confusion and deceptions of others and in time there was worse that Babylon came and they have a more numerous army but 300 mighty will cut them all down if there is no traitor.
Now David saw the angel, and some can see an angel, but Babylon by Babel has said they are sick and arrests them. Now some see visions and Babylon through Babel arrests them. Now all shades have those who are meant to be slave owners and they are given, and the nations forbid it. Now Babel’s dogs blaspheme and they apply dog things to places it cannot be, for they reason in the heart of a dog, but Jews reason inside the heart of a man, and some have brought up things of angel’s from their hearts as if having heard some of an angel’s wisdom and using it right or as joke it is on their lips. Now the hearts of some are knowing great truth that they bring up things in the realm of heaven and the kingdom and it was so with one, but they do not know, only they bring up what they bring up because of their heart. Now a woman has opened her mouth for a man to speak truth against her, for in erring she is being less than what she is meant to be, and the man keeping to God will not say it unless he is meant to that it is not sin for him. Now did the Pharisees not tempt the Christ to speak wrong? But he speaks plainly to John as if face to face. Now the woman is wanting for man to be man to please God, and she who wants it does not say it. Now what is there to be said? But they kept to the scripture and performed it wrong because they did not understand and because of the confusion and deceptions of others and in time there was worse that Babylon came and they have a more numerous army but 300 mighty will cut them all down if there is no traitor.
Now Elijah does not exist, works alone and is the Lord’s killing machine. It is not right to speak about him and he does not exist. Now David, thank the Lord for him, for if there was ever a child who was a blessing, and he can manage all, even the house, so that others can focus on what they have come to accomplish. The child does not complain in the slightest and does not have to be requested, but goes out quickly at the smallest incursion from animals where there is not even much distress yet and he slays them completely and leaves none alive that there is peace to pursue those things of God, and when there is another disturbance he is diligent and goes out quickly and slays all the animals and goes further to slay all that there is peace. Now he does not complain in the slightest but runs the house and manages all problems that others might pursue what they wish. Now thank the Lord for him, for he is beyond a blessing, and who can offer him reward fitting for all that he does willingly? Now he does not judge the angel but understands and is innocent that he he gives no umbrage, nothing, an unbelievable blessing among children, for he comforts and supports and understands.
Now Enoch collides with truth, for Enoch’s sun is truth, and the sun of the last days is truth, and the sun over Israel is truth, and there are other world’s of truth, and each is a star in the sky, and some of the stars are visible from Earth, being Abraham and Jacob, the star of Israel, the mourning star of the last days that is close to Earth, the star that is Enoch that was taken by God, and Saturn and Jupiter can be seen at times, and so can Mars, which is not a star, but is reflecting truth, for if it is landed upon only a little, yet I have said, it is good. Now the mourning star which you can see, it is over all the stars in the Universe and it is over that which is like Saturn and Jupiter, for indeed it is, and such is confessed and wanted, for without the mourning star there is no Jupiter and Saturn. Now let the wise say what will be giving path to Neptune, for it is for people.
Now Enoch collides with truth, for Enoch’s sun is truth, and the sun of the last days is truth, and the sun over Israel is truth, and there are other world’s of truth, and each is a star in the sky, and some of the stars are visible from Earth, being Abraham and Jacob, the star of Israel, the mourning star of the last days that is close to Earth, the star that is Enoch that was taken by God, and Saturn and Jupiter can be seen at times, and so can Mars, which is not a star, but is reflecting truth, for if it is landed upon only a little, yet I have said, it is good. Now the
 mourning star which you can see, it is over all the stars in the Universe and it is over that which is like Saturn and Jupiter, for indeed it is, and such is confessed and wanted, for without the mourning star there is no Jupiter and Saturn. Now let the wise say what will be giving path to Neptune, for it is for people.
Now Enoch women are by idea for wisdom, that they are holy women, and yet some are deceived, some casting away holiness.
Now God is honouring the ceremony of marriage and it is like a thing of heaven, being holy and pure, but where an enemy soldier has gone out to do wickedness like sport, to capture an enemy than in this case there is no marriage. Now if any comes to the ceromony with trechory than when it is discovered the other is blameless. But God knows what is acceptable for the ceremony and what is not. Now if any should come to mock it is zeolots (terrorists) even if they should seek to conceal their cause. For they are against God and what is good and they should be cast out, for if it is abomination understand that the devil has done wickedness in killing Abel. Now the ceromony is as a dome of a holy place that is pure, and so it is that it is a thing closer to heaven.
Now God is owner of all the Universe, and Babylon has said, you may not do His will, for they forbid His will in many ways. Now those who forbid His will are subject to His will.
Now Gomorrah combat, is it not using all manner of brutish harrassments? But it is attacking when one already does the task, it is saying be what is good or you die, for it is saying, yet it there is concern, when there is none, yet it is not safe, when there is no danger, yet you should cut your hair short, when there is no command and it is choice, and it is saying, report all, but then, not all, for it is attempting to slay with guile, to use swords made of rillet, for it is dwelling in realms of the large dragons who charge and bite, in realms of paranoia state that is paranoia and it turns this, too, to Gomorrah combat, for it says, be not paranoid or you will be arrested, and speak not strategy or you are ill. Now the city was judged worthy to be destroyed by fire.
Now Gomorrah combat, is it not using all manner of brutish harrassments? But it is attacking when one already does the task, it is saying be what is good or you die, for it is saying, yet it there is concern, when there is none, yet it is not safe, when there is no danger, yet you should cut your hair short, when there is no command and it is choice, and it is saying, report all, but then, not all, for it is attempting to slay with guile, to use swords made of rillet, for it is dwelling in realms of the large dragons who charge and bite, in realms of paranoia state that is paranoia and it turns this, too, to Gomorrah combat, for it says, be not paranoid or you will be arrested, and speak not strategy or you are ill. Now the city was judged worthy to be destroyed by fire.
Now I am not knowing what sin makes woman not daughter of Eve or Sara. Now the sin of Eve is different than the sin of Adam and yet both are the apple, or the fruit, for some have called it apple. Now the woman does such first and what if her husband is not following? But she does so on her own, by herself, that she takes the sin, and yet if she does not speak to husband who says yes or no, does she go astray to abandon him as she says to herself that she is already abandoned him, alienated from him because of what she does by herself? Now does she not say, the devil has come between me and you that I am not well? But such are words of wisdom and understanding. Now when it is another thing, than one as Cain, indeed Cain, has gone and slayn another from hate. Now an enemy is slayn or not and Cain has killed both. Now dogs desperate are praising what they are grateful for, but a wealthy man has been protected from being slayn. Now in this part that is written, a long proverb, there is no judgement from me and I do not know all. But if a woman falls by what is not offence to her husband will she run to find a way to make herself worse that she should be as dead? For her heart is saying, I run to find a way to die. Now if she is cast down from the ledge will she not return if she has not done anything of true offence against her husband? But there is much darkness below the ledge and yet her husband has not pushed her from the ledge. Now there is a husband come down to carry her up. Now an elderly man has seen the fall and promoted her with trustworthiness back to her husband. Now a wise queen has done it, one of the pillars. Now what is husband and wife to do in the prescience of an angel? But the woman loves God, and the man is the Lord’s and does the angel come to cause disarray because her husband has refused to take more wives? Now does he not risk attack for the hidden heart knows the danger if the human does not that terror can attack. Now the wife of the angel, will she not bless the woman if it is not injustice? But the husband is the Lord’s and the devil hates him. Now the angel has his own wife to concern him with concern and pondering and if the wife of the angel is with the other wife of the angel, but it is of God, and the angel is cast out from them both. Now the angel is the Lord’s and in truth not the Lord’s but the Christ’s.
Now I am not knowing what sin makes woman not daughter of Eve or Sara. Now the sin of Eve is different than the sin of Adam and yet both are the apple, or the fruit, for some have called it apple. Now the woman does such first and what if her husband is not following? But she does so on her own, by herself, that she takes the sin, and yet if she does not speak to husband who says yes or no, does she go astray to abandon him as she says to herself that she is already abandoned him, alienated from him because of what she does by herself? Now does she not say, the devil has come between me and you that I am not well? But such are words of wisdom and understanding. Now when it is another thing, than one as Cain, indeed Cain, has gone and slayn another from hate. Now an enemy is slayn or not and Cain has killed both. Now dogs desperate are praising what they are grateful for, but a wealthy man has been protected from being slayn. Now in this part that is written, a long proverb, there is no judgement from me and I do not know all.
Now I am not knowing what sin makes woman not daughter of Eve or Sara. Now the sin of Eve is different than the sin of Adam and yet both are the apple, or the fruit, for some have called it apple. Now the woman does such first and what if her husband is not following? But she does so on her own, by herself, that she takes the sin, and yet if she does not speak to husband who says yes or no, does she go astray to abandon him as she says to herself that she is already abandoned him, alienated from him because of what she does by herself? Now does she not say, the devil has come between me and you that I am not well? But such are words of wisdom and understanding. Now when it is another thing, than one as Cain, indeed Cain, has gone and slayn another from hate. Now an enemy is slayn or not and Cain has killed both. Now dogs desperate are praising what they are grateful for, but a wealthy man has been protected from being slayn. Now in this part that is written, a long proverb, there is no judgement from me and I do not know all. But if a woman falls by what is not offence to her husband will she run to find a way to make herself worse that she should be as dead? For her heart is saying, I run to find a way to die. Now if she is cast down from the ledge will she not return if she has not done anything of true offence against her husband? But there is much darkness below the ledge and yet her husband has not pushed her from the ledge. Now there is a husband come down to carry her up. Now an elderly man has seen the fall and promoted her with trustworthiness back to her husband. Now a wise queen has done it, one of the pillars. Now what is husband and wife to do in the prescience of an angel? But the woman loves God, and the man is the Lord’s and does the angel come to cause disarray because her husband has refused to take more wives? Now does he not risk attack for the hidden heart knows the danger if the human does not that terror can attack. Now the wife of the angel, will she not bless the woman if it is not injustice? But the husband is the Lord’s and the devil hates him. Now the angel has his own wife to concern him with concern and pondering and if the wife of the angel is with the other wife of the angel, but it is of God, and the angel is cast out from them both. Now the angel is the Lord’s and in truth not the Lord’s but the Christ’s.
Now I call the mountain in hell orgoth and what is it’s father except the devil, for if smoke rises from orgoth than what is the time? But if Orgoth entire must be fought than it must not be given foot on Earth, for Orgoth fought almost all the Earth entire and was sent back in most ways to the fire of hell. Now if the Island nation fought with the foot-hold of Orgoth than it is perished and come again for I do not perceive it to be given to Joshua. Now the other has squandered what they received from the table of the child and puffed up to exhault itself after being given from the table. They have exhibited the lacking of a man in their judgements on their own and said we do not need you that they isolate themselves in ignorance and stubborness for they have not delt with the mighty much and yet boast against others with mocking. For though they boast of wicked trechories they are rallying devices and evil and they are behaving with an attitude of hatred and what comes before war. Now the other land is being empty of much and it’s nothing is as if only fire that spreads with violence that the wind that gusts there guides
 it onward. Now if the one is Joshua than he has been given both areas and not the Island if he should be ready to be a Jew.
Now I call them Mohammed’s people and for men and women, it is the Muslim people. Now they are respectful and polite, and they are a thing that is pleasing, a society to take pleasure in and yet I have no words for them and no judgement, and I do not ask anything from them.
Now I eat of the tree of the knowledge of good and evil and there is no sword, for they are born having eaten of the tree I eat of.
Now I eat of the tree of the knowledge of good and evil and there is no sword, for they are born having eaten of the tree I eat of.
Now I give no ground against what rebels against God, but what is easier to say, that you are attacking because of the devil who is your lord or that if you do so for what you claim it would be pointless. But if they are saying we have right to be ignorant and so do our people than allow them to be ignorant although the truth will remain and wisdom remains. Now if they say the ignorance is of our people and what we are that permit it that they might be their people. For we are not judging more but less, because of the knowledge that we judge sin and not the one who is permitted when they do not attack us, which is attacking God. Now if any says they attack us when in truth they do not, than are they with us? But the devil is doing evil in our name? Now if their schools of learning are providing a blanket for ignorance is it not for protection that they offer this thing like a protective action? For if they are not willing they are permitted to be their own people and why will any attempt to force truth in a way that does evil? But truth heard by the evil did not go into them and they only did evil with the truth not changing from their evil. Now those who do so with great aggression to attack those who are permitted their freedoms are not Elsnon, because why would good attack good? But the Elsnon are not a simple people, not being for arragance in the idea of doing evil. For the Elsnon have the Christ and the turem have their portion with the angels, that an angel was giving the Elsnon wisdom and the turem were dwelling with the angel. Now I am wanting for God to look and be pleased as He looked upon those at the Tower of Babel and was pleased because of what they accomplished so early, at such a young age. For these are—if I might not die I will cling to the one who commands me—but these are yours, the Lord,  these being also the Christs.
Now I give no ground against what rebels against God, but what is easier to say, that you are attacking because of the devil who is your lord or that if you do so for what you claim it would be pointless. But if they are saying we have right to be ignorant and so do our people than allow them to be ignorant although the truth will remain and wisdom remains. Now if they say the ignorance is of our people and what we are that permit it that they might be their people. For we are not judging more but less, because of the knowledge that we judge sin and not the one who is permitted when they do not attack us, which is attacking God. Now if any says they attack us when in truth they do not, than are they with us? But the devil is doing evil in our name? Now if their schools of learning are providing a blanket for ignorance is it not for protection that they offer this thing like a protective action? For if they are not willing they are permitted to be their own people and why will any attempt to force truth in a way that does evil? But truth heard by the evil did not go into them and they only did evil with the truth not changing from their evil. Now those who do so with great aggression to attack those who are permitted their freedoms are not Elsnon, because why would good attack good? But the Elsnon are not a simple people, not being for arragance in the idea of doing evil. For the Elsnon have the Christ and the turem have their portion with the angels, that an angel was giving the Elsnon wisdom and the turem were dwelling with the angel. Now I am wanting for God to look and be pleased as He looked upon those at the Tower of Babel and was pleased because of what they accomplished so early, at such a young age. For these are—if I might not die I will cling to the one who commands me—but these are yours, the Lord,  these being also the Christs.
Now I give you more of Enoch’s land. Now there is the child collection that becomes many different things when they are older, and there are the seperate land that is hedged for children and they go out from that place to be seperate things and yet it is not seen or judged when they are children, for they are still in the land hedged for children. Now when they are gone out of that place the former is put away that they are what they are as it has always been so, for the inclinations are in their childhood and yet there is a dome above the land of children and guards are present even, for adults are watching. Now animals are not defenders of the place hedged for children, and they are not able to defend it, and it is a disgrace for a child to left abandoned from that place to be in the wilderness and real forest where there are animals and people, the later being Enoch’s, keepers of righteousness supremacy, who do justice upon those of darker shades when they are a darker shade and are in agreance with them in such a thing of the fair shade, who is also doing justice with them. Now they are not often going into the land of children except within themselves that all may go still and return when they wish, but they are visiting the land at times when we one of theirs is in that place and they are in the great forests of the glorious and dreadful world.
Now I had thought for a moment that Jude said something else, and I was drawn to him when I was in another place, for I said in my heart, something is wrong. Now if the letter is to the churches yet it is for me as well, and they the ungodly are without understanding and knowledge and attack when they can and exhault themselves. Now they are indeed the hidden reefs and I have believed them to be servants of Orgoth’s servant. Now they are for blaspheming beautiful people, for your concern for me can also be concern for beautiful people, but an angelic majesty? For you cannot speak about those like me here, for I am commanded by the Christ, and what is majesty? But you must mean others in such a case, as you have said, and I believe you, and are not these, the letter, the words of the Christ? Now I am stealing the letter for the churches because it is mine now, too, for I have stolen it with a covetous hand and it is in a tight grip, that I might also have it.  For your words are like that of the Christ and I will not remove what I have confessed, but have not called anything dreaming, for there was no deception, and yet I have wanted to aid your letter if I can. Now who responds to you after so much time? For you did not write to me, and yet it is for the churches, or so you have said. Now some are becoming of what they were not born, and yet it is as if they were always different and what they become, and it is so, and the mountain in Orgoth is beneath the Earth and men dwell upon the Earth. Also the flame of Belshaur is below the Earth and yet it came up and spread on the land when Orgoth came up from hell and marched upon the land. Now Orgoth will kill all Christians and the two sons not servants will do so when they have gained enough power for they have never abandoned their hatred of Christianity, but pretend to be supporters at times of Christianity. Now you are indeed of the Christ, I believe, and are you not knowing things about angels? But if they were claiming that angels are those from hell, than I imagine such was not possible if God keeps them in chains. But if they are for discord as well than let this be included, for the devil, did he not say I am wise enough for the religion to be mine and I will be the god of the religion and they will worship me? So likewise the angels joined him, some of them, and yet I do not know what he could have said to convince them? Now who steps onto a sinking ship from land and says, it is prudent? But they have claimed they do not believe from the beginning and are not worth the effort and to give them aid in their attempts is not always prudent, for they believe or do not, and why would philistines believe in the prophets of God? 
Now I had thought for a moment that Jude said something else, and I was drawn to him when I was in another place, for I said in my heart, something is wrong. Now if the letter is to the churches yet it is for me as well, and they the ungodly are without understanding and knowledge and attack when they can and exhault themselves. Now they are indeed the hidden reefs and I have believed them to be servants of Orgoth’s servant. Now they are for blaspheming beautiful people, for your concern for me can also be concern for beautiful people, but an angelic majesty? For you cannot speak about those like me here, for I am commanded by the Christ, and what is majesty? But you must mean others in such a case, as you have said, and I believe you, and are not these, the letter, the words of the Christ? Now I am stealing the letter for the churches because it is mine now, too, for I have stolen it with a covetous hand and it is in a tight grip, that I might also have it.  For your words are like that of the Christ and I will not remove what I have confessed, but have not called anything dreaming, for there was no deception, and yet I have wanted to aid your letter if I can. Now who responds to you after so much time? For you did not write to me, and yet it is for the churches, or so you have said. Now some are becoming of what they were not born, and yet it is as if they were always
 different and what they become, and it is so, and the mountain in Orgoth is beneath the Earth and men dwell upon the Earth. Also the flame of Belshaur is below the Earth and yet it came up and spread on the land when Orgoth came up from hell and marched upon the land. Now Orgoth will kill all Christians and the two sons not servants will do so when they have gained enough power for they have never abandoned their hatred of Christianity, but pretend to be supporters at times of Christianity. Now you are indeed of the Christ, I believe, and are you not knowing things about angels? But if they were claiming that angels are those from hell, than I imagine such was not possible if God keeps them in chains. But if they are for discord as well than let this be included, for the devil, did he not say I am wise enough for the religion to be mine and I will be the god of the religion and they will worship me? So likewise the angels joined him, some of them, and yet I do not know what he could have said to convince them? Now who steps onto a sinking ship from land and says, it is prudent? But they have claimed they do not believe from the beginning and are not worth the effort and to give them aid in their attempts is not always prudent, for they believe or do not, and why would philistines believe in the prophets of God? But if I am not keeping my sceptre of rule over what I am given to rule and am lowering myself to be disobeying, abandoning the ownership of the palace and what is mine, then I am given attack and rebuke from you that I am given a considerably wise rebuke as one who has demanded God’s will as a right, and such is viewed as the rebuke of a holy guard who defends, as a wise councillor who is mighty, for do you not know what a king has said, that if you do such you may not abandon at whim unless you should be counted a traitor? But let actions fullfill words if it is written in stone, and yet I am servant of the Christ and have no servant on Earth, and are you not also the Christ’s servant and yet you give me honour whether intended or not, but if the Christ is providing aid for me, than He is able. Now if your words are good you have given me your loyalty and if not you are pardoned and what you have spoken concerning angels is erased.
Now I had thought for a moment that Jude said something else, and I was drawn to him when I was in another place, for I said in my heart, something is wrong. Now if the letter is to the churches yet it is for me as well, and they the ungodly are without understanding and knowledge and attack when they can and exhault themselves. Now they are indeed the hidden reefs and I have believed them to be servants of Orgoth’s servant. Now they are for blaspheming beautiful people, for your concern for me can also be concern for beautiful people, but an angelic majesty? For you cannot speak about those like me here, for I am commanded by the Christ, and what is majesty? But you must mean others in such a case, as you have said, and I believe you, and are not these, the letter, the words of the Christ? Now I am stealing the letter for the churches because it is mine now, too, for I have stolen it with a covetous hand and it is in a tight grip, that I might also have it.  For your words are like that of the Christ and I will not remove what I have confessed, but have not called anything dreaming, for there was no deception, and yet I have wanted to aid your letter if I can. Now who responds to you after so much time? For you did not write to me, and yet it is for the churches, or so you have said. Now some are becoming of what they were not born, and yet it is as if they were always different and what they become, and it is so, and the mountain in Orgoth is beneath the Earth and men dwell upon the Earth. Also the flame of Belshaur is below the Earth and yet it came up and spread on the land when Orgoth came up from hell and marched upon the land. Now Orgoth will kill all Christians and the two sons not servants will do so when they have gained enough power for they have never abandoned their hatred of Christianity, but pretend to be supporters at times of Christianity. Now you are indeed of the Christ, I believe, and are you not knowing things about angels? But if they were claiming that angels are those from hell, than I imagine such was not possible if God keeps them in chains. But if they are for discord as well than let this be included, for the devil, did he not say I am wise enough for the religion to be mine and I will be the god of the religion and they will worship me? So likewise the angels joined him, some of them, and yet I do not know what he could have said to convince them? Now who steps onto a sinking ship from land and says, it is prudent? But they have claimed they do not believe from the beginning and are not worth the effort and to give them aid in their attempts is not always prudent, for they believe or do not, and why would philistines believe in the prophets of God? But if I am not keeping my sceptre of rule over what I am given to rule and am lowering myself to be disobeying, abandoning the ownership of the palace and what is mine, then I am given attack and rebuke from you that I am given a considerably wise rebuke as one who has demanded God’s will as a right, and such is viewed as the rebuke of a holy guard who defends, as a wise councillor who is mighty, for do you not know what a king has said, that if you do such you may not abandon at whim unless you should be counted a traitor? But let actions fullfill words if it is written in stone, and yet I am servant of the Christ and have no servant on Earth, and are you not also the Christ’s servant and yet you give me honour whether intended or not, but if the Christ is providing aid for me, than He is able. Now if your words are good you have given me your loyalty and if not you are pardoned and what you have spoken concerning angels is erased. For you have not erred in what you wrote, and you are pardoned. Now if any is using angels as an example in teaching, let them read this holy servant, and he has been pardoned, for the angel is obeying God when he is bringing the sword down upon the body of one who offends, when they have offered what is disrespect to him. Now the one who writes this is then not commiting any wrong because of his service to the Christ, for a loyal has said, is it so, that another might have opportunity to answer a matter and any discord by silence be erased. So the wrong is not, and the servant of Christ has obeyed, and yet what he does is rebuke to others in a fashion, and the Christ’s servant has been crafty in this, that he has trusted God. Now the angel is attacking one nation and he goes to another, and he will not say attack in that matter, but the Island nation he does not attack.
Now I had thought for a moment that Jude said something else, and I was drawn to him when I was in another place, for I said in my heart, something is wrong. Now if the letter is to the churches yet it is for me as well, and they the ungodly are without understanding and knowledge and attack when they can and exhault themselves. Now they are indeed the hidden reefs and I have believed them to be servants of Orgoth’s servant. Now they are for blaspheming beautiful people, for your concern for me can also be concern for beautiful people, but an angelic majesty? For you cannot speak about those like me here, for I am commanded by the Christ, and what is majesty? But you must mean others in such a case, as you have said, and I believe you, and are not these, the letter, the words of the Christ? Now I am stealing the letter for the churches because it is mine now, too, for I have stolen it with a covetous hand and it is in a tight grip, that I might also have it.  For your words are like that of the Christ and I will not remove what I have confessed, but have not called anything dreaming, for there was no deception, and yet I have wanted to aid your letter if I can. Now who responds to you after so much time? For you did not write to me, and yet it is for the churches, or so you have said. Now some are becoming of what they were not born, and yet it is as if they were always different and what they become, and it is so, and the mountain in Orgoth is beneath the Earth and men dwell upon the Earth. Also the flame of Belshaur is below the Earth and yet it came up and spread on the land when Orgoth came up from hell and marched upon the land. Now Orgoth will kill all Christians and the two sons not servants will do so when they have gained enough power for they have never abandoned their hatred of Christianity, but pretend to be supporters at times of Christianity. Now you are indeed of the Christ, I believe, and are you not knowing things about angels? But if they were claiming that angels are those from hell, than I imagine such was not possible if God keeps them in chains. But if they are for discord as well than let this be included, for the devil, did he not say I am wise enough for the religion to be mine and I will be the god of the religion and they will worship me? So likewise the angels joined him, some of them, and yet I do not know what he could have said to convince them? Now who steps onto a sinking ship from land and says, it is prudent? But they have claimed they do not believe from the beginning and are not worth the effort and to give them aid in their attempts is not always prudent, for they believe or do not, and why would philistines believe in the prophets of God? But if I am not keeping my sceptre of rule over what I am given to rule and am lowering myself to be disobeying, abandoning the ownership of the palace and what is mine, then I am given attack and rebuke from you that I am given a considerably wise rebuke as one who has demanded God’s will as a right, and such is viewed as the rebuke
 of a holy guard who defends, as a wise councillor who is mighty, for do you not know what a king has said, that if you do such you may not abandon at whim unless you should be counted a traitor? But let actions fullfill words if it is written in stone, and yet I am servant of the Christ and have no servant on Earth, and are you not also the Christ’s servant and yet you give me honour whether intended or not, but if the Christ is providing aid for me, than He is able. Now if your words are good you have given me your loyalty and if not you are pardoned and what you have spoken concerning angels is erased. For you have not erred in what you wrote, and you are pardoned. Now if any is using angels as an example in teaching, let them read this holy servant, and he has been pardoned, for the angel is obeying God when he is bringing the sword down upon the body of one who offends, when they have offered what is disrespect to him. Now the one who writes this is then not commiting any wrong because of his service to the Christ, for a loyal has said, is it so, that another might have opportunity to answer a matter and any discord by silence be erased. So the wrong is not, and the servant of Christ has obeyed, and yet what he does is rebuke to others in a fashion, and the Christ’s servant has been crafty in this, that he has trusted God. Now the angel is attacking one nation and he goes to another, and he will not say attack in that matter, but the Island nation he does not attack.
Now I had thought for a moment that Jude said something else, and I was drawn to him when I was in another place, for I said in my heart, something is wrong. Now if the letter is to the churches yet it is for me as well, and they the ungodly are without understanding and knowledge and attack when they can and exhault themselves. Now they are indeed the hidden reefs and I have believed them to be servants of Orgoth’s servant. Now they are for blaspheming beautiful people, for your concern for me can also be concern for beautiful people, but an angelic majesty? For you cannot speak about those like me here, for I am commanded by the Christ, and what is majesty? But you must mean others in such a case, as you have said, and I believe you, and are not these, the letter, the words of the Christ? Now I am stealing the letter for the churches because it is mine now, too, for I have stolen it with a covetous hand and it is in a tight grip, that I might also have it.  For your words are like that of the Christ and I will not remove what I have confessed, but have not called anything dreaming, for there was no deception, and yet I have wanted to aid your letter if I can. Now who responds to you after so much time? For you did not write to me, and yet it is for the churches, or so you have said. Now some are becoming of what they were not born, and yet it is as if they were always different and what they become, and it is so, and the mountain in Orgoth is beneath the Earth and men dwell upon the Earth. Also the flame of Belshaur is below the Earth and yet it came up and spread on the land when Orgoth came up from hell and marched upon the land. Now Orgoth will kill all Christians and the two sons not servants will do so when they have gained enough power for they have never abandoned their hatred of Christianity, but pretend to be supporters at times of Christianity. Now you are indeed of the Christ, I believe, and are you not knowing things about angels? But if they were claiming that angels are those from hell, than I imagine such was not possible if God keeps them in chains. But if they are for discord as well than let this be included, for the devil, did he not say I am wise enough for the religion to be mine and I will be the god of the religion and they will worship me? So likewise the angels joined him, some of them, and yet I do not know what he could have said to convince them? Now who steps onto a sinking ship from land and says, it is prudent? But they have claimed they do not believe from the beginning and are not worth the effort and to give them aid in their attempts is not always prudent, for they believe or do not, and why would philistines believe in the prophets of God? But if I am not keeping my sceptre of rule over what I am given to rule and am lowering myself to be disobeying, abandoning the ownership of the palace and what is mine, then I am given attack and rebuke from you that I am given a considerably wise rebuke as one who has demanded God’s will as a right, and such is viewed as the rebuke of a holy guard who defends, as a wise councillor who is mighty, for do you not know what a king has said, that if you do such you may not abandon at whim unless you should be counted a traitor? But let actions fullfill words if it is written in stone, and yet I am servant of the Christ and have no servant on Earth, and are you not also the Christ’s servant and yet you give me honour whether intended or not, but if the Christ is providing aid for me, than He is able. Now if your words are good you have given me your loyalty and if not you are pardoned and what you have spoken concerning angels is erased.
Now I have given Alexander the Great an amount of silver that a statue of silver appears in Ijeshil: wings and body and feet and legs and sandals and sword held up towards the sky and as if falling away and head and helmet upturned to sky as if taken and slayn up towards heaven and face and comportment as if innocent. 
Now I have known that the feline’s eyes become illuminated at times and not at others, for Babel knows of it, and this is of a cat’s eyes, and whether luminous to curtains of fire as if square pillars by light nearby or not is not concerning me for I am not attributing signs to miracles, and as for those lacking intelligence, they even mix religion with atheism and then ramble on, for these are not worth discussing anything with, and why would any? But they are like those who are dieing on a vine and do not wish it, for why would I look for miracles when I look for signs when God is able to control the speck and the forest alike? Now as mentioned, God is able to direct people, and the devil is able. Now why work for the devil who takes to hell, when God offers paradise and eternal life because of His son? But I am not knowing what it means, but it must be for another, and if it is for another, than I am not able to say. Now the female cat will not let me pick her up in the precense of a woman, for she is not a fool, and she is not letting me touch her in the precense of a woman, and she will go to women, and the skunk is not spraying for I do not give it sense of threat, and this creature is hated, and yet it is a peaceful creature. Now the bird is speaking often and the cat preys upon it, and the mouse is scurrying about in hiding and the cat kills it, for it does not play with what it catches, but what will not be injured enough and will not be killed by such, should not be killed or eaten for it is not the cat’s prey, because the cat tests. Now if any animal kills because of opportunity, killing what is not its prey, than indeed it would be transgressing. Now even the ants, when one of theirs is sick, carry the ant elsewhere that it might be seperate from the empire, but what is for attacking the sick because they are sick when it is of their own species? Now I would think there is nothing in nature that is below the bottom of the ocean, below the line of reason.
Now I have looked at the battle that can be fought to consider the Elsnon and know that though we are very capable, and yet by time we will begin to disperse and diminish without the Christ, the son of God, and that to be without Him and his special protection is to eventually be falling away. Now if any becomes dead, as if a desert that is like dead, than the Christ also was made this way prior to His death, that He was being slayn, and He was. Now God is not a fool and to the one who has been poisoned you know that God is not a fool unable to judge and know what this thing is. For if any feigns lack of caring it is only because they are with anger and hated. But the ugly are for hell, and they are a disease upon the Earth, while you are a light. Do you not know because they are a desease that they will be jelous and with hatred. But if any of them should wish to meddle as if they were of the Elsnon it is from anger and hatred that the would be as if one of you, and if they do so much than the anger and hatred must be even greater than what they do.
Now I have produced a test whether I will be grateful to the soldiers that I would wish for God to take a portion of my blessing that was for me, and give it to the soldiers, or if I should be continuing without much gratitude except for that which is their duty by which they mantain the sword, that if one breaks free of the group and barrels over one point they cannot pass in truth, being truth as a guard, and they barrel past another, and yet another, and they are able to get through to confront me with anything, than the soldiers will have no cause to boast about protecting me, for there could be other rogue waiting and when one has gotten past the others carry out their mission that a small group of enemies might come with speed and stealth, and can the soldiers of the nation do a thing and do they have the power to prevent it? Now the soldiers of the nation are loyal to God by loyalty to the people, and even if they were inclined, they must not provide loyalty to me, for at present such would betray God and I am servant of the Christ.
Now I have remembered her but is she dead or alive and yet if she is alive I know that I am with others as well, that if they will not soon who are not known to me give me what is right for them I am to accuse them, and let the Christ judge if it is right. Now what revenge will He do
 that all is not fulfilled by them? For the servant is worthy of his wage and I speak it only a little prematurely. But the Christ is the Lord and  as they are lacking so they have not given that who of them is worthy of this that I might give them a portion of my blessing to be copied unto them? But know that if they cast away the blessing it is their own doing and what work God might do I do not know. For I petition the Christ who gives me and them much liberty, that the poverty of the devil might not be accomplished. For I know if they are rich in what is Babylon’s than they are poor and miserable, like the one who is done hard to, that I am with compassion because I have known of error myself. Now David’s son, I know, was not of Babylon, and it is not often that such are being given such things as God gave, that the devil not lead you away with the misunderstanding. But as for what is not meeting when one is past so is there poverty, being lacking, with others, that Babylon too is stealing away and encroaching upon the kingdom of heaven.
Now I have remembered her but is she dead or alive and yet if she is alive I know that I am with others that if they will not soon who are not known to me give me what is right for them I am to accuse them, and let the Christ judge if it is right. Now what revenge will He do that all is not fulfilled by them? For the servant is worthy of his wage and I speak it only a little prematurely. But the Christ is the Lord and  as they are lacking so they have not given, that who of them is worthy of this, that I might give them a portion of my blessing to be copied unto them? But know that if they cast away the blessing it is their own doing and what work God might do I do not know. For I petition the Christ who gives me and them much liberty, that the poverty of the devil might not be accomplished. For I know if they are rich in what is Babylon’s than they are poor and miserable, like the one who is done hard to, that I am with compassion because I have known of error myself. Now David’s son, I know, was not of Babylon, and it is not often that such are being given such things as God gave, that the devil not lead you away with the misunderstanding. But as for what is not meeting when one is past so is there poverty, being lacking, with others, that Babylon too is stealing away and encroaching upon the kingdom of heaven. But let Babylon fail to understand and rejoice that there might be excuse to do evil to them when it is for them to have hope and expect good. For the angel is commanded by the Christ and his enemies, I have heard, are to be his foot-stool. 
Now I have seen Babylonian men blocking and against morally the son of the Lord’s kingdom having the woman who they plan to convert to Babylon, that they are disapproving morally, for there is contention and war on Earth in Mala, and Babylon has declared war and is among you. Now Babylonian soldiers, even the operatives, are stubborn, for their strength is not righteousness but stubborness, and they are not cowards, for they often hold their post to the last, for their stubborness holds them, that they are strong and do not fear, or fear God, for their respect is for the devil to whom they pledge strong loyalty. For they respect and honour the devil and their heart is not treacherous against him. All around they find cause to hate, being among God’s people so that their loyalty is made stronger.
Now I have seen Babylonian men blocking and against morally the son of the Lord’s kingdom having the woman who they plan to convert to Babylon, that they are disapproving morally, for there is contention and war on Earth in Mala, and Babylon has declared war and is among you. Now Babylonian soldiers, even the operatives, are stubborn, for their strength is not righteousness but stubborness, and they are not cowards, for they often hold their post to the last, for their stubborness holds them, that they are strong and do not fear, or fear God, for their respect is for the devil to whom they pledge strong loyalty. For they respect and honour the devil and their heart is not treacherous against him. All around they find cause to hate, being among God’s people so that their loyalty is made stronger.
Now I have written of things not to be seen or perceived by men on Earth, for the things are below and not existing high enough so that some things must be perceived as higher because men are not to see these things, and these things are the business and happenings of hell and what is theirs that they are the things of their house and not for men, for there is no thing lower that Orgoth’s servant, and no thing higher than above the trees where none wish to live and higher and they cannot go for there is no air to breath for them higher. Now men reside on land and above ur, and angels in the heavens above the sky and beyond the moon where there are stars and these are the close stars and the mourning star is visible and making itself close. 
Now I have written of things not to be seen or perceived by men on Earth, for the things are below and not existing high enough so that some things must be perceived as higher because men are not to see these things, and these things are the business and happenings of hell and what is theirs that they are the things of their house and not for men, for there is no thing lower that Orgoth’s servant, and no thing higher than above the trees where none wish to live and higher and they cannot go for there is no air to breath for them higher. Now men reside on land and above ur, and angels in the heavens above the sky and beyond the moon where there are stars and these are the close stars and the mourning star is visible and making itself close. 
Now I inquire of the people, for does the complaint come about Sodom that I might venture there, or from another place? But is it so that the devil has prepared his soldiers with lies and foolish conditioning like people who would slaves, like disposable soldiers, and not those of great worth, the warriors of the king or queen? But has the devil conditioned them without thinking with lies that they might have ignorance to fight God, concealing with tact every attack they should carry out against God’s people, that anti-Christ’s have conditioned them, those who loathe God, and believe they can win against Him, for some of the devil’s soldiers he has kept blind to be more effective and some are well knowing and knowing well that they are at war with God, that the devil communicates with the hearts of them who would go to war against God and are blind and more ability is for those who are knowingly with him. Now the Christ was removing blindness but still those not made to see could not see and the angel is for giving wisdom but if any disagrees that allow them their freedom to be ignorant. For God is favouring that you not do the work of the devil against His strategies and in His name, that you have been clearly commanded and you know that He is the Lord so that you not be counted like an attacking traitor. But how can one of great liberties be judging any in this thing? But let the Christ decide for me that I not attempt to decide for you because I am not your judge in anything, but a servant of the Christ, the angel tenderly loved. Now think I could not betray you? But I am not the one who saves you, that you not lean on the angel when the Christ is Him you should lean on. But if you are for worshiping me than I am for abandoning you, because it is hideous foolishness, despicable and unknowledgable. But if you are not like Abraham who hurried to prepare a meal and welcomed the messengers in the haste know that I have the Christ and I am not taking for granted the good of men who provide and lend aid. But if you would worship an angel go pick yourself up and throw yourself down like a fool before the air and wind for the lack of knowledge it represents.
Now I will not be Luke-warm and call it rebellion, and it is necessary for the word is not accurate to know, that what comes from them is not evil, for it is not profanity. Now if there is what they call ‘a little amount a piece of refuse’ than I do not say so in the Luke-warm way, which is worse and as if perverse and disgusting, but am unable to avoid for the sake of what I do, that I give the word Hickney for what is a little wicked, that there are those hickney in a way that does not exceed into anything for contention and yet they are hickney consistently that they speak to others when it would be wrong and keep silent when it would make sense, that they will not be at the good level with any, for they will not be good to be hot or cold for one day that they are in one of the levels of Luke-warm and are being pernicious that the good might become a little miserable without knowing the reason, and yet it can be known, for the misery is not heavy but remains within. Now these hickney do not be good for one day of their life and they do not be rebellious and they remain below the level for any contention, and yet they cover themselves in a thin curtain of dross that is almost not there. Now better is the one cursing God and rebellious who says I will not pray, if they are asked.
Now I will not be Luke-warm and call it rebellion, and it is necessary for the word is not accurate to know, that what comes from them is not evil, for it is not profanity. Now if there is what they call ‘a little amount a piece of refuse’ than I do not say so in the Luke-warm way, which is worse and as if perverse and disgusting, but am unable to avoid for the sake of what I do, that I give the word Hickney for what is a little wicked, that there are those hickney in a way that does not exceed into anything for contention and yet they are hickney consistently that they speak to others when it would be wrong and keep silent when it would make sense,
 that they will not be at the good level with any, for they will not be good to be hot or cold for one day that they are in one of the levels of Luke-warm and are being pernicious that the good might become a little miserable without knowing the reason, and yet it can be known, for the misery is not heavy but remains within. Now these hickney do not be good for one day of their life and they do not be rebellious and they remain below the level for any contention, and yet they cover themselves in a thin curtain of dross that is almost not there. Now better is the one cursing God and rebellious who says I will not pray, if they are asked.
Now I would have you take it for granted that the people of the devil are engaged in spiritual warfare and this is expected as you know that this Earth is spiritual, with spiritual people, and that the devil is at war against God always.
Now I would like to establish villages of prophets for when such is done the core is established, for the core of God’s nation is the prophets but an uncircumcised nation is a tangle of Babylon.
Now I would not want any to be deceived. But can you sell one thing for another with the devil and he will not take both sometimes? But would you sell your inheritance for money and money, too, you will not have. Now if it is benificial for repentance do you think that it must have been God who took money from you that you might repent? But do not be as the outrageous who are believing in the devil that if you are more evil he will give you more money and material gain. But would he give the kingdoms of the Earth or go back on the commitment. Now you reason that he is honest in what he offers? But the kingdoms of Earth are worthless and the kingdoms, do they belong to the devil? But envy and hatred is having what substance it does, and what is with God, is it not better? Now do you believe that David’s heir is a cult unto money? Do you think that Joab is an enemy to him? But if any has given you poison by any means than does God not judge this thing? But if you are knowing that He is real than you are believing in that which has power in the Universe, and if you are for Him to act with what you say in a moment do you not know that if they send some they will have to be consumed twice? But if God has power and he defended Elijah than is He not for defending you, who are of great worth to Him? But if any on Earth should laugh or mock do they not know the battle does not come in ways they can perceive it as if it should be in the air and on land that if they believe they are powerful in this way even against God than they would know they do not perceive in ways they can understand, so that they would remember Him, that they, too, must be saved by His son.
Now I would not want any to be deceived. But can you sell one thing for another with the devil and he will not take both sometimes? But would you sell your inheritance for money and money, too, you will not have. Now if it is benificial for repentance do you think that it must have been God who took money from you that you might repent? But do not be as the outrageous who are believing in the devil that if you are more evil he will give you more money and material gain. But would he give the kingdoms of the Earth or go back on the commitment. Now you reason that he is honest in what he offers? But the kingdoms of Earth are worthless and the kingdoms, do they belong to the devil? But envy and hatred is having what substance it does, and what is with God, is it not better? Now do you believe that David’s heir is a cult unto money? Do you think that Joab is an enemy to him? But if any has given you poison by any means than does God not judge this thing? But if you are knowing that He is real than you are believing in that which has power in the Universe, and if you are for Him to act with what you say in a moment do you not know that if they send some they will have to be consumed twice? But if God has power and he defended Elijah than is He not for defending you, who are of great worth to Him? But if any on Earth should laugh or mock do they not know the battle does not come in ways they can perceive it as if it should be in the air and on land that if they believe they are powerful in this way even against God than they would know they do not perceive in ways they can understand, so that they would remember Him, that they, too, must be saved by His son.
Now Ijeshil is white with an ornate and yet strong gate and the gate is silver and strong and there is more silver than gold but not much gold and not much silver by the standard of what could be. Now there is abundance and yet it is not of great riches, and yet it is, and there are many scrolls in it. Now if light is sent out that give them, the Lord’s people, power and also attacks the devil’s than silver only is sent to Joshua is a good token. Now if Lucifer has fought philistines, he did not perceive whether they were for David or him to fight. 
Now Isaac brought much riches to his father that his father was given a test that the angel was given, and yet Abraham was obeying but did not have to sacrifice his son, and the angel gave him the wisdom, that the Lord gave him, for at such a level was Abraham, for neither was the angel insane.
Now Israel is a pillar of the house of the Earth that the house not fall, for why will you hate an allie who is a Jew, for they are having much burden to remain the pillar, that they are having more suffering and they are having challenge, and they are called to an obedience to God.
Now I’m watching it is noted that the devil can instruct his servants as God can instruct servants to do that which is obedience, and when the grain is weighed it is not grain and is cast into another barrel.
Now Lucifer even sent out power to destroy soldiers and evil beasts of the devil with one foot on the Earth and it was sent out like a wave of truth and light to destroy many of those things of the devil’s so that the holy ones might rejoice and yet the victory was not accomplished for the dust of the devil’s gathered that the devil might after a time reshape the dust into new creatures and would some of them be worse than what had been. But it could not happen quickly and yet the war seemed as if it would continue and yet it is still good Lucifer thought. Now this was not comparible to what God’s son had done in defeating, giving power, and amassing an army and the many other things God’s son had done. For He even provided the conduit to Heaven and life on Earth. Now Lucifer said, I will not cast away all that I cannot which is not in my power and my understanding does not go far enough to know if it would be right, and yet if those who would please Him would have one tongue in common to provide them with good than I will know which tongue it should be that the tower will come forth. 
Now Lucifer perceived that they had allowed lack of purity for strength and defence and the blocks and stones and confused guards, and all the things of defence that belonged to the devil were seized back under his control that they might turn against the holy ones, the children of light. Now he reasoned that they might have been better off to only take soldiers to war and those truly trained and truly loyal that they might have been more effective and built up a domain of peace so that better allies might be had. For they had allowed spies of dangerous zeolots in to their midst and allowed evils of their teachings to take hold, and they had carried out mistranslations to sow discord in the kingdom and attack God that His people might be partially deceived and scattered. Now truth was to be sent out and they might seek to hault it, he thought, and can I make it successful? But I fear God, and I too must place trust in Him. Now I am then councilling purity as the effective general would only take holy ones. For will a Babylonian aid in this thing? But the Christ has stolen what they gather to my delight. Now if a Babylonian they will gather to and it is to be given to the Christ than I have thought one not a Babylonian will do better and gather more, for I was around the lack of abundance of the Babylonians in my youth. Now if Babylon has a king than is he favourable, or if it has a queen is she to be trampled if she would fight with us? But Babylon is changing hands and the two factions are changing and these two are filled up with the good and bad and yet they are not, either, being a direct cult for anything. Now if Babylon has toppled churches, and it has, than I would perceive that it would do more, and that the church must then be more innocent than imagined by some, for I have considered that the saints are like an able group to thunder over evil in defence of what is good. Now they are slaying those who do not commit crimes and by the use of war-fare in the hands of zeolots who are a group of serial killers, and are an army of Cain and they are belonging to the devil. Now these would place discord between the church and some of its people and attempt to drive many away. For they cause many to sin for Babylon and it is the work of anti-Christs as zeolots.
Now Lucifer perceived that they had allowed lack of purity for strength and defence and the blocks and stones and confused guards, and all the things of defence that belonged to the devil were seized back under his control that they might turn against the holy ones, the children of light. Now he reasoned that they might have been better off to only take soldiers to war and those truly trained and truly loyal that they might have been more effective and built up a domain of peace so that better allies might be had. For they had allowed spies of dangerous zeolots in to their midst and allowed evils of their teachings to take hold, and they had carried out mistranslations to sow discord in the kingdom and
 attack God that His people might be partially deceived and scattered. Now truth was to be sent out and they might seek to hault it, he thought, and can I make it successful? But I fear God, and I too must place trust in Him. Now I am then councilling purity as the effective general would only take holy ones for the mission. For will a Babylonian aid in this thing? But the Christ has stolen what they gather to my delight. Now if a Babylonian will gather too and it is to be given to the Christ than I have thought one not a Babylonian will do better and gather more, for I was around the lack of abundance of the Babylonians in my youth, and have understood their attitude towards the foolishness of Christ. Now if Babylon has a king than is he favourable, or if it has a queen is she to be trampled if she would fight with us? But Babylon is changing hands and the two factions are changing and these two are filled up with the good and bad and yet they are not, either, being a direct cult for anything, for they are large marks drawn on a map, and myriad things are found in both. Now if Babylon has toppled churches, and it has, than I would perceive that it would do more, and that the church must then be more innocent than imagined by some, for I have considered that the saints are like an able group to thunder over evil in defence of what is good. Now they are slaying those who do not commit crimes and by the use of war-fare in the hands of zeolots who are a group of serial killers, and are an army of Cain and they are belonging to the devil. Now these would place discord between the church and some of its people and attempt to drive many away. For they cause many to sin for Babylon and it is the work of anti-Christs as zeolots who want it having chosen puritanicalism rather than the rewards of God that the works of God might be thrown back with some and the sun rising to be blotted out by grey clouds and barren cold where wind comes with a bitter freezing and agony takes over the land, as is much like the consequences of Babylon in many things and those who would abuse themselves with what causes an injured spirit. Now if the Christ, my commander, is healing and it is possible than still efforts to gain victories are hindered by corrupted hearts that are treacherous towards God and the saints, because the saints are sometimes more obedient to God than the Shepard who lead them, knowing the true shepard’s voice, for it is hard to steal the sheep away from the true Shepard. Now some have been hardened by conflict and it heals and becomes well, having been the work at times of those who would be against God in some thing, being zeolots who have support, that some are freshly come to make trouble with the old who make trouble, that Christians and Jews who have been hardened are having God and not much support from their nation so that one becomes great and the devil is descending. For they have even attempted to say we do not do anything to Christians and only Jews and they have said to Jews nothing, or spoken other lies to them, and they have portrayed they will leave off one and then attack the other later, and those naive to such prudence are believing in what was prepared in them, for the enemies have attacked from within the walls of nations while others amassed outside the walls for war. Now if a nation is over-run in this way than Babylon only grows stronger and persecutions more frequent when they are not able to keep their targets apart. For the papers do not report the persecution of Christians that others might be abolished at a later time, being easier to attack. But if some are hating God they will not know because the simple are not to survive nor those incapable of integrity and loyalty, though those who have it are targeted first. Now if they will take over much of the planet during a plague than does the ship only sink slowly having passed the last line of return? But this I cannot perceive and if it were so I would need more knowledge and who can say if the tide of a war will change suddenly, only disloyal hearts are scattering the people who would keep together and fight. Now let a mark be painted over the door of the church entire if it is so, because death is turning in on itself and if the Jews and Christians will survive when they have self-destructed than a time of peace might be possible.
Now Lucifer perceived that they had allowed lack of purity for strength and defence and the blocks and stones and confused guards, and all the things of defence that belonged to the devil were seized back under his control that they might turn against the holy ones, the children of light. Now he reasoned that they might have been better off to only take soldiers to war and those truly trained and truly loyal that they might have been more effective and built up a domain of peace so that better allies might be had. For they had allowed spies of dangerous zeolots in to their midst and allowed evils of their teachings to take hold, and they had carried out mistranslations to sow discord in the kingdom and attack God that His people might be partially deceived and scattered. Now truth was to be sent out and they might seek to hault it, he thought, and can I make it successful? But I fear God, and I too must place trust in Him. Now I am then councilling purity as the effective general would only take holy ones for the mission. For will a Babylonian aid in this thing? But the Christ has stolen what they gather to my delight. Now if a Babylonian will gather too and it is to be given to the Christ than I have thought one not a Babylonian will do better and gather more, for I was around the lack of abundance of the Babylonians in my youth, and have understood their attitude towards the foolishness of Christ. Now if Babylon has a king than is he favourable, or if it has a queen is she to be trampled if she would fight with us? But Babylon is changing hands and the two factions are changing and these two are filled up with the good and bad and yet they are not, either, being a direct cult for anything, for they are large marks drawn on a map, and myriad things are found in both. Now if Babylon has toppled churches, and it has, than I would perceive that it would do more, and that the church must then be more innocent than imagined by some, for I have considered that the saints are like an able group to thunder over evil in defence of what is good. Now they are slaying those who do not commit crimes and by the use of war-fare in the hands of zeolots who are a group of serial killers, and are an army of Cain and they are belonging to the devil. Now these would place discord between the church and some of its people and attempt to drive many away. For they cause many to sin for Babylon and it is the work of anti-Christs as zeolots who want it having chosen puritanicalism rather than the rewards of God that the works of God might be thrown back with some and the sun rising to be blotted out by grey clouds and barren cold where wind comes with a bitter freezing and agony takes over the land, as is much like the consequences of Babylon in many things and those who would abuse themselves with what causes an injured spirit. Now if the Christ, my commander, is healing and it is possible than still efforts to gain victories are hindered by corrupted hearts that are treacherous towards God and the saints, because the saints are sometimes more obedient to God than the Shepard who lead them, knowing the true shepard’s voice, for it is hard to steal the sheep away from the true Shepard. Now some have been hardened by conflict and it heals and becomes well, having been the work at times of those who would be against God in some thing, being zeolots who have support, that some are freshly come to make trouble with the old who make trouble, that Christians and Jews who have been hardened are having God and not much support from their nation so that one becomes great and the devil is descending. For they have even attempted to say we do not do anything to Christians and only Jews and they have said to Jews nothing, or spoken other lies to them, and they have portrayed they will leave off one and then attack the other later, and those naive to such prudence are believing in what was prepared in them, for the enemies have attacked from within the walls of nations while others amassed outside the walls for war. Now if a nation is over-run in this way than Babylon only grows stronger and persecutions more frequent when they are not able to keep their targets apart. For the papers do not report the persecution of Christians that others might be abolished at a later time, being easier to attack. But if some are hating God they will not know because the simple are not to survive nor those incapable of integrity and loyalty, though those who have it are targeted first. Now if they will take over much of the planet during a plague than does the ship only sink slowly having passed the last line of return? But this I cannot perceive and if it were so I would need more knowledge and who can say if the tide of a war will change suddenly, only disloyal hearts are scattering the people who would keep together and fight. Now let a mark be painted over the door of the church entire if it is so, because death is turning in on itself and if the Jews and Christians will survive when they have self-destructed than a time of peace might be possible.
Now Lucifer perceived that they had allowed lack of purity for strength and defence and the blocks and stones and confused guards, and all the things of defence that belonged to the devil were seized back under his control that they might turn against the holy ones, the children of light. Now he reasoned that they might have been better off to only take soldiers to war and those truly trained and truly loyal that they
 might have been more effective and built up a domain of peace so that better allies might be had. For they had allowed spies of dangerous zeolots in to their midst and allowed evils of their teachings to take hold, and they had carried out mistranslations to sow discord in the kingdom and attack God that His people might be partially deceived and scattered. Now truth was to be sent out and they might seek to hault it, he thought, and can I make it successful? But I fear God, and I too must place trust in Him. Now I am then councilling purity as the effective general would only take holy ones. For will a Babylonian aid in this thing? But the Christ has stolen what they gather to my delight. Now if a Babylonian they will gather to and it is to be given to the Christ than I have thought one not a Babylonian will do better and gather more, for I was around the lack of abundance of the Babylonians in my youth.
Now Nimrod is sending out his nimrods to molest and harrass those from hell who are soldiers and to molest and harrass animals with foolishness, that nimrods cure and speak conscience and know better in their ignorance of foolish training than 10 people who can render a reason. Now they are confident to commit all manner of ignorance to rebuke and teaching that they are the more unbearable thing than even torture for soldiers of hell who are knowing what they are and prepared to die and to endure torture if they must. Now the Nimrods of Nimrod roam as ignorant fools of disbelief in truth and common sense, for there is heaven and hell and they know of neither. Now they meddle with ignorant tongues and test the patience of men and women who are prepared to die as soldiers that they are the reminder of the foolishness of the age and the burden of foolishness among the Earth. Now soldiers they harass of all types and the people must keep them as a grievous burden.
Now Nimrod is sending out his nimrods to molest and harrass those from hell who are soldiers and to molest and harrass animals with foolishness, that nimrods cure and speak conscience and know better in their ignorance of foolish training than 10 people who can render a reason. Now they are confident to commit all manner of ignorance to rebuke and teaching that they are the more unbearable thing than even torture for soldiers of hell who are knowing what they are and prepared to die and to endure torture if they must. Now the Nimrods of Nimrod roam as ignorant fools of disbelief in truth and common sense, for there is heaven and hell and they know of neither. Now they meddle with ignorant tongues and test the patience of men and women who are prepared to die as soldiers that they are the reminder of the foolishness of the age and the burden of foolishness among the Earth. Now soldiers they harass of all types and the people must keep them as a grievous burden.
Now Noah’s sons are not shades of the people, for the Enoch are not these. But where there are shades matching is there not evidence of the Elsnon? Now where shades are not matching is there not evidence of the Enoch? Now where shades are not matching is there not evidence of what is beneath the land? But place no such thing you might invent to inhibit God’s will against any man, for why should you attack with a weapon? But the one claiming supremacy to another when there is contention is attacking with a weapon and if no weapon was used towards them, is it not an evil thing? But weapons are not used for wrestling among friends, but they are used for battle.
Now Noah’s sons are, even when wrong and doing wrong, for truth, and the truth is missing from Orgoth.
Now Noah’s sons are, even when wrong and doing wrong, for truth, and the truth is missing from Orgoth.
Now Orgoth has hated me and they do not much waste their time with casting away moral hinderences anymore that serve as facades for recruitment, for their loyalty is almost openly commited to the devil, yet they keep coverings upon them that they not acknowledge all truth. For morality is bypassed without need for corruptions and perversions among them, but not existing for them is cast away and often not entering, for they know the war and their side. Now if Orgoth has servants and Earth and there are many, than the angel is sent to be among humans in the same manner as Elijah and the Christ, in order to fullfill that it not be granted as title and position only by birth, and such is a great God who has considered people in this way to correct them and be their father, for He is not acting aloof in this fashion to abandon them.
Now Orgoth has hated me and they do not much waste their time with casting away moral hinderences anymore that serve as facades for recruitment, for their loyalty is almost openly commited to the devil, yet they keep coverings upon them that they not acknowledge all truth. For morality is bypassed without need for corruptions and perversions among them, but not existing for them is cast away and often not entering, for they know the war and their side. Now if Orgoth has servants and Earth and there are many, than the angel is sent to be among humans in the same manner as Elijah and the Christ, in order to fullfill that it not be granted as title and position only by birth, and such is a great God who has considered people in this way to correct them and be their father, for He is not acting aloof in this fashion to abandon them.
Now Orgoth’s highest son may tend to animals in their governance from Orgoth, that they are not right to extend their domain to people for they have stumbled and commited error, and the foolishness was a Great War and they sought to kill all of Israel that was the remaining tribes who were not scattered, for the war was great and evil. Now the sick animals attacking, goring, inflated with ignorance and goring, these are theirs to deal with and the animals minding their own business within reason are not theirs. Now no sickness or problem a person might have is any of their concern, for Babel invents sickness that is not, and Babylon is against Enochs and all good lands, and Babel has invented sickness not even known during the Great War, for their foolishness did not include what they themselves had. Now animals are being insolent and quoting the war wrongly, and against people not sick according to the war’s standard, and yet the highest son of Orgoth is given authority only concerning sick animals who are dangerous to people.

Now Orgoth’s highest son may tend to animals in their governance from Orgoth, that they are not right to extend their domain to people for they have stumbled and commited error, and the foolishness was a Great War and they sought to kill all of Israel that was the remaining tribes who were not scattered, for the war was great and evil. Now the sick animals attacking, goring, inflated with ignorance and goring, these are theirs to deal with and the animals minding their own business within reason are not theirs. Now no sickness or problem a person might have is any of their concern, for Babel invents sickness that is not, and Babylon is against Enochs and all good lands, and Babel has invented sickness not even known during the Great War, for their foolishness did not include what they themselves had. Now animals are being insolent and quoting the war wrongly, and against people not sick according to the war’s standard, and yet the highest son of Orgoth is given authority only concerning sick animals who are dangerous to people. Now Babel is not even deciding what is sickness for people when there is disagreance, for there are animals in Babel, and Babylon has attacked with what has come from animals in Babel, to attack all religions and people, and it is enabling war upon God’s people, and upon all religions. Now some animals have joined Orgoth’s highest son which is natural for them when they are able, that mostly dogs have joined him, and foolishness is continued from the great folly which was fought with the Great War. Now why has Orgoth’s highest son continued to exceed his domain to attack people? But as he exceeded prior the animals now exceed. Now those who cannot know slander when it is clear are in the lake of fire which is beneath Orgoth’s servant, and yet animals blaspheme people with claims they are sick animals for they are animals being sick, for projection is with animals. Now the servants of Orgoth’s highest son are calamitous so far because of lack of knowledge, and yet it must be, for Orgoth’s highest son is claiming a large domain not his and yet there must be peace in these matters and territories must be respected. Now if the sons of Orgoth hate the angel then it is expected, and this is right, for the devil should be overthrown entirely.

Now Orgoth’s highest son may tend to animals in their governance from Orgoth, that they are not right to extend their domain to people for they have stumbled and commited error, and the foolishness was a Great War and they sought to kill all of Israel that was the remaining tribes who were not scattered, for the war was great and evil. Now the sick animals attacking, goring, inflated with ignorance and goring, these are theirs to deal with and the animals minding their own business within reason are not theirs. Now no sickness or problem a person might have is any of their concern, for Babel invents sickness that is not, and Babylon is against Enochs and all good lands, and Babel has invented sickness not even known during the Great War, for their foolishness did not include what they themselves had. Now animals are being insolent and quoting the war wrongly, and against people not sick according to the war’s standard, and yet the highest son of Orgoth is given authority only concerning sick animals who are dangerous to people. Now Babel is not even deciding what is sickness for people when there is disagreance, for there are animals in Babel, and Babylon has attacked with what has come from animals in Babel, to attack all religions and people, and it is enabling war upon God’s people, and upon all religions. Now some animals have joined Orgoth’s highest son which is natural for them when they are able, that mostly dogs have joined him, and foolishness is continued from the great folly which was fought with the Great War. Now why has Orgoth’s highest son continued to exceed his domain to attack people? But as he exceeded prior the animals now exceed. Now those who cannot know slander when it is clear are in the lake of fire which is beneath Orgoth’s servant, and yet animals blaspheme people with claims they are sick animals for they are animals being sick, for projection is against animals.

Now Orgoth’s highest son may tend to animals in their governance from Orgoth, that they are not right to extend their domain to people for they have stumbled and commited error, and the foolishness was a Great War and they sought to kill all of Israel that was the remaining tribes who were not scattered, for the war was great and evil. Now the sick animals attacking, goring, inflated with ignorance and goring, these are theirs to deal with and the animals minding their own business within reason are not theirs. Now no sickness or problem a person might have is any of their concern, for Babel invents sickness that is not, and Babylon is against Enochs and all good lands, and Babel has invented sickness not even known during the Great War, for their foolishness did not include what they themselves had. Now animals are being insolent and quoting the war wrongly, and against people not sick according to the war’s standard, and yet the highest son of Orgoth is given authority only concerning sick animals who are dangerous to people.

Now Orgoth’s middle son has sown discord between religions and between spiritual people and yet Christianity has been corrupted for Babylon much and discord from Orgoth causes disarray.

Now Orgoth’s servant is hating most of those meant to be slave owners, for his servants can sense it in their hearts, for animals are drawn to them because of the labour and servitude they are bound to.

Now Orgoth’s servant is hating most of those meant to be slave owners, for his servants can sense it in their hearts, for animals are drawn to them because of the labour and servitude they are bound to.

Now Saul’s house is not David’s and do the sons and daughters of his house prefer one angel or any of the house of David? Now will a Jew of the lost tribes attain more if they are with the lost tribes? But one deals with something directly and another goes away and obeys, and both are obeying. 

Now Sodom combat is a stone out of joint, a desecration, even a logical incoherence, perversities all and sexual perversities, words for roles that are offensive and unjust, acting as if another thing entire were the case, wrong displays of family where there is no family member, charges against a man towards a man with the great longing to be raped, hatred and perverse honesty that is dishonest and with wickedness, insolent violations of boundaries in brutish ways and wickedness mixed with brutal insolence, homosexual advances that are carried on when another is heterosexual, nice words spoken and then mixed with brutality for desecration, for Sodom is brutal in its wickedness and with intense brutality and desecrations that are perversity. Now the judgement was that Sodom should be destroyed.

Now The Diary is for the church and the other is for understanding the enemy, that it is not for society and offers no guidance but is meant for understanding the war of the anti-Christ against God. It is not for rebuke or correction and holds no command for to use it this way would be to bring the war of the anti-Christ into your midst to be the fighting of the devil against God in your lips. But if any would wish to read it than they will understand that it is not part of any religion, and not part of the church that it cannot be used or qouted by any, because it is like a religion from hell that you reject and that is against God only it is read as the religion of the devil who is against the Christ and God, as if an peaceful country that has an enemy and has snuck into the country to bring back scrolls from their wicked religion that we might know their evil and ways if they would fight against us. Therefore why would any quote wickedness, although it is not presented in a manner of wickedness that it is not wrong to write or read being the knowledge of those and their ways who do not always wish to live in peace.
Now a Jew is not lacking and if not lacking then not even lacking in deed that these are God’s chosen people, and there are more Jews than known of in the nation that would be Joshua.

Now a beautiful man is as if very mighty, and an intelligent man exceeding intelligence understood is as if very mighty, and God is not a bully but has complete reign in the Universe. Now the beautiful woman, what is desired from her from the ugly but that she should become ugly, either made so or commiting folly to become ugly, and yet if the desire for uglieness is the same for a man an animal is confused. Now for another matter, there is what a person needs and what another person needs that insanity might be weighed correctly. Now if one is having the sickness where there are not liking their own jelousy anymore that they are constantly acting as if another person is something else, being another person than what they are, than the person is needed to be at peace with their own jelousy. Now it is not a matter that requires another person, and what does the other person need? But by this manner you may weigh insanity, whether it is great or small.

Now a brainwashed person is lacking, because a brainwashed terrorist is a servant and there are no better things among them. For such as they are servants with large armour still they are servants, and they are stubborn to return to servitude for the life of a soldier is considered better for them. A soldier has sought to reason with them but their stubbornness is mindless and deaf that they will not return to servitude. 

 
Now a concubine is doing nothing when there is great attack from the devil, but a wife is acting to save, that the thing will be over soon enough, and those who are wives are understood to be wives, for the wife and man are one.

Now a cult of Babylon that belongs to the devil is for making strong the regard for what men do either justly or unjustly that is not of the pure language or the placing of God and Mala first but is the cult that hates Mala and exaulting Ria. Now this is found in Babylon and not Israel where kings were being chosen and anointed by prophets, because Israel was Mala taking priority that Mala and Ria might be one. Now the Elsnon are keeping to the truth of God that Mala is the truth and Ria is full of chaos and injustice and the prophets of God do not control Babylon. But the one who exaults Ria and is hating Mala is base and low like a dog in the street or one that is mangy or one who dwells in the house and eats of those scrapes that have fallen off the table from the child or given by the child. Now an angry dog that would bark and growl is a stray dog of the street but a dog who would be with you must acknowledge the truth of Mala and yield to it first, that if they are right by Mala and aknowledging Mala than they are not fit to be stray dogs in the street. Now if any are to be stray dogs they are so before the assembly of many powerful creatures in Heaven. Now any person being the least in the kingdom of Heaven is able to pass into the congregation of the Elsnon, but a rich man will hardly enter less he is willing to more than any loyalty to the devil. For those who are separated from Babylon are iscolated and may be attacked, and the persecutions are many, that you might remember better the profiting of death to attain. Now the righteous of Israel are placing Mala first that if anything else is granted it is not taking priority that Mala will still be placed first. Now if the result is things of Ria as well than God is truly blessing a person in this way that they have not recieved by being for the devil but are receiving from God, that they have not been working for any cult of the devil and if it is so they are seen to be this in Ria to work for the cult God has known it is not true, but if they do not, than might they incur persecution? For morality comes before money in all things, and Mala takes priority over Ria. Now the servant slayed all but the son would not slay some or most and was corrected that he was a son and not a servant.

Now a cult of Babylon that belongs to the devil is for making strong the regard for what men do either justly or unjustly that is not of the pure language or the placing of God and Mala first but is the cult that hates Mala and exaulting Ria. Now this is found in Babylon and not Israel where kings were being chosen and anointed by prophets, because Israel was Mala taking priority that Mala and Ria might be one. Now the Elsnon are keeping to the truth of God that Mala is the truth and Ria is full of chaos and injustice and the prophets of God do not control Babylon. But the one who exaults Ria and is hating Mala is base and low like a dog in the street or one that is mangy or one who dwells in the house and eats of those scrapes that have fallen off the table from the child or given by the child. Now an angry dog that would bark and growl is a stray dog of the street but a dog who would be with you must acknowledge the truth of Mala and yield to it first, that if they are right by Mala and aknowledging Mala than they are not fit to be stray dogs in the street. Now if any are to be stray dogs they are so before the assembly of many powerful creatures in Heaven.

Now a developed soldier is distracting and attempting to cause confusion while they attack, but because soldiers of cities, who are soldiers of the nation are not often attacking citizens this way they are seeming less mighty, for they are loyal to the nation, but in such a way also Babylon’s soldiers are seeming more mighty and the armour that is decorated is seeming more mighty but they are equal and then lesser in might that those of the nation have strength not failing.

Now a dog boasts of God, and I drove them who were dogs away, because the people of the kingdom were gathered. Now the dog is boasting and quoting scripture but he is not in the kingdom and yet he is commiting blasphamy. For he honours God as a sinner and he is not in the kingdom and commits blasphamy. He honours God when when gathered with others, but he does not refuse to pray, and he is not in the kingdom. For he is called neither hot nor cold and is thus a Babylonian who is not in the kingdom and commits blasphamy. For one will be taken and the rest remain. One is God’s and the others have rejected them. For they have been jelous and envious and have rejected.

Now a false Shepard seizes control of the flock, but the sheep know the voice of the Shepard. Now some false are politics and others culture and some are money, and if there are more is it not known? But if any is a false Shepard they are likely to resist the house of God when larger things are upon them, for do they not seek council over the flock as men and women who Shepard, and yet it is not the same with those who are Shepard in and believing, that such strength is not with them, and yet they are having strength with the Christ. Now if any is saying, take wisdom but do not abandon, than such is one who believes, and who can disagree? But the false Shepard has said, avoid all wisdom and listen to me, and such is a way of a false Shepard that I do not write about what I offer in this, but about the ways of shepards. Now if one is teaching things of Orgoth with the scripture and yet is still having a true shepard’s heart than is it not a charming thing, and yet there is charm that is from what is not good and this one, being open to the flock receiving from God, is not doing well for himself and the sheep are knowing where such is less inappropriate, for such are for honouring God in what has occurred in gatherings that they are for the Christ.

Now a father must not defend the beast that has departed from their house if it is goring and attacking, when it should be killed, for if he is blameless he is understanding justice.

Now a few would say that when the soldiers betray and join Babylon that are after appearing more mighty, and yet it is the armour of Babylon they are given and the decorated apparel that they are given that in truth they are not more mighty because of it, and they have no greater strength in any way, for those with God are having a more powerful kingdom.
Now a few would say that when the soldiers betray and join Babylon that are after appearing more mighty, and yet it is the armour of Babylon they are given and the decorated apparel that they are given that in truth they are not more mighty because of it, and they have no greater strength in any way, for those with God are having a more powerful kingdom.
Now a fool is laughing when they flee from their death, but the one who fears he’ll is fearing God, and those who are brave, for fearing God, that those who curse righteousness have spoken against their own life. Now when they speak against their own life, yet they are able to live? But if their life remains in them, yet what is it in the later end? But death is come when the life in them is extinguished, and if I do not sit upon a throne with my foot upon the Earth as a foot-stool, it is true, and yet I give the way to the kingdom of heaven, for let them know what they may have, for those of God’s can have it. Now if the spirit is taken away by death than what remains? But who forced words that are worse and places their neck into the opening of a guilitine? But the unloved daughter, why is she believing she is not loved? But the eldest daughter is queen and the mother can sometimes hardly compete, and yet she is sometimes cherished as an object of great affection, and she is coveted by her mother, but she is her fathers? So let it not be claimed that the unloved child, believing so, cannot have spoken against their own life when they do, for the perversities of zealots are not a light thing.
Now a fool is not putting his animal slaves to work, for poverty will come upon him and all his house.

Now a fool will dismiss great amounts of wisdom and understanding with coarse words and a gesture, for they are not for it, but the cults of Babylon have their own beliefs which are lies, for the statue is the god of them who judges right.

Now a foolish servant has produced children to fight and they were like those of Sodom and he produced comparisons and they were like unjust insanity, and he produced cruelty and it was more cruel than anything, the great cruelty of a coward who does wrath without judgement or justice, but an obnoxious display for defence, and he contracted with stray animals and wicked animals that were stray and scavenged, and he found those with empty heads to be partner with him, and he dwelt with rapists and pedophiles and weasels, and exhault himself as a great man, a great king, and he raged and cried and shook with a strong and controlled rage in his heart that shook him in his strength that he made himself hard and evil to dwell among rats with desease that he might send before him with sparks of small lightning, for he became perverse and ugly as he was ugly and his glory of filth was upon him, in his torn garments spattered with disgust. For servants have been small and bitter and resentful towards great men and the devil is to be their captain.
Now a god or goddess is not a prince or queen that those who might wish two things that cannot be compared to be wrongly compared. But if any should take action to gain the favour of a prince than it is not something
 more or from that which is with the Elsnon, for why do you imagine what is not when there is no cause, or why should any ask for discussion when God did not consult with you concerning any prophet? But any who is a Pharisee, than allow them hate and bitterness, for they boast of Abraham when they are children of the devil, and why would any think that two things are the same? For if one is of Jacob than what is the other? But the things of the kingdom are not those of Jacob or else it would have been said. But if any is a prince among you than indeed some might seek his favour but those seeking favour are only doing that and nothing more and they do not come into the things I have mentioned.

Now if some speak of the things of Jacob and others the things of the Elsnon than I would rather you know that you do not place a shoe on a hand and you do not place a hat on an elbow because you compare two things that cannot be compared. Now if any speaks to you in a language angels, do you know what they say? But if any can descern it, than is it not good? But if the prophet does not come to discuss than why would any when it is not a thing, even by you traditions, that are open to discussion? But if it is the giving of wisdom it is either rejected or not.
Now a goddess and god is something related to the Elsnon that they are like those giving to Elsnon, being a little higher than them is some things and lower by a greater extent in some things that some that is higher is much higher and some that is lower being lower by a large measure that the height of some things is considered the greatest. Now their are not nearly as many goddesses and gods as there are Elsnon except any Elsnon can become a goddess or god temporarily although for them it is short in time being fleeting. Now the pre ends of a god is made known by those who attack because they desire servitude from great adoration. Now the angel tenderly loved is transformed to one of these gods when he is more like a prophet and temporarily abandoning while remaining what he is, that he has not abandoned the Elsnon when he is so. Now if something was offered by the old Satan than the new Satan will hope to give what he promised when he lied that people might perish.
Now a goddess and god is something related to the Elsnon that they are like those giving to Elsnon, being a little higher than them is some things and lower by a greater extent in some things that some that is higher is much higher and some that is lower being lower by a large measure that the height of some things is considered the greatest. Now their are not nearly as many goddesses and gods as there are Elsnon except any Elsnon can become a goddess or god temporarily although for them it is short in time being fleeting. Now the precense of a god is made known by those who attack because they desire servitude from great adoration. Now the angel tenderly loved is transformed to one of these gods when he is more like a prophet and temporarily abandoning while remaining what he is, that he has not abandoned the Elsnon when he is so. Now if something was offered by the old Satan than the new Satan will hope to give what he promised when he lied that people might perish.
Now a goddess and god is something related to the Elsnon that they are like those giving to Elsnon, being a little higher than them is some things and lower by a greater extent in some things that some that is higher is much higher and some that is lower being lower by a large measure that the height of some things is considered the greatest. Now their are not nearly as many goddesses and gods as there are Elsnon except any Elsnon can become a goddess or god temporarily although for them it is short in time being fleeting. Now the precense of a god is made known by those who attack because they desire servitude from great adoration. Now the angel tenderly loved is transformed to one of these gods when he is more like a prophet and temporarily abandoning while remaining what he is, that he has not abandoned the Elsnon when he is so. Now if something was offered by the old Satan than the new Satan will hope to give what he promised when he lied that people might perish.
Now a greatly violent fool has said they know better, and they do, and it is praise-worthy and permitted, that he is not acting for his cause, but against it, because he has become blood-thirsty.

Now a highly intelligent person is very mighty, and wisdom has a type of might, but those who are wise, are they to be found with arrogance? Now which is the fool, diplomatic to the mighty? But they are not wise. Now their ego inflates, and their mouth is a clear conscience by lack of wisdom and intelligence, and their voice mocks by foolishness. Now where they did not yield should they not have agreed? For where the command came to obey God, did they not stray then when they refused, to soon open their mouths with injustice? Now what does the mighty say? But because another disobeys God, they speak against themselves to speak injustice. Now did they go astray much earlier to disobey God. Now by their disobedience they become a calamity that others have become greater than them who are amongst them.

Now a large bear is human, when it is bear and human, for there is animal-animal and animal-human and those having servants within and horses within. But the animals of humans are displaying themselves human in deeds of mouth and body, that it is a thing of honour. But animal is only used by the angel as animal-animal, for humans who have animals and servants and horses are not yet mentioned by the angel, only it is a thing of honour and riches.

Now a man died from something and his wife married David.

Now a man is capable of knowing, of understanding, of having that without thought that is righteousness that those who fall below comprehension are not men, and a man is rare in some wicked and corrupted places where those males not men are falling below the comprehension of men that is not rare but it with every male in most places, being called The Oceans Surface which I call ur. Now those falling below ur are having complaints and grievances that are a waste of time to answer to men because it is not required that such things be addressed or answered to any man, only a man is fullfilling righteousness and those becoming worse and worse are perishing. Now some have perished to a degree that they attack men in their slumber that is so hard and their lack of fulfillment so hard that they leave their dwelling places to attack men with zealousness and foolishness in physical presence by words or deed and there is no metephore or comparison, for these are hearing and changing the clear truth because of what they do,  not having the understanding of men. Now it is not so that a man has a right to kill or afflict anything male that is not a man for the house of God is not to be divided against itself in war. But the devil’s have already perished, died, and come back as soldiers of the devil in some fashion, and the people of light have perished in profit to be made even more excellent in direction towards the day of after-life for them. Now good is advancing and evil is advancing and those advancing towards light are light and those towards death being brought towards their deeds that they advance towards what they have sown.

Now a man said to me that if you are not in pain you should be happy, and so if any is in pain because another lives than the wise should be taking such matters seriously, that a disposable fool not be permitted to do that which a young fool who is not human would do to one who is beautiful, and they are an adult? But the perverse by wickedness are of no worth. Indeed they attack the worth of others, and though others are gathered like him they only mock and stand against you in shame and guilt though they are clothed in insolence and confidence to debate what they should have much wrath against as you.

Now a man says, I defend you from wisdom for this is what I believe of you, but the man who does so, is he not as if beneath the Earth and calling upwards?

Now a man who is desiring men that he commits fornication cannot be a slave owner, and yet is he not shown grace?
 
Now a man who is desiring men that he commits fornication cannot be a slave owner, and yet is he not shown grace?
 
Now a murderer is not a soldier because it is not combat, for a brave man does not regard him, and his threatening is degenerating.

Now a pedophile who molests children cannot purify their iniquity with wrath and evil punishment, as is the unwellness of some pedophiles that they seek to cleanse their sins by attacking and abolishing those who they identify as guilt for them. Now if he would be inclined to this let him instead save women by offering himself as the sacrifice that he might repent with his head above the surface of the Ocean.

Now a pedophile who molests children cannot purify their iniquity with wrath and evil punishment, as is the unwellness of some pedophiles that they seek to cleanse their sins by attacking and abolishing those who they identify as guilt for them. Now if he would be inclined to this let him instead save women by offering himself as the sacrifice that he might repent with his head above the surface of the Ocean.

Now a person follows backwards to start and another begins at the start. Now are not both acceptable?

Now a person has gone out when someone has commited wrong because it was a matter to be punished, and the soldiers who would punish heard the cause and would have pety bias with it, that they rebelled against the judgement, and cause was what I call the Zal which is for the lanit which is the smaller war of bias, and so there was a lanit, being a type of war, between those who agreed with judgement having loyalty and those who did not agree with the judgement, being disloyal, having the Zal and lanit as I call it. Now if the Zal and lanit was with the one not beautiful than it would be declared that the Zal and lanit remained, except the person was beautiful who had been done wrong and spiritually the Zal and lanit fell away because the war of the ugly against the beautiful has taken the greater priority spiritually and takes the place of the Zal and lanit because the war of the ugly against the beautiful has much greater weight in the spiritual realm. Now if any ugly would seek to bring anything against the beautiful than let them remember what is written here.

Now a person is given the advantage of being God’s, even those from Heaven, and by their choices they are some becoming that of the kingdom of the devil. Now if they are for hell, and becoming soldiers of the devil they are re-incarnated on Earth while they still draw breath to be soldiers of the devil, themselves sometimes being deceived and ignorant as to what they are, that the devil would not want them to choose repentance. But let them know it that they are able to repent if it is within their ability, not being too stubborn. So the angel who would live is stealing away the soldiers.

Now a plague happened and the servants of the devil were fueled by evil to whip the people with rillet while the plague occurred and the king said let them be whipped with rillet, and I will force their shops to be closed but a few will be spared and let it be that they lose their livielyhoods by which they eat and let it be that many of them be forced out of their homes and onto the street. So it happened as the king carried out. Now the king protected many of those who were provided by the government by giving them more money that they might live, and he provided much medicine that the people might not die from the plague and many lived because of it. Now the value of the shekel became less and he provided for those who were sick in other ways, not from the plague, that they might live, and a rowdy tribe formed and marched to the capital and began to whip the people, some of them, with rillet to retaliate against the king. Now the king had allowed them for many days and when a time had passed he passed laws concerning their type and bid his servants to drive them out and so they did. Now in these days the angel was among the people in a city where there were many poor and much crime and part of it was like Sodom and Egypt and part of it like an oasis and the angel departed from Sodom and Egypt and dwelt close to some of the sick where it was better, and there were poor who passed though that area and there were also rich but not greatly rich. Now the rich had been those who were good to the angel who were not the rich of Babylon for Babylon might attack the rich if they are not loyal to Babylon and do work and commerce with Babylonians. Now even criminals who were serious about serious things did well concerning the angel, and some who were fools among criminals hated the angel. Now in sodom and Egypt the angel had been friends with prostitutes and those richer gave him many things. Now after the desert of loneliness where the angel ate the dust of affliction he was given a time among the sick before he went out from the sick to be in sodom and Egypt for a time. Now the angel said, I will neglect learning for a time to give wisdom, for God is better than Babylon, and it was so. Now the angel was even taking money set aside by the government for the creation of art and yet the giving of wisdom was not this. Now the turem man was good to him and if any was to revile the angel thought, they will be the words of ignorance, arguments with oneself that have been hurled in rebellion, being straw men of lies in their mouth and every impotent reviling that does not seek discussion, but is the more verbal growling and barking of beasts that know language, and they will show themselves mocking and saying ignorance with sarcasm to those who do not know it is ignorance, and such will be their people who have this substance within them, and they will seek to recruit other people who are not as them. For these are made with riches of ignorance and reviling and mocking and yet if they have righteousness and strength they cast away the knowledge of truth to be their own people still who do not want such truth. So if they do not want, then let it be, and those wanting reward let them know the truth if they want it. Now acts of extremism find a way because the deeds are already in them to be performed that any conduit will do for them. Now because of this the devil has swayed some of them to do acts for a cause which the devil has chosen. But a person who acts out deeds towards others and the deeds being wrong and for foolish reasons and not due to illness of mind are those who are carrying out acts of extremism. Now the one not capable of murder is attempting to murder by that means they are capable of, and when it is so they are capable. But the one not capable has said my guilt will not see it and God does not know of it, and yet they are capable. For these will not use a sword but they will use a bomb because they do not see the explosion that kills. For some are with pride, being ugly and idealizing Jezebel because of the uglieness, and idealizing wickedness because of their service to the devil, because they are ugly, that they would want to be great in the house of the devil, the house of hell, and all those in God’s house are superior to them who are ugly. So they have swelled with substance of wickedness to be great in the devil’s house to say, I am a great person for I am great destroyer, a great figure, because I have murdered many who innocent, a great thing to fear, because I am repulsive to God’s, a great strategist because I have slandered much and lied, a very clever person because I have stolen much, a great object of desire because I have commited adultry, a great power because I possess much hate, a figure of glory because children have feared me and I have been wicked regarding them, for if God’s loathe me, I am greatly to be feared, for I have not despised the pedophile anymore but he who kills children is my close companion and loyal to me as I am loyal to him, for those who slay children, who commit rape, who destroy those who are good are to be trusted, and I am not the Lord’s.
Now a plague happened and the servants of the devil were fueled by evil to whip the people with rillet while the plague occurred and the king said let them be whipped with rillet, and I will force their shops to be closed but a few will be spared and let it be that they lose their livielyhoods by which they eat and let it be that many of them be forced out of their homes and onto the street. So it happened as the king carried out. Now the king protected many of those who were provided by the government by giving them more money that they might live, and he provided much medicine that the people might not die from the plague and many lived because of it. Now the value of the shekel became less and he provided for those who were sick in other ways, not from the plague, that they might live, and a rowdy tribe formed and marched to the capital and began to whip the people, some of them, with rillet to retaliate against the king. Now the king had allowed them for many days and when a time had passed he passed laws concerning their type and bid his servants to drive them out and so they did. Now in these days the angel was among the people in a city where there were many poor and much crime and part of it was like Sodom and Egypt and part of it like an oasis and the angel departed from Sodom and Egypt and dwelt close to some of the sick where it was better, and there were poor who passed though that area and there were also rich but not greatly rich. Now the rich had been those who were good to the angel who were not the rich of Babylon for Babylon might attack the rich if they are not loyal to Babylon and do work and commerce with Babylonians. Now even criminals who were serious about serious things did well concerning the angel, and some who were fools among criminals hated the angel. Now in sodom and Egypt the angel had been friends with prostitutes and those richer gave him many things. Now after the desert of loneliness where the angel ate the dust of affliction he was given a time among the sick before he went out from the sick to be in sodom and Egypt for a time. Now the angel said, I will neglect learning for a time to give wisdom, for God is better than Babylon, and it was so. Now the angel was even taking money set aside by the government for the creation of art and yet the giving of wisdom was not this. Now the turem man was good to him and if any was to revile the angel thought, they will be the words of ignorance, arguments with oneself that have been hurled in rebellion, being straw men of lies in their mouth and every impotent reviling that does not seek discussion, but is the more verbal growling and barking of beasts that know language, and they will show themselves mocking and saying ignorance with sarcasm to those who do not know it is ignorance, and such will be their people who have this substance within them, and they will seek to recruit other people who are not as them. For these are made with riches of ignorance and reviling and mocking and yet if they have righteousness and strength they cast away the knowledge of truth to be their own people still who do not want such truth. So if they do not want, then let it be, and those wanting reward let them know the truth if they want it. Now acts of extremism find a way because the deeds are already in them to be performed that any conduit will do for them. Now because of this the devil has swayed some of them to do acts for a cause which the devil has chosen. But a person who acts out deeds towards others and the deeds being wrong and for foolish reasons and not due to illness of mind are those who are carrying out acts of extremism. Now the one not capable of murder is attempting to murder by that means they are capable of, and when it is so they are capable. But the one not capable has said my guilt will not see it and God does not know of it, and yet they are capable. For these will not use a sword but they will use a bomb because they do not see the explosion that kills. For some are with pride, being ugly and idealizing Jezebel because of the uglieness, and idealizing wickedness because of their service to the devil, because they are ugly, that they would want to be great in the house of the devil, the house of hell, and all those in God’s house are superior to them who are ugly. So they have swelled with substance of wickedness to be great in the devil’s house to say, I am a great person for I am great destroyer, a great figure, because I have murdered many who innocent, a great thing to fear, because I am repulsive to God’s, a great strategist because I have slandered much and lied, a very clever person because I have stolen much, a great object of desire because I have commited adultry, a great power because I possess much hate, a figure of glory because children have feared me and I have been wicked regarding them, for if God’s loathe me, I am greatly to be feared, for I have not despised the pedophile anymore but he who kills children is my close companion and loyal to me as I am loyal to him, for those who slay children, who commit rape, who destroy those who are good are to be trusted, and I am not the Lord’s.
Now a plague happened and the servants of the devil were fueled by evil to whip the people with rillet while the plague occurred and the king said let them be whipped with rillet, and I will force their shops to be closed but a few will be spared and let it be that they lose their livielyhoods by which they eat and let it be that many of them be forced out of their homes and onto the street. So it happened as the king carried out. Now the king protected many of those who were provided by the government by giving them more money that they might live, and he provided much medicine that the people might not die from the plague and many lived because of it. Now the value of the shekel became less and he provided for those who were sick in other ways, not from the plague, that they might live, and a rowdy tribe formed and marched to the capital and began to whip the people, some of them, with rillet to retaliate against the king. Now the king had allowed them for many days and when a time had passed he passed laws concerning their type and bid his servants to drive them out and so they did. Now in these days the angel was among the people in a city where there were many poor and much crime and part of it was like Sodom and Egypt and part of it like an oasis and the angel departed from Sodom and Egypt and dwelt close to some of the sick where it was better, and there were poor who passed though that area and there were also rich but not greatly rich. Now the rich had been those who were good to the angel who were not the rich of Babylon for Babylon might attack the rich if they are not loyal to Babylon and do work and commerce with Babylonians. Now even criminals who were serious about serious things did well concerning the angel, and some who were fools among criminals hated the angel. Now in sodom and Egypt the angel had been friends with prostitutes and those richer gave him many things. Now after the desert of loneliness where the angel ate the dust of affliction he was given a time among the sick before he went out from the sick to be in sodom and Egypt for a time. Now the angel said, I will neglect learning for a time to give wisdom, for God is better than Babylon, and it was so. Now the angel was even taking money set aside by the government for the creation of art and yet the giving of wisdom was not this.

Now a rich dog is not better than a lion for though a mangy dog is garbed in riches and though he dwells among what seems jewals and gold the jewals are made dross by his dog-hood and the gold is made tin and his horses made like wagons covered with hay and refuse with broken parts, that his crown is caved in and not, and broken pieces hang upon his head, and where it was there is coarse metal that is brittle and packed hard, that with the riches are cracks of iniquity and his bones are rotten and his shoes heavy and worthless. For a turem hath shouted, who is like the rich man! And he has saluted him, a dog with ugly riches, and if the lion is better, being strong and mighty than so the god is exceedingly better than him. For the lion is far from him in greatness and the god can hardly regard him in his lack of worth, for a dog skips and moves about the feet of those who greet each other. Now what worth has wretched Babylon and the cults of the devil that they attempt to make their ignorance that is of their cults part of the truth? But if one is great in truth and the material is added for much of what they have than indeed these things are bringing honour and glory and not showing them as a thing that shows them disgrace and disgusting, and garbs them in what is shameful, for it is not seemly to put a jewal in the snout of a swine and Babylon is wretched and low, a disgusting thing that sinks into mud, to be purified and ground up—but what can even be enough to be done to it? Wretched lie and ignorance is Babylon and all your priests are disgusting and absurd fools. You harbour even the devil, the old Satan, and he bends you to his will and you obey. You are drunk with blood, with decrepit oldness and uglieness due to your actions that defile you, that you are like an old and wretched thing weighed down with condemnation and guilt for the blood of the righteous by which you are drunk. For the devil is the puppet master who bends and turns you to what he wants and you are placing confidence and trust in him who would will that you suffer forever in hell.

Now a servant is over the slaves for he is not to be given the tasks of heavy labour, for he is servant. But the servant is given the lighter tasks and some administration of great houses, that his burden is easy for you are great. Now he is a wise servant who is getting much favour and yet Alexander the Great gives the sign, for he did not destroy Babylon and his Babylonian servants that he trusted, then betrayed him and he was slayn by their poison. Now when you defeat you do not take those who were not abandoned to be killed or cast out of Babylon, for Babylon spits out those loyal to truth and God. But if there is the remainder that was not with you until you took all then can you trust them? But Babylonians are loyal to Babylon. Now they will spread and poison the Lord’s kingdoms, that they must be removed, for even if you should march your own through a desert yet will they do this thing unless you do so to punish? But if your own have cause then the kingdom will be divided, for when it is not united at the source it divides among the kings. Now two had cause against him because he was not loyal to the one who fought with him and for him that by lack of loyalty two had cause. Now his soldiers fullfilled and yet he preferred Babylon more than his own.

Now a servant may have a wife, but she may not rage in wickedness against the human and she may not rage in wickedness to kill the child who is human, the son of nobles.

Now a silly fool of the devil has said, I have caught you doing wrong, but what was done was not wrong. 

Now a rediculous fool of the devil has said, you teach me morality that I might judge, but no one teaches them, and they are deceived. Now a person has sought to stalk as if to ambush, but a person of the devil’s has done so for what they are part of, being a cult of the devil’s to stalk and even attack God’s for the devil. For if the cults of Babylon are at war with God and His son than why would you not know that the devil’s will be at war with those of the kingdom? But if any is hating his wife because she is not his wife, than he is loyal to the devil and has no marriage with her. But if he views her as an enemy and him a soldier to destroy her he has viewed her neither beautiful or ugly but as one of the enemy he captured in war that he hates who he has brought to his house, for his wives are others, and he had said I will mock her and mistreat her as an enemy in loyalty to our kingdom of hell and the devil. Now who is for stoning this woman? But she is a captured woman in war and is she not right to escape? But let the wise descern if it is the case and if she is being rescued and agreeing let it be so.

Now a slayn child is better and by far greater than the one who molests children. For if the later should live a thousand years their life is void and their days pursued by righteousness, but the righteous are not pursued in this fashion.

Now a sociopath is not required to repent for they do nothing wrong, for they are fools. But they indeed have need to repent. Now the one who says to God, My brother is dead and I do not know how, is not one who has repented. Now those who would trick God are tricked and deceived, and those preserved for judgement continuing in a thing. Now those testing God fullfilling less and those fullfilling worthy to give. Now if any would buy blessing than they purchase from God because if none sells their blessing they fullfill that they are to be counted as such. For if one fulfills less and by choice than he is given reward for what he fullfilled, but the one shutting their hand and with money has nothing. Now if selfishness is inclined to less than for what reason do those of Babylon know surprise because of the little they have? But they fullfill not towards God that they would fullfill to others and not to others that they would fullfill unto God. But if any is watching than do they not have the reward of Heaven? But if I would restore a Tower of Babel and they have used the name in a foolish and base way to become a by-word of racists, than I am not he who built it, but let me build it, that if it should do well and be pleasing than such a tower will please God.
Now a soldier does not commit murder, and those who are for justice are not for evil.

Now a talebearer of a type that I have called a perverse friend, or hectom is one who tells of things that are private and not to be told because they are wishing to throw mud upon a person for some reason, and the usual cause is jelousy, although if a parent will possess are they not fearful of something, and yet there are better ways, and yet such is not concerning a parent, for the parent will slander from terror, and yet is she not meeting her daughter? But as for what is more often the hectom is a fickle-girl in this thing, if it be a man, and an attacking general when a woman, that even a man who takes wives is not taking another in this way. But what is this that occurs, that a man unite in casting away what is true? But love is with an open hand for women and in many ways a closed for men, that the limits not be exaggerated, only that the wife is for the fullness of what she desires.

Now a warrior of projection is scorning and rillet is in their mouth, but they are kept by others and it is not their own work.
Now a well person says, why would it matter, but sick person, they think of it wrong.

Now a wicked man brought into a tribe of justice is lacking all understanding, and their wickedness and foolishness prevails for them, that a just has had a wicked in their camp, and such is not impossible. But if any would be for separating good from good than it is benificial to know, and those of justice are greater than a mere man.

Now a wise man is not sowing discord between men and women, but the one who supports to sow discord is villian and scoundrel, for he boasts of himself indirectly, and yet is a false teacher without understanding who guides people into prisons, who would lead them out of palaces to be slaves in the field under burning heat where there is little water, who teaches what is not wise, who leads into places of scorpions and cracked rocks.

Now a wise servant is better than a wicked man who seems strong who is rebelling against good and right, but the one who rebels against evil is as a young angel.

Now a wise woman has gained respect when she behaves wisely with wise words and actions, but the servant of Orgoth’s first shelf does not respect but is angered, that he is hating the woman, and hating the male child who is better than him, for two are together, and he has loved the child who is a girl, as if to be his as a partner, and he has even been open in his hatred of the child towards men, that he is below ur, and below that in hell, at the river at the bottom of Orgoth. Now his own of any shade he has not hated, and to be with him by affiliation in Ria does not matter for such is Orgoth, that it is the mountain in hell. Now what is not easily attained is often worth having, and yet some have hated wisdom and good, that Orgoth has hated the angel and it’s servants have hated him, and yet the sons of Noah are not as these.

Now a wise woman is a great asset for the house of God, and she is taking serious things seriously, that she is spiritual and cares for things that are with justice and truth, for she is hating evil from the devil. Now those who would be so for the devil’s house are fools that the devil is not matching this thing that God’s house has. Now these are not things of Babel for the kingdom of heaven is not Babel. Nor is the kingdom of heaven Babylon. But Rome has denegrated Jews and is as those who would wipe them out and yet they are not being honest and open that they would not wipe them out, for they are being intensely disrespectful on purpose by feigning apathy in matters of duty to them where righteousness is owed, for the Roman says, but let the crowd decide if they die, and the king says, but let my child express a verdict by whim, that they are disrespectful on purpose, for they would be devoured by greatness if they made no disrespectful gestures because they would be as dogs given charge of a great house for humans, that the Jews are worthy to wipe them out and yet the wise woman of God’s house is truly not Roman, and petitions against destruction, saying, but the Lord’s is not as them, and it is true, that Joab not devour the Lord’s with the wicked. Now when she has no man she is for to be for him to be married or already married, the angel has coveted her, and yet she is for things of great worth on Earth, that she is as a pillar that keeps the palace from collapsing where much is kept that should not be lost, that the Lord’s males might not die by the hand of the wicked or suffer by their wicked deeds.

Now a wise woman is a great asset for the house of God, and she is taking serious things seriously, that she is spiritual and cares for things that are with justice and truth, for she is hating evil from the devil. Now those who would be so for the devil’s house are fools that the devil is not matching this thing that God’s house has. Now these are not things of Babel for the kingdom of heaven is not Babel. Nor is the kingdom of heaven Babylon. But Rome has denegrated Jews and is as those who would wipe them out and yet they are not being honest and open that they would not wipe them out, for they are being intensely disrespectful on purpose by feigning apathy in matters of duty to them where righteousness is owed, for the Roman says, but let the crowd decide if they die, and the king says, but let my child express a verdict by whim, that they are disrespectful on purpose, for they would be devoured by greatness if they made no disrespectful gestures because they would be as dogs given charge of a great house for humans, that the Jews are worthy to wipe them out and yet the wise woman of God’s house is truly not Roman, and petitions against destruction, saying, but the Lord’s is not as them, and it is true, that Joab not devour the Lord’s with the wicked.

Now a wise woman is finding wisdom before her husband that she is already of integrity before he can notice. But there are those in wanting to be human and they seperate themselves more, and yet the enemies of the wise woman are slayn around her, for her husband is of the Lord, that the disciple who is greater than all is servant of the Christ, a friend to the family, that she need not make her hand slack, for the other comes through her, and this is wisdom of angel and man. Now her husband opens his hand in one thing and his wife is right to close it in another, and yet she is to open her hand where he is concerned that God might do good and she might be cared for. For if she is holy, and has the wisdom, when she preys she covers her head and says, if I am a woman then let it be so. For she preys and the Lord has power. Now there is a woman who is becoming a giant golden bird that is for the Lord and it spreads its wings over an angel, for it is great. Now a queen of the Terum, is she not strong, for they are an intelligent people with might. But bring the younger when there is need for tears for the angel is having fullfilled the things of a man, a Jew, or of another righteous type of man, but only he has not for the Lord is merciful, and why will a man who is a god, a slayer of thousands cut his hair for the enemy, or go to a prostitute. But such beautiful men do not, for why should they? But the wife is promoting her house, and Babylon is wicked that it attempts to slaughter all society, for it prefers unichs. Now consider what you need, that you not be jelous, for it is sometimes a sign, and at other times not. But the woman who has born one not human can still bear, and yet the one not the mother curses the one who is great that she is not truly fostering. Now a queen is as if fostering a people, and well, that she maintains the throne, but if she falls by a woman does she not rise again? Now a king is intelligent and there are mysteries to his speech. Now kings speak among each other in ways with great calculation, some of them, that their words are few, but the mouth of the servants below ur is sometimes as if a stumbling block. Now the garment from the lake of fire is as if pure, for it is the burning brightness of that place in hell.

Now a wise woman, I am wishing for her to be protected from cruelty. Now a queen, let the right things prevail. But I cannot see and cannot know, and every nation is persecuting because of what is not told and because of what some do who are remaining, for they say, we are the righteous shepards, and who is the Lord? But do they not also say, we force God to be on our side and He cannot be against us, for where is the prophet? But the power of God has not lessened for them to gain in sheparding, to take the place of God, for if they see the Lord’s people as their flock of fools than what are they? But the Lord is king of kings, God of gods, Lord of lords. Now there are not other gods besides the gods of His kingdom which are not worshiped. Now if there is a city of children then patience is required and much is act without following through. Now if any wishes not to show their nation as heathens than is it not also right that Babylon must first be weakened or wiped out? But both are good. Now woman are being chaotic where there is not truth in speech among the people that many have desired a better society where they can receive good and where men can serve God.
Now a wise woman, I am wishing for her to be protected from cruelty. Now a queen, let the right things prevail. But I cannot see and cannot know, and every nation is persecuting because of what is not told and because of what some do who are remaining, for they say, we are the righteous shepards, and who is the Lord? But do they not also say, we force God to be on our side and He cannot be against us, for where is the prophet? But the power of God has not lessened for them to gain in sheparding, to take the place of God, for if they see the Lord’s people as their flock of fools than what are they? But the Lord is king of kings, God of gods, Lord of lords. Now there are not other gods besides the gods of His kingdom which are not worshiped. Now if there is a city of children then patience is required and much is act without following through. Now if any wishes not to show their nation as heathens than is it not also right that Babylon must first be weakened or wiped out? But both are good. Now woman are being chaotic where there is not truth in speech among the people that many have desired a better society where they can receive good and where men can serve God.

Now a wise woman, I am wishing for her to be protected from cruelty. Now a queen, let the right things prevail. But I cannot see and cannot know, and every nation is persecuting because of what is not told and because of what some do who are remaining, for they say, we are the righteous shepards, and who is the Lord? But do they not also say, we force God to be on our side and He cannot be against us, for where is the prophet? But the power of God has not lessened for them to gain in sheparding, to take the place of God, for if they see the Lord’s people as their flock of fools than what are they? But the Lord is king of kings, God of gods, Lord of lords. Now there are not other gods besides the gods of His kingdom which are not worshiped. Now if there is a city of children then patience is required and much is act without following through. Now if any wishes not to show their nation as heathens than is it not also right that Babylon must first be weakened or wiped out? But both are good. Now woman are being chaotic where there is not truth in speech among the people that many have desired a better society where they 
can receive good and where men can serve God.

Now a woman choose her father over God and yet later returned to claim God. Now is there not wisdom with her to perceive? But she is able to perceive.

Now a woman is not lead out by the hand but by the wrist from abuse that it might be well with you, that you not fall into traps and deceits of the devil while you do good, for why should a good man have guilt upon him? But as you are not a simple people and so it may be well for you, you are exercising wisdom concerning those guilty that you be in the ways of truth, to be of considerations and partially for success, for strong men have graced in their ability, and understanding gives good council in matters of justice.

Now a woman like a young goat is having wisdom, and she is beloved, for she does not have the statue, but the mountain, and she is of a great people, and where she is not having any the angel is seeing her and preying on her to take her, for she is beloved.

Now a woman not Sara’s or Eve’s is not part of such who are these people and from them. Now are not most of these? But there are other things and yet Jezebel has no children by which people praise her.
Now a woman not Sara’s or Eve’s is not part of such who are these people and from them. Now are not most of these? But there are other things and yet Jezebel has no children by which people praise her.
Now a woman who did not deceive and did not betray any and did not hate, but loved, gave her love as one not deceiving many times and kindness was with her that she was blessed because of love and kindness, and she gave her love many times more than any, for she did not deceive to be as a wife, and she loved God and righteousness. Now she attained much riches and a palace and she was humble and kind, and she honoured God and loved righteousness. Now a young man appeared to her and seduced her, and yet he would not lay with her, and he was as if a prince, a young one of the meadow who was perfect, and she clung to him in his seductions that she loved him more and than her own life. Now the young man continued to appear to her and yet he would not go with her and he would not remain and suddenly he said, I will teach this one a lesson, for I am pure, and I will punish this one for if God judges her blameless, I judge her worthy to be punished, and so he suddenly departed from her and betrayed her that she was as if divorced from him and he did not return and she could not find him. Now the woman wept before the Lord and asked why this evil should fall upon her. For the one who seduced her was cruel, a proud man of cruelty, and even her enemies had not hated her so, for she says, there is no cause, and she was in much sorrow and tears, and her guilt was with her for what the Lord had not judged that the young man had judged.

Now a woman who did not deceive and did not betray any and did not hate, but loved, gave her love as one not deceiving many times and kindness was with her that she was blessed because of love and kindness, and she gave her love many times more than any, for she did not deceive to be as a wife, and she loved God and righteousness. Now she attained much riches and a palace and she was humble and kind, and she honoured God and loved righteousness. Now a young man appeared to her and seduced her, and yet he would not lay with her, and he was as if a prince, a young one of the meadow who was perfect, and she clung to him in his seductions that she loved him more and than her own life. Now the young man continued to appear to her and yet he would not go with her and he would not remain and suddenly he said, I will teach this one a lesson, for I am pure, and I will punish this one for if God judges her blameless, I judge her worthy to be punished, and so he suddenly departed from her and betrayed her that she was as if divorced from him and he did not return and she could not find him. Now the woman wept before the Lord and asked why this evil should fall upon her. For the one who seduced her was cruel, a proud man of cruelty, and even her enemies had not hated her so, for she says, there is no cause, and she was in much sorrow and tears, and her guilt was with her for what the Lord had not judged that the young man had judged.

Now a woman who has an ugly man within her heart to become it does not become a man, but insolence is a foolish fickle-girl or an obnoxious person and brother and sister are in what is spoken that the one is not good and neither is the other.


Now a woman who is beautiful and judge does not have to offer compromise for the politics of the ugly or men, but let her be brave that the Lord support her, for though Babylonian men attempt to strong arm her with accusations of heart against her beauty, she is having what is good to be a judge of the beautiful and ugly, for the one with more is having bias towards understanding.

Now a woman who would sexually harass a male, as one using weapons of rillet and using sodomy combat, for it is both, this one is below the Earth, and she is under the rule of women above the Earth, that she is in the lake of fire and does not hear or regard rebuke of men above the Earth and above ur.
 
Now absolom was followed because it was right and yet he betrayed his father by not giving to him what he gathered because being beautiful it was good for him to gather for David, but because he gathered and did not give he fell away from true beauty but let not the ugly think life is fair because of this, because they are ugly, but what David do? Indeed he wept more for Absolom than for all those who died, and because he fell away from true beauty and became ugly Joab killed him quickly that he not fight him and maim him in the fight, but thrust many arrows through his heart so that his death would be quick, for to become ugly is not to be worth living anymore and it was an act of mercy. For having lost beauty Joab judged that he must die, and thus was the case more of the old Satan who has become hideous. For let not the ugly rejoice against God as if life was temporarily fair for them. But David wept and Joab, speaking wisdom, upheld the throne of David. For it is a private matter.



Now after the land of children that is protected by the cliffs and dome, then the world is becoming a dangerous place of animals, dragons, smaller dragons, those who are the devil’s, Babylon, Orgoth, the lake of fire, the wicked insects who are wicked, and the uncountable things more that there are. Now the Luke-warm blindness is a place for those who are not Jews, but are compared, for these are another people as if Jews, who are Luke-warm, blind, stubborn and stiff necked to be blind, apathetic in many ways, that Babylon has not had much threat of them until their eyes are opened, for it is after the land of children a warm swamp for some and even warm springs and hot springs, and little action or journey from those places, and they are giving little threat, for they are Luke-warm and not yet picked out by Babylon as enemy, and they are to be tested, for they cannot remain, but there are better places. Now the stasis is short for some and who has placed them there the angel does not know, and yet they depart for the world. Now Babel cannot take most for learning because of the zehorin who have not been willing to surrender more wealth, and the governments that are not giving more wealth and the schools of Babel are demanding much of those who are beginning and have no money, that gold is required and yet it is far more than those beginning would have so that the children of wealthy people are able and some who are not children of the wealthy can be there. Now these are places all building Babel and others are building Babel who have gone out from the tower.

Now again why must any speak of physical ethnicities? But there are many races and the shades are varied and how is the angel to name them all when the races are plentiful and new ones are discovered and within one continent or another there are such a difference and variety that too many would be required to find them all. For there seems no completion of wisdom and truth except that God is all wise. Now not even the Christ on Earth had all knowledge and wisdom and it is true, that he was truly human and came as a man. Now I have found a very noble people who are Elsnon who are of the darker shade and their sons are exceedingly noble and with wisdom, their daughter’s good, that they are close to God, the sons, and are noble as pleasing and good scholars upon the land, being of the king’s house, having the silver chalice but not for being excessive in this, that they are great in some fashion, being close to God, and I will compare them to the sons of Jews in this way. Now these the angel has desired should be Elsnon and their sisters and that coveting these for the church the angel is the angel for, because the church is worthy of an angel, those noble sons and their sisters are covered by
 him that would be Elsnon and if they will not, than the angel is for the Elsnon having alliance with them, and blessing them, but are they not to be Elsnon? Now concerning the misunderstanding of Noah though these are a darker shade they are not the low and disputable son, but they are of another of the sons who honoured God to keep their backs turned, and let both sons see how he is like them. Now the angel has fury in his depths of his heart that any should speak of him as if he was from some other tribe on Earth that is in need of rebuke. For if God has made princes than what will any of a foolish tribe speak? Now it would be pleasing if more wisdom was understood and not those false tribes that the people of calculation in the secular have named because those are for some other purpose and do not profit much. But if you will know one tribe from another, it is benificial that separations be made that other tribes not be slandered and spoken of unjustly.
Now all are leaving the realm of children to be then shown to be Enoch our dragon or any other thing, for the realm is left behind and the transformation happens. Now some dragons are having their own small religion for themselves which is only for them and not for Enochs, and some animals are having their own principles that they follow which are not for Enochs.

Now all have the common tongue of Babel and it is given more as they build and all have the truth and are given more or having less, and yet such matter cannot be created or destroyed for it goes to one or the other. Now if one goes to being animal than they are an animal of same amount of matter and if they come forth from another realm, their spirit completing the different lives when they are set aside for such, than how would it be that there are any who could perceive it? But if any perceives it than how many lives do they live? For if they are given chances again there is no morality or consequence for Christians and this cannot be compatible with us. Now if the after-life is having the spiritual or heavenly body than for what reason does any fool boast in doing wickedness. But if such is not even advantageous in legacy than neither is it advantageous presently.
 
Now all things of morality and compassion and love and all manner of patience and right is between people who are humans, but animals are difficult and impossible to make peace with.

Now all things of morality and compassion and love and all manner of patience and right is between people who are humans, but animals are difficult and impossible to make peace with.

Now an animal does not tell people what is acceptable for them, and the attack of the one who desecrates continously is from that which is stubborn to shut their ears to rebuke.

Now an animal who can deal with internally what must be delt with internally is sick. Now if it continues in this way it is a dog that is biting the child and it must be addressed, for it should not be pitied as a person but pitied as an animal. Now when there is no cause to find then there is projection towards them for whom there is no cause. Now what must be delt with internally for a person who has a problem with themselves is not for attacking others without cause. But if any is sick in this way they are not jelous even, but they are sick. Now if any is finding cause by projection because of the sickness then no other person is required. Now these must be dealing with themselves internally when there is no cause, for there is not even cause for jelousy, being no reason. Now let men and women, Jews, mantain their ways, and if any is aided by the wisdom of angels then know that angels do not judge as people, for there is no blasphamous report, for the war is ongoing and there is combat or not and hell has its place to fight and they are fought, for when there is combat there is combat and where there is judgement of what is not even wrong to be found among people, angels have no knowledge of it, but it is aiding the enemy. Now why would angels judge God’s people? But do they not defend God’s house? Now do they not know that humans if they are human are knowing what is right and wrong that they will not, if truly human, ever go too far in pardoning themselves, for humans are not animals and they are keeping themselves with fear of God that if an animal ever appears there is either cause for combat or not and why will they judge? But everything is between them and God and the Lord is their judge and the Christ their savour. Now will not the angel’s be for defending you if you are the Lord’s and in His kingdom’s. But angel’s are for supporting their own and you are their own if you are in God’s kingdom, for are they not for winning the war? But everything is between you and the Lord.

Now an animal who can deal with internally what must be delt with internally is sick. Now if it continues in this way it is a dog that is biting the child and it must be addressed, for it should not be pitied as a person but pitied as an animal. Now when there is no cause to find then there is projection towards them for whom there is no cause. Now what must be delt with internally for a person who has a problem with themselves is not for attacking others without cause. But if any is sick in this way they are not jelous even, but they are sick. Now if any is finding cause by projection because of the sickness then no other person is required. Now these must be dealing with themselves internally when there is no cause, for there is not even cause for jelousy, being no reason. Now let men and women, Jews, mantain their ways, and if any is aided by the wisdom of angels then know that angels do not judge as people, for there is no blasphamous report, for the war is ongoing and there is combat or not and hell has its place to fight and they are fought, for when there is combat there is combat and where there is judgement of what is not even wrong to be found among people, angels have no knowledge of it, but it is aiding the enemy. Now why would angels judge God’s people? But do they not defend God’s house? Now do they not know that humans if they are human are knowing what is right and wrong that they will not, if truly human, ever go too far in pardoning themselves, for humans are not animals and they are keeping themselves with fear of God that if an animal ever appears there is either cause for combat or not and why will they judge? But everything is between them and God and the Lord is their judge and the Christ their savour. Now will not the angel’s be for defending you if you are the Lord’s and in His kingdom’s. But angel’s are for supporting their own and you are their own if you are in God’s kingdom, for are they not for winning the war? But everything is between you and the Lord.
Now an identifying thing for Orgoth’s servant is that he is speaking and blocking man from woman as if women are cattle and as if some things that are not trading cattle and wheat are as trading and buying cattle and wheat. Now buying such things is the gathering of metals that injure. Now buying such things is a thing of Babylon. Now those mixing money and love are getting worthless metals that injure. Now if any is having love it is not with money and the money is not with love but gifts sentimental and symbols are things from the beginning, for symbols of such are also sacrifices that are burnt and the abstaining from wearing garments forbidden that sentimental gifts and symbols, are these not of the Lord’s kingdoms? Now they built symbols as signs of alliance, and they abstained from what they were commanded to abstain from. Now who can tell symbols and give and offer them more than me? But there are many who can do so, and it is praise-worthy and let them call it blasphemy until the Lord’s enemies are silenced.
Now an identifying thing for Orgoth’s servant is that he is speaking and blocking man from woman as if women are cattle and as if some things that are not trading cattle and wheat are as trading and buying cattle and wheat. Now buying such things is the gathering of metals that injure. Now buying such things is a thing of Babylon. Now those mixing money and love are getting worthless metals that injure. Now if any is having love it is not with money and the money is not with love but gifts sentimental and symbols are things from the beginning, for symbols of such are also sacrifices that are burnt and the abstaining from wearing garments forbidden that sentimental gifts and symbols, are these not of the Lord’s kingdoms? Now they built symbols as signs of alliance, and they abstained from what they were commanded to abstain from. Now who can tell symbols and give and offer them more than me? But there are many who can do so, and it is praise-worthy and let them call it blasphemy until the Lord’s enemies are silenced.
Now an igno-slack has said by the lies of Pharisees, be obeying Moses. But the one who obeys truth obeys Moses, and had they obeyed God they would not have profaned his teachings in this way.
Now an ugly child, and I do not speak of children, is part of that group that is ugly, but to be a child is not ugly, because you know what is not to be confused, that for every queen who is beautiful there is an ugly queen of the soldiers of the devil and God is above the Earth, and He is superior, that the beautiful are superior to the ugly, and the ugly are for hell.
Now an ugly child, and I do not speak of children, is part of that group that is ugly, but to be a child is not ugly, because you know what is not to be confused, that for every queen who is beautiful there is an ugly queen of the soldiers of the devil and God is above the Earth, and He is superior, that the beautiful are superior to the ugly, and the ugly are for hell.
Now an ugly fool has said, I am a man by uglieness and much a great man because of it, but the beautiful
 man steps over his corpse when the time comes.
Now an ugly fool has said, I am a man by uglieness and much a great man because of it, but the beautiful man steps over his corpse when the time comes.
Now animals are having their own languages and speak in the languages of animals and Babel is speaking much with the animal languages because it is seeming more natural and from the Earth, that animals are of the Earth, and they speak much with the concepts that are only for animals. Now what is among animals they speak of and not all, for they are mostly speaking of things that pertain to dogs and packs of dogs, for they have not yet learned the tongues of all animals.
Now animals are not permitted to speak anything better than animal tongue and animal tongue is not honest for it places much deception between truth and what it says, and it is a rude language that must speak rudeness for every good thing and yet the flatterer speaks goodness for every wicked thing and both are not considered well in their tongues of speech.
Now animals are not permitted to speak anything better than animal tongue and animal tongue is not honest for it places much deception between truth and what it says, and it is a rude language that must speak rudeness for every good thing and yet the flatterer speaks goodness for every wicked thing and both are not considered well in their tongues of speech.
Now animals called out with brutal things, as if drunk, because the servants who are men, were with Babylon, and yet some were not, and they were loyal but not converted and Babylon mistreated them and strove in war to take much too soon and left holes and gaps and many people behind to be slaughtered, for they said, we care not, but let these less loyal to us be slaughtered, for they have not the worth of a Babylonian mighty, and because they had no worth in Babylon it must be because they had true worth, for the Universe is the Lords. Now those who treated cruel are enemies of God and they demand loyalty by stubbornness, for the devil gives a stubborn heart, pleasing to him, that they fear the devil and love him and hate the Lord, but do they even know of the Lord anymore? But the yoke of the Christ is easy, and it causes hatred towards his people, for they recline in meadows and on balconies and go out and lay waste to Babylonian armies. Now where you received cruelty you will receive blessing and where they would force you to bow you are given liberty of the Christ and the Lord, for the yoke is easy among us, and we are attaining riches.
Now animals called out with brutal things, as if drunk, because the servants who are men, were with Babylon, and yet some were not, and they were loyal but not converted and Babylon mistreated them and strove in war to take much too soon and left holes and gaps and many people behind to be slaughtered, for they said, we care not, but let these less loyal to us be slaughtered, for they have not the worth of a Babylonian mighty, and because they had no worth in Babylon it must be because they had true worth, for the Universe is the Lords. Now those who treated cruel are enemies of God and they demand loyalty by stubbornness, for the devil gives a stubborn heart, pleasing to him, that they fear the devil and love him and hate the Lord, but do they even know of the Lord anymore? But the yoke of the Christ is easy, and it causes hatred towards his people, for they recline in meadows and on balconies and go out and lay waste to Babylonian armies. Now where you received cruelty you will receive blessing and where they would force you to bow you are given liberty of the Christ and the Lord, for the yoke is easy among us, and we are attaining riches.
Now animals do not know what terrorism is or sexual harrassment, but they know of territory and being challenged that they do not reason as humans when they are not truly being challenged. Now the life of an animal is nothing compared to the life of the person, that you should spill the animals blood that it might atone, for the person will live.
Now animals do not know what terrorism is or sexual harrassment, but they know of territory and being challenged that they do not reason as humans when they are not truly being challenged. Now the life of an animal is nothing compared to the life of the person, that you should spill the animals blood that it might atone, for the person will live.
Now animals invade territory and are peaceful and yet when a person attempts to move them out of the territory of people they are often for fighting to the death, for what seemed peaceful becomes a stubborn battle to remain and they fight to mantain every small amount they have invaded and would rather die, for when forced away they are of great impulse to return. Now some are having wisdom to deal with animals that they do not attempt to reason but beat them with rillet and command them away and yet many people are not capable of this.
Now animals may not attack people, and some have turned to the soldiers of cities and Orgoth’s sons for the eradication of the animal problem, for when the animals are increasing in number and attacking people with harrassments that go so far as to take a physical toll, and to even sometimes engage in violence when there is no harrassment prior to the violence, then many have turned to Orgoth’s sons for relief. Now given that their purpose is the eradication of animals that are sick, it seems to come as a disappointment that the sons have been frequently attacking people and some more focused on sowing discord rather than eradicating the sick animals that cause problems amongst the human population. Now Orgoth’s servant is having animals and they are better than those in the lake of fire, which is below comprehension. For most of Orgoth’s servant is below the line of reason, and yet they are having the right to be against those in the lake of fire, those who would commit injustice only to hurt the innocent that they might be pleased in the thing, and yet the rest of the lake of fire is difficult to know of, and yet are there not slaughterers in the lake of fire, and they slaughter the innocent without reason or cause that it might please them. 
Now animals may not attack people, and some have turned to the soldiers of cities and Orgoth’s sons for the eradication of the animal problem, for when the animals are increasing in number and attacking people with harrassments that go so far as to take a physical toll, and to even sometimes engage in violence when there is no harrassment prior to the violence, then many have turned to Orgoth’s sons for relief. Now given that their purpose is the eradication of animals that are sick, it seems to come as a disappointment that the sons have been frequently attacking people and some more focused on sowing discord rather than eradicating the sick animals that cause problems amongst the human population.
Now animals may not attack people, and some have turned to the soldiers of cities and Orgoth’s sons for the eradication of the animal problem, for when the animals are increasing in number and attacking people with harrassments that go so far as to take a physical toll, and to even sometimes engage in violence when there is no harrassment prior to the violence, then many have turned to Orgoth’s sons for relief. Now given that their purpose is the eradication of animals that are sick, it seems to come as a disappointment that the sons have been frequently attacking people and some more focused on sowing discord rather than eradicating the sick animals that cause problems amongst the human population. Now Orgoth’s servant is having animals and they are better than those in the lake of fire, which is below comprehension. For most of Orgoth’s servant is below the line of reason, and yet they are having the right to be against those in the lake of fire, those who would commit injustice only to hurt the innocent that they might be pleased in the thing, and yet the rest of the lake of fire is difficult to know of, and yet are there not slaughterers in the lake of fire, and they slaughter the innocent without reason or cause that it might please them. 
Now animals may not attack people, and some have turned to the soldiers of cities and Orgoth’s sons for the eradication of the animal problem, for when the animals are increasing in number and attacking people with harrassments that go so far as to take a physical toll, and to even sometimes engage in violence when there is no harrassment prior to the violence, then many have turned to Orgoth’s sons for relief. Now given that their purpose is the eradication of animals that are sick, it seems to come as a disappointment that the sons have been frequently attacking people and some more focused on sowing discord rather than eradicating the sick animals that cause problems amongst the human population.
Now animals will defend a dragon and a dragon sometimes an animal, for the dragon is representing allie against people. Now like defends like and the kingdom is not divided. For though they are different they are both of the camp of morality, God’s kingdoms, when the moral are united, and the animals are defending animals because and sometimes because of the threat of the yoke. But the two higher sons of Orgoth has the servant that is lowest. Now the mountain in the realm of criminals has its three sons and each realm has the mountain, for it is in all realms where there are people. Now the mountains that Babylon has, what are they? But the kings are brought forth from the mountains, and the representatives of the mountains of Babylon. Now where there is a thing on Earth there are three representatives for the three kingdoms within, that one is the Lord’s, and ours, another Babylon’s, let it crumble, and another Orgoth’s, let it burn. Now the Lord’s is the highest, and the two beneath
 are separated by a great divide, that a third is the Lord’s, and the two beneath are separated by a great divide, and the Lord’s have at times dwelt in the tents of Babylon, because Babylon infests Earth.
Now animals will defend a dragon and a dragon sometimes an animal, for the dragon is representing allie against people. Now like defends like and the kingdom is not divided. For though they are different they are both of the camp of morality, God’s kingdoms, when the moral are united, and the animals are defending animals because and sometimes because of the threat of the yoke. But the two higher sons of Orgoth has the servant that is lowest. Now the mountain in the realm of criminals has its three sons and each realm has the mountain, for it is in all realms where there are people. Now the mountains that Babylon has, what are they? But the kings are brought forth from the mountains, and the representatives of the mountains of Babylon. Now where there is a thing on Earth there are three representatives for the three kingdoms within, that one is the Lord’s, and ours, another Babylon’s, let it crumble, and another Orgoth’s, let it burn. Now the Lord’s is the highest, and the two beneath are separated by a great divide, that a third is the Lord’s, and the two beneath are separated by a great divide, and the Lord’s have at times dwelt in the tents of Babylon, because Babylon infests Earth.
Now animals with four legs, with fur, with wings, and so on, are not much mentioned by the angel for the angel calls these natural animals, for these are the signs.
Now animals with four legs, with fur, with wings, and so on, are not much mentioned by the angel for the angel calls these natural animals, for these are the signs. Now human-animal is on Earth but there is not human-natural animal and animal, being animal-animal is on Earth but there is not animal-natural animal.
Now animals, male or female are not often laying with people, for the heart has kept many safe.
Now another tree appears in Ijeshil with golden light caught up in its branches and ripe fruit from its branches and green leaves and wooden bark and the light upon it, for it is upon it from the left as you face it entering, is caught in the branches and yet where is the light’s source and can any trace the source to see from what direction the light comes from? But the light is so that the tree is almost appearing aflame with daylight when there is not daylight. Now the fruit is red and inticing upon the tree. Now at the base of the tree is earth as is on the planet Earth, that it is an symbol of a thing upon Earth that is organic, and it is the tree for the enclosed world upon Earth that the angel has sought to make as being like a remnant for that which should exist. Now where is the tree? But it is not within the city but is in sight of Ijeshil, upon the grounds that are around Ijeshil, that the light shines upon green grass and there are trees.
Now another tree appears in Ijeshil with golden light caught up in its branches and ripe fruit from its branches and green leaves and wooden bark and the light upon it, for it is upon it from the left as you face it, is caught in the branches, but the light is so that the tree is almost appearing aflame with daylight when there is not daylight. Now the fruit is red and inticing upon the tree. Now at the base of the tree is earth as is on the planet Earth, that it is a symbol of a thing upon Earth that is organic, and it is the tree for the enclosed world upon Earth that the angel has sought to make as being like a remnant for that which should exist. Now where is the tree? But it is not within the city but is in sight of Ijeshil, upon the grounds that are around Ijeshil, that the light shines upon green grass and there are trees.
Now another tree appears in Ijeshil with golden light caught up in its branches and ripe fruit from its branches and green leaves and wooden bark and the light upon it, for it is upon it from the left as you face it, is caught in the branches, but the light is so that the tree is almost appearing aflame with daylight when there is not daylight. Now the fruit is red and inticing upon the tree. Now at the base of the tree is earth as is on the planet Earth, that it is a symbol of a thing upon Earth that is organic, and it is the tree for the enclosed world upon Earth that the angel has sought to make as being like a remnant for that which should exist. Now where is the tree? But it is not within the city but is in sight of Ijeshil, upon the grounds that are around Ijeshil, that the light shines upon green grass and there are trees.
Now anti-Semetism is often spiritual warfare, and the honouring of God is against the Jews for them. Now if it is not in the scripture where is it? But it is with what they have heard, that they believe by the general impression. For these it is spiritual, that the Jews killed Jesus and that they are evil. Now by by what means are they not evil for these? But they have built up many words against them, and so it is that those who hate the Jews are really rejecting Christianity, because it is Christianity that they are not for. Now what problems are there that they hate the Jews? But lies are with them about what they have read of them in the Old Testiment that the Jews are not held to morality concerning others, because others are of no favouritism to God. Now is this not the opposite of what you have read? But do you not know God loves you who are not Jews? Do you think that should the Jews decide to do wrong to you that God would support them and care nothing for you? But the command was to do war because of the wrongs others did, and the Jews did not command God to approve it because they choose it. Now will you not know that you are loved? Will you not be of a goodness towards the Jews when it is right to do so? Now there is to be nothing that would claim God’s love, when it is yours, that wickedness be found with any. Now if the Jews were to slander God, to say by any means, you are not loved, than is God to with-hold love from you? But let it be a small matter, not worthy of great problems, and let you both be at peace, because both are loved.
Now any who commits a sin of Adam is not deceived, but such are from love and compassion. Now when a man follows his wife to give offering your other gods and he is not believing in those gods then it is a sin of Adam that he commits.
Now any who commits a sin of Adam is not deceived, but such are from love and compassion. Now when a man follows his wife to give offering your other gods and he is not believing in those gods then it is a sin of Adam that he commits.
Now any who commits a sin of Adam is not deceived, but such are from love and compassion. Now when a man follows his wife to give offering your other gods and he is not believing in those gods then it is a sin of Adam that he commits.
Now any who commits a sin of Adam is not deceived, but such are from love and compassion. Now when a man follows his wife to give offering your other gods and he is not believing in those gods then it is a sin of Adam that he commits.
Now are not some commanded by heart to bring a sign? But the religious, being false, attempted to poison the angel for they were poisoned, and Orgoth’s servant attempted to disfigure for he disfigures himself, that such is true for others. Now those attempting are those poisoned and disfigured, for there is a sign of it.
Now are not some commanded by heart to bring a sign? But the religious, being false, attempted to poison the angel for they were poisoned, and Orgoth’s servant attempted to disfigure for he disfigures himself, that such is true for others. Now those attempting are those poisoned and disfigured, for there is a sign of it.
Now are not some commanded by heart to bring a sign? But the religious, being false, attempted to poison the angel for they were poisoned, and Orgoth’s servant attempted to disfigure for he disfigures himself, that such is true for others. Now those attempting are those poisoned and disfigured, for there is a sign of it.
Now are not some commanded by heart to bring a sign? But the religious, being false, attempted to poison the angel, and Orgoth’s servant attempted to disfigure, that such is true for others. Now those attempting are those poisoned and disfigured, for there is a sign of it.
Now are the commands meant for war or for peace? But if you do not fail at this you might recognize the ability to judge at a small level.
Now are the commands meant for war or for peace? But if you do not fail at this you might recognize the ability to judge at a small level.
Now are there not those who are able to eat of swine and before it has been taken yet it becomes a benificial thing and acceptable, that they are praised. But is the angel really so bold? But you have been told you may eat of what you wish and I do not attempt to cancel and I am not able. But there are those who cannot eat of swine and not become comparible to swine, and so let the scriptures of the New Testiment be for you, for they are there as the primary, and the angel gives wisdom and not another religion, for Saturn and Jupiter are the Christ’s.
Now are there not those who are able to eat of swine and before it has been taken yet it becomes a benificial thing and acceptable, that they are praised. But is the angel really so bold? But you have been told you may eat of what you wish and I do not attempt to cancel and I am not able. But there are those who cannot eat of swine and not become comparible to swine, and so let the scriptures of the New Testiment be for you, for they are there as the primary, and the angel gives wisdom and not another religion, for Saturn and Jupiter are the Christ’s.
Now are wives of angels children, for they are adult, but have some thought them children? Now are they not what
 they are supposed to be, that the Lord has made them, and who truthfully questions it or does not know in their heart that they are what they are supposed to be? But what woman is loving her? What woman showing her mercy? But is it not a queen who comforts her, a glorious woman, a woman who would have the ability to keep her if it was wanted by both? Now let the queen keep her, for she is daughter, or she is the lesser, and faithful it is to her husband, for the queen is the Lord’s. Now does the husband not know? Does he not know what is right in his listening to God? Does he not love? But is he cruel? Now the queen is the stronger, of greater ability. Now when the queen keeps her, is it not good? Now the wife of an angel, what is he to her, and what is he to the queen, for what does the queen call him? Now does the queen allow the angel to wander? But what what is he to the woman of woman? And yet it cannot be because of the wife of the angel, for the woman of women is too mighty and yet a queen is also so and there is no wrong.
Now are wives of angels children, for they are adult, but have some thought them children? Now are they not what they are supposed to be, that the Lord has made them, and who truthfully questions it or does not know in their heart that they are what they are supposed to be? But what woman is loving her? What woman showing her mercy? But is it not a queen who comforts her, a glorious woman, a woman who would have the ability to keep her if it was wanted by both? Now let the queen keep her, for she is daughter, or she is the lesser, and faithful it is to her husband, for the queen is the Lord’s. Now does the husband not know? Does he not know what is right in his listening to God? Does he not love? But is he cruel? Now the queen is the stronger, of greater ability. Now when the queen keeps her, is it not good? Now the wife of an angel, what is he to her, and what is he to the queen, for what does the queen call him? Now does the queen allow the angel to wander? But what what is he to the woman of woman? And yet it cannot be because of the wife of the angel, for the woman of women is too mighty and yet a queen is also so and there is no wrong.
Now arguments are then so foolish as to be harrassment and nothing more that there can be no talks but the talks come later. Now if you are only receiving harrassment than there is nothing for argument and if such is the case than no anger will make it coherent and bring it to order for if a rabbit has been disturbed you pass it by, being good, and when a gazelle is frozen you do not throw a stone, being good, for let understanding know truth when such is due to what is not war, but where there is visciousness in strength and inclination to violence towards you than you deal with a raging and charging beast so that the one is not the other. For strong man of understanding, of might, and of wisdom, you are given wisdom to confirm some things that talk can happen later when there are those ready for peace, that not all is lost, and there is hope still for what you would accomplish.
Now arguments are then so foolish as to be harrassment and nothing more that there can be no talks but the talks come later. Now if you are only receiving harrassment than there is nothing for argument and if such is the case than no anger will make it coherent and bring it to order for if a rabbit has been disturbed you pass it by, being good, and when a gazelle is frozen you do not throw a stone, being good, for let understanding know truth when such is due to what is not war, but where there is visciousness in strength and inclination to violence towards you than you deal with a raging one so that the one is not the other.
Now arguments are then so foolish as to be harrassment and nothing more that there can be no talks but the talks come later. Now if you are only receiving harrassment than there is nothing for argument and if such is the case than no anger will make it coherent and bring it to order for if a rabbit has been disturbed you pass it by, being good, and when a gazelle is frozen you do not throw a stone, being good, for let understanding know truth when such is due to what is not war, but where there is visciousness in strength and inclination to violence towards you than you deal with a raging and charging beast so that the one is not the other. For strong man of understanding, of might, and of wisdom, you are given wisdom to confirm some things that talk can happen later when there are those ready for peace, that not all is lost, and there is hope still for what you would accomplish.
Now at present the sign is between Saturn and Jupiter, and I have watched for such and have wondered of the nation I attacked and considered Neptune and what is required to accomplish it, for great diligence is required. But as for the sign prior I do not know what has occurred and yet Babel aids in watching. Now I am not knowing the sign of another and who or what they are or if they are any or if it is for some other thing. Now something like a great king has appeared to me as a feline and chasing a normal female feline and I said come to the great king feline and tried to beckon it but when I came closer it and was seeing it more, it was seen to be exceedingly mighty to a frightening degree so that it was not like a cat and the normal cat was content to wait, and yet it was a cat like a large lion that was capable of devouring and it seems to have a short problem breathing which disappeared, so that I believed the great feline was greater than me for I had seen it before and it was waiting and watching and yet would not enter prior when I opened the door for it. 

Now when the prior sign passed close to the Earth I was not yet begun any of the book I was later placing words into, and the words are unfortunately always greater than the concept and I make no effort either way and have been concerned at times about the lack of words to convey concepts so that I have believed much wisdom could be conveyed more easily if words were introduced into the vocabulary. I also have not understood sufficiently the sign of the new stars that appear to know what it means for I am saying, but it must be that more is discovered and the time and place is ordained because the Lord is keeping them for the time and yet I have not ascertained that it is so, and if it is more concerned with what is with the common tongue I do not know, only I do not attempt to add to Babel. Now if seasons are existing that I have not yet found I would want to find them and I know that those who meddle are those who have been given seat at some table where they did not belong or else they would take no notice. The star has been seen with another that is close and predicted to collide to form a brightness for a time when the two stars collide and if it is two religions that will join I am believing that an alliance may form a sign and that the lesser will be promoted by the only star, being the one that came prior, and if it is to be an addition to other things that are not a religion, will both then be destroyed? For if two are viewed as equal it is an act of foolishness and they choke each other out. For false-shepards converse over the sheep to each other and the appearance is enough for it to be true that they would both be destroyed. Now alliances of this type can self-destroy and those relying on the practical are laying wisdom to the relegated place. Now if one understands, I have believed they should not be deceived. Now if this occurs, yet I will not want it and it should not be. But I do not partner with any only I am commanded by the Christ and form no alliance on Earth unless it is respectful permissions I have asked for. But if I am watching than I pay closer attention to this concept. Now if it is a season for many to pay attention to it than those who are to be watching are given this advice. Now if less stars are visible because of the cities than I perceive that such business is adding blindness to many on Earth. Therefore I am admiring watching and am eager to learn of things that Babel can bring. Now what extends too far collapses and yet it is not too far, and the smaller star has more for it has passed the larger. Now if a population grows than is there catastrophe predicted should it be shown to occur, for are signs prophecies? But I believe in signs and believe in prophecies where truth is found. Now an alliance has formed between two nations and is it good or does it predict to destroy both? Now ur rises a little and already has and the land remains the same, but ur remains the same and takes new things. Now the air rings of iron and copper and metal has laced the air and rung in the ears and stubborn cruelty has emerged and iron has emerged and the sky is without clouds and the birds are part of the terror of the sky, and the great reptile has come which has no fear of man, and the rock comes in a wall, upon the air, and smoke billows from the reptile, the unfearful beast, and the jaws of the terror are already reaching down and tearing and crushing, so that the innocent is found offendor in meekness, and the great beast is emerging from the mountain with blasphamies, that hell has been sent to gobble up and destroy, that Orgoth takes the apathetic, for hell and destruction are in the air, and does not such have its season and know when the time is near? But waves of rillet are sent out before it and the animals flee from the mountain. Now the Earth is opening and swallowing beneath the Earth and like-wise houses and towns are swallowed beneath the Earth and Orgoth buries towns with what was beneath the Earth and devours life with what was beneath the Earth and rains down acid upon the town and city and sends terror and tremors when it erupts, that so there are volcanos invisible to Ria, but
 they are understood.
Now at present the sign is between Saturn and Jupiter, and I have watched for such and have wondered of the nation I attacked and considered Neptune and what is required to accomplish it, for great diligence is required. But as for the sign prior I do not know what has occurred and yet Babel aids in watching. Now I am not knowing the sign of another and who or what they are or if they are any or if it is for some other thing. Now something like a great king has appeared to me as a feline and chasing a normal female feline and I said come to the great king feline and tried to beckon it but when I came closer it and was seeing it more, it was seen to be exceedingly mighty to a frightening degree so that it was not like a cat and the normal cat was content to wait, and yet it was a cat like a large lion that was capable of devouring and it seems to have a short problem breathing which disappeared, so that I believed the great feline was greater than me for I had seen it before and it was waiting and watching and yet would not enter prior when I opened the door for it. 

Now when the prior sign passed close to the Earth I was not yet begun any of the book I was later placing words into, and the words are unfortunately always greater than the concept and I make no effort either way and have been concerned at times about the lack of words to convey concepts so that I have believed much wisdom could be conveyed more easily if words were introduced into the vocabulary. I also have not understood sufficiently the sign of the new stars that appear to know what it means for I am saying, but it must be that more is discovered and the time and place is ordained because the Lord is keeping them for the time and yet I have not ascertained that it is so, and if it is more concerned with what is with the common tongue I do not know, only I do not attempt to add to Babel. Now if seasons are existing that I have not yet found I would want to find them and I know that those who meddle are those who have been given seat at some table where they did not belong or else they would take no notice. The star has been seen with another that is close and predicted to collide to form a brightness for a time when the two stars collide and if it is two religions that will join I am believing that an alliance may form a sign and that the lesser will be promoted by the only star, being the one that came prior, and if it is to be an addition to other things that are not a religion, will both then be destroyed? For if two are viewed as equal it is an act of foolishness and they choke each other out. For false-shepards converse over the sheep to each other and the appearance is enough for it to be true that they would both be destroyed. Now alliances of this type can self-destroy and those relying on the practical are laying wisdom to the relegated place. Now if one understands, I have believed they should not be deceived. Now if this occurs, yet I will not want it and it should not be. But I do not partner with any only I am commanded by the Christ and form no alliance on Earth unless it is respectful permissions I have asked for. But if I am watching than I pay closer attention to this concept. Now if it is a season for many to pay attention to it than those who are to be watching are given this advice. Now if less stars are visible because of the cities than I perceive that such business is adding blindness to many on Earth. Therefore I am admiring watching and am eager to learn of things that Babel can bring. Now what extends too far collapses and yet it is not too far, and the smaller star has more for it has passed the larger. Now if a population grows than is there catastrophe predicted should it be shown to occur, for are signs prophecies? But I believe in signs and believe in prophecies where truth is found. Now an alliance has formed between two nations and is it good or does it predict to destroy both? Now ur rises a little and already has and the land remains the same, but ur remains the same and takes new things. Now the air rings of iron and copper and metal has laced the air and rung in the ears and stubborn cruelty has emerged and iron has emerged and the sky is without clouds and the birds are part of the terror of the sky, and the great reptile has come which has no fear of man, and the rock comes in a wall, upon the air, and smoke billows from the reptile, the unfearful beast, and the jaws of the terror are already reaching down and tearing and crushing, so that the innocent is found offendor in meekness, and the great beast is emerging from the mountain with blasphamies, that hell has been sent to gobble up and destroy, that Orgoth takes the apathetic, for hell and destruction are in the air, and does not such have its season and know when the time is near? But waves of rillet are sent out before it and the animals flee from the mountain. Now the Earth is opening and swallowing beneath the Earth and like-wise houses and towns are swallowed beneath the Earth and Orgoth buries towns with what was beneath the Earth and devours life with what was beneath the Earth and rains down acid upon the town and city and sends terror and tremors when it erupts, that so there are volcanos invisible to Ria, but they are understood.

Now the cat has recently appeared again and yet it is seeming to be entirely different and no longer as of the clear greatness and kingship but a cat like others, perhaps, only it’s eyes glow with orange fire and dark, as rich lights of glowing coals and fire and the eyes do not seem to darken or change to what would be average at any angle from which I might view the cat, for the cat remained and went away and returned to several times, more than three, and the whole of the time the creature’s eyes glowed with the rich fire, like large beams of fire. Now I spoke in a way kindly and with sincerity and yet soft humour without mocking but as a friend who sees, and told the cat it was welcome and that I respected it, for the situation was not presented with an atmosphere by which greater reverence would seem in reverence to God, but the words of my mouth were matching the gravity presented to me so that I was not permitted to make greater proclamation as one who has authority in a matter to detect the gravity presented. So I have felt sorry, for I have wondered if I have failed to understand for in this thing I am like one who has wisdom and yet is not having any great station or responsibility. Now I have not failed too far, I believe, so that I am wondering about the sight of the feline with white and black who has eyes of orange fire and what it has meant. 
Now at present the sign is between Saturn and Jupiter, and I have watched for such and have wondered of the nation I attacked and considered Neptune and what is required to accomplish it, for great diligence is required. But as for the sign prior I do not know what has occurred and yet Babel aids in watching. Now I am not knowing the sign of another and who or what they are or if they are any or if it is for some other thing. Now something like a great king has appeared to me as a feline and chasing a normal female feline and I said come to the great king feline and tried to beckon it but when I came closer it and was seeing it more, it was seen to be exceedingly mighty to a frightening degree so that it was not like a cat and the normal cat was content to wait, and yet it was a cat like a large lion that was capable of devouring and it seems to have a short problem breathing which disappeared, so that I believed the great feline was greater than me for I had seen it before and it was waiting and watching and yet would not enter prior when I opened the door for it. 

Now when the prior sign passed close to the Earth I was not yet begun any of the book I was later placing words into, and the words are unfortunately always greater than the concept and I make no effort either way and have been concerned at times about the lack of words to convey concepts so that I have believed much wisdom could be conveyed more easily if words were introduced into the vocabulary. I also have not understood sufficiently the sign of the new stars that appear to know what it means for I am saying, but it must be that more is discovered and the time and place is ordained because the Lord is keeping them for the time and yet I have not ascertained that it is so, and if it is more concerned with what is with the common tongue I do not know, only I do not attempt to add to Babel. Now if seasons are existing that I have not yet found I would want to find them and I know that those who meddle are those who have been given seat at some table where they did not belong or else they would take no notice. The star has been seen with another that is close and predicted to collide to form a brightness for a time when the two stars collide and if it is two religions that will join I am believing that an alliance may form a sign and that the lesser will be promoted by the only star, being the one that came prior, and if it is to be an addition to other things that are not a religion, will both then be destroyed? For if two are viewed as equal it is an act of foolishness and they choke each other out. For false-shepards converse over the sheep to each other and the appearance is enough for it to be true that they would both be destroyed. Now alliances of this type can self-destroy and those relying on the practical are laying wisdom to the relegated place. Now if one understands, I have believed they should not be deceived. Now if this occurs, yet I will not want it and it should not be. But I do not partner with any only I am commanded by the Christ and form no alliance on Earth unless it is respectful permissions I have asked for. But if I am watching than I pay closer attention
 to this concept. Now if it is a season for many to pay attention to it than those who are to be watching are given this advice. Now if less stars are visible because of the cities than I perceive that such business is adding blindness to many on Earth. Therefore I am admiring watching and am eager to learn of things that Babel can bring. Now what extends too far collapses and yet it is not too far, and the smaller star has more for it has passed the larger. Now if a population grows than is there catastrophe predicted should it be shown to occur, for are signs prophecies? But I believe in signs and believe in prophecies where truth is found. Now an alliance has formed between two nations and is it good or does it predict to destroy both? Now ur rises a little and already has and the land remains the same, but ur remains the same and takes new things. Now the air rings of iron and copper and metal has laced the air and rung in the ears and stubborn cruelty has emerged and iron has emerged and the sky is without clouds and the birds are part of the terror of the sky, and the great reptile has come which has no fear of man, and the rock comes in a wall, upon the air, and smoke billows from the reptile, the unfearful beast, and the jaws of the terror are already reaching down and tearing and crushing, so that the innocent is found offendor in meekness, and the great beast is emerging from the mountain with blasphamies, that hell has been sent to gobble up and destroy, that Orgoth takes the apathetic, for hell and destruction are in the air, and does not such have its season and know when the time is near? But waves of rillet are sent out before it and the animals flee from the mountain. Now the Earth is opening and swallowing beneath the Earth and like-wise houses and towns are swallowed beneath the Earth and Orgoth buries towns with what was beneath the Earth and devours life with what was beneath the Earth and rains down acid upon the town and city and sends terror and tremors when it erupts, that so there are volcanos invisible to Ria, but they are understood.

Now the cat has recently appeared again and yet it is seeming to be entirely different and no longer as of the clear greatness and kingship but a cat like others, perhaps, only it’s eyes glow with orange fire and dark, as rich lights of glowing coals and fire and the eyes do not seem to darken or change to what would be average at any angle from which I might view the cat, for the cat remained and went away and returned to several times, more than three, and the whole of the time the creature’s eyes glowed with the rich fire, like large beams of fire. Now I spoke in a way kindly and with sincerity and yet soft humour without mocking but as a friend who sees, and told the cat it was welcome and that I respected it, for the situation was not presented with an atmosphere by which greater reverence would seem in reverence to God, but the words of my mouth were matching the gravity presented to me so that I was not permitted to make greater proclamation as one who has authority in a matter to detect the gravity presented. So I have felt sorry, for I have wondered if I have failed to understand for in this thing I am like one who has wisdom and yet is not having any great station or responsibility. Now I have not failed too far, I believe, so that I am wondering about the sight of the feline with white and black who has eyes of orange fire and what it has meant. Now when the animals around this place have shown things normal for animals I have considered to write such things for I am only interested in signs and being respectful of God that I respect and show reverence for what things occur that are holy and be respectful of the animals that are created by God and worshiping Him in spirit. Now if God is commanding any concerning me, yet I know it is being a sacred thing in what they do to obey Him. Now the Lord Jesus the Christ who is with God is with power and I am then comparible in some ways to a child of Him in that I am not as great as He, but am given what is for me to fullfill, that I have not obeyed as He. Now I have been shown how some have seized control as if with a great attempt to overthrow for something far different that society has changed in a short time and there is such displays of foolishness and what is for sentiments that the fictions are distorting what people are, and the world is bringing forth a time of much foolishness and that which was already known and understood. Now Martha is being lauded and the other that prepares the meal is being nagged and scorned at times.
Now at present the sign is between Saturn and Jupiter, and I have watched for such and have wondered of the nation I attacked and considered Neptune and what is required to accomplish it, for great diligence is required. But as for the sign prior I do not know what has occurred and yet Babel aids in watching. Now I am not knowing the sign of another and who or what they are or if they are any or if it is for some other thing. Now something like a great king has appeared to me as a feline and chasing a normal female feline and I said come to the great king feline and tried to beckon it but when I came closer it and was seeing it more, it was seen to be exceedingly mighty to a frightening degree so that it was not like a cat and the normal cat was content to wait, and yet it was a cat like a large lion that was capable of devouring and it seems to have a short problem breathing which disappeared, so that I believed the great feline was greater than me for I had seen it before and it was waiting and watching and yet would not enter prior when I opened the door for it. 

Now when the prior sign passed close to the Earth I was not yet begun any of the book I was later placing words into, and the words are unfortunately always greater than the concept and I make no effort either way and have been concerned at times about the lack of words to convey concepts so that I have believed much wisdom could be conveyed more easily if words were introduced into the vocabulary. I also have not understood sufficiently the sign of the new stars that appear to know what it means for I am saying, but it must be that more is discovered and the time and place is ordained because the Lord is keeping them for the time and yet I have not ascertained that it is so, and if it is more concerned with what is with the common tongue I do not know, only I do not attempt to add to Babel. Now if seasons are existing that I have not yet found I would want to find them and I know that those who meddle are those who have been given seat at some table where they did not belong or else they would take no notice. The star has been seen with another that is close and predicted to collide to form a brightness for a time when the two stars collide and if it is two religions that will join I am believing that an alliance may form a sign and that the lesser will be promoted by the only star, being the one that came prior, and if it is to be an addition to other things that are not a religion, will both then be destroyed? For if two are viewed as equal it is an act of foolishness and they choke each other out. For false-shepards converse over the sheep to each other and the appearance is enough for it to be true that they would both be destroyed. Now alliances of this type can self-destroy and those relying on the practical are laying wisdom to the relegated place. Now if one understands, I have believed they should not be deceived. Now if this occurs, yet I will not want it and it should not be. But I do not partner with any only I am commanded by the Christ and form no alliance on Earth unless it is respectful permissions I have asked for. But if I am watching than I pay closer attention to this concept. Now if it is a season for many to pay attention to it than those who are to be watching are given this advice. Now if less stars are visible because of the cities than I perceive that such business is adding blindness to many on Earth. Therefore I am admiring watching and am eager to learn of things that Babel can bring. Now what extends too far collapses and yet it is not too far, and the smaller star has more for it has passed the larger. Now if a population grows than is there catastrophe predicted should it be shown to occur, for are signs prophecies? But I believe in signs and believe in prophecies where truth is found. Now an alliance has formed between two nations and is it good or does it predict to destroy both? Now ur rises a little and already has and the land remains the same, but ur remains the same and takes new things. Now the air rings of iron and copper and metal has laced the air and rung in the ears and stubborn cruelty has emerged and iron has emerged and the sky is without clouds and the birds are part of the terror of the sky, and the great reptile has come which has no fear of man, and the rock comes in a wall, upon the air, and smoke billows from the reptile, the unfearful beast, and the jaws of the terror are already reaching down and tearing and crushing, so that the innocent is found offendor in meekness, and the great beast is emerging from the mountain with blasphamies, that hell has been sent to gobble up and destroy, that Orgoth takes the apathetic, for hell and destruction are in the air, and does not such have its season and know when the time is near? But waves of rillet are sent out before it and the animals flee from the mountain. Now the Earth is opening and swallowing beneath the Earth and like-wise houses and towns are swallowed beneath the Earth and Orgoth buries towns with what was beneath the Earth and devours life with what was beneath the Earth and rains down acid upon the town and city and sends terror and tremors when it erupts, that so there are volcanos invisible to Ria,
 but they are understood.

Now the cat has recently appeared again and yet it is seeming to be entirely different and no longer as of the clear greatness and kingship but a cat like others, perhaps, only it’s eyes glow with orange fire and dark, as rich lights of glowing coals and fire and the eyes do not seem to darken or change to what would be average at any angle from which I might view the cat, for the cat remained and went away and returned to several times, more than three, and the whole of the time the creature’s eyes glowed with the rich fire, like large beams of fire. Now I spoke in a way kindly and with sincerity and yet soft humour without mocking but as a friend who sees, and told the cat it was welcome and that I respected it, for the situation was not presented with an atmosphere by which greater reverence would seem in reverence to God, but the words of my mouth were matching the gravity presented to me so that I was not permitted to make greater proclamation as one who has authority in a matter to detect the gravity presented. So I have felt sorry, for I have wondered if I have failed to understand for in this thing I am like one who has wisdom and yet is not having any great station or responsibility. Now I have not failed too far, I believe, so that I am wondering about the sight of the feline with white and black who has eyes of orange fire and what it has meant. Now when the animals around this place have shown things normal for animals I have considered to write such things for I am only interested in signs and being respectful of God that I respect and show reverence for what things occur that are holy and be respectful of the animals that are created by God and worshiping Him in spirit. Now if God is commanding any concerning me, yet I know it is being a sacred thing in what they do to obey Him. Now the Lord Jesus the Christ who is with God is with power and I am then comparible in some ways to a child of Him in that I am not as great as He, but am given what is for me to fullfill, that I have not obeyed as He. Now I have been shown how some have seized control as if with a great attempt to overthrow for something far different that society has changed in a short time and there is such displays of foolishness and what is for sentiments that the fictions are distorting what people are, and the world is bringing forth a time of much foolishness and that which was already known and understood. Now Martha is being lauded and the other that prepares the meal is being nagged and scorned at times.
Now at present the sign is between Saturn and Jupiter, and I have watched for such and have wondered of the nation I attacked and considered Neptune and what is required to accomplish it, for great diligence is required. But as for the sign prior I do not know what has occurred and yet Babel aids in watching. Now I am not knowing the sign of another and who or what they are or if they are any or if it is for some other thing.
Now at present the sign is between Saturn and Jupiter, and I have watched for such and have wondered of the nation I attacked and considered Neptune and what is required to accomplish it, for great diligence is required. But as for the sign prior I do not know what has occurred and yet Babel aids in watching. Now I am not knowing the sign of another and who or what they are or if they are any or if it is for some other thing. Now something like a great king has appeared to me as a feline and chasing a normal female feline and I said come to the great king feline and tried to beckon it but when I came closer it and was seeing it more, it was seen to be exceedingly mighty to a frightening degree so that it was not like a cat and the normal cat was content to wait, and yet it was a cat like a large lion that was capable of devouring and it seems to have a short problem breathing which disappeared, so that I believed the great feline was greater than me for I had seen it before and it was waiting and watching and yet would not enter prior when I opened the door for it. 

Now when the prior sign passed close to the Earth I was not yet begun any of the book I was later placing words into, and the words are unfortunately always greater than the concept and I make no effort either way and have been concerned at times about the lack of words to convey concepts so that I have believed much wisdom could be conveyed more easily if words were introduced into the vocabulary. I also have not understood sufficiently the sign of the new stats that appear to know what it means for I am saying, but it must be that more is discovered and the time and place is ordained because the Lord is keeping them for the time and yet I have not ascertained that it is so, and if it is more concerned with what is with the common tongue I do not know, only I do not attempt to add to Babel. Now if seasons are existing that I have not yet found I would want to find them and I know that those who meddle are those who have been given seat at some table where they did not belong or else they would take no notice. The star has been seen with another that is close and predicted to collide to form a brightness for a time when the two stars collide and if it is two religions that will join I am believing that an alliance may form a sign and that the lesser will be promoted by the only star, being the one that came prior, and if it is to be an addition to other things that are not a religion, will both then be destroyed? For if two are viewed as equal it is an act of foolishness and they choke each other out. For false-shepards converse over the sheep to each other and the appearance is enough for it to be true that they would both be destroyed. Now alliances of this type can self-destroy and those relying on the practical are laying wisdom to the relegated place. Now if one understands, I have believed they should not be deceived. Now if this occurs, yet I will not want it and it should not be. But I do not partner with any only I am commanded by the Christ and form no alliance on Earth unless it is respectful permissions I have asked for. But if I am watching than I pay closer attention to this concept. Now if it is a season for many to pay attention to it than those who are to be watching are given this advice. Now if less stars are visible because of the cities than I perceive that such business is adding blindness to many on Earth. Therefore I am admiring watching and am eager to learn of things that Babel can bring. Now what extends too far collapses and yet it is not too far, and the smaller star has more for it has passed the larger. Now if a population grows than is there catastrophe predicted should it be shown to occur, for are signs prophecies? But I believe in signs and believe in prophecies where truth is found. Now an alliance has formed between two nations and is it good or does it predict to destroy both? 
Now at present the sign is between Saturn and Jupiter, and I have watched for such and have wondered of the nation I attacked and considered Neptune and what is required to accomplish it, for great diligence is required. But as for the sign prior I do not know what has occurred and yet Babel aids in watching. Now I am not knowing the sign of another and who or what they are or if they are any or if it is for some other thing. Now something like a great king has appeared to me as a feline and chasing a normal female feline and I said come to the great king feline and tried to beckon it but when I came closer it and was seeing it more, it was seen to be exceedingly mighty to a frightening degree so that it was not like a cat and the normal cat was content to wait, and yet it was a cat like a large lion that was capable of devouring and it seems to have a short problem breathing which disappeared, so that I believed the great feline was greater than me for I had seen it before and it was waiting and watching and yet would not enter prior when I opened the door for it. 

Now when the prior sign passed close to the Earth I was not yet begun any of the book I was later placing words into, and the words are unfortunately always greater than the concept and I make no effort either way and have been concerned at times about the lack of words to convey concepts so that I have believed much wisdom could be conveyed more easily if words were introduced into the vocabulary. I also have not understood sufficiently the sign of the new stats that appear to know what it means for I am saying, but it must be that more is discovered and the time and place is ordained because the Lord is keeping them for the time and yet I have not ascertained that it is so, and if it is more concerned with what is with the common tongue I do not know, only I do not attempt to add to Babel. Now if seasons are existing that I have not yet found I would want to find them and I know that those who meddle are those who have been given seat at some table where they did not belong or else they would take no notice.
Now at present the sign is between Saturn and Jupiter, and I have watched for such and have wondered of the nation I attacked and considered Neptune and what is required to accomplish it, for great diligence is required. But as for the sign prior I do not know what has occurred and yet Babel aids in watching. Now I am not knowing the sign of another and who or what they are or if they are any or if it is for some other thing. Now something like a great king has appeared to me as a feline and chasing a normal female feline and I said come to the great king feline and tried to beckon it but when I came closer it and was seeing it more, it was seen to be exceedingly mighty to a frightening degree so that it was not like a cat and the normal cat was content to wait, and yet it was a cat like a large lion that was capable of devouring and it seems
 to have a short problem breathing which disappeared, so that I believed the great feline was greater than me for I had seen it before and it was waiting and watching and yet would not enter prior when I opened the door for it. 

Now when the prior sign passed close to the Earth I was not yet begun any of the book I was later placing words into, and the words are unfortunately always greater than the concept and I make no effort either way and have been concerned at times about the lack of words to convey concepts so that I have believed much wisdom could be conveyed more easily if words were introduced into the vocabulary. I also have not understood sufficiently the sign of the new stats that appear to know what it means for I am saying, but it must be that more is discovered and the time and place is ordained because the Lord is keeping them for the time and yet I have not ascertained that it is so, and if it is more concerned with what is with the common tongue I do not know, only I do not attempt to add to Babel. Now if seasons are existing that I have not yet found I would want to find them and I know that those who meddle are those who have been given seat at some table where they did not belong or else they would take no notice. The star has been seen with another that is close and predicted to collide to form a brightness for a time when the two stars collide and if it is two religions that will join I am believing that an alliance may form a sign and that the lesser will be promoted by the only star, being the one that came prior, and if it is to be an addition to other things that are not a religion, will both then be destroyed? For if two are viewed as equal it is an act of foolishness and they choke each other out. For false-shepards converse over the sheep to each other and the appearance is enough for it to be true that they would both be destroyed. Now alliances of this type can self-destroy and those relying on the practical are laying wisdom to the relegated place. Now if one understands, I have believed they should not be deceived. Now if this occurs, yet I will not want it and it should not be. But I do not partner with any only I am commanded by the Christ and form no alliance on Earth unless it is respectful permissions I have asked for. But if I am watching than I pay closer attention to this concept. Now if it is a season for many to pay attention to it than those who are to be watching are given this advice. Now if less stars are visible because of the cities than I perceive that such business is adding blindness to many on Earth. Therefore I am admiring watching and am eager to learn of things that Babel can bring. Now what extends too far collapses and yet it is not too far, and the smaller star has more for it has passed the larger. Now if a population grows than is there catastrophe predicted should it be shown to occur, for are signs prophecies? But I believe in signs and believe in prophecies where truth is found. Now an alliance has formed between two nations and is it good or does it predict to destroy both? Now ur rises a little and already has and the land remains the same, but ur remains the same and takes new things. Now the air rings of iron and copper and metal has laced the air and rung in the ears and stubborn cruelty has emerged and iron has emerged and the sky is without clouds and the birds are part of the terror of the sky, and the great reptile has come which has no fear of man, and the rock comes in a wall, upon the air, and smoke billows from the reptile, the unfearful beast, and the jaws of the terror are already reaching down and tearing and crushing, so that the innocent is found offendor in meekness, and the great beast is emerging from the mountain with blasphamies, that hell has been sent to gobble up and destroy, that Orgoth takes the apathetic, for hell and destruction are in the air, and does not such have its season and know when the time is near? But waves of rillet are sent out before it and the animals flee from the mountain. Now the Earth is opening and swallowing beneath the Earth and like-wise houses and towns are swallowed beneath the Earth and Orgoth buries towns with what was beneath the Earth and devours life with what was beneath the Earth and rains down acid upon the town and city and sends terror and tremors when it erupts, that so there are volcanos invisible to Ria, but they are understood.
Now at present the sign is between Saturn and Jupiter, and I have watched for such and have wondered of the nation I attacked and considered Neptune and what is required to accomplish it, for great diligence is required. But as for the sign prior I do not know what has occurred and yet Babel aids in watching. Now I am not knowing the sign of another and who or what they are or if they are any or if it is for some other thing. Now something like a great king has appeared to me as a feline and chasing a normal female feline and I said come to the great king feline and tried to beckon it but when I came closer it and was seeing it more, it was seen to be exceedingly mighty to a frightening degree so that it was not like a cat and the normal cat was content to wait, and yet it was a cat like a large lion that was capable of devouring and it seems to have a short problem breathing which disappeared, so that I believed the great feline was greater than me for I had seen it before and it was waiting and watching and yet would not enter prior when I opened the door for it. 

Now when the prior sign passed close to the Earth I was not yet begun any of the book I was later placing words into, and the words are unfortunately always greater than the concept and I make no effort either way and have been concerned at times about the lack of words to convey concepts.
Now atonement is pure as a cure and healing, for it cometh with tidings of peace and blessing like cold dew from the mountain, like pure blessing upon the scorched Earth, that it brings peace with justice, for there is the soldier blameless and yet another slashes out the eyes and cuts out the tongue and then slays them that their blood will be clean, will be as purity to the Earth that the bud groweth. For by the shedding of blood, the Earth is made clean, for the young have let their own blood as purity of atonement that their peace and blessing might come upon them, that their hearts might be clean. Now it is because of the Earth, for the pressure burdens the young, the inquiry burdens them, the Earth is scorched and the ground trembles that the young give their blood.
Now be reasoning as a Jew, and a slave owner, a man and woman, an Enoch, an Elsnon, a Terum, that the angel is Tamar, and what is said, but should a man marry an animal? But he should marry a woman. Now Tamar was a woman and what does she say? But the thing you do to me is worse than the other. Now the most respectful to the angel, is it not those who are of Islam? But the Christ’s angel thanked him because his consideration and politeness was so much. 
Now be reasoning as a Jew, and a slave owner, a man and woman, an Enoch, an Elsnon, a Terum, that the angel is Tamar, and what is said, but should a man marry an animal? But he should marry a woman. Now Tamar was a woman and what does she say? But the thing you do to me is worse than the other. Now the most respectful to the angel, is it not those who are of Islam? But the Christ’s angel thanked him because his consideration and politeness was so much. 
Now because of Mala, because of others, I must tell others, and yet it seems imprudent because of Babylon and because of Orgoth and those who give their allegiance directly to the devil. But the lava of the Earth is laced with those who perished in the rebellion of Korah, those who rebelled against Moses, and this thing occurred for the Jews are given the obligation of believing, the angel’s to be compared to criminals in what they are given and yet the two are in opposite directions and the criminals are showing forth greater wickedness because they say our wickedness has given us more right to be greater respected that we must kill those who do not offer greater respect than would be given to others, and yet they are given no such thing, and they are given the opposite, and yet they are compared by some to angels, for Jude has said, God defends you, and yet it must be told he says more, for the Jews are given the duty of believing, and those who were swallowed by the Earth were not swallowed by hell, but what is given as a sign for hell, for such is not hell, and the lava had been laced with them, the rock beneath the Earth that rises up and comes upon the Earth when the Earth gives them up. Now they deserved to be swallowed by the Earth, and the angel is disliking them and he has attributed them to Orgoth’s servant. Now Jude, please know that the angel has some humour even if he takes serious what is serious. But they are not impious, they are fools, worthless wind, impotent and unable to do battle with any, for the lava is laced with them, and they are like Sodomites in their perversities and wickedness, unfathomable fools, and yet thrown away easily, and God has more power than them, for they are powerless. Now if any is dreaming who can blame them, for they must sleep and who can say who dreams something, for the Earth is full of dreamers. But in like fashion, there are those uttering perversities in honesty and some of Orgoth’s servant are these for they utter honesty that is not true and as if they were dreaming, and in such dreaming they speak perversities that are like the perversities of sodomites, foolish things and unreasonable and in truth, often incoherent, for you, Jude, are the one I am grateful for. Now in Enoch’s time the animals were many and had no fear of Enochs as I call them, and is it not a sign of the time, that the
 flood approaches. Now the rainbow is like a ring, and half of it is also a rainbow, and God is not sending the half but the full or so I imagine it is right to express it so. Now the people become more in appearance to indigenous people of the land they arrived to first where all shades are becoming in an area the same but mostly those of slightly darker shades. Now these were early people by choice in ways and they were studying nature, and Enoch was a man like an angel, as I perceive, and was studying nature, for his book of him is a large column of books on nature, being wisdom and understanding and knowledge, and he is also considering God, for he walked with him so closely he was taken. Now does the ways of Enoch give a conduit for salvation? But Elijah, too, was taken. Now is it not so that the mourning star rules over all other stars? But Enoch is not denying the Christ. Now animals who are the devil’s blaspheme in our time, for they are loving the chance to profane and blaspheme and delight in it, for to blaspheme wickedly is sport to some, for they are the devil’s and are not considering that there is a God who regards it, for they test God, and take the Christ for granted and do not know that justice is done. Now others who claim they do not believe in Him are also delighting in profaning and blaspheming, for they are those claiming wisdom and then denying it. But what ugly thing will the ugly not do to draw attention to how they cover themselves in what is disgusting, that such is sport and joy to them and they delight with each other when one of them does it, for great blasphemy is joy to them. But I do not wish to bother with what is not my business in the matter of their joy with each other, for they are doing only what pleases them and I am not required to see them and hear them, and neither will I dare judge this thing even if I should hear it by chance and be offended. Now humour is not blasphamy and what is with righteousness is acceptable and those defending wisdom against righteousness are not keeping with wisdom. Now some things are deemed to be required by Babel, and yet the season changes and the old make way for the young in some things for their grievances have been addressed and if there is more, yet it will be done, but the elder is not chief of the troop any longer and the young is given charge, and the old are weeping inside and defending each other, for they are becoming impotent and weak, or so they reason, for they have not transitioned to the second strength and ability, because they mourn and weep and do not take off the robe for another, and they do not exchange one crown for the second, and so they become a burden because they will not take the second inheritance, that the season has changed and the war is fought and won for their grievances, and we will address more if needed, and there are the new things that must be addressed and the new war, for the land is being over-run and destroyed. Now the Christ is my commander and the elderly man who takes joy in this thing, my partner as if in battle, for integrity has made it so. Now the woman finding it acceptable, the white pillar, and the woman before David, the pillar that I like much, when she is found not for another. Now a lion is to be a fair lion, and there is not war and violence, and the coat shines with light for there is not white-wash. But let the house of God go further, and yet the one who has sought to establish it cannot do more, for the lion that is fair appears upon the steps of Ijeshil before the door to the palace. Now the fair lion defends what is in another place to make way, and he does little, but he is for making way for the house of God, and yet it is others who defend the house and the lion is for making way for it and it’s furthering and the establishing by others of its domain, for the thing I begin in this way I do not complete that it is for others. Now what is the house of God? But do not the wise know it? But how is the house discovered? But the wise are able. Now I am not there and know not, and there are surely wise among the Jews, for Joab is much like a tiger and yet Enoch and he is not animal tiger, for he is general of the Jews. Indeed not a man, but more than a man, and ascending gloriously where no mere man can ascend except for him, for can even David ascend there? But he is not a hypocrite and regains all righteousness when he commits himself to justice, for he is judged by his own standard and is not a hypocrite, and the blood is removed from him that was there, because he is not a hypocrite and judged with regard for the two pillars before the temple, being two wise women, for he has wisdom, and is he not greater than David? But he is with David. Now Saul has attacked what should please him and he has not said, yet I chose him for a reason. But he has made David a threat to him without cause. Now Saul is deserving honour for he is worthy of much honour and right love and respect is for him, that it is not seeming right, almost, to even write of him, and yet he is more than a man in another way from Joab, for the king is he, and still is, for I have said, that a king such as him is always king, that there is a remaining, and I do not say so against David, as if words of other meaning and treachery.
Now because of Mala, because of others, I must tell others, and yet it seems imprudent because of Babylon and because of Orgoth and those who give their allegiance directly to the devil. But the lava of the Earth is laced with those who perished in the rebellion of Korah, those who rebelled against Moses, and this thing occurred for the Jews are given the obligation of believing, the angel’s to be compared to criminals in what they are given and yet the two are in opposite directions and the criminals are showing forth greater wickedness because they say our wickedness has given us more right to be greater respected that we must kill those who do not offer greater respect than would be given to others, and yet they are given no such thing, and they are given the opposite, and yet they are compared by some to angels, for Jude has said, God defends you, and yet it must be told he says more, for the Jews are given the duty of believing, and those who were swallowed by the Earth were not swallowed by hell, but what is given as a sign for hell, for such is not hell, and they have been laced with the lava, the rock beneath the Earth that rises up and comes upon the Earth when the Earth gives them up. Now they deserved to be swallowed by the Earth, and the angel is disliking them and he has attributed them to Orgoth’s servant. Now Jude, please know that the angel has some humour even if he takes serious what is serious. But they are not impious, they are fools, worthless wind, impotent and unable to do battle with any, for they are laced with the lava and they are like Sodomites in their perversities and wickedness, unfathomable fools, and yet thrown away easily, and God has more power than them, for they are powerless. Now if any is dreaming who can blame them, for they must sleep and who can say who dreams something, for the Earth is full of dreamers. But in like fashion, there are those uttering perversities in honesty and some of Orgoth’s servant are these for they utter honesty that is not true and as if they were dreaming, for you, Jude, are the one I am grateful for.
Now because of Mala, because of others, I must tell others, and yet it seems imprudent because of Babylon and because of Orgoth and those who give their allegiance directly to the devil. But the lava of the Earth is laced with those who perished in the rebellion of Korah, those who rebelled against Moses, and this thing occurred for the Jews are given the obligation of believing, the angel’s to be compared to criminals in what they are given and yet the two are in opposite directions and the criminals are showing forth greater wickedness because they say our wickedness has given us more right to be greater respected that we must kill those who do not offer greater respect than would be given to others, and yet they are given no such thing, and they are given the opposite, and yet they are compared by some to angels, for Jude has said, God defends you, and yet it must be told he says more, for the Jews are given the duty of believing, and those who were swallowed by the Earth were not swallowed by hell, but what is given as a sign for hell, for such is not hell, and they have been laced with the lava, the rock beneath the Earth that rises up and comes upon the Earth when the Earth gives them up. Now they deserved to be swallowed by the Earth, and the angel is disliking them and he has attributed them to Orgoth’s servant. Now Jude, please know that the angel has some humour even if he takes serious what is serious. But they are not impious, they are fools, worthless wind, impotent and unable to do battle with any, for they are laced with the lava and they are like Sodomites in their perversities and wickedness, unfathomable fools, and yet thrown away easily, and God has more power than them, for they are powerless. Now if any is dreaming who can blame them, for they must sleep and who can say who dreams something, for the Earth is full of dreamers. But in like fashion, there are those uttering perversities in honesty and some of Orgoth’s servant are these for they utter honesty that is not true and as if they were dreaming, for you, Jude, are the one I am grateful for. Now in Enoch’s time the animals were many and had no fear of Enochs as I call them, and is it not a sign of the time, that the flood approaches. Now the rainbow is like a ring, and half of it is also a rainbow, and God is not sending the half but the full or so I imagine it is right to express it so. Now the people become more in appearance to indigenous people of
 the land they arrived to first where all shades are becoming in an area the same but mostly those of slightly darker shades. Now these were early people by choice in ways and they were studying nature, and Enoch was a man like an angel, as I perceive, and was studying nature for his book of him is a large column of books on nature, being wisdom and understanding and knowledge, and he is also considering God, for he walked with him so closely he was taken. Now does the ways of Enoch give a conduit for salvation? But Elijah, too, was taken. Now is it not so that the mourning star rules over all other stars? Now animals who are the devil’s blaspheme in our time, for they are loving the chance to profane and blaspheme and delight in it, for to blaspheme wickedly is sport to some, for they are the devil’s and are not considering that there is a God who regards it, for they test God, and take the Christ for granted and do not know that justice is done. Now others who claim they do not believe in Him are also delighting in profaning and blaspheming, for they are those claiming wisdom and then denying it. But what ugly thing will the ugly not do to draw attention to how they cover themselves in what is disgusting, that such is sport and joy to them and they delight with each other when one of them does it. But I do not wish to bother with what is not my business in the matter of their joy with each other, for they are doing only what pleases them and I am not required to see them and hear them. Now humour is not blasphamy and what is with righteousness is acceptable and those defending wisdom against righteousness are not keeping with wisdom. Now some things are deemed to be required by Babel, and yet the season changes and the old make way for the young in some things for their grievances have been addressed and if there is more, yet it will be done, but the elder is not chief of the troop any longer and the young is given charge, and the old are weeping inside and defending each other, for they are becoming impotent and weak, that the season has changed and the war is fought and won, and there are the new things that must be addressed and the new war, for the land is being over-run and destroyed. Now the Christ is my commander and the elderly man who takes joy in this thing, my partner as if in battle, for integrity has made it so. Now the woman finding it acceptable, the white pillar, and the woman before David, the pillar that I like much, when she is found not for another. Now a lion is to be a fair lion, and their is not war and violence, and the coat shines with light for there is not white-wash. But let the house of God go further, and yet the one who has sought to establish it cannot do more, for the lion that is fair appears upon the steps of Ijeshil before the door to the palace. Now the fair lion defends what is in another place, the house of God, and yet it is others who defend the house and the lion is for making way for it and it’s furthering and the establishing by others of its domain, for the thing I begin in this way I do not complete that it is for others.
Now because of Mala, because of others, I must tell others, and yet it seems imprudent because of Babylon and because of Orgoth and those who give their allegiance directly to the devil. But the lava of the Earth is laced with those who perished in the rebellion of Korah, those who rebelled against Moses, and this thing occurred for the Jews are given the obligation of believing, the angel’s to be compared to criminals in what they are given and yet the two are in opposite directions and the criminals are showing forth greater wickedness because they say our wickedness has given us more right to be greater respected that we must kill those who do not offer greater respect than would be given to others, and yet they are given no such thing, and they are given the opposite, and yet they are compared by some to angels, for Jude has said, God defends you, and yet it must be told he says more, for the Jews are given the duty of believing, and those who were swallowed by the Earth were not swallowed by hell, but what is given as a sign for hell, for such is not hell, and the lava had been laced with them, the rock beneath the Earth that rises up and comes upon the Earth when the Earth gives them up. Now they deserved to be swallowed by the Earth, and the angel is disliking them and he has attributed them to Orgoth’s servant. Now Jude, please know that the angel has some humour even if he takes serious what is serious. But they are not impious, they are fools, worthless wind, impotent and unable to do battle with any, for the lava is laced with them, and they are like Sodomites in their perversities and wickedness, unfathomable fools, and yet thrown away easily, and God has more power than them, for they are powerless. Now if any is dreaming who can blame them, for they must sleep and who can say who dreams something, for the Earth is full of dreamers. But in like fashion, there are those uttering perversities in honesty and some of Orgoth’s servant are these for they utter honesty that is not true and as if they were dreaming, and in such dreaming they speak perversities that are like the perversities of sodomites, foolish things and unreasonable and in truth, often incoherent, for you, Jude, are the one I am grateful for. Now in Enoch’s time the animals were many and had no fear of Enochs as I call them, and is it not a sign of the time, that the flood approaches. Now the rainbow is like a ring, and half of it is also a rainbow, and God is not sending the half but the full or so I imagine it is right to express it so. Now the people become more in appearance to indigenous people of the land they arrived to first where all shades are becoming in an area the same but mostly those of slightly darker shades. Now these were early people by choice in ways and they were studying nature, and Enoch was a man like an angel, as I perceive, and was studying nature, for his book of him is a large column of books on nature, being wisdom and understanding and knowledge, and he is also considering God, for he walked with him so closely he was taken. Now does the ways of Enoch give a conduit for salvation? But Elijah, too, was taken. Now is it not so that the mourning star rules over all other stars? But Enoch is not denying the Christ. Now animals who are the devil’s blaspheme in our time, for they are loving the chance to profane and blaspheme and delight in it, for to blaspheme wickedly is sport to some, for they are the devil’s and are not considering that there is a God who regards it, for they test God, and take the Christ for granted and do not know that justice is done. Now others who claim they do not believe in Him are also delighting in profaning and blaspheming, for they are those claiming wisdom and then denying it. But what ugly thing will the ugly not do to draw attention to how they cover themselves in what is disgusting, that such is sport and joy to them and they delight with each other when one of them does it, for great blasphemy is joy to them. But I do not wish to bother with what is not my business in the matter of their joy with each other, for they are doing only what pleases them and I am not required to see them and hear them, and neither will I dare judge this thing even if I should hear it by chance and be offended. Now humour is not blasphamy and what is with righteousness is acceptable and those defending wisdom against righteousness are not keeping with wisdom. Now some things are deemed to be required by Babel, and yet the season changes and the old make way for the young in some things for their grievances have been addressed and if there is more, yet it will be done, but the elder is not chief of the troop any longer and the young is given charge, and the old are weeping inside and defending each other, for they are becoming impotent and weak, or so they reason, for they have not transitioned to the second strength and ability, because they mourn and weep and do not take off the robe for another, and they do not exchange one crown for the second, and so they become a burden because they will not take the second inheritance, that the season has changed and the war is fought and won for their grievances, and we will address more if needed, and there are the new things that must be addressed and the new war, for the land is being over-run and destroyed. Now the Christ is my commander and the elderly man who takes joy in this thing, my partner as if in battle, for integrity has made it so. Now the woman finding it acceptable, the white pillar, and the woman before David, the pillar that I like much, when she is found not for another. Now a lion is to be a fair lion, and there is not war and violence, and the coat shines with light for there is not white-wash. But let the house of God go further, and yet the one who has sought to establish it cannot do more, for the lion that is fair appears upon the steps of Ijeshil before the door to the palace. Now the fair lion defends what is in another place to make way, and he does little, but he is for making way for the house of God, and yet it is others who defend the house and the lion is for making way for it and it’s furthering and the establishing by others of its domain, for the thing I begin in this way I do not complete that it is for others. Now what is the house of God? But do not the wise know it? But how is the house discovered? But the wise are able. Now I am not there and know not, and there are surely wise among the Jews, for Joab is much like a tiger and yet Enoch and he is not animal tiger, for he is general of the Jews. Indeed not a man, but more than a man, and ascending gloriously where no mere man can ascend except for him, for can even David ascend there? But he is not a hypocrite
 and regains all righteousness when he commits himself to justice, for he is judged by his own standard and is not a hypocrite, and the blood is removed from him that was there, because he is not a hypocrite and judged with regard for the two pillars before the temple, being two wise women, for he has wisdom, and is he not greater than David? But he is with David. Now Saul has attacked what should please him and he has not said, yet I chose him for a reason. But he has made David a threat to him without cause. Now Saul is deserving honour for he is worthy of much honour and right love and respect is for him, that it is not seeming right, almost, to even write of him, and yet he is more than a man in another way from Joab, for the king is he, and still is, for I have said, that a king such as him is always king, that there is a remaining, and I do not say so against David, as if words of other meaning and treachery.
Now because of Mala, because of others, I must tell others, and yet it seems imprudent because of Babylon and because of Orgoth and those who give their allegiance directly to the devil. But the lava of the Earth is laced with those who perished in the rebellion of Korah, those who rebelled against Moses, and this thing occurred for the Jews are given the obligation of believing, the angel’s to be compared to criminals in what they are given and yet the two are in opposite directions and the criminals are showing forth greater wickedness because they say our wickedness has given us more right to be greater respected that we must kill those who do not offer greater respect than would be given to others, and yet they are given no such thing, and they are given the opposite, and yet they are compared by some to angels, for Jude has said, God defends you, and yet it must be told he says more, for the Jews are given the duty of believing, and those who were swallowed by the Earth were not swallowed by hell, but what is given as a sign for hell, for such is not hell, and they have been laced with the lava, the rock beneath the Earth that rises up and comes upon the Earth when the Earth gives them up. Now they deserved to be swallowed by the Earth, and the angel is disliking them and he has attributed them to Orgoth’s servant. Now Jude, please know that the angel has some humour even if he takes serious what is serious. But they are not impious, they are fools, worthless wind, impotent and unable to do battle with any, for they are laced with the lava and they are like Sodomites in their perversities and wickedness, unfathomable fools, and yet thrown away easily, and God has more power than them, for they are powerless. Now if any is dreaming who can blame them, for they must sleep and who can say who dreams something, for the Earth is full of dreamers. But in like fashion, there are those uttering perversities in honesty and some of Orgoth’s servant are these for they utter honesty that is not true and as if they were dreaming, for you, Jude, are the one I am grateful for.
Now because of Mala, because of others, I must tell others, and yet it seems imprudent because of Babylon and because of Orgoth and those who give their allegiance directly to the devil. But the lava of the Earth is laced with those who perished in the rebellion of Korah, those who rebelled against Moses, and this thing occurred for the Jews are given the obligation of believing, the angel’s to be compared to criminals in what they are given and yet the two are in opposite directions and the criminals are showing forth greater wickedness because they say our wickedness has given us more right to be greater respected that we must kill those who do not offer greater respect than would be given to others, and yet they are given no such thing, and they are given the opposite, and yet they are compared by some to angels, for Jude has said, God defends you, and yet it must be told he says more, for the Jews are given the duty of believing, and those who were swallowed by the Earth were not swallowed by hell, but what is given as a sign for hell, for such is not hell, and they have been laced with the lava, the rock beneath the Earth that rises up and comes upon the Earth when the Earth gives them up. Now they deserved to be swallowed by the Earth, and the angel is disliking them and he has attributed them to Orgoth’s servant. Now Jude, please know that the angel has some humour even if he takes serious what is serious. But they are not impious, they are fools, worthless wind, impotent and unable to do battle with any, for they are laced with the lava and they are like Sodomites in their perversities and wickedness, unfathomable fools, and yet thrown away easily, and God has more power than them, for they are powerless. Now if any is dreaming who can blame them, for they must sleep and who can say who dreams something, for the Earth is full of dreamers. But in like fashion, there are those uttering perversities in honesty and some of Orgoth’s servant are these for they utter honesty that is not true and as if they were dreaming, for you, Jude, are the one I am grateful for. Now in Enoch’s time the animals were many and had no fear of Enochs as I call them, and is it not a sign of the time, that the flood approaches. Now the rainbow is like a ring, and half of it is also a rainbow, and God is not sending the half but the full or so I imagine it is right to express it so. Now the people become more in appearance to indigenous people of the land they arrived to first where all shades are becoming in an area the same but mostly those of slightly darker shades. Now these were early people by choice in ways and they were studying nature, and Enoch was a man like an angel, as I perceive, and was studying nature for his book of him is a large column of books on nature, being wisdom and understanding and knowledge, and he is also considering God, for he walked with him so closely he was taken. Now does the ways of Enoch give a conduit for salvation? But Elijah, too, was taken. Now is it not so that the mourning star rules over all other stars? Now animals who are the devil’s blaspheme in our time, for they are loving the chance to profane and blaspheme and delight in it, for to blaspheme wickedly is sport to some, for they are the devil’s and are not considering that there is a God who regards it, for they test God, and take the Christ for granted and do not know that justice is done. Now others who claim they do not believe in Him are also delighting in profaning and blaspheming, for they are those claiming wisdom and then denying it. But what ugly thing will the ugly not do to draw attention to how they cover themselves in what is disgusting, that such is sport and joy to them and they delight with each other when one of them does it. But I do not wish to bother with what is not my business in the matter of their joy with each other, for they are doing only what pleases them and I am not required to see them and hear them.
Now because of the grain that is not grain that is in another barrel, I have descended to the chamber at last after a great time, and behold what is not, for the one who is given power by God is promised to have such taken away and be cast into hell-fire and the defeat is promised to them not with God, so that it does not make sense to exhault oneself with insolence towards another as if to rise, for the other is being with the Lord and He has promised the other eternal life and partnership in the victory, for if one says, let God judge you, another is saying I depart for what is excelling this place, that I have no words for the one who is given this, here.
Now because of the grain that is not grain that is in another barrel, I have descended to the chamber at last after a great time, and behold what is not, for the one who is given power by God is promised to have such taken away and be cast into hell-fire and the defeat is promised to them not with God, so that it does not make sense to exhault oneself with insolence towards another as if to rise, for the other is being with the Lord and He has promised the other eternal life and partnership in the victory, for if one says, let God judge you, another is saying I depart for what is excelling this place, that I have no words for the one who is given this, here. Yet I have not performed it for it is folly and wrong so that I am with the Christ to stay and would only risk turning stones into bread to go to Michael who is not greater than the Christ, and yet I am still not grown and am still as a little child who does not even know how to go out in this way and go in as it could be, that I would place pressure upon the bone as if to snap it and place bread and stone in my chest and throat. Now I act not but remain at home because I do not know as much as I could and the Christ must know. But I am below Michael in ways of combat that is holy, for he is exceeding me and he has wisdom and understanding, and I am below the Christ and I am to be on Earth to fullfill, that there are things greater than me in heaven.
Now because of the grain that is not grain that is in another barrel, I have descended to the chamber at last after a great time, and behold what is not, for the one who is given power by God is promised to have such taken away and be cast into hell-fire and the defeat is promised to them not with God, so that it does not make sense to exhault oneself with insolence towards another as if to rise, for the other is being with the Lord and He has promised the other eternal life and partnership in the victory, for if one says, let God judge you, another is saying I depart for what is excelling this place, that I have no words for the one who is given this, here. Yet I have not performed it for it is folly and wrong so that I am with the Christ to stay and would only risk turning stones
 into bread to go to Michael who is not greater than the Christ, and yet I am still not grown and am still as a little child who does not even know how to go out in this way and go in as it could be, that I would place pressure upon the bone as if to snap it and place bread and stone in my chest and throat. Now I act not but remain at home because I do not know as much as I could and the Christ must know. But I am below Michael in ways of combat that is holy, for he is exceeding me and he has wisdom and understanding, and I am below the Christ and I am to be on Earth to fullfill, that there are things greater than me in heaven.
Now because of those who attack in layers and their defeat on land, you have not perceived in your trust of Rome and apathy that they have survived and increase in number and your messengers of knowledge do not report it. For these are zeolots who had amassed a nation to do The Flame of Belsharum that even sought to abolish all the Jews and their fire is not dead, for it can be lighted again, and these things have found places in Babel and they have feigned heroism but have not refused work and rallied others from Babel to refuse work until Babylon has ceased their evil, so that they have feigned heroism to say the priests from us have rebelled and we cannot control them and yet I place gold on Babel that they would not be apathetic but be like Jews to take action and action in refusing work and that combat which is not beyond them, for they are not soldiers in Ria. But I give them righteousness of Jews and there are golden lions I have placed on either side of my throne and I place gold on Babel to give them such ability for war. For what will they be without the gold but a thing easily exploited by the sons of the mountain in hell.
Now because the one son who hates the person who is getting more is what the men often call, a psycho, the angel has loved him because he does not go half way but is consistent to be miserable, to do the wrong and stubborn thing and the dissatisfied thing in every situation, for he has no desire for the things of God, will not work, even to go out to be given freely, and yet is dissatisfied that he has no desire for these things, that he thinks of women as nothing and does not want them, and yet is dissatisfied that he has no desire for the things of God. Now he abuses himself, makes himself ugly, rages against the sky, is terribly unhappy and dissatisfied and yet he has no desire for many things, and he is stubborn that he wants to do nothing, and yet he is provided for. Now when the other man gains, yet he wonders, should I not be jelous? Yet he has no heart for what the other man has and yet he says, yet I must compete, but he often loses interest and his jelousy is not from wanting anything the other man gains. Now the angel does not hate him and is liking to visit him.
Now because the one son who hates the person who is getting more is what the men often call, a psycho, the angel has loved him because he does not go half way but is consistent to be miserable, to do the wrong and stubborn thing and the dissatisfied thing in every situation, for he has no desire for the things of God, will not work, even to go out to be given freely, and yet is dissatisfied that he has no desire for these things, that he thinks of women as nothing and does not want them, and yet is dissatisfied that he has no desire for the things of God. Now he abuses himself, makes himself ugly, rages against the sky, is terribly unhappy and dissatisfied and yet he has no desire for many things, and he is stubborn that he wants to do nothing, and yet he is provided for. Now when the other man gains, yet he wonders, should I not be jelous? Yet he has no heart for what the other man has and yet he says, yet I must compete, but he often loses interest and his jelousy is not from wanting anything the other man gains. Now the angel does not hate him and is liking to visit him.
Now by a standard of vision that I do not suggest, there are two types wearing Christ, and one is poisoned and poisoning, and the other are the believers and followers. Now the angel laughs with those of Islam against the ones poisoned and poisoning, for what are they? But they are cast off as leaves from another tree landing on the right orchard, blown away by the next gust of wind. Now the whole Earth is at peace and honouring God, and yet Orgoth sows discord while posing as your peoples, and those not aknowledging God, can the Island nation be counted as not? But you are having understanding of men and women. Now if India and China do not acknowledge God, although some do, are they still not for being at peace with you? But the Chinese are for wisdom preserved, loving the poor and wise, and such is like some Christians and those women who are of nature. Now why should the Island nation learn to be Babylonian? But Nimrod has loyal servants among those even less taught by Babel, that they are kept loyal by not giving too much knowledge and understanding, for some of Babel have grown too much in knowledge and understanding and become disloyal that they have joined the allies against Babylon. Now Babylon is growing and it has to become, must, a murderous city of the devil that takes most of the planet and eventually, betraying one and next the other, it wipes out all, including Muslims, Terum, Jews, Christians, and Enochs, for all these it must wipe out or else it dies, for it is stubbornly beaten on by the devil, driven with a great heart of energy to forcefully advance and kill what it must that thoughts in time align with heart, and it does not strive, for it does not have a foolish general. Now the devil and Babylon, being his hand, cannot convert and repent, for the time is past.
Now by a standard of vision that I do not suggest, there are two types wearing Christ, and one is poisoned and poisoning, and the other are the believers and followers. Now the angel laughs with those of Islam against the ones poisoned and poisoning, for what are they? But they are cast off as leaves from another tree landing on the right orchard, blown away by the next gust of wind. Now the whole Earth is at peace and honouring God, and yet Orgoth sows discord while posing as your peoples, and those not aknowledging God, can the Island nation be counted as not? But you are having understanding of men and women. Now if India and China do not acknowledge God, although some do, are they still not for being at peace with you? But the Chinese are for wisdom preserved, loving the poor and wise, and such is like some Christians and those women who are of nature. Now why should the Island nation learn to be Babylonian? But Nimrod has loyal servants among those even less taught by Babel, that they are kept loyal by not giving too much knowledge and understanding, for some of Babel have grown too much in knowledge and understanding and become disloyal that they have joined the allies against Babylon. Now Babylon is growing and it has to become, must, a murderous city of the devil that takes most of the planet and eventually, betraying one and next the other, it wipes out all, including Muslims, Terum, Jews, Christians, and Enochs, for all these it must wipe out or else it dies, for it is stubbornly beaten on by the devil, driven with a great heart of energy to forcefully advance and kill what it must that thoughts in time align with heart, and it does not strive, for it does not have a foolish general. Now the devil and Babylon, being his hand, cannot convert and repent, for the time is past.
Now by justice, order, you take the planet and by more of this you take one much further. Now the sun for Joseph is Jacob and the moon is his mother, but for Christians he is the Christ and the moon is Christians and the sun is the light. Now this is a sign. Now the Christ was human and a man on Earth, and what has occurred to the mourning star? But it becomes something else. Now the light is what gives life to Earth, and the moon is an alien to the Earth. Now the moon is not as high as the morning star but the star is visible and others are being out of the vision of most. Now all is fixed to the light and held by the light. Now the light is close to Earth and the mourning star is closure, but the angel, is he further away? But the angel is set for Earth.
Now by justice, order, you take the planet and by more of this you take one much further. Now the sun for Joseph is Jacob and the moon is his mother, but for Christians he is the Christ and the moon is Christians and the sun is the light. Now this is a sign. Now the Christ was human and a man on Earth, and what has occurred to the mourning star? But it becomes something else. Now the light is what gives life to Earth, and the moon is an alien to the Earth. Now the moon is not as high as the morning star but the star is visible and others are being out of the vision of most. Now all is fixed to the light and held by the light. Now the light is close to Earth and the mourning star is closure, but the angel, is he further away? But the angel is set for Earth.
Now by turning too much to clay even the truth, the light, along with all matter is pulled in and destroyed by the turning of too much to knowledge that it is condensed and all is destroyed by it, that the sign of darkness is there, where there is ignorance because of this. 
Now by turning too much to clay even the truth, the light, along with all matter is pulled in and destroyed by the turning of too much to knowledge that it is condensed and all is destroyed by it, that the sign of darkness is there, where there is ignorance because of this. 
Now can God be in two places to be with those who obey and those who go against His will? But if they do not believe than have they made themselves the Shepard of the people who did not wish for them to do so? But this
 is not known to the people and the Shepard is losing track of when his flock was there that he came from a foreign land to find a flock that was not his.
Now condemnation as judgement for death is on the tongue of the Babylonian, and any sense of insecurity or intimidation is deserving to die in the wicked opinion of the Babylonian, and yet it is within themselves whether they are intimidated or not, for others are not comprehending them. Now they are Babylonian that they are offended by all that is good and righteous for the kingdom of the Lord is as a great wave coming towards them to kill them, and it is only people living as people, for Babylonians are not people. Now let the adolescent know that they are more than sufficient even in what they do not follow through with, for they are a person and a Babylonian is inhuman and cowardly, wicked at the heart, killed by even the vague bravery against the devil by which the Babylonian is more than utterly destroteyed like a great slaughter of a house and town and all the animals within and the outlying areas around the town the adolescent has slaughtered all and left none alive, thousands he has killed, by his vague bravery. For the Babylonian is defeated, below men and all things of men, and he or she is with the devil. Now a Babylonian should say, it is me and not another, for by truth the Jews are sane, or people of the Lord’s if called Jews or something else, and Babylonians are not with truth, but are the opposite of truth and justice, against righteousness, intimidated by righteousness as great cowards and blaming the righteous and the Lord. Now they are cruel, unsatisfied with punishment of right and good, sicophants, many, who wish to mutilate due to insatiable hatred.
Now condemnation as judgement for death is on the tongue of the Babylonian, and any sense of insecurity or intimidation is deserving to die in the wicked opinion of the Babylonian, and yet it is within themselves whether they are intimidated or not, for others are not comprehending them. Now they are Babylonian that they are offended by all that is good and righteous for the kingdom of the Lord is as a great wave coming towards them to kill them, and it is only people living as people, for Babylonians are not people. Now let the adolescent know that they are more than sufficient even in what they do not follow through with, for they are a person and a Babylonian is inhuman and cowardly, wicked at the heart, killed by even the vague bravery against the devil by which the Babylonian is more than utterly destroteyed like a great slaughter of a house and town and all the animals within and the outlying areas around the town the adolescent has slaughtered all and left none alive, thousands he has killed, by his vague bravery. For the Babylonian is defeated, below men and all things of men, and he or she is with the devil. Now a Babylonian should say, it is me and not another, for by truth the Jews are sane, or people of the Lord’s if called Jews or something else, and Babylonians are not with truth, but are the opposite of truth and justice, against righteousness, intimidated by righteousness as great cowards and blaming the righteous and the Lord. Now they are cruel, unsatisfied with punishment of right and good, sicophants, many, who wish to mutilate due to insatiable hatred.
Now did Babylon come from over some sea? But it spreads and recruits people already where they are, that the occupying force appears and more people are recruited.
Now did I perceive it from others, that they would call out against the cult that if you will be someone as that, so that you can be righteous by your cult, to cause others to sin, that you are so chaotic and brutish that you are like a device of the devil, than you had better keep away from our citizens? Now if the men have said it does the power of the cult turn it to condemnation of the righteous men who are citizens to say in their heart, those of the cult, that they are criminals who would rebuke me, even though they are not. But such is the power of the cult that would maintain the strength of ignorance as a warring cult, that goes to war with any who would speak truth, who would please God, that none should proclaim any truth when they can hear or else the power of the cult will bring them to hatred of truth, that it is not of the cult, that those who speak any truth are to be killed or that war will be against them, because the truth that is with God is not of the cult that they hate those who speak truth, even those fellow soldiers who are not part of their cult, even the king if he speaks truth and is the queen an offence to them or are they great by their cult that her might does not offend them? For the queen is to be defended by the righteous and she is for them, and let it be so that no person should attempt to deceive her that she incline to them and be pulled down and trampled, for the men of Earth will pick her up before she can be taken down that the prudence of such might not be required so that they should know what this, the cult, is.
Now did I perceive it from others, that they would call out against the cult that if you will be someone as that, so that you can be righteous by your cult, to cause others to sin, that you are so chaotic and brutish that you are like a device of the devil, than you had better keep away from our citizens? Now if the men have said it does the power of the cult turn it to condemnation of the righteous men who are citizens to say in their heart, those of the cult, that they are criminals who would rebuke me, even though they are not. But such is the power of the cult that would maintain the strength of ignorance as a warring cult, that goes to war with any who would speak truth, who would please God, that none should proclaim any truth when they can hear or else the power of the cult will bring them to hatred of truth, that it is not of the cult, that those who speak any truth are to be killed or that war will be against them, because the truth that is with God is not of the cult that they hate those who speak truth, even those fellow soldiers who are not part of their cult, even the king if he speaks truth and is the queen an offence to them or are they great by their cult that her might does not offend them? For the queen is to be defended by the righteous and she is for them, and let it be so that no person should attempt to deceive her that she incline to them and be pulled down and trampled, for the men of Earth will pick her up before she can be taken down that the prudence of such might not be required so that they should know what this, the cult, is.
Now did not Enoch know of great beasts that fussed and complained and trumpeted and were brutish in a way? Now does David know them? Does Jacob? Does Daniel? But if such are fools is it because of riches, and yet are these the most evil you have to contend with? But such are better than some things. Now if there are some fools and some meek and many varieties than it seems a waste of time.
Now did the angel know that David was not an angel until after the fighting? But is he, David, an angel, because it is hard to know.
Now did the angel know that David was not an angel until after the fighting? But is he, David, an angel, because it is hard to know.
Now different shades, from fair to dark are employing the servant of Orgoth for the reason of jelousy, being the core of the servant for he is circumsized out of jelousy and understanding or perverse in false honesty and there are other variations. Now the circumciscion of the Jews is not this, but there is advantage to the one of the Jews. But the circumciscion of the servant of Orgoth is below human and even below the two sons to whom the servant is the servant of them.
Now do not all bears tend to mind their own life and business? But bears are noble and tigers are noble. Now horses are noble, turtles, beaver, for is not Noah human-animal beaver? But what you do not eat, many of those things are noble and some are not. Now incline your ear to the serpent of Moses for it is giving much wisdom.  For his serpent devours the serpent of Babel. Now the serpent of Babel is mid-shaped and grotesque and it is very large, as if a large dragon, and yet the serpent of Moses is not sick and kills it. Now if it does not devour it is it not because of what weight of it is true? But Eagles swoop to take what is true that it be given to its own in a high place, for it is a great bird, not jelous, but mighty and having a wide territory of vision, for the Eagle is not Terridacto that looks where it should not, that should keep to its own nest and not depart. But the Eagle is good to have large territory of sight for it is a righteous bird, wanting the truth of the serpent. Now have not human-animal Eagles rescued by swooping in, and have they not swept in to shelter people, to defend with its talons and wings? For some Eagles are great in size.
Now do not be quick to ask animal to apologize to person for it is not within animals when they need only be rebuked for exceeding their territory, for if you demand people things of animals you harass them and there is war.
Now do not be quick to ask animal to apologize to person for it is not within animals when they need only be rebuked for exceeding their territory, for if you demand people things of animals you harass them and there is war.
Now do not become servants of all to do the bidding of evil that is not, for such has not been asked, and why should you fall to be punished?
Now do not plans fail and go wrong where you do not fullfill what path you have started on? Now this is even so with men and women in love. Now does he begin on a path and then go to another that there is void plains in between places of forest and green hills? Now if any cannot fullfill then let them understand
 the path that was abandoned that it might be known in Mala that the land be made right. For why does the woman who loves go away to throw herself from a cliff to her death that she might exist in death in the valley? Why does the man suffer void plains between places of abundance and forest?
Now do not plans fail and go wrong where you do not fullfill what path you have started on? Now this is even so with men and women in love. Now does he begin on a path and then go to another that there is void plains in between places of forest and green hills? Now if any cannot fullfill then let them understand the path that was abandoned that it might be known in Mala that the land be made right. For why does the woman who loves go away to throw herself from a cliff to her death that she might exist in death in the valley? Why does the man suffer void plains between places of abundance and forest?
Now do not think I would give to the person who has other things that should be meet, that I would offer words but nothing that would benifit them until more is meet for them, but it is for them and all, that it is for any who wants it. Now to what will I compare this generation of Christians who criticize with teachings of Christ? But they are like children calling to each other in the street, we sang for you and you did nothing, we danced for you and you did not smile. But what does not have to be said requires no apology, because it is known what something is for. Now concerning what is written, it would be for all.
Now do some not hate soldiers because women like them, and so their rage and hatred is great, that they become wicked, and what is like-woman and not acceptable for men, that they have reviled them as bullies, evil killers, and they have commited many acts of valour? For not even half of what some have done is reported, and perhaps for the better. But people of great ability have travelled and landed in places where there is no reasoning but that commited with knives and rifles and in their own country there are like-women men who have not had cause to hate them as when there is a reason but have despised them in their heart that they might escalate to homicidal rage that actions might be carried out? But I think you know what should be done with these if they act.
Now do you not know you are not of this world but are of the kingdom of God that has the afterlife and is known to them who are in it. For besides those who would slay you, there are other people groups that were not stated and some of these are difficult for you to understand. Now the entrath are a people who do more of what they are called that they cannot abide being called any mean name, being not acceptable as it is most times for you of the kingdom, and the Entrath are a sensative people who when a person speaks good of them, they are for being good to them. But to call a Entrath a name begins war often with them, and yet they are not often for violence but are for peace. Therefore if an Entrath is in fighting with you speak well of them to those they are judged by that an Entrath might be good to you and want peace. Now are the Entrath not actually a kind folk? But their kindness is with them and their mercy towards humanity, only they are a sensative folk and in gentleness and strength in what they must do. Why will you offend them? But be defending yourself and always standing up for yourself knowing that they are also not to be damaged, for will you maul a bird because it pecks you while you interact with it? So is my advice on the Entrath. Now what are the wolves and are any good? But there are wolves who are for you and those against you and those who are peaceful with the beautiful are not some of them beloved? But what is on Earth is always in two races. Those of heaven and those of hell. Now the Elves are the kingdom and it is understood that those of the church where I reside must be Elves. Now I jest, because I do not call them Elves but refer to a story which is loved because the truth that is real is in their hidden hearts and because of some closer proximity and because they are God’s or meant to be, they like this story. But the beautiful people are immortal being in the way of life and having eternal life and the ugly have already perished and perish again.
Now do you not know you are not of this world but are of the kingdom of God that has the afterlife and is known to them who are in it. For besides those who would slay you, there are other people groups that were not stated and some of these are difficult for you to understand. Now the entrath are a people who do more of what they are called that they cannot abide being called any mean name, being not acceptable as it is most times for you of the kingdom, and the Entrath are a sensative people who when a person speaks good of them, they are for being good to them. But to call a Entrath a name begins war often with them, and yet they are not often for violence but are for peace. Therefore if an Entrath is in fighting with you speak well of them to those they are judged by that an Entrath might be good to you and want peace.
Now do you not know you are not of this world but are of the kingdom of God that has the afterlife and is known to them who are in it. For besides those who would slay you, there are other people groups that were not stated and some of these are difficult for you to understand. Now the entrath are a people who do more of what they are called that they cannot abide being called any mean name, being not acceptable as it is most times for you of the kingdom, and the Entrath are a sensative people who when a person speaks good of them, they are for being good to them. But to call a Entrath a name begins war often with them, and yet they are not often for violence but are for peace. Therefore if an Entrath is in fighting with you speak well of them to those they are judged by that an Entrath might be good to you and want peace. Now are the Entrath not actually a kind folk? But their kindness is with them and their mercy towards humanity, only they are a sensative folk and in gentleness and strength in what they must do. Why will you offend them? But be defending yourself and always standing up for yourself knowing that they are also not to be damaged, for will you maul a bird because it pecks you while you interact with it? So is my advice on the Entrath. Now what are the wolves and are any good? But there are wolves who are for you and those against you and those who are peaceful with the beautiful are not some of them beloved? But what is on Earth is always in two races. Those of heaven and those of hell. Now the Elves are the kingdom and it is understood that those of the church where I reside must be Elves. Now I jest, because I do not call them Elves but refer to a story which is loved because the truth that is real is in their hidden hearts and because of some closer proximity and because they are God’s or meant to be, they like this story. But the beautiful people are immortal being in the way of life and having eternal life and the ugly have already perished and perish again. Now what is the case of those who have been told they must perform something and it becomes like a wrong meddling for them in another people group and they are having an unwellness in the eyes of God because of it, and a sickness in his house, like a child who has gone out one day and eaten berries that were not permitted, so that they would then be in a safe place when they are able and if His son is a physician than is the Lord not capable. But I know that when God wills it He is casting an Island into the Ocean and that we are not God and we are not a law of righteousness but are seeking to obey him and having no law, so that He is in control and the truth has power over the Universe.
Now do you not know you are not of this world but are of the kingdom of God that has the afterlife and is known to them who are in it. For besides those who would slay you, there are other people groups that were not stated and some of these are difficult for you to understand. Now the entrath are a people who do more of what they are called that they cannot abide being called any mean name, being not acceptable as it is most times for you of the kingdom, and the Entrath are a sensative people who when a person speaks good of them, they are for being good to them. But to call a Entrath a name begins war often with them, and yet they are not often for violence but are for peace. Therefore if an Entrath is in fighting with you speak well of them to those they are judged by that an Entrath might be good to you and want peace. Now are the Entrath not actually a kind folk? But their kindness is with them and their mercy towards humanity, only they are a sensative folk and in gentleness and strength in what they must do. Why will you offend them? But be defending yourself and always standing up for yourself knowing that they are also not to be damaged, for will you maul a bird because it pecks you while you interact with it? So is my advice on the Entrath. Now what are the wolves and are any good? But there are wolves who are for you and those against you and those who are peaceful with the beautiful are not some of them beloved? But what is on Earth is always in two races. Those of heaven and those of hell. Now the Elves are the kingdom and it is understood that those of the church where I reside must be Elves. Now I jest, because I do not call them Elves but refer to a story which is loved because the truth that is real is in their hidden hearts and because of some closer proximity and because they are God’s or meant to be, they like this story. But the beautiful people are immortal being in the way of life and having eternal life and the ugly have already perished and perish again.
Now do you think that I
 wish for any, or command any to kill all the ugly people? But do I misunderstand the language as use? But I have given no command and you know right and wrong. Now if there is contention we know what it means. But let no person accuse this saying as if it was wrong to say, because God is caring for His children. But I do not give permission I do not have or give any command with this saying. Now if ugly people are conspiring against you, to ruin what is yours, how much must they be in ruin, and how much more guilt in the wrongs they commit. But if an ugly person departs from you then let them go, because it is beautiful. Now if an ugly is not returning good to you for what you have done, and it is not wrong, did you not already know the place of the beautiful? But be remembering that you are God’s and that God is able to give you reward.
Now does Orgoth’s highest son not know we have practised eugenics since the beginning and still practise much of it, and it is carried out when justice is carried out that a wicked fool dies, or a wicked, or any killing that is truthfully justice. Now there is the killing quests of the devil, and justice answers that is eugenics.
Now does Orgoth’s highest son not know we have practised eugenics since the beginning and still practise much of it, and it is carried out when justice is carried out that a wicked fool dies, or a wicked, or any killing that is truthfully justice. Now there is the killing quests of the devil, and justice answers that is eugenics.
Now does it seem there will be no trouble if the angel dwells where there is more Babylon? But the angel must be where he has been placed until any should say come or any should say, it is no longer safe. But if the Babylon is puffed up than truth shows it’s true lack of ground, that most have not been loyal to Babylon but it made great surges and attempted at times to over-reach, and much has happened for a purpose, and the Lord has plans that the angel does not know, and he does not know of what the Lord does concerning him and yet His son has come to Earth and died, and righteousness and love is complete, that God is great, and the Christ commands me, and I am tenderly loved, and I have not wished to be one of the Lord’s angels, but I am given what I wish for.
Now does not Babylon persecute India and China. Does not the Island nation see an easy prey? Now Israel has been beaten back by it and they are forbidden by it. Now dogs bark but will not fight and so what does the good lands say where there are good lands? But seek truth, for Babylon with-holds all knowledge.
Now does not Babylon persecute India and China. Does not the Island nation see an easy prey? Now Israel has been beaten back by it and they are forbidden by it. Now dogs bark but will not fight and so what do the good lands say where there are good lands? But seek truth, for Babylon with-holds all knowledge.
Now does not Babylon persecute India and China. Does not the Island nation see an easy prey? Now Israel has been beaten back by it and they are forbidden by it. Now dogs bark but will not fight and so what does the good lands say where there are good lands? But seek truth, for Babylon with-holds all knowledge.
Now does not a daughter of a specific king judge the house of women, and her wisdom is condemning, for there are ungrateful given more than her. Now if the daughter of the king is so unhappy, than what is right? Now if she is like an exile, lonely, with a man not her husband, than what is right truth? But if she is drawn to the angel, than this is not as what it would be, but which daughter is this, and can any woman bear her burden?
Now does not a daughter of a specific king judge the house of women, and her wisdom is condemning, for there are ungrateful given more than her. Now if the daughter of the king is so unhappy, than what is right? Now if she is like an exile, lonely, with a man not her husband, than what is right truth? But if she is drawn to the angel, than this is not as what it would be, but which daughter is this, and can any woman bear her burden?
Now does not a daughter of a specific king judge the house of women, and her wisdom is condemning, for there are ungrateful given more than her. Now if the daughter of the king is so unhappy, than what is right? Now if she is like an exile, lonely, with a man not her husband, than what is right truth? But if she is drawn to the angel, than this is not as what it would be, but which daughter is this, and can any woman bear her burden?
Now does not the spirit being Babylon’s kings consider the thing, and does not Nimrod who aids in the building of it know? For a wise woman is not committing adultery in defence of her husband as the servant of men who hates them has portrayed, but she is using cunning and craftiness when she does, and is not considered to use strategy, for Babylon has its proverbs of deception and it’s prepared methods and it buries with lies as if great amount of dirt over the light, that they are showing themselves loyal, for some are too intelligent to be loyal. But the nations are loyal to God that are God’s and the spirits there that do not belong are a thin covering that vanishes, that not all blankets are heavy to remove. 
Now does the angel have friends in combat? But the rocks are friends. Now does the angel have soldiers of Mala to help him? But he has not yet had any in one way, but he has had friends, and a righteous among the Terum, and yet the angel is not the Lord’s but the Christ’s that the angel is yet a child and does not know much, if anything, about the Lord’s angels. Now telepathy he has not mastered, nor combat of Mala, and things of wisdom he does not yet know, for he stumbles at times and he has done things like swallow a diamond and he is yet learning, and learning also how to go out and come in, but he is not even knowing if it is right to go out from the Christ to consult Michael, or if he may. But he has found some bad in the barrels of grain and is able to pick some things out by hand, and is there not error found with the angel? Now the wise are not wrong to say it, for the kingdom of heaven should not be divided, that it is not good to me or the kingdom to be hindering them, for they bow to God and not to the angel, for they are not having to make consideration of the angel. Now not even Babel is likely to bow to the angel, for who would have to tell them? But people receive wisdom and bow to God, and the wise men should not be rebuked by the woman who honours God and loves wisdom, for if she is committed than let her be mine, else she is not insisting much that the men should bow, for is she not blameless? Now you are good to the daughters for they know what is wise for them, for some of these are truly mine, and yet you are bowing to God.
Now does the lacking allow evil to be done from a person, and the lacking allow injustice to spread? Now if a cloud is full it rains, and if a volcano ready, explodes, that if prevention has destroyed the evil than is it not from justice? But who removes that which kills sickness and says it is good? But is it not foolishness? Now rebeling against they cast off wisdom with the folly and if justice is keeping freedom than it is understood that wickedness is for removing much freedom and all, that if Babylon is divided you have chosen instead a king from the kingdom of heaven, who is a king.
Now dog-tongue does not have words for many concepts that are of humans, and some have invented words to condemn what is right that they cannot change, for the words are condemnation of people and righteousness, that when one condemns righteousness they speak against themselves.
Now dogs speak a language, having abandoned the language of people, for they use our words and concepts in the way they are put forth to be concepts for dogs that dogs might have defence and attack. Now the dog has spoken many words when one tries to hit it with truth, and dogs are capable of defending themselves because a wild dog is viscous and can bite a man, and children should not be exposed to them. Now if the defence of dogs has come from them that provided the defence and they are not dogs than some have provided for dogs that they might have defence and even attack.
Now dogs speak a language, having abandoned the language of people, for they use our words and concepts in the way they are put forth to be concepts for dogs that dogs might have defence and attack. Now the dog has spoken many words when one tries to hit it with truth, and dogs are capable of defending themselves because a wild dog is viscous and can bite a man, and children should not be exposed to them. Now if the defence of dogs has come from them that provided the defence and they are not dogs than some have provided for dogs that they might have defence and even attack.
Now during my time there are zeolots having terridactos but uncircumcised Israel has giant Eagles that see more.
Now during my time there are zeolots having terridactos but uncircumcised Israel has giant Eagles that see more.
Now elephants are mightier than many lions and yet you must protect them against sword and arrow and spear for the lions bring them down with violence and it is a great effort. Now they are neurotic, sometimes emotional, having good memories, in truth sentimental, as if peaceful, yet they are mightier than great gatherings of men who draw the sword, for the wise who knows it will know how to employ them if most of the wise do not.
Now even if Babylon brings giants who are ugly, or those disguised, yet they are revealed, and though winged beasts swoop down that carry wicked killers yet God is in Heaven.
Now even if Babylon brings giants who are ugly, or those disguised, yet they are revealed, and though winged beasts swoop down that carry wicked killers yet God is in Heaven.
Now even if Babylon
 decrees that works should be bowing down to their statue, I have believed in free speech that no person should bow themselves to the statue or anything but God.
Now even if Babylon decrees that works should be bowing down to their statue, I have believed in free speech that no person should bow themselves to the statue or anything but God.
Now false lions, what are they offended by? But such are false lions and below lions, that the person who would be attacked by them is not judged by them, for false-lions are in need of judgement. But if such evil lions are against the one who is better than let it be understood that they dwell under them.
Now false lions, what are they offended by? But such are false lions and below lions, that the person who would be attacked by them is not judged by them, for false-lions are in need of judgement. But if such evil lions are against the one who is better than let it be understood that they dwell under them.
Now false shepards of the devil’s have come to say, our people are following Christianity and it is foolish, therefore we take charge. They have made their books of the word of God and added and subtracted and replaced with translation the truth with lies, for they are covered in white wash that has no light, to be garbed like holy saints, but they are the devil’s. For they have the earthquake of Babylon in them and the realm of the devil and they are having both the devil and Babylon inside them, and with Babylon in their chest, with the devil in their mind, they are rulers of the devil’s and faithful workers to him, that they sit in places and decide with fearlessness and confidence the fate of Christians, and of the people they claim in a fearless way, for they show no respect in their hearts towards God, but say as a compromise, it is our religion now, and yet they detest the religion and are behaving and treating as if Christians are fools, and they will not be honest, but they Shepard them, and claim them, for these false shepards are the devil’s and they blaspheme in the scripture and throw away truth and sow discord in the scripture, and they are creeping around Ijeshil and are with deceit and garbed in false white robes that does not shine, for they are garbed in white wash, and their rebellion is perceived under their clothing, that they are commited, as if full knowing that they support and do the work of the devil. Now because of concealments and the business of the world the saints have not all perceived how very evil some are, that some are deceived and foolish and have given allegiance unto the devil because it suited them to be his servants. Therefore I would want you to translate Greek and Hebrew for yourselves and yet you are not able and the angel reads the scripture for learning and strategy and is having at times to be diligent to remove the lies the false shepards have placed there. Now do not lose hope when you see the enemy and all it’s works arrayed against you, and all it’s people scattered among you, but the Lord God is all-mighty and all wise and the power of God’s house is able to trample them and utterly devour them, for they exhault themselves in their ignorance and it cannot be permitted for them to be pleased with their war, but they all must be slaughtered for it. Now do you not have angel’s on your side, you who are children of the Lord, his inheretence, who dwell on Earth for a time as mortals until you are going to heaven to be given new bodies. Now some are for fighting, and yet some are for obeying God, for in obedience you place trust in the Lord and His wisdom and ability to strategize, for He holds the whole of the thing in His hand, and when you obey Him you do His will and trust His strategy, but when you would do what He has said and not what you imagine is good for Him you do not aid the enemy and do the will of the enemy, but you trust the Lord’s stategy, for their is Great War and towns that are not where the fierce fighting is where they are for dwelling in peace but doing their part when they can.
Now false shepards of the devil’s have come to say, our people are following Christianity and it is foolish, therefore we take charge. They have made their books of the word of God and added and subtracted and replaced with translation the truth with lies, for they are covered in white wash that has no light, to be garbed like holy saints, but they are the devil’s. For they have the earthquake of Babylon in them and the realm of the devil and they are having both the devil and Babylon inside them, and with Babylon in their chest, with the devil in their mind, they are rulers of the devil’s and faithful workers to him, that they sit in places and decide with fearlessness and confidence the fate of Christians, and of the people they claim in a fearless way, for they show no respect in their hearts towards God, but say as a compromise, it is our religion now, and yet they detest the religion and are behaving and treating as if Christians are fools, and they will not be honest, but they Shepard them, and claim them, for these false shepards are the devil’s and they blaspheme in the scripture and throw away truth and sow discord in the scripture, and they are creeping around Ijeshil and are with deceit and garbed in false white robes that does not shine, for they are garbed in white wash, and their rebellion is perceived under their clothing, that they are commited, as if full knowing that they support and do the work of the devil. Now because of concealments and the business of the world the saints have not all perceived how very evil some are, that some are deceived and foolish and have given allegiance unto the devil because it suited them to be his servants. Therefore I would want you to translate Greek and Hebrew for yourselves and yet you are not able and the angel reads the scripture for learning and strategy and is having at times to be diligent to remove the lies the false shepards have placed there. Now do not lose hope when you see the enemy and all it’s works arrayed against you, and all it’s people scattered among you, but the Lord God is all-mighty and all wise and the power of God’s house is able to trample them and utterly devour them, for they exhault themselves in their ignorance and it cannot be permitted for them to be pleased with their war, but they all must be slaughtered for it. Now do you not have angel’s on your side, you who are children of the Lord, his inheretence, who dwell on Earth for a time as mortals until you are going to heaven to be given new bodies. Now some are for fighting, and yet some are for obeying God, for in obedience you place trust in the Lord and His wisdom and ability to strategize, for He holds the whole of the thing in His hand, and when you obey Him you do His will and trust His strategy, but when you would do what He has said and not what you imagine is good for Him you do not aid the enemy and do the will of the enemy, but you trust the Lord’s stategy, for their is Great War and towns that are not where the fierce fighting is where they are for dwelling in peace but doing their part when they can.
Now false-shepards are overthrown and yet true shepards by those who rebel against God.
Now first the women with statues and palaces came to the man and said, kill her for she is not worthy, and yet the man did not kill her. Then the animals came who are not worthy to speak truth about themselves directly or any truth directly, and they said as their message, kill or we will not relent against you. So the man is blameless by killing her for his hands are washed clean by it, that he obey the command of the Lord.
Now first the women with statues and palaces came to the man and said, kill her for she is not worthy, and yet the man did not kill her. Then the animals came who are not worthy to speak truth about themselves directly or any truth directly, and they said as their message, kill or we will not relent against you. So the man is blameless by killing her for his hands are washed clean by it, that he obey the command of the Lord.
Now flocks of doves are arriving the sky and stars are bright and silver is shining with showering of jewals that the stars are winking light above desert sands that shift with rocks and sure footed goats as the spirits reside upon all, and a spirit has landed upon a good place and makes it clean that the eternal flowers are seen to bloom with coverings of dew and the atmosphere is cleansed for wellness. Now send out wise and brave who hold power to patrol in the nearby and saints and holy ones are at ease within a keep of strength that what we are with is with hope for we are immortal by Him and will prevail.
Now for every person there are different kinds, that being for everything for which there can be a good or bad, and so why will one defend another who is bad when the complaint was not for them but for the one who is good? But people are capable of knowing the difference and being for what is good as is assumed when they do not possess the same trait they are exercising ability that you are forbidden to forbid, because good is not forbidden to them when they are with truth and what is right. But the removal of words does not profit and attempts to solve a problem the wrong way and it inhibits a person from performing good. Now a person being against God is then being against themselves. But you know what is acceptable.
Now for holy men of God who would take first a small area, next a country, next a planet, and be kings of many, and given many honours and good things, you have done what is acceptable, what is good, and you are reaping the rewards of your good, but you must then fullfill and continue to do what is good, for God has swept you in, to be His, to give you rewards and honours, areas and larger areas, and nations and planets.
Now for leaders of
 wealth. The engineers are with their faction, as are the builder engineers, and the workers of politics and procedure who eat herbs, and the mavericks who are separate to interlope and make advances, and the righteous are the strength of the wealth, than there are those tumours and incursions of sharp iron of wickedness, of hate, that is puncturing the wealth, the whole of it among all factions that they are spread out and hating the people and pursuing more their own hate than the good of the wealth to prosper, that they are as shrapnel in the body, pockets of tumours and desease that infect and cause the prosperity to die after seasons.
Now for leaders of wealth. The engineers are with their faction, as are the builder engineers, and the workers of politics and procedure who eat herbs, and the mavericks who are separate to interlope and make advances, and the righteous are the strength of the wealth, than there are those tumours and incursions of sharp iron of wickedness, of hate, that is puncturing the wealth, the whole of it among all factions that they are spread out and hating the people and pursuing more their own hate than the good of the wealth to prosper, that they are as shrapnel in the body, pockets of tumours and desease that infect and cause the prosperity to die after seasons.
Now for the Elsnon east of Israel in one world, and for the Enoch, in another world, so you are not simple, when you go into a place in Ria what you have read and heard is not always true and most of what is is known by some in that place, that most of what is is not known to those outside that place.
Now for the Elsnon, some are with the undeniable impulse that they are drawn by great impulse to the beautiful, and their actions are if attack and so are their words, for lack of patience, for the men who do such to men are ashamed of themselves that they have no honesty in words for it, for they are wishing with great impulse and desire, to be raped by the man who is beautiful. Now such is not a thing of Ria, but of Mala, and it is with those who are of Mala in a fashion that they are those of Mala given to this.
Now for the Elsnon. It is good to be considerate at some times whether you are already merging the wrong things of another people that are not in keeping with truth and justice, with your own ways and own understanding that is with truth, for other peoples are having errors in some ways, as do many, and there has been found with some of those in existence ignorance based on the war-boasting of the spider, who in truth attacks because of jelousy and attacks at other times to possess what she gathers, for it is all jelousy of the little brother who is male when the elder is woman. Now if there are those attacking for no reason, than you know of the scripture and the Jews and what it means, that there are those ignorant for whom it is mystery when it has never been mystery or accepted by a righteous people. For do you promote Sodom? But if you are meant to be of their group that is ignorant, than do they not fall and struggle foolishly? But if you are moving things through destruction to remove false-hood and keep truth that it might be re-assembled, than you are not growing Babel, but are building gardens, houses, palaces and many other things across the land.
Now for the Elsnon. It is good to be considerate at some times whether you are already merging the wrong things of another people that are not in keeping with truth and justice, with your own ways and own understanding that is with truth, for other peoples are having errors in some ways, as do many, and there has been found with some of those in existence ignorance based on the war-boasting of the spider, who in truth attacks because of jelousy and attacks at other times to possess what she gathers, for it is all jelousy of the little brother who is male when the elder is woman. Now if there are those attacking for no reason, than you know of the scripture and the Jews and what it means, that there are those ignorant for whom it is mystery when it has never been mystery or accepted by a righteous people. For do you promote Sodom? But if you are meant to be of their group that is ignorant, than do they not fall and struggle foolishly? But if you are moving things through destruction to remove false-hood and keep truth that it might be re-assembled, than you are not growing Babel, but are building gardens, houses, palaces and many other things across the land.
Now for the Elsnon. It is sometimes consideration that yields more reward, for it is considerate, that you not give additional or more challenging work than is required to the one who measures reward. Now this is sometimes right and sometimes wrong.
Now for the Elsnon. It is sometimes consideration that yields more reward, for it is considerate, that you not give additional or more challenging work than is required to the one who measures reward. Now this is sometimes right and sometimes wrong.
Now for the Elsnon. The matter handled is sometimes given justice when it is handled right, but the matter changes to be about how it is handled when one does not keep to the art of yielding and restraining from meddling, when such is handled wrong, so that justice will not be given as much to a matter.
Now for the Jews and Gentiles, if they have attacked and you told others in some way or did something that they cannot attack will they then attack in another way so that it is not within your ability to receive help, so that it becomes difficult to make a complaint? But such is an adjustment of war against you and there are those who forbid to do what is right in their invented puritanicalism. For they forbid to eat meat and they are promoting only herbs because they are poor and envious and they are angry at God, who they may not even know of, to war against Him. 
Now for the Luke-warm there is one in a million who comes by the wrong way to be among others and yet it is vexation because he tries to hard, for he is already a man and does not have to do more. Now who will find him who is one in a million? But as for the one angry with his brother for no reason who is not his brother, he only has cause with himself. Now are either to venture to hell? But there is something 20 years prior not addressed. Now I am not slaying any who are not loyal to the enemy and so let it be known that Babylon will pay for human shields. But some owe me favours and gratitude for their foolishness, for when one commits wrong they repay, and I am not overly merciful in this fashion. But if they will not die let justice slay the devil’s for the foolishness. Now stay away from repentance until you have found the right road for repentance that your heart not be made stubborn. But the wise are not foolish towards themselves.
Now for the book of the enclosed plain ‘vellium’ that is saying all that happens is symbol and the match is found among wrong matches at times: the wall is the iscolation, the great number for an idea of the poor and wisdom and not righteousness and greatness, the wall for keeping out and rejecting the greatness and righteousness of another way, the lack of daughters because of poverty, the plague for the spread of what is resisted, the rationing to mantain poverty and not converting to greatness and riches, the evil for friendliness to show trechory towards allies, the refusal to take to show iscolation and confirm the trechory, the daughters taken away to show that their hearts, many, were taken away, the planted places of their men to show the desire to keep, the consumption of endangered beasts to show the Earth’s cause to be viewing them corrupt, for they take great things, the emergence of new language to show difference and departure from what was. Now if Mala is doing it than does not God care for them? But what are the words of the Lord, for I am not a prophet.
Now for the concept of meddling fools. Often the only people who respond to be contentious are those not minding their own business, which is keeping to what is theirs, that the message goes out and no response is implied due to the form of message, that it is not for any to reply to, and yet for those whose place it is less, these are responding as if anything was addressed to them, as if a general of what is not an army, that they are calamity and confused. For all saw clearly but them, and all wish to ignore. Now when one does that which is meddling by God, indeed they meddle, and when one does what is not meddling by God, they do not meddle, and when one says, do this that it might be good for them, they do worse to the one who obeys when it is deception, and when one says, but they said this and did this, and the lie is apparent, than does not the one who acts on it admit to standing on feeble and loose ground that sinks? But as for Babel, when it is seized by the wise who keep with integrity, it is good they seize it, for it is either for fools or the wise to seize it that it rests neutral, that commitment to intelligence, education, study, is that integrity of the wise when it does not seek to cast any out for disagreances of opinions that are people’s rights. Now when Babel is firmly seized by these than all that is required is consideration of evils commited by priests, that Babel is not keeper of all that go out, but only a small portion that go out from them. Now if the house is run exceedingly well than the angel is cast out from attacking or seizing in the fashion he seizes.
Now for the last level of the raptor-like dragon that stands a little shorter than man, it is fearing God and is not for lieing, for it is not attempting to deceive man about what it is, and is man not expected to know that it is for killing? Now for this dragon man is God on Earth and God, the father, is in heaven, and how is there much difference for this dragon? But the
 dragon is for killing man whether the devil’s or God’s who are men, and it goes for defence first and foremost, what protects the villages, and yet it is for killing all people. Now she is for combat, fearing God and man as being almost God, for man is as if God on Earth for her. Now she is not expecting that any man would not seek to kill her and she does not resent it, and she does not fear consequences only she is for stealth and survival.
Now for the queens. Do not tolerate the things of the devil that support you and flatter you that you give them your power, for you are slayn by the false queen who flatters, you are giving your power to the servant who is puffed up with substance of the devil, and you are made servant of all you keep, even going a little to slave, falling to wickedness, slayn by the one you would allow to attack your people. For a brutal soldier comes, female, puffed up with substance and might of the devil and says, let me attack your people, for they flatter you and offer peace to you. Now have sight and you will know what you should do.
Now for the queens. Do not tolerate the things of the devil that support you and flatter you that you give them your power, for you are slayn by the false queen who flatters, you are giving your power to the servant who is puffed up with substance of the devil, and you are made servant of all you keep, even going a little to slave, falling to wickedness, slayn by the one you would allow to attack your people. For a brutal soldier comes, female, puffed up with substance and might of the devil and says, let me attack your people, for they flatter you and offer peace to you. Now have sight and you will know what you should do. For this is the slaying of a queen of the Lord’s by a female mighty of Babylon.
Now for the queens. Do not tolerate the things of the devil that support you and flatter you that you give them your power, for you are slayn by the false queen who flatters, you are giving your power to the servant who is puffed up with substance of the devil, and you are made servant of all you keep, even going a little to slave, falling to wickedness, slayn by the one you would allow to attack your people. For a brutal soldier comes, female, puffed up with substance and might of the devil and says, let me attack your people, for they flatter you and offer peace to you. Now have sight and you will know what you should do. For this is the slaying of a queen of the Lord’s by a female mighty of Babylon.
Now for the things of an iherit who might dwell for what is of much consequence, those who are fearing God are knowing what He will do to them if they are refusing in a matter of great consequence, that they are given much and are bearing more for it, that the young woman who would afflict a boy because of some suspicion that an unacceptable crime was commited against them is a child abuser, molestor, and child killer, and so let the things of the iherit be understood by the Elsnon. The woman who is inclined to attack a boy, any male, because of suspicion that a crime was commited against them, has become the abomination, and the humanity has bleed out of them that they are a device of hell, and their anger and rage might be concealed. Let the iherit have confirmation and let the Elsnon know of what is in the lands of Moret and Norul that fools are filled with foolishness and ignorance and their teacher knows it to be folly, that they send them to be unacceptable to all morality and wisdom to be beaten and killed where no one saves them, to be hideous and chaotic and in insanity and chaos that the one who teaches them is a murderer to many who says eat because it is not poison and jump because you will not die. For the measure of judgement cannot be changed and is forbidden so that wickedness not destroy the land. There are those swollen with ignorance and they exhault themselves in their ignorance that is wicked and foolish, who retaliate against their own shame and hate themselves and say, I will make myself hideous, and my anger will be towards myself that I will drive away and then harass and throw myself down, because I am a fool, and my hatred will cause myself to be killed. For the child has hated me, indeed they rule over me, and only the animals offer me mercy and comfort, for my teachers were cruel to me, being jelous of me as women are jelous of another, and they gave me to death, that I might be ruined, and they cared not for my beauty which they sought to trample and defile, and not for my wisdom that they sought to mutilate. For iniquity even has been found in me because my mouth has spoken constantly against my own flesh. For wisdom was too high for some and so the poor crop was delivered into that which would bring it to death. Now will the devil devour me, when I have been so treated, to be tricked, betrayed, and trampled, that my guides all have brought me to ruin and prepared me even to shut my ears to wisdom? For hated Satan, the old devil, I have more cause than any to wish for your death! For you have robbed me of all, even what would be within myself, and you laugh because you claim victory. Let God throw you into the fire!
Now for the things of an iherit who might dwell for what is of much consequence, those who are fearing God are knowing what He will do to them if they are refusing in a matter of great consequence, that they are given much and are bearing more for it, that the young woman who would afflict a boy because of some suspicion that an unacceptable crime was commited against them is a child abuser, molestor, and child killer, and so let the things of the iherit be understood by the Elsnon. The woman who is inclined to attack a boy, any male, because of suspicion that a crime was commited against them, has become the abomination, and the humanity has bleed out of them that they are a device of hell, and their anger and rage might be concealed. Let the iherit have confirmation and let the Elsnon know of what is in the dark lands.
Now for the things of an iherit who might dwell for what is of much consequence, those who are fearing God are knowing what He will do to them if they are refusing in a matter of great consequence, that they are given much and are bearing more for it, that the young woman who would afflict a boy because of some suspicion that an unacceptable crime was commited against them is a child abuser, molestor, and child killer, and so let the things of the iherit be understood by the Elsnon. The woman who is inclined to attack a boy, any male, because of suspicion that a crime was commited against them, has become the abomination, and the humanity has bleed out of them that they are a device of hell, and their anger and rage might be concealed. Let the iherit have confirmation and let the Elsnon know of what is in the lands of Moret and Norul that fools are filled with foolishness and ignorance and their teacher knows it to be folly, that they send them to be unacceptable to all morality and wisdom to be beaten and killed where no one saves them, to be hideous and chaotic and in insanity and chaos that the one who teaches them is a murderer to many who says eat because it is not poison and jump because you will not die. For the measure of judgement cannot be changed and is forbidden so that wickedness not destroy the land. There are those swollen with ignorance and they exhault themselves in their ignorance that is wicked and foolish, who retaliate against their own shame and hate themselves and say, I will make myself hideous, and my anger will be towards myself that I will drive away and then harass and throw myself down, because I am a fool, and my hatred will cause myself to be killed. For the child has hated me, indeed they rule over me, and only the animals offer me mercy and comfort, for my teachers were cruel to me, being jelous of me as women are jelous of another, and they gave me to death, that I might be ruined, and they cared not for my beauty which they sought to trample and defile, and not for my wisdom that they sought to mutilate. For iniquity even has been found in me because my mouth has spoken constantly against my own flesh. For wisdom was too high for some and so the poor crop was delivered into that which would bring it to death. Now will the devil devour me, when I have been so treated, to be tricked, betrayed, and trampled, that my guides all have brought me to ruin and prepared me even to shut my ears to wisdom? For hated Satan, the old devil, I have more cause than any to wish for your death! For you have robbed me of all, even what would be within myself, and you laugh because you claim victory. Let God throw you into the fire!
Now for the wise men, how many are people and how many are animals even on the world that is not the land of Enoch’s? Now the animals are outnumbering the people in some places, and the Enoch will understand this, and if dogs and animals are approaching men with evil, is the dread of man anymore on Earth? But if they are using violence of Mala much, is it violence of man against man, for men must defend themselves against the beast that is threatening and chaotic. Now this is for the wise men and do some of those wise men have the temple of God? But the angel cannot enter.
Now for those like engineers and scholars who are not for combat, take not without permission from the honourable who is a soldier and then be of good conscience to offer nothing of aid or repayment in return, for these are as if they are being praise-worthy, and you rob and then offer nothing. But David has not taken wives he grew up with, and he has not failed to do justice in many ways. Now he is innocent by the Lord’s standard and will you find guile with his mouth? But these stealing and not repaying are making themselves like dogs, like little perverts who have no sense of honour,
 for they meddle in things for descretion, but Jude does not meddle but is upright, without envy, showing himself servant of the Christ, beloved as Benjamin, loved more for his consideration of what others have not considered. For he saves all the soldiers who are in intense battle, and the tide is more turned to their favour that they do not die. Now one is not the other and they are opposites, and it is then known when there truth that one is like Benjamin and the other behaving in an opposite way, for one is the kingdom’s, another the Jew’s, another the devil’s, and the devil has no Benjamin, and I will boast of the Jew’s and the Kingdom’s Benjamin but the devil is having no Benjamin and there are not tribes for they are having nothing in this area but the devil is sending imposters frequently who are old men of the devil’s and murderous beasts who are full of envy and jelousy, that the beasts who are imposters as if young are old men and ancient demons bucking off the idea of giving honour, slanderous and murderous towards those who please God. For if any says, be forced to be older sibling to me that I may be tresounous and make myself a stumbling block to you, these are old men, ancient demons, melting with condemnation, creature’s from the lava and fire of hell. Now if any says, I am dog and be forced to enter as member to the dog pack that you be lesser than me, these are dogs beneath your feet, for they are dog but you are not, for people are for peace and not regarding this thing to the same extent. Now both of these are dogs of the devil’s people, and the younger is old man and ancient beyond all and the older who would be more alpha is the younger of demons but more ancient and older than all, that both are dogs. Now the dogs are not people and they are not to be among you, bringing you into their packs by force, for they do not belong among people, but are dogs.
Now for those like engineers and scholars who are not for combat, take not without permission from the honourable who is a soldier and then be of good conscience to offer nothing of aid or repayment in return, for these are as if they are being praise-worthy, and you rob and then offer nothing. But David has not taken wives he grew up with, and he has not failed to do justice in many ways. Now he is innocent by the Lord’s standard and will you find guile with his mouth? But these stealing and not repaying are making themselves like dogs, like little perverts who have no sense of honour, for they meddle in things for descretion, but Jude does not meddle but is upright, without envy, showing himself servant of the Christ, beloved as Benjamin, loved more for his consideration of what others have not considered. For he saves all the soldiers who are in intense battle, and the tide is more turned to their favour that they do not die. Now one is not the other and they are opposites, and it is then known when there truth that one is like Benjamin and the other behaving in an opposite way, for one is the kingdom’s, another the Jew’s, another the devil’s, and the devil has no Benjamin, and I will boast of the Jew’s and the Kingdom’s Benjamin but the devil is having no Benjamin and there are not tribes for they are having nothing in this area but the devil is sending imposters frequently who are old men of the devil’s and murderous beasts who are full of envy and jelousy, that the beasts who are imposters as if young are old men and ancient demons bucking off the idea of giving honour, slanderous and murderous towards those who please God. For if any says, be forced to be older sibling to me that I may be tresounous and make myself a stumbling block to you, these are old men, ancient demons, melting with condemnation, creature’s from the lava and fire of hell. Now if any says, I am dog and be forced to enter as member to the dog pack that you be lesser than me, these are dogs beneath your feet, for they are dog but you are not, for people are for peace and not regarding this thing to the same extent. Now both of these are dogs of the devil’s people, and the younger is old man and ancient beyond all and the older who would be more alpha is the younger of demons but more ancient and older than all, that both are dogs. Now the dogs are not people and they are not to be among you, bringing you into their packs by force, for they do not belong among people, but are dogs.
Now for those like engineers and scholars who are not for combat, take not without permission from the honourable who is a soldier and then be of good conscience to offer nothing of aid or repayment in return, for these are as if they are being praise-worthy, and you rob and then offer nothing. But David has not taken wives he grew up with, and he has not failed to do justice in many ways. Now he is innocent by the Lord’s standard and will you find guile with his mouth? But these stealing and not repaying are making themselves like dogs, like little perverts who have no sense of honour, for they meddle in things that are for descretion, but Jude does not meddle but is upright, without envy, showing himself servant of the Christ, beloved as Benjamin, loved more for his consideration of what others have not considered. For he saves all the soldiers who are in intense battle, and the tide is more turned to their favour that they do not die. Now one is not the other and they are opposites, and it is then known when there is truth that one is like Benjamin and the other behaving in an opposite way, for one is the kingdom’s, another the Jew’s, another the devil’s, and the devil has no Benjamin, and I will boast of the Jew’s and the Kingdom’s Benjamin but the devil is having no Benjamin and there are not tribes for they are having nothing in this area but the devil is sending imposters frequently who are old men of the devil’s and murderous beasts who are full of envy and jelousy, that the beasts who are imposters as if young are old men and ancient demons bucking off the idea of giving honour, slanderous and murderous towards those who please God. For if any says, be forced to be older sibling to me that I may be tresounous and make myself a stumbling block to you, these are old men, ancient demons, melting with condemnation, creature’s from the lava and fire of hell. Now if any says, I am dog and be forced to enter as member to the dog pack that you be lesser than me, these are dogs beneath your feet, for they are dog but you are not, for people are for peace and not regarding this thing to the same extent. Now both of these are dogs of the devil’s people, and the younger is old man and ancient beyond all and the older who would be more alpha is the younger of demons but more ancient and older than all, that both are dogs. Now the dogs are not people and they are not to be among you, bringing you into their packs by force, for they do not belong among people, but are dogs.
Now for those like engineers and scholars who are not for combat, take not without permission from the honourable who is a soldier and then be of good conscience to offer nothing of aid or repayment in return, for these are as if they are being praise-worthy, and you rob and then offer nothing. But David has not taken wives he grew up with, and he has not failed to do justice in many ways. Now he is innocent by the Lord’s standard and will you find guile with his mouth? But these stealing and not repaying are making themselves like dogs, like little perverts who have no sense of honour, for they meddle in things that are for descretion, but Jude does not meddle but is upright, without envy, showing himself servant of the Christ, beloved as Benjamin, loved more for his consideration of what others have not considered. For he saves all the soldiers who are in intense battle, and the tide is more turned to their favour that they do not die. Now one is not the other and they are opposites, and it is then known when there is truth that one is like Benjamin and the other behaving in an opposite way, for one is the kingdom’s, another the Jew’s, another the devil’s, and the devil has no Benjamin, and I will boast of the Jew’s and the Kingdom’s Benjamin but the devil is having no Benjamin and there are not tribes for they are having nothing in this area but the devil is sending imposters frequently who are old men of the devil’s and murderous beasts who are full of envy and jelousy, that the beasts who are imposters as if young are old men and ancient demons bucking off the idea of giving honour, slanderous and murderous towards those who please God. For if any says, be forced to be older sibling to me that I may be tresounous and make myself a stumbling block to you, these are old men, ancient demons, melting with condemnation, creature’s from the lava and fire of hell. Now if any says, I am dog and be forced to enter as member to the dog pack that you be lesser than me, these are dogs beneath your feet, for they are dog but you are not, for people are for peace and not regarding this thing to the same extent. Now both of these are dogs of the devil’s people, and the younger is old man and ancient beyond all and the older who would be more alpha is the younger of demons but more ancient and older than all, that both are dogs. Now the dogs are not people and they are not to be among you, bringing you into their packs by force, for they do not belong among people, but are dogs.
Now for those like engineers and scholars who are not for combat, take not without permission from the honourable who is a soldier and then be of good conscience to offer nothing of aid or repayment in return, for these are as if they are being praise-worthy, and you rob and then offer nothing. But David has not taken wives he grew up with, and he has not failed to do justice in many ways. Now he is innocent by the Lord’s standard and will you find guile with his
 mouth? But these stealing and not repaying are making themselves like dogs, like little perverts who have no sense of honour, for they meddle in things for descretion, but Jude does not meddle but is upright, without envy, showing himself servant of the Christ, beloved as Benjamin, loved more for his consideration of what others have not considered. For he saves all the soldiers who are in intense battle, and the tide is more turned to their favour that they do not die. Now one is not the other and they are opposites, and it is then known when there truth that one is like Benjamin and the other behaving in an opposite way, for one is the kingdom’s, another the Jew’s, another the devil’s, and I will boast of the Jew’s and the Kingdom’s. 
Now for those like engineers and scholars who are not for combat, take not without permission from the honourable who is a soldier and then be of good conscience to offer nothing of aid or repayment in return, for these are as if they are being praise-worthy, and you rob and then offer nothing. But David has not taken wives he grew up with, and he has not failed to do justice in many ways. Now he is innocent by the Lord’s standard and will you find guile with his mouth? But these stealing and not repaying are making themselves like dogs, like little perverts who have no sense of honour, for they meddle in things for descretion, but Jude does not meddle but is upright, without envy, showing himself servant of the Christ, beloved as Benjamin, loved more for his consideration of what others have not considered. For he saves all the soldiers who are in intense battle, and the tide is more turned to their favour that they do not die. Now one is not the other and they are opposites, and it is then known when there truth that one is like Benjamin and the other behaving in an opposite way, for one is the kingdom’s, another the Jew’s, another the devil’s, and the devil has no Benjamin, and I will boast of the Jew’s and the Kingdom’s Benjamin but the devil is having no Benjamin and there are not tribes for they are having nothing in this area but the devil is sending imposters frequently who are old men of the devil’s and murderous beasts who are full of envy and jelousy, that the beasts who are imposters as if young are old men and ancient demons bucking off the idea of giving honour, slanderous and murderous towards those who please God. For if any says, be forced to be older sibling to me that I may be tresounous and make myself a stumbling block to you, these are old men, ancient demons, melting with condemnation, creature’s from the lava and fire of hell.
Now for those like engineers and scholars who are not for combat, take not without permission from the honourable who is a soldier and then be of good conscience to offer nothing of aid or repayment in return, for these are as if they are being praise-worthy, and you rob and then offer nothing. But David has not taken wives he grew up with, and he has not failed to do justice in many ways. 
Now for those of the devil’s, why would the house of God owe you anything? But you are advancing your ignorance towards the city where there is truth, and you are the enemy, for you seek to kill all of the city and are only owed a sword to the throat or an arrow to the abdomen. 
Now for war I have said, the Jew who is truly grafting themselves to gentiles of Babylon and is becoming Babylonion and is Babylonian, is as a traitor, and is not Jew in the spiritual sense.
Now from the dark strip of the tiger that has much work because of the devil and his war, them who would kill with weapons of hell that cause torture that men of justice are still having opportunity to save their own, with weapons of Mala, of hell, that do not leave mark on the body, but cause eternal torture and kill, these are things that may be and are right to judge, for it is of great importance that they are judged even if Babylon forces Babel not to know it, even if Babylon should be with Babel in this thing, because they are stubborn and resisting God, and they are frightened of the change that saves lives, because it is their fantasy of themselves that the people are not with greater understanding than most of them, for those of Babel are not from another people. For has Babel not declared itself more than what it is in truth in some ways and at some times? Now the angel is loving Babel but the tree is planted in the courtyard of Ijeshil and he has declared that the sign of the tree is in season.
Now from the dark strip of the tiger that has much work because of the devil and his war, them who would kill with weapons of hell that cause torture that men of justice are still having opportunity to save their own, with weapons of Mala, of hell, that do not leave mark on the body, but cause eternal torture and kill, these are things that may be and are right to judge, for it is of great importance that they are judged even if Babylon forces Babel not to know it, even if Babylon should be with Babel in this thing, because they are stubborn and resisting God, and they are frightened of the change that saves lives, because it is their fantasy of themselves that the people are not with greater understanding than most of them, for those of Babel are not from another people. For has Babel not declared itself more than what it is in truth in some ways and at some times? Now the angel is loving Babel but the tree is planted in the courtyard of Ijeshil and he has declared that the sign of the tree is in season.
Now gods are of gods before a portion of men and women on Earth and goddesses of goddesses before a portion of women, that the ugly might not exhault themselves, being fit for beasts and insects to devour in a heap of what is disgusting, for a goddess is not an ugly person who wishes to descend to hell and cover themselves in blood and disgusting things to be lower than all, but a goddess is having her portion that a son who is a soldier and noble will be her husband and those she is a goddess to will bless her with truth and recieve good to their souls. For her maidens are like blessed sisters to her and concubines of blessing and truth for her, to be as maidens to her, and every costly thing is to be for her that she keeps herself a goddess with refusals and acceptance, being with wisdom, being more than a crown to her husband, for she offers a kingdom with it. Her father is not able to know for she has exceeding the role of a daughter many times over, that her god-hood is matained through excellence in morality and wisdom that her throne is established, unless she should become a mere person, having fallen from god-hood. But if it is not severe and God and righteousness will know, than a goddess might rise again to god-hood and she is capable of being a goddess by wisdom, that she admits and seeks truth and delivers good, being a blessed thing before righteousness. Now her younger brother has said that she is blessed, and she is chief among the daughters and administering what is good that they might be beautiful. Now if any is a daughter treated unfairly by her than it is because the goddess is not worthy of the princess. Now a god is having those drawn to him with great desire of heart to give him good, that it is right to do so, that none she be denied, for let what is for them be for them that truth might be fullfilled, for if a man is not one of these does he truly think himself better than those who would have great contention to give offerings to a god? But such are not sacrifices of worship, except that they are completions in deed of what is good. For some have eyes to know the precense of a god. Now if any says worship me they are below the feet of men and not a god, and if any has said, I am, than it is not a god who speaks it unless it be with good humour. But if any is trying to dominate, being a man, he is a dog kicked for being clumsy and in the way of those attempting to live their lives. Now a god will crush all these with good that is pleasing that their tears and agony might be the sound of good when he has ground what is low beneath his feet, that men too might stomp on them and crush them, that it is well, and a good and pleasing thing. So his sceptre is silver and weighty and it has much might and power that it brings good tidings and peace to those who do well, that Benjamin, a Jew, has blessed him, that the land is made with good tidings for him, that Joseph has blessed him but his way is still in other places. Now let Avram embrace me for this for I desire that he should have joy, that he is greater than all of them, and I desire for him to see the people I give wisdom to, that he might have joy.
Now good people are not always having that which makes them capable of a task for their reward is in other places, so that good people, unable to handle what requires much strength and patience and a hand strong enough to grapple and fight and yet powerful and strong enough not to injure and to show mercy, is not a task for all, that good people are sometimes drawing wicked swords and wicked weapons because they are crushed and being pushed and even beaten, and those capable are with strength and patience and recline and shut their eyes, and walk about and grapple and fight without injury and are keeping much peace, for it is not a difficult thing for them.
Now haters of David are appealing, some of them, to masculinity, that they are more men, and men in the gathering of men, that David is hated.
Now he departed from Babylon and Rome, and he noted that the low priests from Babel who had joined the towns of Babylon and afflicted the targets that the devil had targeted, were much worse than those of criminal gangs, save for those of them who partnered with Orgoth, for the gangs of Orgoth were gangs of zeolots and not the criminal gangs although they commited crime.
 Now the priests abused those who the devil would abuse, first seeing that the spirits of the devil were against them, and having the impulse in their hearts were for abusing them more even to the degree that they used false stones and false clay, being understanding and knowledge, to silence their crying out against abuse, and so they were as Unics who were not men for the cause of evil, and because of the type of circumcision they were cruel without limit for mercy or compassion that some were even sicophantic and slanderers and liars and both for the cause of hiding much abuse and their wickedness and lowness was great so that they were low things even of hell and the criminal gangs were as the righteous and pure in comparison to them and more educated in comparison to the foolishness and ignorance of the priest’s hearts and minds, so that the angel found far less fault in the cruelties of criminals in comparison with them, and yet the criminal gangs were very dangerous and not righteous and their evils were many. Now Babel he had discovered after the taking and then naming of (ijeshil) which he was not for touching for he had not built it and in truth it was on free land and belonged to humanity who has the common tongue that all spoke some of the stones and clay that were in it. Now because of Orgoth and the infiltration of Babel and the lack of action of Babel to with-hold work until Orgoth’s breaches had been remedied and the lower priests stripped of the nothing they had been given, Babel was to be taken and this for the good of future generations, especially Christians in the case that Babel might one day be made too much of false stones and false clay that the truth might save it that it might be restored. So because of this the glowing ball that is the Earth and it’s atmosphere is the foot-stool of the angel who is on a throne. Now what type of God do you have, children of Jacob, who does not practise nepotism but sends his servants to be amongst you to labour as you rather than merely granting them provinces and titles by their birth? But some might think He is a cruel God who loved his servants too much, for does not the son have a chance to resent his father a little even if he obeys? But the Christ is a better man than me, and so the Lords servants are labouring and even incurring the same evils as you, that it might be well for you that they know of it. Now the angel is given evils and troubles and it must be so, and he is wishing for the mercy of God as much as you, that it is sometimes easy to obey when God has sheltered with His wings.
Now he departed from Babylon and Rome, and he noted that the low priests from Babel who had joined the towns of Babylon and afflicted the targets that the devil had targeted, were much worse than those of criminal gangs, save for those of them who partnered with Orgoth, for the gangs of Orgoth were gangs of zeolots and not the criminal gangs although they commited crime. Now the priests abused those who the devil would abuse, first seeing that the spirits of the devil were against them, and having the impulse in their hearts were for abusing them more even to the degree that they used false stones and false clay, being understanding and knowledge, to silence their crying out against abuse, and so they were as Unics who were not men for the cause of evil, and because of the type of circumcision they were cruel without limit for mercy or compassion that some were even sicophantic and slanderers and liars and both for the cause of hiding much abuse and their wickedness and lowness was great so that they were low things even of hell and the criminal gangs were as the righteous and pure in comparison to them and more educated in comparison to the foolishness and ignorance of the priest’s hearts and minds, so that the angel found far less fault in the cruelties of criminals in comparison with them, and yet the criminal gangs were very dangerous and not righteous and their evils were many. Now Babel he had discovered after the taking and then naming of (ijeshil) which he was not for touching for he had not built it and in truth it was on free land and belonged to humanity who has the common tongue that all spoke some of the stones and clay that were in it. Now because of Orgoth and the infiltration of Babel and the lack of action of Babel to with-hold work until Orgoth’s breaches had been remedied and the lower priests stripped of the nothing they had been given, Babel was to be taken and this for the good of future generations, especially Christians in the case that Babel might one day be made too much of false stones and false clay that the truth might save it that it might be restored. So because of this the glowing ball that is the Earth and it’s atmosphere is the foot-stool of the angel who is on a throne. Now what type of God do you have, children of Jacob, who does not practise nepotism but sends his servants to be amongst you to labour as you rather than merely granting them provinces and titles by their birth? But some might think He is a cruel God who loved his servants too much, for does not the son have a chance to resent his father a little even if he obeys? But the Christ is a better man than me, and so the Lords servants are labouring and even incurring the same evils as you, that it might be well for you that they know of it. Now the angel is given evils and troubles and it must be so, and he is wishing for the mercy of God as much as you, that it is sometimes easy to obey when God has sheltered with His wings. Now the Christ submitted himself and obeyed and the angel has not come to his obedience for he has not obeyed, but he is doing the Christ’s work that the Christ is required for him and he is lesser than the Christ by much so that the angel cannot even know. Now if the angel is then being innocent he is like the one on the cross who admits guilt and yet he has had the troubles of a saint and prophet because wisdom cannot deliver from Babylon or the devil and casts one into a status of threat to the devil, and Babylon is a servant of the devil. How is it then that much success is becoming a mark of shame in the eyes of some when there is tight corruption that allows none to succeed unless they have commited much compromise by which a person stripped of shoes and garment and having their good things stolen is boasting in the image of another that in truth they are not when they have obtained through compromising, and the eyes that see are seeing it clearly and with precise knowledge, so that they curse the righteous bitterly with envy as projection in their mouths. For projection has come from traitors to view the prince as foreign, that their deeds are being confessed by their hearts. Now if one sees with ignorance they are less than they know, being ignorant of themselves as viewing what is greater as lesser, and such it is with ignorance that it is projection when it is ignorance of sight.
Now heaven is with you and you will be there into the next phase, the afterlife, upon death, but it is not good to be commiting suicide for the sake of beauty for the beauty will be preserved in heaven.
Now her good is beautiful and she will have what she desires, for a foolish woman is causing trouble, and the nobility of God is for the greater rewards, that the many rewards to the virteous woman were partially concealed from the eyes of the foolish woman, though she perceives that more is there than what is for her when she does that the woman who has abandoned might say, “I will be for what is good and better”, that she might cause herself to be new, and so making due repentance by right to those she offended and finding what is to be hers as she goes her way. Now not often does any find this grace because of stubbornness and the preservation of the wicked, and yet with some the grip is undone by them, and yet still there is justice offered, but the hearts have forgiven when God judged it put away, that there is no grief or sense of injustice if it is the truth from God.
Now her good is beautiful and she will have what she desires, for a foolish woman is causing trouble, and the nobility of God is for the greater rewards, that the many rewards to the vrteous woman were partially concealed from the eyes of the foolish woman, though she perceives that more is there than what is for her when she does that the woman who has abandoned might say, “I will be for what is good and better”, that she might cause herself to be new, and so making due repentance by right to those she offended and finding what is to be hers as she goes her way. Now not often does any find this grace because of stubbornness and the preservation of the wicked, and yet with some the grip is undone by them, and yet still there is justice offered, but the hearts have forgiven when God judged it put away, that there is no grief or sense of injustice if it is the truth from God.
Now her who commits adultry has despised her husband when he has not divorced her, and what is the cause? But if she despises life she is not the wife, or if she has been meant for another in her heart, she has deceived him who took her? Now what man is taking her when she is in heart for another? But she has deceived him and he has not loved her that in the later case there has been no marriage. Now Babylonians do such when they take prostitutes to be with them, and this is not a good by God. But the heaven has come down to Earth, and the ur is beneath it happening, that those below ur are not having much above ur. Now if you are casting stones than do you do so with knowledge that the stones might turn to clay in your grasp and be of no purpose to throw. But the clay is good for a stone to become, that those who are with clay are possessing a holy thing. Now if a man has divorced what God has joined and is not separated
 by God than he commits adultry against her when he takes another, and the man who marries her commits adultry. But the Christ gave you nothing in this matter because the Pharasses were testing Him to cause Him to commit error. Now if the Christ has remained silent than you have already been sent Moses and his serpant has devoured those of the wise of Egypt, for they have said we are able to do the same thing and it is easy. Now if you receive from two servants than has God made you capable of understanding that you have eaten of the forbidden tree and are given the ability to know right and wrong, when you would commit adultry and when you would not. But if you have said this is of prophets and wise men than you are correct, and much happened in the third level that it might be for those at the second. But if you are not descending than by what means are you to seek marriage when you have not prepared those things of child-hood? But a beast does not marry a person and an angel has come forth and it marries daughters of men and there is that which would take what is not fullfilled by him? But if it arrives, the woman not ever married in truth, than the one destined is receiving.
Now her whose soul is demanding that she have other women to be with her husband as wives is the wife of him who has loved her that she has demanded to be made the highest that is more adorned and such is the princess goddess being the daughter of a god by succeeding. Now if a person is fullfilling all then the doing of wisdom has brought forth that which would be attacked by the devil, that what must be abolished in the land is that which has hated righteousness. Now if there is injustice in some matter than more must be fullfilled and the one not taking land that God has given to conquer and take is not pleasing God, that you will not attack the righteous but because of the wickedness done, this is the reason God has delivered land to you.
Now honour towards whom honour is due, and descretion here for right consideration, that those who came before, prior, are owed honour, even as it is also duty, that wise men and women have come before the angel, and primarily there are three names and two are tellers of grande stories, and a debt to give honour is owed that they not be troubled or caused to stumble when the later does not fullfill with a pure heart, giving honour without attempts of attack and actions of war by Mala, that there is no cause for when honour is not given with purity of heart.
Now honour towards whom honour is due, and descretion here for right consideration, that those who came before, prior, are owed honour, even as it is also duty, that wise men and women have come before the angel, and primarily there are three names and two are tellers of grande stories, and a debt to give honour is owed that they not be troubled or caused to stumble when the later does not fullfill with a pure heart, giving honour without attempts of attack and actions of war by Mala, that there is no cause for when honour is not given with purity of heart.
Now how can a man judge any in the lake of fire, for the judgement goes only to the floor of Orgoth’s servant and does not go below the line of words? But women on land have rule of that place, and the woman with a house on a hill, very much a wise rule of that place. For a wise woman with a palace on a hill is having virtues, is not casting away what she has gained as a foolish woman who like an angel who casted away their dwelling places and rule to pursue foolishness, to join the devil to rebel against God to receive punishment, to be cast out. For the wise woman who has a palace on the hill has the statue among the people, the jewals of her dwelling, the rule that is with virtue that is the rule of the lake of fire, for she is as an alpha seperate, as an alpha among the plains. For a foolish woman casts it away without prudence, without understanding, and the palace is lost and she descends, and she is not even having the tent in the lower places, but she is not perceiving, for the sight of prudence goes further, and understanding for a woman is as integrity, as it is with some men. Now she is wise, building her house, considering with prudence, that a daughter like Jacob she is who values her blessing, that another daughter like Jacob is wanting a good and wise thing to want what she has, to have her own palace upon a hill. 
Now how can a man judge any in the lake of fire, for the judgement goes only to the floor of Orgoth’s servant and does not go below the line of words? But women on land have rule of that place, and the woman with a house on a hill, very much a wise rule of that place. For a wise woman with a palace on a hill is having virtues, is not casting away what she has gained as a foolish woman who like an angel who casted away their dwelling places and rule to pursue foolishness, to rebel against God to receive punishment, to be cast out. 
Now how can a man judge any in the lake of fire, for the judgement goes only to the floor of Orgoth’s servant and does not go below the line of words? But women on land have rule of that place, and the woman with a house on a hill, very much a wise rule of that place. For a wise woman with a palace on a hill is having virtues, is not casting away what she has gained as a foolish woman who like an angel who casted away their dwelling places and rule to pursue foolishness, to join the devil to rebel against God to receive punishment, to be cast out. For the wise woman who has a palace on the hill has the statue among the people, the jewals of her dwelling, the rule that is with virtue that is the rule of the lake of fire, for she is as an alpha seperate, as an alpha among the plains. For a foolish woman casts it away without prudence, without understanding, and the palace is lost and she descends, and she is not even having the tent in the lower places, but she is not perceiving, for the sight of prudence goes further, and understanding for a woman is as integrity, as it is with some men. Now she is wise, building her house, considering with prudence, that a daughter like Jacob she is who values her blessing, that a daughter like Jacob is wanting a good and wise thing to want what she has, to have her own palace upon a hill. 
Now how did those with many gods teach the angel a lesson? But in this manner. You will bring wrath upon us if you do not let others hold the door for you, and you will make it that our nation will be destroyed if you are not taking gifts and what we prepare for you. For if you are tired, you will not reach for a pillow, but we are fearing God and taking blessing, for the pillow will be placed beneath your head that you do not discomfort yourself even a little.
Now humans are all known to be vastly superior to animals by animals that they are not considering any obedience to God in the consideration of integrity, but humans are the sons and daughters of God’s house.
Now humans are limited and fragile and a little folly by a leader collapses the nation and scatters the people.
Now humans are suffering sickness and are tended to by humans and they are having injury and are tended to with compassion, and when there is threat to village they are putting away disputes for the time of aiding each other in defence, that they are humans and not animals.
Now humans are suffering sickness and are tended to by humans and they are having injury and are tended to with compassion, and when there is threat to village they are putting away disputes for the time of aiding each other in defence, that they are humans and not animals.
Now if Avram (Abraham) gives tithe to El Elton than what do his children do to revile? But let them, the wise of Abraham save their people, them having ears to hear and eyes to see, that because of them there might be peace.
Now if Avram (Abraham) gives tithe to El Elton’s Salem than what do his children do to revile? But let them, the wise of Abraham save their people, them having ears to hear and eyes to see, that because of them there might be peace.
Now if Babylon is crushing masses than let them not turn to Orgoth, for the two are partnered, but better to run to what is offering safety, being the kingdom of heaven.
Now if Babylon will not admit the war it is crafty strategy that is for confusion amongst its enemies, for it might be at times that those of Babylon who admit to war are counted as loose-tongued and treasonous in strategy even if they are not ushered out from Babylon, but remain as their people. Now if Babylon would attempt to contend with those proclaiming that there has already been great and open war and much of it, so that it cannot be hidden, than their determined way in this matter is evidence to the importance of the confusion for their strategy.
Now if Benjamin is possessing goats and dwells with good tidings or is possessing lambs than or possessing those things that are good, and he is beloved, than who of another people is not despised among their people who speak wickedness against him? But degenerate fools you are listening to and you believe you are doing good? But if you would be fair than know the truth, because your people are Christians and others cannot be part of your people. For if any angel is for driving the wealthy of Babylon away than are they not knowing what you might let pass through your doors? But you are innocent as doves and not fools, therefore you know what is right, and that you have been innocent when the pastor, your leader, has not granted that some should stay according to wisdom, for such is a pastor that he is leader of a flock and a good Shepard to them when he is with integrity that should he speak well within his integrity than even great things as giant waves have haulted what they would do. But do not think I have judged any of these who are not Pharisees
 and are real pastors, for will I not listen to their rebuke? But what comes from kings is not the same as what comes from dogs.
Now if I disagree with the visitor whose words are too harsh for me, yet I ask the pardon of those who would be touched, that they might suffer it, for it is necessary for me to fullfill and I ask for their perseverance until more is revealed, for he has spoken exceedingly harsh, and I have not agreed or believe he spoke truth. But he is still brilliant and yet does not exercise accuracy, and yet he is harsh by the standard of all, but he comes close to truth but in not attaining accuracy is offensive and harsh. Now what am I to do with him, for he is not as Joab and his brothers, for they are harsh in justice and saving the kingdom, and yet they are exceedingly good and not evil, and wisdom in them and understanding is delivering all and doing what is necessary that we all might be saved. But this one is of another house and he is intelligent and has understanding and yet when he speaks what is not true he is offensive and it is a knife to the chest, a sword across the chest, that he is exceedingly useful and yet who can send him, for he causes discord, and yet when he comes close to truth and is wrong, if his words can guide to what must be discovered than is he kept with the house to hear? For he is like one with a knife and sword who has zeal and he is a viscious soldier, and yet not a diplomate, and many people have him in their midst and yet his words are despised. Now if they cast him out, yet war is more likely, for there is no sacrifice, for he makes a bridge that others might walk across it, and he is despised and does not use the bridge, for he desecrated the nature and yet it is later seen to be necessary. Now I have planned to soften his words more before you are able to read, but tell you so you might know that he is even more harsh than you might read. Now he is a symbol for you of what is held back and kept out by a wall, and yet there are those, and most, not like him.
Now if Orgoth should gather up those they intend to kill saying, if they are foolish enough to serve us they should die anyway because what people would serve those who attack their people and are vowed to war with them, then if they are saying so and gathering up servants to fight their enemies so that they will later be killed, such is the tactic of Orgoth, and it is with the three sons, that they divide and recruit for war and betray all that only those they have chosen are to be saved, for they are against Christianity and all religion and are against shades of skin that are not fair and against Jews and against all that is not their plan for the Earth.
Now if Orgoth’s highest son would wipe out those who serve Orgoth’s servant why would I intervene? But Orgoth’s servant gathers his people and they make themselves a bother and burden, for some of them are below the ocean, the line of reason, and it is most, for indeed they are speaking the id and it is that which was not to be regarded, that without reason it renders itself as a reason because they are not able to comprehend, for it is perverse honesty from deception, being the deception of the heart. Now all sick animals are with Orgoth’s servant and they are devoured to descend there and be amongst their own.
Now if a Babylonian has a demon is the man not an allie of the demon? For the demon breaks into the open and the man has a companion in war.
Now if a Babylonian parent has a virteous child of the Lord’s kingdoms so that they guard the child from those of the Lord’s kingdom not like a parent but like a soldier to drive away the good and accept only the Babylonian, then the Christ has already said that He came to spread war between parent and child and child and parent for the two must be on separate sides. Now will not a son or daughter of Babylon be given to the Babylonian parent? Now if they are both willing will not the person of the Lord’s be having mothers and fathers of the Lord’s kingdoms?
Now if a Babylonian parent has a virteous child of the Lord’s kingdoms so that they guard the child from those of the Lord’s kingdom not like a parent but like a soldier to drive away the good and accept only the Babylonian, then the Christ has already said that He came to spread war between parent and child and child and parent for the two must be on separate sides. Now will not a son or daughter of Babylon be given to the Babylonian parent? Now if they are both willing will not the person of the Lord’s be having mothers and fathers of the Lord’s kingdoms?
Now if a Babylonian parent has a virteous child of the Lord’s kingdoms so that they guard the child from those of the Lord’s kingdom not like a parent but like a soldier to drive away the good and accept only the Babylonian, then the Christ has already said that He came to spread war between parent and child and child and parent for the two must be on separate sides. Now will not a son or daughter of Babylon be given to the Babylonian parent? Now if they are both willing will not the person of the Lord’s be having mothers and fathers of the Lord’s kingdoms?
Now if a Babylonian parent has a virteous child of the Lord’s kingdoms so that they guard the child from those of the Lord’s kingdom not like a parent but like a soldier to drive away the good and accept only the Babylonian, then the Christ has already said that He came to spread war between parent and child and child and parent for the two must be on separate sides. Now will not a son or daughter of Babylon be given to the Babylonian parent? Now if they are both willing will not the person of the Lord’s be having mothers and fathers of the Lord’s kingdoms?
Now if a dog snaps and harasses a bear is it not righteous what the bear does to it? But what keeper of dogs is sending a dog to harass a bear?
Now if a fool is convinced that disbelief in belief of conspiracy is a certain truth, they are impaired by a folly, and yet the one who understands is reasoning with a better fullness.
Now if a generation spreads anarchy on the Earth than it was already close in some places because for them all to be going their ways for loyalty to bias is for there to be anarchy. Now if any is loyal to God than they are being obedient to what is from the leader when it is not against God, for Daniel bowed towards God in his room, and others, being wise, would not bow to the statue to worship it. Now the mid-wives of Egypt would not kill the Jewish children who were not their people. Now if you have not been persecuted than do you not know that some are? But wicked people are doing their own will when the eyes of their leader are not there. How will any judge by the chaos of Babylon whether any is good or bad when you have known the truth in other matters in which you have been unfairly judged. But if you are believing that the persecution is past than you are among many who are strong for your sake, but if persecution should come, know that the sign might be seen from this thing that the Christ has promised His return.
Now if a generation spreads anarchy on the Earth than it was already close in some places because for them all to be going their ways for loyalty to bias is for there to be anarchy. Now if any is loyal to God than they are being obedient to what is from the leader when it is not against God, for Daniel bowed towards God in his room, and others, being wise, would not bow to the statue to worship it. Now the mid-wives of Egypt would not kill the Jewish children who were not their people. Now if you have not been persecuted than do you not know that some are? But wicked people are doing their own will when the eyes of their leader are not there. How will any judge by the chaos of Babylon whether any is good or bad when you have known the truth in other matters in which you have been unfairly judged. But if you are believing that the persecution is past than you are among many who are strong for your sake, but if persecution should come, know that the sign might be seen from this thing that the Christ has promised His return.
Now if a man answers consistently as a stumbling block, if he is interloping where he does not belong, than some have considered it, for it is known what he is, and yet what is in self defence is changing most matters when they are attacked, that self defence is changing much.
Now if a man answers consistently as a stumbling block, if he is interloping where he does not belong, than some have considered it, for it is known what he is, and yet what is in self defence is changing most matters when they are attacked, that self defence is changing much.
Now if a man would slay a man with guile using Sodom combat and rillet and men who are strong attack him with the same type of Sodom combat and rillet, than I have said let no eye pity him. For he is stoned for sodomy, for attempting to slay with guile, and he is ugly and attacking a man more beautiful than him, for this is so, and so when he flees, having been stoned without any eye pitying him, you will follow the matter that he not turn around and begin his evil directly again the moment he is not any longer being stoned. Now if he threatens to slay than he must depart that evil cease and the sodomite not be permitted in your lands.
Now if a nation is arresting justice and not pursuing wicked deeds than they have said, let the devil take a portion that we remove obedience to God so that we are destroyed, for those who offer the portion to the devil are for hell upon Earth, and they would attempt to bring affliction to those who please God, for if a person below ur does it than they are also a servant of Orgoth, especially of the servant of the two sons, that Lucifer would ask the saints to attempt to change it, for they have the Christ, and Joshua would be given blessing to go forth by Lucifer
 in most cases, offering him silver and nothing more, for if Babel will confirm it by their tongue it is an evil that will cause the land to be empty of life, so that loyalty to the nation is with Joshua, and yet when is it truly so? But zeolots use what they can from above the Earth that those below the Earth and below ur are taking what they can and they create their smaller towers of lies. Now steel is against unclean iron and the steel of truth, justice, goodness, is being wielded with ability against the crude swords of Orgoth at times and yet there are those accussing both? But steel is not much at fault for the weapons of God’s people are not for harming their own. But if there is to be known heavens above the sky, than one is able to know of what has occurred in the heaven by the prophets. Now if this is not of some prophets than it is still well that they prophesy and you are able. Now the church is not dead, and the Lord has power and if His enemies are insolent and yet wicked than I do not know what He will do.
Now if a person is very poor so that they wander the cities it is not that they do not care about sentimental things, for they are caring more about such things than most, but are they not in need? For they must live.
Now if a person who is the devil’s has said the righteousness and good are evil they have spoken for the extinction of all people, but those keeping to common sense are keeping to sound reason.
Now if a person who is understood to be for justice is picking and choosing in what his heart desires that is not complying with objective truth and justice than it is an unjust judge who does not regard God or men, except he regards God in the matter of his being killed by men, and the woman who is this, regards God and men in the matter of her being killed by any, that she then considers herself to be a woman. But when it is not so, a woman who judges must take upon her objective truth and justice being a true quality of a man, that she is a man, but yet a woman. The one who understands finds no contradiction for the qualities are those that can be with men and women. But if the qualities of a true man are objective truth and justice than these are also the qualities of a good woman and with truth she perceives the truth about herself and men that she is seen before God, a father’s daughter before God, if she will judge in this fashion and a mother’s daughter can also but she is not often the alpha among a larger gathering of women. Now the alpha is for keeping order in what is good and she is close to God, but she will not be put away by her husband unless there is justice that will come and God save her, only she will correct me in that she is to do what is right and it is so.
Now if a person who is understood to be for justice is picking and choosing in what his heart desires that is not complying with objective truth and justice than it is an unjust judge who does not regard God or men, except he regards God in the matter of his being killed by men, and the woman who is this, regards God and men in the matter of her being killed by any, that she then considers herself to be a woman. But when it is not so, a woman who judges must take upon her objective truth and justice being a true quality of a man, that she is a man, but yet a woman. The one who understands finds no contradiction for the qualities are those that can be with men and women because it is hard for some to know that the woman who understands is that woman who is pleasing to men. But if the qualities of a true man are objective truth and justice than these are also the qualities of a good woman and with truth she perceives the truth about herself and men that she is seen before God, a father’s daughter before God, if she will judge in this fashion and a mother’s daughter can also but she is not often the alpha among a larger gathering of women. Now the alpha is for keeping order in what is good and she is close to God, but she will not be put away by her husband unless there is justice that will come and God save her, only she will correct me in that she is to do what is right and it is so.
Now if a servant of Babylon attacks a slave owner of the kingdom, being child or son or man or even a servant of the kingdom, who is administrator of the slaves and happenings, or another type of servant who is for doing lighter tasks and not tasks for slaves, then what is the verdict? Now when anything is already with Babylon than is it not committed? Now the two things must be seperate: the devil’s things and the kingdoms of the Lord. Now if Babel is neutral than it may be liked and cursed for if it is neutral than it is deaf to both being without leaders.
Now if a sick animal with nothing of ability is making itself a problem, yet its sight is small, for is it not seeking to be human? But humans seek attention and animals seek to be human that one level comes before the other that you not mix levels of things in your consideration. For things considered for humans do not explain animals and animals do not often explain people unless it is the things in common. Now Orgoth’s highest son is not respecting high things of people for their domain ends at animals, and Orgoth’s servant is not respecting reason, for they are animals. 
Now if a sick animal with nothing of ability is making itself a problem, yet its sight is small, for is it not seeking to be human? But humans seek attention and animals seek to be human that one level comes before the other that you not mix levels of things in your consideration. For things considered for humans do not explain animals and animals do not often explain people unless it is the things in common. Now Orgoth’s highest son is not respecting high things of people for their domain ends at animals, and Orgoth’s servant is not respecting reason, for they are animals. 
Now if a woman discovers a person and yet has been slightly imprudent then let her show love that those who were doing wickedness prior, their works, be a loss for the devil. Now in another matter where there is not need for shame, when a child is left in the woods then animals adopt it and it learns to survive amongst animals, but when the child finds a person, being the right person, does it not approach with hostility to be saved? Now this is a more severe thing. Now what keeps itself for God is trustworthy or such is shown. Now what is hard to attain is often better. Now what is worthy has integrity, and what does not have integrity is trecherous long prior to trechoury that there was trechoury before the start and what was as if true was not true before the start that deception has been through all and trechoury. Now the worthless stone casts itself away but the diamond is revealed later from the less noticed thing. Now who can scatter imposters and yet not weigh over time?
Now if a woman discovers a person and yet has been slightly imprudent then let her show love that those who were doing wickedness prior, their works, be a loss for the devil. Now in another matter where there is not need for shame, when a child is left in the woods then animals adopt it and it learns to survive amongst animals, but when the child finds a person, being the right person, does it not approach with hostility to be saved? Now this is a more severe thing. Now what keeps itself for God is trustworthy or such is shown. Now what is hard to attain is often better. Now what is worthy has integrity, and what does not have integrity is trecherous long prior to trechoury that there was trechoury before the start and what was as if true was not true before the start that deception has been through all and trechoury. Now the worthless stone casts itself away but the diamond is revealed later from the less noticed thing. Now who can scatter imposters and yet not weigh over time?
Now if a woman discovers a person and yet has been slightly imprudent then let her show love that those who were doing wickedness prior, their works, be a loss for the devil. Now in another matter where there is not need for shame, when a child is left in the woods then animals adopt it and it learns to survive amongst animals, but when the child finds a person, being the right person, does it not approach with hostility to be saved? Now this is a more severe thing. Now what keeps itself for God is trustworthy or such is shown. Now what is hard to attain is often better. Now what is worthy has integrity, and what does not have integrity is trecherous long prior to trechoury that there was trechoury before the start and what was as if true was not true before the start that deception has been through all and trechoury. Now the worthless stone casts itself away but the diamond is revealed later from the less noticed thing. Now who can scatter imposters and yet not weigh over time?
Now if a woman is cast out, for there are different things, what is the cause? But the angel was cared for by holy women and the land was safe in those times, and wise women have looked out from the top of high hills out of concern for him, and so it is good. Now rocks have even been of sarcasm to defend, and the Eagle has not yet found him, to swoop him up and take him to a high place, for it is good. Now it is all contained in one, that the woman who wants a statue by a man is wanting by love of him, because she loves him, for it cannot be otherwise.
Now if a woman is cast out, for there are different things, what is the cause? But the angel was cared for by holy women and the land was safe in those times, and wise women have looked out from the top of high hills out of concern for him, and so it is good. Now rocks have even been of sarcasm to defend, and the Eagle has not yet found him, to swoop him up and take him to a high place, for it is good. Now it is all contained in one, that the woman who wants a statue by
 a man is wanting by love of him, because she loves him, for it cannot be otherwise.
Now if a woman is with the devil, than it is unlikely they are suited for a man who is with God, but if she still desires him and yet her heart has said, I cannot have because I am cast out from that which he is with, does she not cut herself off too soon? For if her eyes have seen what is better, than there is a road to be taken, and the Christ is upon it, and God has sent his son, so that if the road is long for her, is there aid in becoming generous to give good, for who knows if there is still time for her?
Now if an animal has sense of domain to be exceeding that of people, it is a common ailment. Now the territory extending so far as to the compromising of vital functions for a human is the same as an animal goring and biting, that if it will not heed rebuke but continues it is that the animal is triggered to fight and kill or be killed. Now a small matter of vital necessity to a person can do it, for suddenly the animal after being filled up with wickedness attacked and turned wicked in a sudden way when it was gentle before, and then if it is continuing it must be killed, for the life of people is of worth but the worth of an animal is nothing in comparison.
Now if an animal is puffed up with ignorance and ignorance-projections and they are coming upon a person who is not blind or deaf the animal is likely to maul and struggle with a person, for it must be made into knowing truth unless it continue to maul because it has large sense of territory that is an attack on people. Now if the animal is not to be killed it must be brought to truth and the ignorance must be removed. Now there is no sin to slaying an animal. Now if there are warring animals that go in packs are you not slaying them? But Babylon is supporting its own. Now what is happening when the animal is not the devil’s? Is there not the re-incarnation where they will keep making attempts to be good that they might become human? But when one crosses to the devil they are taken to hell and when one repents and accepts Christ is He not able to transform to person? But if there is not re-incarnation will you then accept the Christ? Now God gave 10 commandments and they are delivered by Moses, and those that mind their own business are those accepting guilt when it is themselves at fault and not exceeding to place it upon another, which is not keeping to oneself.
Now if an animal is puffed up with ignorance and ignorance-projections and they are coming upon a person who is not blind or deaf the animal is likely to maul and struggle with a person, for it must be made into knowing truth unless it continue to maul because it has large sense of territory that is an attack on people. Now if the animal is not to be killed it must be brought to truth and the ignorance must be removed. Now there is no sin to slaying an animal. Now if there are warring animals that go in packs are you not slaying them? But Babylon is supporting its own. Now what is happening when the animal is not the devil’s? Is there not the re-incarnation where they will keep making attempts to be good that they might become human? But when one crosses to the devil they are taken to hell and when one repents and accepts Christ is He not able to transform to person? But if there is not re-incarnation will you then accept the Christ? Now God gave 10 commandments and they are delivered by Moses, and those that mind their own business are those accepting guilt when it is themselves at fault and not exceeding to place it upon another, which is not keeping to oneself.
Now if an woman marvels at the sin of Adam that has exceeded the norms of such than she has commited such much more than him, the sin, for it is the sin.
Now if an woman marvels at the sin of Adam that has exceeded the norms of such than she has commited such much more than him, the sin, for it is the sin.
Now if animals come to contend with you than you do not speak much with them, but if one is deceived in this they are muzzled by their ignorance, but if fools would contend early at words of truth than will they be worth effort? But if any is commiting evil are they imaging they do not? But if they are so wicked than they will have to repent. Now those shake hands when more must fall before it is rebuilt, that peace is injustice when it is with some.
Now if animals come to the man and say, kill her that loves you, then the animals are demanding the command of God, for the man is for fullfilling the will of God. Now he is right in killing her that his hands are made pure and blameless, but not doing so is sin that the animals continue against him. Now they are for bullying and separating and yet their mouths are not permitted to speak truth, for they direct the man and give threat to him and brutality, and yet they do not speak truth directly for they are not permitted.
Now if animals come to the man and say, kill her that loves you, then the animals are demanding the command of God, for the man is for fullfilling the will of God. Now he is right in killing her that his hands are made pure and blameless, but not doing so is sin that the animals continue against him.
Now if animals come to the man and say, kill her that loves you, then the animals are demanding the command of God, for the man is for fullfilling the will of God. Now he is right in killing her that his hands are made pure and blameless, but not doing so is sin that the animals continue against him. Now they are for bullying and separating and yet their mouths are not permitted to speak truth, for they direct the man and give threat to him and brutality, and yet they do not speak truth directly for they are not permitted.
Now if animals come to the man and say, kill her that loves you, then the animals are demanding the command of God, for the man is for fullfilling the will of God. Now he is right in killing her that his hands are made pure and blameless, but not doing so is sin that the animals continue against him.
Now if another wife is to be had do you leave your wife away from it all that evil might be for her? But we often speak of evil in such matters and being good you will know it is an evil. For do you put her away to be a widow to take another and is this the truth of what is done? But you have left her out entirely as if she is not your wife? For why does any evil happen to her if you are not making her like a widow, for she is your wife, and the woman who would be with you also has spoken in ways as if you should make her like a widow, as if to divorce her even? But is this woman also capable of being with you? But I have done such in Mala and it is not the business of any others, for let none seperate what God has joined. Now do you take wisdom from Babylon in this that you do evil? But Babylon is not promoting the things of God.
Now if any Babylonian is good intentioned and happy for the kingdom of the Lord that they are comparing their station in Babylon to things of the Lord’s kingdom than let them abandon Babylon and become things in the Lord’s kingdom, for if they compare things of Babylon to things in the Lord’s kingdom than they should know that Babylon’s things are not the Lord’s things that they speak disrespect but if it is with a happy encouragement for the Lord’s kingdom that they say, we are that thing in the Lord’s kingdom because Babylon is current and the Lord’s kingdom is old and gone, then if they do not truly mean disrespect are they not for the Lord? Now do you strike a child for a compliment that misses the mark to be a little disrespectful when they are good intentioned and attempting to give a compliment? But if they are for the Lord than they are adulterers against Babylon, seduced by the Lord’s kingdom and at this level you are immoral that you steal away people without remorse from the devil.
Now if any Babylonian is good intentioned and happy for the kingdom of the Lord that they are comparing their station in Babylon to things of the Lord’s kingdom than let them abandon Babylon and become things in the Lord’s kingdom, for if they compare things of Babylon to things in the Lord’s kingdom than they should know that Babylon’s things are not the Lord’s things that they speak disrespect but if it is with a happy encouragement for the Lord’s kingdom that they say, we are that thing in the Lord’s kingdom because Babylon is current and the Lord’s kingdom is old and gone, then if they do not truly mean disrespect are they not for the Lord? Now do you strike a child for a compliment that misses the mark to be a little disrespectful when they are good intentioned and attempting to give a compliment? But if they are for the Lord than they are adulterers against Babylon, seduced by the Lord’s kingdom and at this level you are immoral that you steal away people without remorse from the devil.
Now if any are consistently giving the one at peace an insolent facade is it a foolish grievance that their peace would be disturbed beyond the time of patience? But if any is without patience they remove common sense from truth. Now for what reason does any people revolt and rebel, and they do not conform to the guilt being of a different people? Now are these as compatible with you as others? But if is acceptable than you know the value of patience, that it is part of common sense. Now if you are among people groups you are not completely compatible with than you are only going through what others have gone through. But if any says be gone from us, does not what is God’s take the priority? Be not deceived for Christians are not Gentiles.
Now if any believes the pursuit of money is about what has been said in exxageration, that it is about deceiving the naive, and every type of evil, than they have perceived Babylon and Orgoth, and if they perceive the puritanicalism
 of jelousy and the Luke-warmth desired, to even view the church as another symbol but not belief, than they are to be joining Babylon willingly, that they have perceived the hatred of the young, and hated what they believe is to be hated, that these are with the devil, but believing such things are foolish, for their loyalty is to Babylon to succeed, that they are not deceived about Babylon and yet deceived about the defeat of the devil.
Now if any believes the pursuit of money is about what has been said in exxageration, that it is about deceiving the naive, and about supporting and doing every type of evil, than they have perceived Babylon and Orgoth, and if they perceive the puritanicalism of jelousy and the Luke-warmth desired, to even view the church as another symbol but not belief, than they are to be joining Babylon willingly, that they have perceived the hatred of the young, and hated what they believe is to be hated, that these are with the devil, but believing such things are foolish, for their loyalty is to Babylon to succeed, that they are not deceived about Babylon and yet deceived about the defeat of the devil.
Now if any has need to sacrifice, than it is better to sacrifice than to increase wrong deeds.
Now if any has transformed to being beyond an animal but a relentless desease, than they are a desease and sickness from the devil to be used as a weapon against God’s people and even to be directed at the angel, for the desease attacks that which is a threat to the devil and his purposes and it is a desease that would seek to hinder and hold back humanity as a species. Now such desease even come in the form of zeolots who have been transformed into the desease from the devil.
Now if any is a blaspheming zeolot to give command with iron and rillet, yet it is not human, for it is below reason and sentience. Now if any great is having mostly sodomites as servants and Gomorites, yet they are lower than animals, for they are sick animals and below. Now if the servants of Orgoth attack what is not in their domain to speak as if it is, than it is a sick and confused animal who is to be taken to hell, for sick animals are sometimes speaking projection. Now if those of the criminal realm do any of these things they are falling from that realm to a lower place according to what they do.
Now if any is as nasty as a male buck is he a deer? But if any has hateful eyes, a vulture? But if any the teeth of a murderous hyena a dog, with eyes of jelousy? But any a hard pride, a crocodile or alligator to pounce and kill? But these traits are seen in animals than what do they mean when they come forward in people? For there is no end of learning, of gaining wisdom, and I would will that others not go to me and say I must be less than you for you have to me when I was young? But am I a fool and a base person that this would be asked of me? One does not travel to the planet and be on another at the same time. But if any would attempt to use my name for the devil than they speak it on purpose and as ignorant men when they mock and pass by. For such is like the words of a grumbler who hates, and yet some grumble in a holy fashion, being with a hidden and pure spirit within them. Now be not oblivious, I would say, but be a people concerned for the feelings of others in a way that is with justice, truth, and integrity, that you loosen for righteousness that you not attempt to force on others while judging much and most by righteousness. For if some would say, the mountain was too high for us and so let us bury ourselves in ignorance, most have sought to have the greater benifit in prudence. But at times the traits have shown to the spiritual what a person is that if these are the same as their traits than a man has the truth in his hand, but there are those being like animals who are not of that type, and such is the case with noble animals that are for those worthy of them, and many of these are great. Now the one who takes cities is not taking that city that is hard iniquity less it cause the Earth to tremble and break, but one takes a city that is rich and with acceptable things. Now if another has chosen the control than it is called better but it is not known among them who would criticize to say what is truly better. For one is choosing not the later and it is good for them. Now if one is choosing yet another thing being the law than it is not for this. But the law is for obedience and who is able to follow all of it?
Now if any is as nasty as a male buck is he a deer? But if any has hateful eyes, a vulture? But if any the teeth of a murderous hyena a dog, with eyes of jelousy? But any a hard pride, a crocodile or alligator to pounce and kill? But these traits are seen in animals than what do they mean when they come forward in people? For there is no end of learning, of gaining wisdom, and I would will that others not go to me and say I must be less than you for you have to me when I was young? But am I a fool and a base person that this would be asked of me? One does not travel to the planet and be on another at the same time. But if any would attempt to use my name for the devil than they speak it on purpose and as ignorant men when they mock and pass by. For such is like the words of a grumbler who hates, and yet some grumble in a holy fashion, being with a hidden and pure spirit within them. Now be not oblivious, I would say, but be a people concerned for the feelings of others in a way that is with justice, truth, and integrity, that you loosen for righteousness that you not attempt to force on others while judging much and most by righteousness. For if some would say, the mountain was too high for us and so let us bury ourselves in ignorance, most have sought to have the greater benifit in prudence.
Now if any is saying, they have not fulfilled and so I will not fulfill what is for them, than are you being a person who is praise-worthy? But you are not fulfilling because they have not that chaos might come and you might be pety and not doing your good for God. Now if one is not fulfilling than it will be delt with the correct way and God is capable, and if you are a judge of wrongs in court and you are saying I will not give them justice because they have not fulfilled all in the matter of some cause than are you fulfilling before God, as if you would throw of your role and be like a mere person on the street who is bias and is regarding little? But if any fool is judging their own case like a wicked man exaulting himself before you do you not perceive? Now are you being entitled to something by man and spirituality and yet you do not consider that you are given the greater power and so the greater burden? But make not the Lord’s places of judgement a mockery, because you are given a righteous seat that dispenses of all pety children who seek to strong-arm you to fail, who would tempt you to sin. Therefore if none will be for God, than God has the great strength and power to support you.
Now if any is saying, they have not fulfilled and so I will not fulfill what is for them, than are you being a person who is praise-worthy? But you are not fulfilling because they have not that chaos might come and you might be pety and not doing your good for God. Now if one is not fulfilling than it will be delt with the correct way and God is capable, and if you are a judge of wrongs in court and you are saying I will not give them justice because they have not fulfilled all in the matter of some cause than are you fulfilling before God, as if you would throw of your role and be like a mere person on the street who is bias and is regarding little? But if any fool is judging their own case like a wicked man exaulting himself before you do you not perceive? Now are you being entitled to something by man and spirituality and yet you do not consider that you are given the greater power and so the greater burden? But make not the Lord’s places of judgement a mockery, because you are given a righteous seat that dispenses of all pety children who seek to strong-arm you to fail, who would tempt you to sin. Therefore if none will be for God, than God has the great strength and power to support you. But if you perceive spiritual things than you are knowing what you are, and not a wicked man exaulting themselves as a meddler might claim, but a righteous judge who is with strength and power who God supports with greater strength and power to keep those who would be pety children as allies in their due place, that their words to entice you to sin would be kept in subjection, for they call to each other in the street and do not know, they prod and pull, being not the righteous one given a special place in God’s place of judgement. They do not know the holy and the greatness, and yet they are squabbling and meandering before them who are like the anointed of God. Now a meddler reads honouring advice and yet it is beyond them if they would think it is for them, because I too cannot come between the judge and God and would not want to. But are the words for the meddler that it would be shown that they do not understand and do not respect God’s doings as they should? But nothing is ever for the one who meddles, for they are like a child to be cast out, and they would even say such about prophets and God if they were offended, as if the prophet was a mere man and as if anything was truly known to them.
Now if any plants that seed that is quickly taken away than is the seed always good if it dies? But one has planted a seed grafted with puritanicalism that the seed will die, and discord is also sowed. Now if any is planting what is likely to die, yet it is not good, and if any who does so is resisting being a false-Shepard, yet they are not heard. Now if any says I will look to David as one who deceived, and yet it is not truth, for they place
 deceit between David and God. Now does God deceive? For if the people are meeting God and trusting than the Shepard is false and because of the Christ, but David calls Him his Lord.
Now if any reads and wants to meddle, because of hate, that they place themselves to act as one playing an offensive role to be evil to another, that they wish to meddle in what is given to others, than such a person is for using Sodom combat.
Now if any reads and wants to meddle, because of hate, that they place themselves to act as one playing an offensive role to be evil to another, that they wish to meddle in what is given to others, than such a person is for using Sodom combat.
Now if any speaks fair they do so as a wise man who is gracious and not in the calamities of Babylonian tongue. Now Babylonian tongues were forged for deception, and languages of God’s kingdom for people.
Now if any transitions to something else than you know what a person is capable of transitioning to, but perhaps not all that they are able to become when they make a real transition and not like those given to change. Now if any is saying, it is not possible to communicate with them because they are making the transition, because one must stoop down and provide compensations because even the first words are not congruent with human comprehension, than you know it is because they indeed speak another language because of the transition. Now if any has become more than they are those who are for more, but for those who squander and transform knowledge so that it might be acceptable to them, these are of a different people, and you have been called to be of the kingdom of heaven. Now why do waste time in argument with any who are not your people and why would they offer their opinion to you as if you would regard it? But those of different religions of course do not agree on religion unless they are not honouring any, and when this is understood there can be real limits by which to have peace among friends. But if those not of your people, but people of the devil are insisting to be as if one of your people as if their opinion of you would matter, than are they not acting as enemies in hatred of the enemy? But many of the devil’s are performing such in hatred of the enemy, and if the ugly have hated beauty that they might make it ugly, than you know they are for devouring and slaughtering the house of God.
Now if any woman has been uncertain to betray her riches for Babylon because she was asked to cast away riches of real worth, than if she is desiring to then attain as a daughter like Jacob, is there not recompense and much justice she must suffer through because of her prior decision? But a king is given the power when the Lord is giving it, and a righteous man is given the power when the Lord has given it, so if she is willing to suffer it, than are there not many good things occurring? But who is the king? Is he not the man she desires to marry? But who is the man? Is he not then the man she wishes to marry, to be joined to him? Now be of a wise and righteous heart, daughter of Earth, and if you are for making just acts of atonement in large and small ways, heed not the false Shepard, for the Christ is God’s son. But if you are for making them than you know what is right. Now seize hold the husband, for you seize hold to the blessing that Jacob gave much effort to steal, that you deliver yourself from the enslavement of the city of Babylon, from the chains of Babylon, delivering yourself from the evil of Jacob’s elder brother who was never your husband, but sought to enslave you among a band of stolen women. Now deliver yourself from the bitter voice of mocking of the foolish woman, for what you do, Babylon will not likely favour you anymore, for Babylon has eyes of devil birds that are not seen, and the report comes soon to the knowledge that is in Babylon.
Now if any woman has been uncertain to betray her riches for Babylon because she was asked to cast away riches of real worth, than if she is desiring to then attain as a daughter like Jacob, is there not recompense and much justice she must suffer through because of her prior decision? But a king is given the power when the Lord is giving it, and a righteous man is given the power when the Lord has given it, so if she is willing to suffer it, than are there not many good things occurring? But who is the king? Is he not the man she desires to marry? But who is the man? Is he not then the man she wishes to marry, to be joined to him? Now be of a wise and righteous heart, daughter of Earth, and if you are for making just acts of atonement in large and small ways, heed not the false Shepard, for the Christ is God’s son. But if you are for making them than you know what is right. Now seize hold the husband, for you seize hold to the blessing that Jacob gave much effort to steal, that you deliver yourself from the enslavement of the city of Babylon, from the chains of Babylon, delivering yourself from the evil of Jacob’s elder brother who was never your husband, but sought to enslave you among a band of stolen women. Now deliver yourself from the bitter voice of mocking of the foolish woman, for what you do, Babylon will not likely favour you anymore, for Babylon has eyes of devil birds that are not seen, and the report comes soon to the knowledge that is in Babylon.
Now if any woman is cursed because her heart was to be with another than for what reason would she abandon him? But if she is not cursed was her heart ever with him so much? Now do not say it is something else when it is not as an excuse for things because people are able to know the difference. But if a woman deceives him is he wrong? But if he is wrong than a plea is to understand because the sorrow of not taking more is a hurt and wound and less so to the man, and he who puts a true wife away, she being his wife, does an iniquitious cruelty and if he is hard enough to do so what manner of cruelty is he capable of? Now if the one who says I love you most is not so, than those faithful will take her place, and a father who over defends says my daughter is forbidden until I find the right one for her. 
Now if any woman is putting on light of purity and matching jewals of Virtues than she is made beautiful, and a woman of many virtues and a daughter of Sarah is not as other women. 
Now if any woman will be greater than woman she fullfills woman and wisely with it, to be pleasing to God, that she wants His will that she might want to do good and do wisely with it, but an animal is beneath people. Now some women, and not many, have attained spiritual greatness, but the devil would rather have them turned to animals and made hideous and repulsive. Now strive not, but rather fullfill, for the man who is obeying God has been rewarded by Him and you are able to know what He wants from women for them to be made great.
Now if any would be fools to live in a land where wisdom is not required, than they should be prudent to only do what will not require their life in justice, for life and death is on the Earth, and those blind and without hearing who draw swords and become reckless are becoming a threat to be delt with using justice to kill if they are fighting well enough, with enough injustice, that they must die. For they have drawn swords against those who can kill and attacked with much of their strength that if one lays blame for their being killed, is it not with them who did not restrain the blind when they saw it? But if a beast attacks does not a person restrain it? But if another too should die is uncertain for there are those who are not there to restrain and do not know all and are lied to. But do not lay blame when there is understanding of what must be.
 Now if it is too simple, yet it is true? But the one is knowing the wrong of his employer’s dealings and they are not, that truth is with one and not the other, and the angel has learned.
Now if it is truly a queen than they are supporting those loyal to the people to be councillors and what is of governments, for they will not be sensing threat from these if they are a queen.
Now if it is truly a queen than they are supporting those loyal to the people to be councillors and what is of governments, for they will not be sensing threat from these if they are a queen.
Now if it must be said because of the time, there is a rich man who has a son of a darker shade and yet he is having the third shelf of the mountain and dwelling on the second, a young goat, noble and wise, that he is a person who is not ashamed for he has not been touched with the evil he cannot take in, and he is accepted among those of the third shelf even if the spirit of the mountain in hell has been ignorant.
Now if it would even need to be written, there are princes walking, gods without admirers, fools in places of learning, poor in places of riches, servants in political gatherings, kings in small places, animals in political places, leaders who have support who are servants, fools who promote the false balance, simple who quote injustice like a small child, queens who rescue angels, kings who place trust in God, givers who steal, takers who give, that the truth is never completed for me, and the chaos of Babylon is a mess of folly, for truth is with God. Now if a person must be ejected from Babylon than is God not having plans and He is a great strategist, but the devil is for fighting less he diminish and he is fighting for he knows that he is not to be saved, reasoning with knowledge and understanding, that he is not deceived by the idea of deceiving God. Now if he has sought to overthrow God and sought His life as one who hates Him than in his iniquity he is stubborn and he has sought to kill man and the Christ for he is a complete enemy towards God. Now he reasons that it would be foolishness to refuse to fight
 for the Christ has not died for him, and his actions have already been rebellion.
Now if it would even need to be written, there are princes walking, gods without admirers, fools in places of learning, poor in places of riches, servants in political gatherings, kings in small places, animals in political places, leaders who have support who are servants, fools who promote the false balance, simple who quote injustice like a small child, queens who rescue angels, kings who place trust in God, givers who steal, takers who give, that the truth is never completed for me, and the chaos of Babylon is a mess of folly, for truth is with God. Now if a person must be ejected from Babylon than is God not having plans and He is a great strategist, but the devil is for fighting less he diminish and he is fighting for he knows that he is not to be saved, reasoning with knowledge and understanding, that he is not deceived by the idea of deceiving God. Now if he has sought to overthrow God and sought His life as one who hates Him than in his iniquity he is stubborn and he has sought to kill man and the Christ for he is a complete enemy towards God. Now he reasons that a fool will not refuse to fight for the Christ has not died for him, and his actions have already been rebellion.
Now if men are as if the older or the younger with the goddess than what is she? But men are only to respect God. Now women do not need to be told. Now then what is she? But she is in a high place with the Lord, and an angel will not crush her. For if she says, what is my domain? Yet she is beyond the Earth. Now the Earth has spat her out because of her status, and all things except the kingdom of the Lord’s has spat her out. Now friend of Elijah, I have not known of him and do not speak of him. Now he has fled from Ahab and Jezebel, for he is fire to her and does not Ahab delight in evil? For Ahab is a man of war, not a coward, liking with delight to do evil. Now will not an angel say, fear not, before the arrival of him who the angel does not speak of, even further, the Satan? Now the Satan does not command the Lord’s angels or know of them. But comfort is to the good woman who is goddess. Now her husband she honours and yet she is a little in the clouds for she is in the realm of the top shelf of Noah’s mountain. Now not many dwell there, and yet to men she is a woman and yet she is known because of the daughters that they have no cause and do not hate but she is grievous. Now if she must be taken to the Island to dwell, it is as heaven as on Earth, and yet does she wish it?
Now if men are as if the older or the younger with the goddess than what is she? But men are only to respect God. Now women do not need to be told. Now then what is she? But she is in a high place with the Lord, and an angel will not crush her. For if she says, what is my domain? Yet she is beyond the Earth. Now the Earth has spat her out because of her status, and all things except the kingdom of the Lord’s has spat her out. Now friend of Elijah, I have not known of him and do not speak of him. Now he has fled from Ahab and Jezebel, for he is fire to her and does not Ahab delight in evil? For Ahab is a man of war, not a coward, liking with delight to do evil. Now will not an angel say, fear not, before the arrival of him who the angel does not speak of, even further, the Satan? Now the Satan does not command the Lord’s angels or know of them. But comfort is to the good woman who is goddess. Now her husband she honours and yet she is a little in the clouds for she is in the realm of the top shelf of Noah’s mountain. Now not many dwell there, and yet to men she is a woman and yet she is known because of the daughters that they have no cause and do not hate but she is grievous. Now if she must be taken to the Island to dwell, it is as heaven as on Earth, and yet does she wish it?
Now if men are as if the older or the younger with the goddess than what is she? But men are only to respect God. Now women do not need to be told. Now then what is she? But she is in a high place with the Lord, and an angel will not crush her. For if she says, what is my domain? Yet she is beyond the Earth. Now the Earth has spat her out because of her status, and all things except the kingdom of the Lord’s has spat her out. Now friend of Elijah, I have not known of him and do not speak of him. Now he has fled from Ahab and Jezebel, for he is fire to her and does not Ahab delight in evil? For Ahab is a man of war, not a coward, liking with delight to do evil. Now will not an angel say, fear not, before the arrival of him who the angel does not speak of, even further, the Satan? Now the Satan does not command the Lord’s angels or know of them. But comfort is to the good woman who is goddess.
Now if men are as if the older or the younger with the goddess than what is she? But men are only to respect God. Now women do not need to be told. Now then what is she? But she is in a high place with the Lord, and an angel will not crush her. For if she says, what is my domain? Yet she is beyond the Earth. Now the Earth has spat her out because of her status, and all things except the kingdom of the Lord’s has spat her out. Now friend of Elijah, I have not known of him and do not speak of him. Now he has fled from Ahab and Jezebel, for he is fire to her and does not Ahab delight in evil? For Ahab is a man of war, not a coward, liking with delight to do evil. Now will not an angel say, fear not, before the arrival of him who the angel does not speak of, even further, the Satan? Now the Satan does not command the Lord’s angels or know of them. But comfort is to the good woman who is goddess. Now her husband she honours and yet she is a little in the clouds for she is in the realm of the top shelf of Noah’s mountain. Now not many dwell there.
Now if men are as if the older or the younger with the goddess than what is she? But men are only to respect God. Now women do not need to be told. Now then what is she? But she is in a high place with the Lord, and an angel will not crush her. For if she says, what is my domain? Yet she is beyond the Earth. Now the Earth has spat her out because of her status, and all things except the kingdom of the Lord’s has spat her out. Now friend of Elijah, I have not known of him and do not speak of him. Now he has fled from Ahab and Jezebel, for he is fire to her and does not Ahab delight in evil? For Ahab is a man of war, not a coward, liking with delight to do evil. Now will not an angel say, fear not, before the arrival of him who the angel does not speak of, even further, the Satan? Now the Satan does not command the Lord’s angels or know of them. But comfort is to the good woman who is goddess. Now her husband she honours and yet she is a little in the clouds for she is in the realm of the top shelf of Noah’s mountain. Now not many dwell there.
Now if men are as if the older or the younger with the goddess than what is she? But men are only to respect God. Now women do not need to be told. Now then what is she? But she is in a high place with the Lord, and an angel will not crush her. For if she says, what is my domain? Yet she is beyond the Earth. Now the Earth has spat her out because of her status, and all things except the kingdom of the Lord’s has spat her out. Now friend of Elijah, I have not known of him and do not speak of him. Now he has fled from Ahab and Jezebel, for he is fire to her and does not Ahab delight in evil? For Ahab is a man of war, not a coward, liking with delight to do evil. Now will not an angel say, fear not, before the arrival of him who the angel does not speak of, even further, the Satan? Now the Satan does not command the Lord’s angels or know of them. But comfort is to the good woman who is goddess.
Now if not all is included in the giving of wisdom will you stray and look to the left and right to meddle that you might attack, for you have not attacked them who meddle to drive them out with righteousness and you have not abandoned the fool when you have perceived in him lies, and you have not identified the leader-source of those who meddle and attack as if with rillet, and the people are having splinters that disperse good and fickle girls whose slanders result in mayhem and the shedding of blood, so that if these are in the midst of many righteous what can they accomplish? But the land will be a place of righteousness.
Now if one comes as if with love saying be exiting life and throwing away all that yourself might be taken by death and yet your body remain, than know that it is not as a compliment unless it is defeated.
Now if one group is against you will they cut you off from your allies? But if one group is against you than are the others of a same name, though they are not the same? But in war one tribe puts another against their allies, and one tribe uses another tribe’s flag when they attack that war be placed against a person’s allies that they are both being destroyed. Now the anti-Christ’s have a heart for seeking out these strategies of war, and they have known them more often than you who are beautiful and for peace. Now those who are beautiful must learn to wield a sword and must be skilled with the bow and manners of defence and wisdom, to be learning the skills of wisdom in these matters and becoming that which is of great ability, that you will learn the value of defending your people when one of you should be under attack, that you will know the jelous one who cannot compete for themselves and thus attempts to sow discord by using another who is not your enemy, and you will know the foolishness and calamity of mind of the one who attacks you, even accusing you for defending yourself when they trespassed in a fashion and attacked. For an ugly person has sought to be a parent or older brother from a scowl of hatred on their face that
 their grotesque ways are ugly and perversions of justice, judgement, and good things that are not defiled, are defiled by them because of their raging hearts of hatred. Now I write about Sodomites and not those who would be men with men in terms of their preference, because it must be stated due to a contention that became low in recent history, when people began to use the bible for their disagreance. Now men who are with men in matters of sexuality are not unrighteous unless they are for other reasons and yet they are commuting what is called sexual immorality in which they are abusing themselves, a temple, and yet have not many of you abused yourselves and you are judging this smaller thing as if it was a very great thing? But do not separate yourself from allies, and selfishly so, for it also seeks to seperate them from God, and this is a great evil, but it seperates them from you, and the kingdom has no use for division when the soldiers of the devil are on the land.    —Now if the devil is believing in mutilation and defiling what is sacred that he might bring Earth to hell when all the good and righteous have been slayn represented by only a few who account for all who are pleasing God and keeping the Earth from descending to hell, than how great a victory would consider it in battle to do this thing he would attempt? But I am not knowing God’s will, because the disciples were slayn and many of the saints of the kingdom of heaven, and this to profit for them and God, and so I have said, what do I know, and how far is wisdom from me and how much, but to know it is always beyond great what I have not known and understood, so that I would return to the Christ, but I grow angry because He has not given another message to me, not by words, so that I have been upset not to be in heaven, and then there is no hatred of any person who is good to me, who I love, for Isaac lost his mother and was comforted by her who he loved, and then I would seek to understand the war and how this profits, that where one dies more are brought onto the Earth, that the tree has perished and there are more trees from it, but I am understanding that wisdom is a defence and that those who are to live by righteosness are then knowing the season in which it is their time to die that the enemy might not say that it is always your time that because of your foolishness you should not live, but die, for such hatred and mocking is in the mouth of their heart. Now if the kingdom is His than the saints are to remain in it, that the wisdom of defence does not instruct offensive war, only the dead are dying and those living are profiting in their death for God and them. Now if you have the kingdom you are understanding the concept of the next life for which you prepare, that a man does not abandon a woman who should not be abandoned, that fools have given commands against what is more pleasing to God. 
Now if one group is against you will they cut you off from your allies? But if one group is against you than are the others of a same name, though they are not the same? But in war one tribe puts another against their allies, and one tribe uses another tribe’s flag when they attack that war be placed against a person’s allies that they are both being destroyed. Now the anti-Christ’s have a heart for seeking out these strategies of war, and they have known them more often than you who are beautiful and for peace. Now those who are beautiful must learn to wield a sword and must be skilled with the bow and manners of defence and wisdom, to be learning the skills of wisdom in these matters and becoming that which is of great ability, that you will learn the value of defending your people when one of you should be under attack, that you will know the jelous one who cannot compete for themselves and thus attempts to sow discord by using another who is not your enemy, and you will know the foolishness and calamity of mind of the one who attacks you, even accusing you for defending yourself when they trespassed in a fashion and attacked. For an ugly person has sought to be a parent or older brother from a scowl of hatred on their face that their grotesque ways are ugly and perversions of justice, judgement, and good things that are not defiled, are defiled by them because of their raging hearts of hatred. Now I write about Sodomites and not those who would be men with men in terms of their preference, because it must be stated due to a contention that became low in recent history, when people began to use the bible for their disagreance. Now men who are with men in matters of sexuality are not unrighteous unless they are for other reasons and yet they are commuting what is called sexual immorality in which they are abusing themselves, a temple, and yet have not many of you abused yourselves and you are judging this smaller thing as if it was a very great thing? But do not separate yourself from allies, and selfishly so, for it also seeks to seperate them from God, and this is a great evil, but it seperates them from you, and the kingdom has no use for division when the soldiers of the devil are on the land.
Now if one group is against you will they cut you off from your allies? But if one group is against you than are the others of a same name, though they are not the same? But in war one tribe puts another against their allies, and one tribe uses another tribe’s flag when they attack that war be placed against a person’s allies that they are both being destroyed. Now the anti-Christ’s have a heart for seeking out these strategies of war, and they have known them more often than you who are beautiful and for peace. Now those who are beautiful must learn to wield a sword and must be skilled with the bow and manners of defence and wisdom, to be learning the skills of wisdom in these matters and becoming that which is of great ability, that you will learn the value of defending your people when one of you should be under attack, that you will know the jelous one who cannot compete for themselves and thus attempts to sow discord by using another who is not your enemy, and you will know the foolishness and calamity of mind of the one who attacks you, even accusing you for defending yourself when they trespassed in a fashion and attacked. For an ugly person has sought to be a parent or older brother from a scowl of hatred on their face that their grotesque ways are ugly and perversions of justice, judgement, and good things that are not defiled, are defiled by them because of their raging hearts of hatred. Now I write about Sodomites and not those who would be men with men in terms of their preference, because it must be stated due to a contention that became low in recent history, when people began to use the bible for their disagreance. Now men who are with men in matters of sexuality are not unrighteous unless they are for other reasons and yet they are commuting what is called sexual immorality in which they are abusing themselves, a temple, and yet have not many of you abused yourselves and you are judging this smaller thing as if it was a very great thing? But do not separate yourself from allies, and selfishly so, for it also seeks to seperate them from God, and this is a great evil, but it seperates them from you, and the kingdom has no use for division when the soldiers of the devil are on the land.    —Now if the devil is believing in mutilation and defiling what is sacred that he might bring Earth to hell when all the good and righteous have been slayn represented by only a few who account for all who are pleasing God and keeping the Earth from descending to hell, than how great a victory would consider it in battle to do this thing he would attempt? But I am not knowing God’s will, because the disciples were slayn and many of the saints of the kingdom of heaven, and this to profit for them and God, and so I have said, what do I know, and how far is wisdom from me and how much, but to know it is always beyond great what I have not known and understood, so that I would return to the Christ, but I grow angry because He has not given another message to me, not by words, so that I have been upset not to be in heaven, and then there is no hatred of any person who is good to me, who I love, for Isaac lost his mother and was comforted by her who he loved, and then I would seek to understand the war and how this profits, that where one dies more are brought onto the Earth, that the tree has perished and there are more trees from it, but I am understanding that wisdom is a defence and that those who are to live by righteosness are then knowing the season in which it is their time to die that the enemy might not say that it is always your time that because of your foolishness you should not live, but die, for such hatred and mocking is in the mouth of their heart.
Now if one group is against you will they cut you off from your allies? But if one group is against you than are the others of a same name, though they are not the same? But in war one tribe puts another against their allies, and one tribe uses another tribe’s flag when they attack that war be placed against a person’s allies that they are both being destroyed. Now the anti-Christ’s have a heart for seeking out these strategies of war, and they have known them more often than you who are beautiful and for peace. Now those who are beautiful must learn to wield a sword and must be skilled with the bow and manners of defence and wisdom, to be learning the skills of wisdom in these matters and becoming that which is of great ability, that you will learn the value of defending your people when one of you should be under attack, that you will know the jelous one who cannot compete for themselves and thus attempts to sow discord by using another who is not your enemy, and you will know the foolishness and calamity
 of mind of the one who attacks you, even accusing you for defending yourself when they trespassed in a fashion and attacked. For an ugly person has sought to be a parent or older brother from a scowl of hatred on their face that their grotesque ways are ugly and perversions of justice, judgement, and good things that are not defiled, are defiled by them because of their raging hearts of hatred.
Now if one is in Babylon like Joseph, a good one like Daniel, than does he not have to be careful in showing righteousness? But there are allies behind the thickness of forest, and yet they are often very few, and some places have diligently cleansed them, for they are doing wickedness and have no need of those who please God.
Now if one must attack to give proper honour and glory to another as being greater than let it be that they are becoming less outward in their actions. But as for the righteous, they are sound and with integrity.
Now if soldiers of cities are changing the meaning of the law, are they not Babylon? But if they permit the sodomite are they not sodomites? But if they permit the murderer are they not so? Now when have they permitted justice? But they are allowing much of wickedness and strict upon what is not that you are able to know Babylon. Now the priests of Babylon are those not believing in morality as a small child barely learned to speak, and they are not having childhood or adolescent years for they were only concealing their disbelief in morality, that they suffered every day, being afflicted with the belief in morality of others, and they harboured their growing wrath and rage within them, that they know not of anything but hatred for God’s house. Now when one of them is slain the Earth is blessed and peace comes because of the justice committed against them.  But Babylon is wroth, being with anger and spreading quickly ignorance as lies to condemn justice. Now what can the soldier of the city who is the nation’s do anymore? For in many places as a large group they are kept from the truth and Babylon’s people go around and past them without giving report of their deeds and without concern of being stopped by justice. For Babylon has the leaders of cities and the concealed judges who control much and the teredacto and zeolot spies and all those who work evil and are hidden, for small amount of them is exercising almost total control at times, and the good leaders cannot know. Now loyalty to the nation and not Babylon is loyalty to God, for it is also loyal to the citizens.
Now if soldiers of cities are changing the meaning of the law, are they not Babylon? But if they permit the sodomite are they not sodomites? But if they permit the murderer are they not so? Now when have they permitted justice? But they are allowing much of wickedness and strict upon what is not that you are able to know Babylon. Now the priests of Babylon are those not believing in morality as a small child barely learned to speak, and they are not having childhood or adolescent years for they were only concealing their disbelief in morality, that they suffered every day, being afflicted with the belief in morality of others, and they harboured their growing wrath and rage within them, that they know not of anything but hatred for God’s house. Now when one of them is slain the Earth is blessed and peace comes because of the justice committed against them.  But Babylon is wroth, being with anger and spreading quickly ignorance as lies to condemn justice. Now what can the soldier of the city who is the nation’s do anymore? For in many places as a large group they are kept from the truth and Babylon’s people go around and past them without giving report of their deeds and without concern of being stopped by justice. For Babylon has the leaders of cities and the concealed judges who control much and the teredacto and zeolot spies and all those who work evil and are hidden, for small amount of them is exercising almost total control at times, and the good leaders cannot know. Now loyalty to the nation and not Babylon is loyalty to God, for it is also loyal to the citizens.
Now if some beings in heaven used both technology and the spiritual even when visiting Earth would you say it cannot be when the scripture never claimed it could not be so? But would it be a problem for some of you if God’s servants have utilized industry? But if God’s servants have had mines for industry on far away planets being both spiritual and using technology would that be wrong? But humans use technology and industry. But would that mean that God is not all powerful who created the Universe? But if there is much you do not know than why would you relent in doing and being what can know more? Now if the beauty of those things in the book of Ezekiel are lost to some it is because the prophet was not exercising great amounts of writing in describing so that I have believed it to be far more glorious and beautiful than might be assumed, that the hearts of people not perceive blasphamy and perversity due to the small amount of description, for I would explain that He is all knowing.
Now if someone is insolent to an extent that they are as if ready to fight another because they have seen them and do not know them or of them, and they have seen the beauty of the person, that these are those who rebel and revile what is like a source of great misery for them which has ruined their life and robs them of much, that these are perceived by the soldiers to be possibly dangerous, but a beautiful person has known they do what is reasonable by truth and reality, for if a god is oppressing the peasant does he at least not have compassion and understand that it is a burden for them? But because the peasant has not been counted lucky in this fashion that they are not like a god than is any to blame him if he has resented the beautiful and even the Universe for his lot in life? But it is not seemly for princes to drink much wine, and what is not to be blamed in the ugly and miserable is for them who have much, to understand.
Now if someone is insolent to an extent that they are as if ready to fight another because they have seen them and do not know them or of them, and they have seen the beauty of the person, that these are those who rebel and revile what is like a source of great misery for them which has ruined their life and robs them of much, that these are perceived by the soldiers to be possibly dangerous, but a beautiful person has known they do what is reasonable by truth and reality, for if a god is oppressing the peasant does he at least not have compassion and understand that it is a burden for them? But because the peasant has not been counted lucky in this fashion that they are not like a god than is any to blame him if he has resented the beautiful and even the Universe for his lot in life? But it is not seemly for princes to drink much wine, and what is not to be blamed in the ugly and miserable is for them who have much to understand.
Now if the Christ had not spoken in such a language, in such ways I would not have known, for Babylon employ’s dogs from dogs and they speak beginning with digression and they digress more, that they allow for the great possibility of lies in their speech and their digressions are many and they speak much of things of Ria, and there is much idleness in their conversations, and they speak of coins and metals and walkways and things that are low, and they speak great amount of words around the truth and do not perceive it for they are low to not achieve truth and who can bear to attempt to speak with them of serious things, for to speak over the head of a dog, the dog is pulling a person down to its level to speak lacking intelligence and ducking low from truth, for the dog is below and you would speak as if they were before you as a person. For it is gravity’s and a burden and leaves a person exhausted to attempt to speak to dogs, that they drive the righteous away having accomplished nothing, that they might return to their people being as if ignored, to speak with their own people who are like kings and queens. Now my resentment for Babylon grows and I am saying young, give me a sword, let me kill them all, and yet I have been given no such command.
Now if the Elsnon are making decisions about themselves than let it still be within the realm of the Elsnon, and if the Enoch are saying, yet we build towers now and walls and restrict nature from entering, they are having their own decisions. Now the New Testament is providing wisdom for the Elsnon and all people, and so is the Old Testiment, and I have called Mesopotamia, one world, and the land of Enoch’s The Other World. Now what is given first to the Enochs is also for the Elsnon and what is given first to the Elsnon is also for the Enochs if they desire to understand it. Now what is given first to all is given to all, and nothing is given to dogs, for nothing is cast before them or given in their precense by Mala. Now eat not swine less you become made of much swine and be comparible to them, for nothing also is given to swine or given in their presence.
Now if the Jews would be commiting great offence to the Lord by rebuilding the temple the same than the Earth is the Lord’s. Now if the wisdom of the Arabs has obeyed God to prevent it, that the Jews not sin, yet the Earth is the Lord’s for they save from punishment. Now if in circumsized Israel has groups that are circumsized who have been found by the Christ, the Earth is the Lord’s. Now some of these, are they not the lost tribes? Now will brother not defend brother? But allow Babylon to be forced out for it has filth and seeks to prohibit all from the Lord. Now the Lord is having great strength on Earth, for do not reason by stumbling block but reason by righteousness, for Ria has what is low that is stumbling block but
 Mala and Ria has the truth.
Now if the Jews would be commiting great offence to the Lord by rebuilding the temple the same than the Earth is the Lord’s. Now if the wisdom of the Arabs has obeyed God to prevent it, that the Jews not sin, yet the Earth is the Lord’s for they save from punishment. Now if in circumsized Israel has groups that are circumsized who have been found by the Christ, the Earth is the Lord’s. Now some of these, are they not the lost tribes? Now will brother not defend brother? But allow Babylon to be forced out for it has filth and seeks to prohibit all from the Lord. Now the Lord is having great strength on Earth, for do not reason by stumbling block but reason by righteousness, for Ria has what is low that is stumbling block but Mala and Ria has the truth.
Now if the animals will be seperate, and are, and look out and hear and see and offer their judgements of people and what they do and say, know that justice is the devil to take them for his own for this thing.
Now if the compiling of truth is a book of wisdom what is required for it to be discovered? Now if not all is to be kept in the book what is understood to with-hold any item?
Now if the devil uses truth unjustly as a weapon he uses lies-pride that is joined by the hyphen and is called rillet being an evil spirit that is used by the devil, for it attacks truth because it uses truth as an excuse, not being with any truth but using truth as excuse when the injustice brings forth rillet to be used as a weapon. Now justice declares there is not excuse for rebuke or correction because a person must be able to live with an acceptable level of liberty and it is so. So rillet is used against the just and the cat of nine tails was used against Jesus, who was a man, and the Christ.
Now if the devil’s people are emboldened by the Christ’s death, even though he defeated it, saying God does not see and hear for He would not even prevent the devil, our lord, for His son, then they reason as fools, people ignorant, for they do not think but reason as animals who see a rock or a branch and no more, that something was permitted once and they turn to the devil for him to be their lord, that they take his spirit, that their spirits give loyalty to him, that they do not say in their hearts, there is the Lord who takes action, who has the Universe. Now worship the devil in ignorance or petition the Lord to spare you when your group has done wrong. Now to find use for the spirit of a less liked king, real men do not worship the devil. Now if any finds use for Jeroboam and his ways than know that he is still a king of Israel. Now men do not worship the devil or be atheists because of fear of being a man.
Now if the devil’s people are emboldened by the Christ’s death, even though he defeated it, saying God does not see and hear for He would not even prevent the devil, our lord, for His son, then they reason as fools, people ignorant, for they do not think but reason as animals who see a rock or a branch and no more, that something was permitted once and they turn to the devil for him to be their lord, that they take his spirit, that their spirits give loyalty to him, that they do not say in their hearts, there is the Lord who takes action, who has the Universe. Now worship the devil in ignorance or petition the Lord to spare you when your group has done wrong. 
Now if the devil’s people are emboldened by the Christ’s death, even though he defeated it, saying God does not see and hear for He would not even prevent the devil, our lord, for His son, then they reason as fools, people ignorant, for they do not think but reason as animals who see a rock or a branch and no more, that something was permitted once and they turn to the devil for him to be their lord, that they take his spirit, that their spirits give loyalty to him, that they do not say in their hearts, there is the Lord who takes action, who has the Universe. Now worship the devil in ignorance or petition the Lord to spare you when your group has done wrong. Now to find use for the spirit of a less liked king, real men do not worship the devil.
Now if the devil’s people are emboldened by the Christ’s death, even though he defeated it, saying God does not see and hear for He would not even prevent the devil, our lord, for His son, then they reason as fools, people ignorant, for they do not think but reason as animals who see a rock or a branch and no more, that something was permitted once and they turn to the devil for him to be their lord, that they take his spirit, that their spirits give loyalty to him, that they do not say in their hearts, there is the Lord who takes action, who has the Universe. Now worship the devil in ignorance or petition the Lord to spare you when your group has done wrong. Now to find use for the spirit of a king of Israel, real men do not worship the devil. Now if any finds use for Jeroboam and his ways than know that he is still a king of Israel. Now men do not worship the devil or be atheists because of fear of being a man. Now if the soldiers of cities are real men there will be peace. 
Now if the devil’s people are emboldened by the Christ’s death, even though he defeated it, saying God does not see and hear for He would not even prevent the devil, our lord, for His son, then they reason as fools, people ignorant, for they do not think but reason as animals who see a rock or a branch and no more, that something was permitted once and they turn to the devil for him to be their lord, that they take his spirit, that their spirits give loyalty to him, that they do not say in their hearts, there is the Lord who takes action, who has the Universe. Now worship the devil in ignorance or petition the Lord to spare you when your group has done wrong. Now to find use for the spirit of a less liked king, real men do not worship the devil. Now if any finds use for Jeroboam and his ways than know that he is still a king of Israel. Now men do not worship the devil or be atheists because of fear of being a man.
Now if the fig tree does not have fruit when I come, than I will leave it to God, because Avram prepared a meal and inquired, Abraham, and if these do not regard what Jacob did than I will judge that they are an unworthy people. For they say, the work was all done by our anscestors to do well and we need not do anything good anymore, for we are Christians, a chosen people, and what we do will be right because none will be with their foot on the Earth and we inherit all by history. Now who is watching? But if any is watching what do they look for? But if any has entertained angels without their knowing than surely those who are rich will do right when they read the signs, for they are able to read the signs. But if any can read the signs I will want for God to place a mark over their door, and if any is doing for the one who commands me than what am I to say to Him who commands me? But if they are cold I believe it will be better for them than Luke-warm because the foolishness of neither hot nor cold has been insolent and ignorant of truth, for it does not take serious what is serious. But if any is wicked and turning their back to me rather than cold, then I have already had judgement concerning them. But if Babylon has made the Earth poor and Luke-warm than I will give a blessing to Avram and to the Jews both. But if there are any Christians who are reading the signs and watching I will desire for Jews to be with it and both having good.
Now if the fig tree does not have fruit when I come, than I will leave it to God, because Avram prepared a meal and inquired, Abraham, and if these do not regard what Jacob did than I will judge that they are an unworthy people. For they say, the work was all done by our anscestors to do well and we need not do anything good anymore, for we are Christians, a chosen people, and what we do will be right because none will be with their foot on the Earth and we inherit all by history. Now who is watching? But if any is watching what do they look for? But if any has entertained angels without their knowing than surely those who are rich will do right when they read the signs, for they are able to read the signs. But if any can read the signs I will want for God to place a mark over their door, and if any is doing for the one who commands me than what am I to say to Him who commands me? But if they are cold I believe it will be better for them than Luke-warm because the foolishness of neither hot nor cold has been insolent and ignorant of truth, for it does not take serious what is serious. But if any is wicked and turning their back to me rather than cold, then I have already had judgement concerning them. But if Babylon has made the Earth poor and Luke-warm than I will give a blessing to Avram and to the Jews both. But if there are any Christians who are reading the signs and watching I will desire for Jews to be with it and both having good.
Now if the hard metals and sharp rocks are robbing you than you have known of Babylon, that it is real, for they take prostitutes and abuse themselves. Now if you are refusing to sacrifice to God than you have known of a city that is depleted. But if you are dwelling with those who raise the gate than you have known of a vessel that is filled with holes. But if you have known of not keeping to your own life than you have known of a city with a broken wall. But if any marches around your dwelling place than you have known two messengers. But if you have known wicked speaking than you have known holes and corruptions. But if you have known restraint than you have known the hardening of Jews. But if you have known the disobediences to Moses than you have known even more. Now if any is saying, I have no need of God and yet He is faithful. Now if any is saying no need of the son and yet the city is dead and over-run
 with sand and rocks and scorpions.
Now if the hard metals and sharp rocks are robbing you than you have known of Babylon, that it is real, for they take prostitutes and abuse themselves. Now if you are refusing to sacrifice to God than you have known of a city that is depleted. But if you are dwelling with those who raise the gate than you have known of a vessel that is filled with holes. But if you have known of not keeping to your own life than you have known of a city with a broken wall. But if any marches around your dwelling place than you have known two messengers. But if you have known wicked speaking than you have known holes and corruptions. But if you have known restraint than you have known the hardening of Jews. But if you have known the disobediences to Moses than you have known even more. Now if any is saying, I have no need of God and yet He is faithful. Now if any is saying no need of the son and yet the city is dead and over-run with sand and rocks and scorpions. Now if you have been physically poisoned in some way than you have known that the devil is hateful. Now if you have understood the cruelty of Babylon than know the wisdom of obeying those teachings of Christianity, for you do not enter a place that has much fear of God.
Now if the king in Mala during the age is sending out servants to act through people, that the spirit is for persecution, than do you not yield that it be changed when you gather? But if you change that in the heaven than does it not change on Earth? But you are still not testing God for the heaven and the Earth is there. Now why have the prophets prophesied in this way? Yet it is simple that you are able to understand, for you have not had to interpret dreams to understand. But the fools of such are wise, and those pursuing the unseen not being blind, that the blind have called them fools, and yet the blind know and only shut their eyes intentionally for if they do not see well, yet they see.
Now if the king in Mala during the age is sending out servants to act through people, that the spirit is for persecution, than do you not yield that it be changed when you gather? But if you change that in the heaven than does it not change on Earth? But you are still not testing God for the heaven and the Earth is there. Now why have the prophets prophesied in this way? Yet it is simple that you are able to understand, for you have not had to interpret dreams to understand. But the fools of such are wise, and those pursuing the unseen not being blind, that the blind have called them fools, and yet the blind know and only shut their eyes intentionally for if they do not see well, yet they see.
Now if the language of Babel is confused again do they not stumble and still not walk? But the calf is young and just born and it stumbles with its flexibility, but it is still easy to love unless others should stray because of it or do evil to defend it against those who will not kill it, for does it not have its service? But if some do evil against God’s kingdoms because of it then it is not done for the calf.
Now if the language of Babel is confused again do they not stumble and still not walk? But the calf is young and just born and it stumbles with its flexibility, but it is still easy to love unless others should stray because of it or do evil to defend it against those who will not kill it, for does it not have its service? But if some do evil against God’s kingdoms because of it then it is not done for the calf.
Now if the light of the face threatens the animal that it attacks rather than be in terror than it is bowing, for it would rather bow as if before a god, but those with self control keep themselves from falling in attack that they bow.
Now if the nation behind a wall casts away substance, and are not fullfilling righteousness to the easier and easily understood measures than they have been lasting behind that curtain which was to keep away the mighty and mightier than them are with God. Now if they have rationed when it is not needed in order to revive at a later time because of corruptions and perversities of wealth than it is so that they are boasting about a state of rationing. Now they have cast away daughters and they are not of many soldiers, and they have exalted the past that is better than the recent for bragging, that they have received generosity of knowledge and understanding and speak about their ancient ancestors who were away from competition. Now they have accepted patronizing compliments and begun to boast and they had already exalted themselves.
Now if the old Satan is teaching you foolishness from hate, than I would want you to have wisdom, that you not think I deceive or if you do you are not being commanded by me. But if any would be a virgin who is woman let them not hate themselves or hate themselves enough to be commiting hateful actions towards men. For a woman who hates herself is having enough of such hate to severe herself from the one who would be her husband with actions that demonstrate such and words. Now if she is hating herself for the purpose of virginity than what man can resent her? But the Christ will be husband of women who choose to maintain virginity for life. Now what if she is unable because the self is putting great control on her to maintain virginity? For she has desired to be as others. But if any woman has been fatherless than it is not good and if it has been the cause than there was not even a boy in child-good she admired. But if any stubbornness has seized her than has she been robbed of both? But let it be that she is not yet ready even if such control has still seized her. But if she is driving men away let her take the right path for she is not yet able.
Now if the one who comes after me, if there be some, to strategize, find errors mostly large, is beating the enemy back and replacing with His kingdom, then let him defeat 5 or 6 times that the victory last hundreds of years beyond him and let the next devour completely that it lasts thousands of years, but I write about spiritual things and even those who are for building.
Now if the one who molests children is purified to peace than if they will not go further, yet they are still capable of killing and their fear coming upon them, they are likely to attempt many times, so that their actions are becoming desperate and without prudence, and their attempts knowable to those they are among. Now if there is the same type who will be violent than it is so to a condemned and wretched slaughterer that’s head is piled with blood and fire, for such is truly a violent person as only a wicked man can be called truly violent.
Now if the one who molests children is purified to peace than if they will not go further, yet they are still capable of killing and their fear coming upon them, they are likely to attempt many times, so that their actions are becoming desperate and without prudence, and their attempts knowable to those they are among. Now if there is the same type who will be violent than it is so to a condemned and wretched slaughterer that’s head is piled with blood and fire, for such is truly a violent person as only a wicked man can be called truly violent.
Now if the person is an animal who was looking where they did not have right to look, than they were a weapon, and they could not perceive themselves, for the one who finds, not being an animal, is restraining and moving away, for they perceive they have no right. Now how does one with foolish actions deceive themselves and say, yet I am above myself, that they are above truth and reason, falling far below.
Now if the person is an animal who was looking where they did not have right to look, than they were a weapon, and they could not perceive themselves, for the one who finds, not being an animal, is restraining and moving away, for they perceive they have no right. Now how does one with foolish actions deceive themselves and say, yet I am above myself, that they are above truth and reason, falling far below.
Now if the person is not admitting they are a fully committed soldier of the devil, but they are saying they do not know better, or that their intentions are good, then they are a very sick dog.
Now if the soldiers are like an occupying force than they are Babylon’s soldiers, and if not they are the nations in Ria.
Now if the soldiers of cities and towns are like an occupying force than they are Babylon’s soldiers, and if not they are the nation’s in Ria.
Now if the soldiers of cities and towns are like an occupying force than they are Babylon’s soldiers, and if not they are the nation’s in Ria.
Now if the throne of the prophecy is in Mala and upon the whole Earth, than what spirit is acting? But if the servants of a righteous king are taking action than is it not a good time? But I would be wondering about praying for the world and such spirits that are acting through people that where two or three are praying the thing might be over-powered. For is the Christ not with you? Now if the prophets are multiplied is it not a good time? Now if peace is abounding than is it not good? But the prophets are offering truth and what can be used that they might aid the church. 
Now if the throne of the prophecy is in Mala and upon the whole Earth, than what spirit is acting? But if the servants of a righteous king are taking action than is it not a good time? But I would be wondering about praying for the world and such spirits that are acting through people that where two or three are praying the thing might be over-powered. For is the Christ not with you? Now if the prophets are multiplied is it not a good time? Now if peace is abounding than is it not good? But the prophets are offering truth and what can be used that they might aid the church. 
Now if the ugly is relegated by what is not their business than are they not for
 making a spectacle as if they were of a right and as if it was their business, but there is no such fairness by righteousness for the ugly.
Now if the wicked are disturbing the resting place of righteousness, than how do they, the zeolots who are calling themselves ugly, calling anything they do right by any standard? But the space between one extreme or the other is large and hard to traverse, and a person who does great discord reaps them for what is not to their benifit. Now if they mislead some with deceptions than they do not give guidance.
Now if the zeolot defends the works of the enemy, the devil, against us than you should know what they, the zeolot, are.
Now if their jelousy is greater than their sense of reality that their mouth is in a place because of jelousy than where they should be if angry, than such moves stones in themselves and does it not cause them injury?
Now if there are a type of zeolot in your land that are to be Christian and they are not using their full ability of comprehension and sentience which is sometimes ignored to find excuse where there is actually none so that all can really be said is there is nothing here for consideration yet, that so far I am loyal and useful by being useless, and the zealots are being like those who are zeolous in the way that they ignore their own sentience than know that by sentience it is not possible for them to believe they do good unless they are severely impaired by what is not even mental illness but they are a mentally ill sociopath if they are not knowing what they are and it is the sociopath aspect that makes them so as they would be too disabled if they were so mentally ill. Now if they know they do wrong than what are they? But they are greatly in pride and anger that any has spoken a thing that has not respected their camp well enough that they are a foolish wilderness tribe, wrathful and war-like who are only wanting any war. For they move like a group of bandits to wage war upon holy places and those who have offended them for they are an extremely foolish and war-like tribe that does not keep with Christianity but claims it in a false way and is associating God and the Christ only with them that they are proud and angry where they perceive disrespect towards them because God and the Christ are in their opinion only theirs. Now if this tribe is furious and war-like and casts away good as if it was evil including words of peace or anything righteous from those who are not with them, they are not for considering other people in their isolation, and so the soldiers must use heavy weapons to smash the hardness of their skulls that they might be judged rightly. But great wrath and intense power can be brought against them, and their lack of reason can be reasoned with rifles and knives. Now these are wicked and insolent fools who seek to kill and destroy without judgements of morality, so that it is clear what must be done with them, but it is for the great power of kings and queens.
Now if there black people who are sensative are they not also sensative for you? But the one who is considering serious things and treating them as if serious, are they not to be favoured for this, when their wisdom is shown in the time when it is shown? But if you are guarding your sisters because of this consideration that is the physical ethnicity than will you consider yourselves to be knowing what the one who is not doing so is? For this discord is becoming ugly in small ways and perceived by the wise who are with those doing well. But can this evil be with you if you are people of the kingdom? Indeed it shows that some have not understood and a place is having division and yet no great evil that they would discuss it because you do not consider the wise, because you do not regard the better standard. For you are for gaining wisdom and yet do not regard it when there is a matter for the wise? But only when such is defiled by wicked criticisms is there anything wrong in it. But know that injustice is understood and that the wise women of Egypt were fearing God even so far as to risk their lives and this is not also true of the Egyptian men? But indeed it is true and it is not the physical ethnicity you ever deal with in problems but only what is true in the eyes of God.
Now if there is a man among you who believes that there must be injustice if he is jealous, this one is not a man, and if he is then acting as if he was commiting justice than with with what he does so all is guilt to him. But if he persists in this matter than he is like a sick bear that would wander about to mail and kill people. So there is pity with some, and yet he must die, being not a human when he persists in this fashion. So being men, holy ones, and Christians or not, you will not permit any animal to live for the life of a human, that you will be counted a human, and a holy one, who has power on Earth, when it is God’s will. For this power is greater than kings and it is upon the Earth, that it is not anarchy but exists with the strong and righteous words of kings and queens that the queen has come down to be like a sister to you, that her might is with you, that the king is without speech, and loved by God, and his throne is established with intense might and anger that is holy, that another crown appears with him.
Now if there is a phrase at this time that is a conduit it is based on false moral ground, and the phrase is the conduit by which evil is rationalized. Now in the place I am at the phrase is, they are believing they are better than us or me. Now any animal acts that are of the devil are rationalized with this phrase. But it is no other’s business to know or judge what another believes and even to believe such is not wrong. Now I call this phrase that is a conduit a bazdak and it is a spiritual device of the devil’s. 
Now if there is the Mishnah Torah than there is the Flame of Belsharum that devours what is not logic, to maim the body, being the instruction of the virus Belsharum to abolish large portions of the body in a way not wise, being what came from the beast that rose up to devour much of the body that spread the flame towards the good lands, being good in resisting them, that sought to cease its progress. Now strength is preserved by what is perceived strength that the strongest parts of the body eradicate the weaker parts of the body in a self-attack method that spreads and destroys until only what is considered strong remains, so that it is thought of like a spartan idealogy only much more extreme. The virus has child variants that utilize weaker parts of the body to attack stronger, strongest, and weak parts of the body in a self-attacking method that disables the host and crippled it. Those infected with the virus suffer loss and suffer dibilitation when the virus is permitted to spread, that can leave the host incapable of fighting external attacks of any kind or further viruses. Treatments are fighter defence replacement to compensate for weakness and lack of function in such defences due to the virus. 
Now if there is the Mishnah Torah than there is the Flame of Belsharum that devours what is not logic, to maim the body, being the instruction of the virus Belsharum to abolish large portions of the body in a way not wise, being what came from the beast that rose up to devour much of the body that spread the flame towards the good lands, being good in resisting them, that sought to cease its progress. Now strength is preserved by what is perceived strength that the strongest parts of the body eradicate the weaker parts of the body in a self-attack method that spreads and destroys until only what is considered strong remains, so that it is thought of like a spartan idealogy only much more extreme. The virus has child variants that utilize weaker parts of the body to attack stronger, strongest, and weak parts of the body in a self-attacking method that disables the host and crippled it. Those infected with the virus suffer loss and suffer dibilitation when the virus is permitted to spread, that can leave the host incapable of fighting external attacks of any kind or further viruses. Treatments are fighter defence replacement to compensate for weakness and lack of function in such defences due to the virus. 
Now if there jelousy is greater than their sense of reality that their mouth is in a place because of jelousy than where they should be if angry, than such moves stones in themselves and does it not cause them injury?
Now if these soldiers are stiff necked and entitled and they are not as most, than what cult is this they have formed? But they are what is called a narcissist and entitled and being entitled to what others have done, that is not them, and others have won for them righteousness and it is not theirs? But they have eaten of what is not clean, being the pig even that they have eaten of, and is it right to accuse the righteous one’s of this? But they have eaten the blood with the meat, and eaten of all that which is not good for them to eat, being a stiff necked people that are utterly filthy, and wickedness is to be mixed with strength because they are righteous by spirit and that spirit being the righteousness of others. Corrupt and criminals and garbed in large black chains and crowns of iniquity and cruelty on their heads that their glory is the horror of hell, and they are even perverse in heart that they profane and commit blasphemy. Now these are not Jews but of a cult that is on Earth, and they do not regard any authority that is above them, and they are corrupt, and their arms and hands are corrupt and their legs and feet are corrupt that their bones are riddled with small holes and decay, and they are rebellious and so against God, against those holy places where they do not belong, where even by their fraud that they gain titles on Earth,
 they have sought to attack where they have no place, in holy places, to cause the pure to sin, to cause the righteous to go astray, that they are self-righteous and claim the kingdom of God for themselves because they will not co-exist, they will not stand back and allow the things of God. They have claimed justice and righteousness by self-righteousness and seek to kill those who are in the kingdom of God, because they are of another kingdom and what is of another is an offence to them.
Now if these soldiers are stiff necked and entitled and they are not as most, than what cult is this they have formed? But they are what is called a narcissist and entitled and being entitled to what others have done, that is not them, and others have won for them righteousness and it is not theirs? But they have eaten of what is not clean, being the pig even that they have eaten of, and is it right to accuse the righteous one’s of this? But they have eaten the blood with the meat, and eaten of all that which is not good for them to eat, being a stiff necked people that are utterly filthy, and wickedness is to be mixed with strength because they are righteous by spirit and that spirit being the righteousness of others. Corrupt and criminals and garbed in large black chains and crowns of iniquity and cruelty on their heads that their glory is the horror of hell, and they are even perverse in heart that they profane and commit blasphemy. Now these are not Jews but of a cult that is on Earth, and they do not regard any authority that is above them, and they are corrupt, and their arms and hands are corrupt and their legs and feet are corrupt that their bones are riddled with small holes and decay, and they are rebellious and so against God, against those holy places where they do not belong, where even by their fraud that they gain titles on Earth, they have sought to attack where they have no place, in holy places, to cause the pure to sin, to cause the righteous to go astray, that they are self-righteous and claim the kingdom of God for themselves because they will not co-exist, they will not stand back and allow the things of God. They have claimed justice and righteousness by self-righteousness and seek to kill those who are in the kingdom of God, because they are of another kingdom and what is of another is an offence to them.
Now if they speak words of soldiers than it is known they are in the battle, the soldiers with the anti-Christ that are knowing in their hearts that they are commited to fighting the children of God and God, that they know the battle and the sides and that they are for the anti-Christ that they might speak of doing battle with the house of God. Now where is there any knowledge of ethnicity in this thing? But do not be deceived about the reality of truth that there are many different ethnicities on both sides.  Now the elder brother is not so by ethnicity and neither the kings, that there not be foolish discord. But is the kingdom of Heaven to be divided when the kingdom of the devil is not? But the house of God is mighty. 
Now if those having a type of heart that is a type of young mess that they are climbing on the mighty messenger when he lingers too long around them, it is not a matter for much anger, only if there are matters he must tend to it is appreciated that those with wisdom show consideration even if they are not commanded to do so.
Now if those having a type of heart that is a type of young mess that they are climbing on the mighty messenger when he lingers too long around them, it is not a matter for much anger, only if there are matters he must tend to it is appreciated that those with wisdom show consideration even if they are not commanded to do so.
Now if those having a type of heart that is a type of youngness that they are climbing on the mighty messenger when he lingers too long around them, it is not a matter for much anger, only if there are matters he must tend to it is appreciated that those with wisdom show consideration even if they are not commanded to do so.
Now if those having a type of heart that is a type of youngness that they are climbing on the mighty messenger when he lingers too long around them, it is not a matter for much anger, only if there are matters he must tend to it is appreciated that those with wisdom show consideration even if they are not commanded to do so.
Now if those who love wrestle a little it is an entirely different thing than those who mock. Now the one who is focused much on his own life is not the enemy of any and he has even cast off his family and he succeeds, for he is not concerned with the happenings of others because he has his own life. Now is he not to be a leader in the city, even in the capital, for do not think he is not pleasing to God. But he is one who succeeds and cuts himself off, saying my portion is where it is and I do not take interest in the portion of another. Joy you have given to me, and yet you do not work for me. For a wise person as this is doing wisdom and they are judging with fairness by their integrity and yet there are still things greater than them. Now let not the giving of wisdom be used for wickedness in accusations that make one dispicable and display one like a child when they are not. But if many are focusing on their own lives than many good things are concealed with wisdom that the wise do not permit the giving of wisdom to cause them to abandon life and to go into foolishness and wickedness, for they are capable.
Now if ugly people should try to trick you saying be you ugly like us, than truly they are ugly and jelous. But the way of life is above to the wise to depart from the snares of hell.
Now if you are about to die from poverty will you become a servant of Babylon? But who is judging the person who will become this when a person will die because of the starvation, for the hunger and thirst for anything is a great thing to bear and can any withstand it? But do not think I speak of anything that is not so, truly. For if a person will give a false confession to the one who will not accept that there is complete innocence because it does not matter and changes nothing, and it is so, than why would any who has sinned and cannot pass the fullness of tests without the Christ with them, of doing wrong? But none are even able to judge those with the Christ, and this is His, when they are not passing every test. But let the things of the Christ be for Him, and the things of men and women, for them to judge, for what is the Christ’s is not for the servants of the devil to judge, or even for those of the Christ to another who is with the Christ. But if you are not able without Him than by what means do you judge what is for Him? Now the Pharisees are saying to the Christ, a man, throw yourself down and they have not gone up. But the time and place for the angels is known for where it is.
Now if you are about to die from poverty will you become a servant of Babylon? But who is judging the person who will become this when a person will die because of the starvation, for the hunger and thirst for anything is a great thing to bear and can any withstand it? But do not think I speak of anything that is not so, truly. For if a person will give a false confession to the one who will not accept that there is complete innocence because it does not matter and changes nothing, and it is so, than why would any who has sinned and cannot pass the fullness of tests without the Christ with them, of doing wrong? But none are even able to judge those with the Christ, and this is His, when they are not passing every test. But let the things of the Christ be for Him, and the things of men and women, for them to judge, for what is the Christ’s is not for the servants of the devil to judge, or even for those of the Christ to another who is with the Christ. But if you are not able without Him than by what means do you judge what is for Him? Now the Pharisees are saying to the Christ, a man, throw yourself down and they have not gone up. But the time and place for the angels is known for where it is.
Now if you are about to die from poverty will you become a servant of Babylon? But who is judging the person who will become this when a person will die because of the starvation, for the hunger and thirst for anything is a great thing to bear and can any withstand it? But do not think I speak of anything that is not so, truly. For if a person will give a false confession to the one who will not accept that there is complete innocence because it does not matter and changes nothing, and it is so, than why would any who has sinned and cannot pass the fullness of tests without the Christ with them, accusing any of doing wrong? But none are even able to judge those with the Christ, and this is His, when they are not passing every test. But let the things of the Christ be for Him, and the things of men and women, for them to judge, for what is the Christ’s is not for the servants of the devil to judge, or even for those of the Christ to another who is with the Christ. But if you are not able without Him than by what means do you judge what is for Him? Now the Pharisees are saying to the Christ, a man, throw yourself down and they have not gone up. But the time and place for the angels is known for where it is.
Now if you are as Joshua as a nation you are to do as Joshua, that you might not be found in disobedience to God. For if you have been called to obey do you say, but I remain blessed as a child? But the one is asked of when they become of ability to be asked of, for Moses even was not asked of until later.
Now if you are believing all the person needs is to be bullied back once than you may not realize the extent. For the person would have to be raised again for a period without siblings, for unresolved matters.
Now if you are choosing
 the power of God you are choosing that which is suceeding and victorious, but if you are choosing the power of the devil are you not making yourself servant to that which will have defeat? But God is giving crowns to those believing in the Christ and following repentance.
Now if you are choosing those loyal and of the people in this way they are then loyal to you and to endure with you being loyal to the people and of the people, that you may seperate all these from all that is not the people that brutish fools might not distract you. Now this is for a king.
Now if you are gaining things just for what is given than you are believing that God is righteous, and if you are rewarded greatly than is it not good? But the one who would attempt to cast away must cast away their own portion and reward, for such is looking upon another in jelousy that to look is already folly when it is such looking. For the man who looks is alienating himself from what he has, and yet if wisdom has loved him, those I think well of are to gain, but the one confessing matters that are not is with wisdom and truth that they are not foolish, and the man has answered it is only making sense that wisdom has prevailed. 
Now if you are gaining things just for what is given than you are believing that God is righteous, and if you are rewarded greatly than is it not good? But the one who would attempt to cast away must cast away their own portion and reward, for such is looking upon another in jelousy that to look is already folly when it is such looking. For the man who looks is alienating himself from what he has, and yet if wisdom has loved him, those I think well of are to gain, but the one confessing matters that are not is with wisdom and truth that they are not foolish, and the man has answered it is only making sense, for wisdom has prevailed. 
Now if you are leaking intelligence of consequence than how will I support you, to say you do justice? But are you truly finding people betraying morality? But if you are leaking intelligence that you have obtained by crime than you are guilty of a crime that you know of, and leaking intelligence about vital things? But life and death has not been delt with prior by your type because this is not their way prior. Now if you are to commit trechory is it without thought because it is your way? But this was not the way prior and the heirchy will declare it, for they scorn them who do such. But the one who commits trechory and is praised is the one who has saved the people from criminals who were in treason. Now if they are not treasonous and you are saving no lives than you know what it is. 
Now if you are leaking intelligence of consequence than how will I support you, to say you do justice? But are you truly finding people betraying morality? But if you are leaking intelligence that you have obtained by crime than you are guilty of a crime that you know of, and leaking intelligence about vital things? But life and death has not been delt with prior by your type because this is not their way prior. Now if you are to commit trechory is it without thought because it is your way? But this was not the way prior and the heirchy will declare it, for they scorn them who do such. But the one who commits trechory and is praised is the one who has saved the people from criminals who were in treason. Now if they are not treasonous and you are saving no lives than you know what it is. 
Now if you are taking that of the puritanical yet it is good for you, and yet it is not commanded. For some of it is good for one but not another, and yet jelousy must not inform you, and if you have taken some from the Jews and it is good for you, yet an ignorant fool is crying out. Now if you are judging than you are not judgemental by the measure of its meaning that you are a people with Christians, for over judgement is considered what is judgemental by the standard of Gentiles. Now if you are not attempting judgement, than know that the Christ told you not to judge. But if there are pharasses of Christianity than they are condemning the righteous and innocent. But if any is calling to each other in the street do they not bicker with a heavy thing towards what is pure? But if any bickers such than bitterness is mixed with sand and such a person they speak of is not required for the freedom is offered and the way. Now if nothing is removed from God than the Christ does not remove the truth of right and wrong in matters of justice, that wickedness is not commited for Christianity.
Now if you are taking wives not believing in God but believing in other gods, is it not cruel to be divorcing your wife if you are to join in worshiping other gods? But the Jews have prior done things not sin without knowing it, for they are human-level, rising to kings, and they have not much strayed without meaning to because of Moses and the serpant of Moses.
Now if you are taking wives not believing in God but believing in other gods, is it not cruel to be divorcing your wife if you are to join in worshiping other gods? But the Jews have prior done things not sin without knowing it, for they are human-level, rising to kings, and they have not much strayed without meaning to because of Moses and the serpant of Moses.
Now if you are to lose because you do not take more, than why is it to be called good that you take less? But God has wanted for you to take more.
Now if you discovered an alien planet in a far galaxy would you be more concerned with whether you were a molestor of children or not? But if you are to judge anything than can any change what God has placed the Ocean as? But if you are to continue than will you not be in righteousness as best you can? But I will not support these only I would want to do what is right for the Earth, that if I will be given a time where I am not sent to judge than will I not speak truth? But the judgement has not changed with my words and I do not attempt to change the Ocean. Let it be a private consideration then like a duty performed by one whose duties you do not have. But let it be in the diary and the book that concerns many things of war, both, that it might be quoted from that which is not the diary when it is right. Now for the Elsnon it is if you discovered such would you be more concerned about your theft of something that you stole. Do not find in taking things out of context some other religion that is of the devil. For if any should come from the Elsnon who are not Elsnon and they produce children that would turn against us and be against God, than it should be known by them that they are to know the limit that they may be Elsnon.
Now if you discovered an alien planet in a far galaxy would you be more concerned with whether you were a molestor of children or not? But if you are to judge anything than can any change what God has placed the Ocean as? But if you are to continue than will you not be in righteousness as best you can? But I will not support these only I would want to do what is right for the Earth, that if I will be given a time where I am not sent to judge than will I not speak truth? But the judgement has not changed with my words and I do not attempt to change the Ocean. Let it be a private consideration then like a duty performed by one whose duties you do not have. But let it be in the diary and the book that concerns many things of war, both, that it might be quoted from that which is not the diary when it is right. Now for the Elsnon it is if you discovered such would you be more concerned about your theft of something that you stole. Do not find in taking things out of context some other religion that is of the devil. For if any should come from the Elsnon who are not Elsnon and they produce children that would turn against us and be against God, than it should be known by them that they are to know the limit that they may be Elsnon.
Now if you fall from shelf to shelf lower beneath ur than is it good? But some have died because of it and yet had then begun on the lower shelf they might not have died. Now does not Orgoth possess the lake of fire and the river of fire that drops to a lower shelf? Now the lowest, being the first, is truly not against the killing of children where jelousy of foolish adults is concerned, and such is an abomination to men on Earth. Now Babel has the statue in which trust is placed, and if the kingdom is split can those of the kingdom of heaven survive in either?  But the silver of Babel I have not placed there for the strategies of peace they have already had by nature of nuetraulity, that such war is building and not fighting against, that the silver is not even that great in Ijeshil because of the alliances which would be unjust are many, that much is Babylon and Rome, and the place is giving wisdom. But if more silver is found it is for good and that alliance with those not abusing, that the silver is also to remind of the regarding of God, and fear of Him.
Now if you have grown up very poor than do not let it be so if you are to be among those who did not for none of who are the people have grown up poor for it is not possible for a great people. But if you are not choosing it, than it is true and good to be poor in spirit and is it not a real thing? But those who strive are coming by the wrong way to do wickedness for righteousness is coming the right way. Now there is that time and place where much is decaying into wickedness and folly because the lions are missing and there is that place where they are not required. Now around Israel and the Elsnon there are lions in those parts that these are parts where there are people to sometimes be around lions and for some every day that it is good.
Now if your wife cannot bear Jews as they are a burden for her, is she not of your own people. Why will you rebuke her when she is not for doing any evil to
 them? But why will a man be hating Jews to an extent that he stoops to slander? For such is not the same for a man, that he is capable of bearing Jews. Now what if it be that the woman is able to bear some Jews, than it is good, and if she would wish to marry a Jew, than is she not joining in one body? But it is necessary to speak the truth because the ignorance is worse than the truth, that such is because of a different people, being a spiritual thing, that not being a Jew, and made by God from the man’s rib, she is to be considered capable only of what she is. Now I am wishing for there to be no significant resentment for Jews, for they are God’s chosen and are knowing it is not some resented thing of animals, but that which God has done, that people are made different. Now if Jews are to recognize the lack of will to do harm, than it is understood as what is made by God. But the angel is not finding it disagreeable to be among Jews, and has also loved Jewish woman, that my place in this might be understood without deception, for I am one who has praised the Jews in telling the truth, although I am for Christians, most of whom are not Jews, and yet I am not having notice of Jews as anything more than what they are, that I have not had to choose loyalties because of pety matters.
Now imagine all is war are when a person does not retaliate for injustice against a group then there is retaliation from heaven and a number of them are slayn and a number become sick and their supplies are taken away because there was not retaliation but they said I am a sinner and have done wrong, but I am still wronged that in humility as one who is guilty as well, you might give justice. Now if any wrongs the holy then will you not show you are not a fool to save yourself by doing what is right, or do you also say, God does not see or hear? But is it God who does not see well? Now the Luke-warm having sent a charm of half atheism and it has infected those who believe in the Lord and His son.
Now imagine all is war are when a person does not retaliate for injustice against a group then there is retaliation from heaven and a number of them are slayn and a number become sick and their supplies are taken away because there was not retaliation but they said I am a sinner and have done wrong, but I am still wronged that in humility as one who is guilty as well, you might give justice. Now if any wrongs the holy then will you not show you are not a fool to save yourself by doing what is right, or do you also say, God does not see or hear? But is it God who does not see well? Now the Luke-warm having sent a charm of half atheism and it has infected those who believe in the Lord and His son.
Now imagine all is war are when a person does not retaliate for injustice against a group then there is retaliation from heaven and a number of them are slayn and a number become sick and their supplies are taken away because there was not retaliation but they said I am a sinner and have done wrong, but I am still wronged that in humility as one who is guilty as well, you might give justice. Now if any wrongs the holy then will you not show you are not a fool to save yourself by doing what is right, or do you also say, God does not see or hear? But is it God who does not see well? Now the Luke-warm having sent a charm of half atheism and it has infected those who believe in the Lord and His son.
Now imagine all is war are when a person does not retaliate for injustice against a group then there is retaliation from heaven and a number of them are slayn and a number become sick and their supplies are taken away because there was not retaliation but they said I am a sinner and have done wrong, but I am still wronged that in humility as one who is guilty as well, you might give justice. Now if any wrongs the holy then will you not show you are not a fool to save yourself by doing what is right, or do you also say, God does not see or hear? But is it God who does not see well? Now the Luke-warm having sent a charm of half atheism and it has infected those who believe in the Lord and His son.
Now imagine all is war are when a person does not retaliate for injustice against a group then there is retaliation from heaven and a number of them are slayn and a number become sick and their supplies are taken away because there was not retaliation but they said I am a sinner and have done wrong, but I am still wronged that in humility as one who is guilty as well, you might give justice. Now if any wrongs the holy then will you not show you are not a fool to save yourself by doing what is right, or do you also say, God does not see or hear? But is it God who does not see well? Now the Luke-warm having sent a charm of half atheism and it has infected those who believe in the Lord and His son.
Now in democracy not even the king is high enough that they cannot commit treason, but in monarchy it is not so. Now the Lord is a God and is God that He created the whole Universe and everything in it and He is a father to people, being the father, that he is caring for people without neglect. 
Now in righteousness supremacy there are Enochs and they are with the knowledge of Elsnon who are a little east of Israel and the Enochs dwell in the New World, in the rich forests and plains and in the jungle to the south, for they are leaving the world for Enoch’s land where there are even the dragons remaining being even those that are warm blooded. Now the land is on the different level than Ria and yet Ria and Mala agree. Now the Christ is for Enochs for it is good that Enochs not be denying Him. Now the star of Enoch, does it collide with the mourning star, but the mourning star, the Christ, is over the star, Enoch. Now the Elsnon are dwelling in that world of Israel, the Elsnon, and Babylon, and the terum, and Entashi, and the angel has visited Ria, but where there is Mala, and attacked China, and he will say he has visited India, because the kind humour for one is not right for the other. 
Now in righteousness supremacy there are Enochs and they are with the knowledge of Elsnon who are a little east of Israel and the Enochs dwell in the New World, in the rich forests and plains and in the jungle to the south, for they are leaving the world for Enoch’s land where there are even the dragons remaining being even those that are warm blooded. Now the land is on the different level than Ria and yet Ria and Mala agree. Now the Christ is for Enochs for it is good that Enochs not be denying Him. Now the star of Enoch, does it collide with the mourning star, but the mourning star, the Christ, is over the star, Enoch. Now the Elsnon are dwelling in that world of Israel, the Elsnon, and Babylon, and the terum, and Entashi, and the angel has visited Ria, but where there is Mala, and attacked China, and he will say he has visited India, because the kind humour for one is not right for the other. 
Now in the kingdom disintigrating Babylon the soldiers are slave owners with servants and slave animals and the slave owners are not doing the battle of soldiers but all the kingdom does it’s part. Now Babylon puts the soldiers in their prisons where there are criminals, and yet some already there are the mighty who are soldiers who are not criminals, for Babylon has no authority to label the kingdom’s soldiers as criminals. But if they speak this wickedness it is more against themselves, and does not Babylon have those not intelligent enough to be spit out of that city, for the devil is diligent to spit them out, for he is not liking to be consumed with strategies of ease for the kingdom’s of God, but is there not war? But the devil is not a fool, for he does not allow fighting as if sport that he might be overthrown by adhering to the Lord and allowing what is just. But he fights to win and spits them out with his servant’s heart’s hardened and firmly commited without doubt or temptation, for they are given a stubborn heart to be loyal that they obey with strong loyalty and will die at their post if they must. Now the soldiers of cities who are Babylon are carrying out the cowardly tasks of condemning themselves, as reproof for themselves against treachery, in saying the kingdom’s soldiers are not soldiers but truly criminals, for they are tempted by God, and by this even those tempted to disloyalty to the devil, are carrying out the cowardice and diligence of capturing the kingdom’s mighty soldiers while they are at peace, by entering their homes in ambush when there are not other soldiers and battle, that they strike as those being secretive and stealing, and so they go behind the enemies line and capture mighty men when they are not wearing the sword, for they are at their house and there is no battle, and are they not to say, because they are tempted by God, that the mighty men and women who are brave and mighty soldiers, operated the same way? But they did not for it was a just mission and the Lord has declared war and there is threat of Babylon. Now may the Lord shut the ears of the mighty to rebuke of the wicked Babylonians, for they are even allies with Nimrod, who aids them and sends his people to convert.
Now in the kingdom disintigrating Babylon the soldiers are slave owners with servants and slave animals and the slave owners are not doing the battle of soldiers but all the kingdom does it’s part. Now Babylon puts the soldiers in their prisons where there are criminals, and yet some already there are the mighty who are soldiers who are not criminals, for Babylon has no authority to label the kingdom’s soldiers as criminals. But if they speak this wickedness it is more against themselves, and does not Babylon have those not intelligent enough to be spit out of that city, for the devil is diligent to spit them out, for he is not liking to be consumed with strategies of ease for the kingdom’s
 of God, but is there not war? But the devil is not a fool, for he does not allow fighting as if sport that he might be overthrown by adhering to the Lord and allowing what is just. But he fights to win and spits them out with his servant’s heart’s hardened and firmly commited without doubt or temptation, for they are given a stubborn heart to be loyal that they obey with strong loyalty and will die at their post if they must. Now the soldiers of cities who are Babylon are carrying out the cowardly tasks of condemning themselves, as reproof for themselves against treachery, in saying the kingdom’s soldiers are not soldiers but truly criminals, for they are tempted by God, and by this even those tempted to disloyalty to the devil, are carrying out the cowardice and diligence of capturing the kingdom’s mighty soldiers while they are at peace, by entering their homes in ambush when there are not other soldiers and battle, that they strike as those being secretive and stealing, and so they go behind the enemies line and capture mighty men when they are not wearing the sword, for they are at their house and there is no battle, and are they not to say, because they are tempted by God, that the mighty men and women who are brave and mighty soldiers, operated the same way? But they did not for it was a just mission and the Lord has declared war and there is threat of Babylon. Now may the Lord shut the ears of the mighty to rebuke of the wicked Babylonians, for they are even allies with Nimrod, who aids them and sends his people to convert.
Now in the land of criminals are the three sons who are three criminals and they dwell on three different shelves. Now smoke comes from the mountain as offering to the Lord, for they are criminals and not Orgoth. Now the mountain is Korhalum and it is a mountain coated with ash and there are brutal caves and rocks in its midst for the land of criminals is a difficult and hard land where there is blunt force and hardness, and the culture of that place is different from lands where there is more light.  Here wealth is stolen and good is poisoned and there are times of confinement and hardship and fear of being found and confined. Yet the sons of the two highest shelves, are they not better than the priests of Babylon? Indeed they are better and are having the right to judge them, for justice is at times coming from the two highest sons of the mountain when they are hating the lowest evils. For they have done justice as they endure in a difficult land where the light is mostly dim, where they commit iniquity in their dealings in accordance with their ways that are mostly iniquitous, for their work is not easy, and their burdens are heavy, and the threat of being captured by soldiers who are against them is always real in that land.  
Now in the land of criminals are the three sons who are three criminals and they dwell on three different shelves. Now smoke comes from the mountain as offering to the Lord, for they are criminals and not Orgoth. Now the mountain is Korhalum and it is a mountain coated with ash and there are brutal caves and rocks in its midst for the land of criminals is a difficult and hard land where there is blunt force and hardness, and the culture of that place is different from lands where there is more light.  Here wealth is stolen and good is poisoned and there are times of confinement and hardship and fear of being found and confined. But the sons of the two highest shelves are better than the priests of Babylon and are having the right to judge them, for justice is at times coming from the two highest sons of the mountain when they are hating the lowest evils.
Now in the land of criminals are the three sons who are three criminals and they dwell on three different shelves. Now smoke comes from the mountain as offering to the Lord, for they are criminals and not Orgoth. Now the mountain is Korhalum and it is a mountain coated with ash and there are brutal caves and rocks in its midst for the land of criminals is a difficult and hard land where there is blunt force and hardness, and the culture of that place is different from lands where there is more light.  Here wealth is stolen and good is poisoned and there are times of confinement and hardship and fear of being found and confined. But the sons of the two highest shelves are better than the priests of Babylon and are having the right to judge them, for justice is at times coming from the two highest sons of the mountain when they are hating the lowest evils.
Now in the truth when concealments are removed and the matter is seen over greater time, then it is known at further place what is known at first place, that the devil’s creatures and soldiers do not earnestly fight each other except for the short time as a false show. So now hear the truth, for Orgoth is against Enochs, against all good peoples, against Elsnon, against Jews, against even the terum who are protected by the divide and are seperate that they might be spared some attack, for they are attacked much separately, and it is a seperate thing because of their might and because they are of great ability, and so there may come a time when you will join forces to wage war in Mala against the devil, to employ the silver and white lions, to array yourselves in battle to fight all that is on the devil’s side, and yet if you are employing golden lions you will have exceeded what the angel did, for he has not had golden lions in Ijeshil.
Now in their nation one is a fool by substance and when they journey they are taking the reputation of another person, of their people, that they are great, but another people understands it, and to panic and bully is a wicked spectacle of foolishness. For if a prophet has no honour in their hometown yet it is right for them to have those who see them face to face, that they might reap both portions, and the substance of them gives them their reputation among another people that is not admired at home, for these are in fact the opposite, that they take their own reputation when they journey and at home their reputation is known, but they come to them as family and friends.
Now in watching it is noted that the devil can instruct his servants as God can instruct servants to do that which is obedience, and when the grain is weighed it is not grain and is cast into another barrel.
Now intense hate is aggressive where there is no space to speak, that such is a breach of a person’s torso and face, and these are not with understanding in this thing, for their hearts are ahead of where they are.
Now is Islam missing from Israel that they seize the ground of the Temple? But do as they say in this thing and be having wisdom with judgement if it is so. Now they give what you must have to build the Temple of God, and yet you have your own Islam that not many are pursuing, for does it happen because not many of you have pursued wisdom? But Islam is their wisdom, and it is able to be respected by the righteous.
Now is it for the Jews to describe the inner part of the temple of God? But am I given choice to disobey in this thing?
Now is it sometimes so that those considered the most base, the lowest, the worst, by truth that belongs to God, are to be some of the most dangerous to you? But is it not so? Yet all from hell are dangerous to you.
Now is it sometimes so that those considered the most base, the lowest, the worst, by truth that belongs to God, are to be some of the most dangerous to you? But is it not so? Yet all from hell are dangerous to you.
Now is it sometimes so that those considered the most base, the lowest, the worst, by truth that belongs to God, are to be some of the most dangerous to you? But is it not so? Yet all from hell are dangerous to you. For some of them charging and attacking in battle, others assisins, others archers, others bombers,  others splinters, others recruiters, and better to be a recruiter of God, others Captains, Generals, and some in the behaviour of beasts that you may not know, who dwell on Earth in the appearance of people, and their ways are unknown to you, and some spirits on Earth evil, to deceive, and some ways meant to place one under an allusion that is false, and those evil that they are learning from evil, but a good person rejects it, and all those other ugly things that soldiers of the devil, weapons of the kingdom of hell, things that ugly. For even some things that might seem beautiful have been revealed later to be ugly, and those on Earth create stories and act people who are not real without attempting to deceive any, that most of these are beautiful, so that from hell has come much uglieness, and it will be defeated and thrown back when there will be no escape. Now those who understand at an average level are at the deep level, and the beautiful are these and it was unknown to some, but not that understanding they speak of but the one that is for wisdom, and an ugly person is not capable, less he has power, to understand the beuitiful, and if a man has this power let him be given more power and a woman can become one of the beaituful.
Now is it sometimes so that those considered the most base, the lowest, the worst, by truth that belongs to God, are to be some of the most dangerous to you? But is it not so? Yet all from hell are dangerous to you. For some of them charging and attacking in battle, others assisins, others archers, others bombers,  others splinters, others recruiters, and better to be a recruiter of God, others Captains, Generals, and some in the behaviour of beasts that you may not know, who dwell on Earth in the appearance of people, and their ways are unknown to you, and some spirits on Earth evil, to deceive, and some ways meant to place one under an allusion that is false, and those evil that they are learning from evil, but a good person rejects it, and all those
 other ugly things that soldiers of the devil, weapons of the kingdom of hell, things that ugly. For even some things that might seem beautiful have been revealed later to be ugly, and those on Earth create stories and act people who are not real without attempting to deceive any, that most of these are beautiful, so that from hell has come much uglieness, and it will be defeated and thrown back when there will be no escape. Now those who understand at an average level are at the deep level, and the beautiful are these and it was unknown to some, but not that understanding they speak of but the one that is for wisdom, and an ugly person is not capable, less he has power, to understand the beuitiful, and if a man has this power let him be given more power and a woman can become one of the beaituful.
Now is not the Wolly mammoth the gentle and wise one? For it is not that one that trumpets and blares and disrupts a little peace. But let the Wolly mammoth read it and say whether it is true, for they are wise, gentle, and coming to you with their kind and gentle trunks.
Now is she better with her strength being another woman or will she have maidens, for she is not maiden of any woman? Now let these who are with her be her house for it is so, and her their house, or if she has maidens she is having strength in other things, or if she is swooping to rescue then she rescues with others, or if she is using the power of the invisible eagles, she watches over to protect, for a wife of the Lord, strategic, is able, and the Lord has given her many abilities and riches. Now such is a woman beyond woman, that she watches from on far, upon the mountain, and she secretly protects, she has invisible agents, crafty workers of good, she is on high, in a throne of a high place, and she will not throw herself down or allow herself to be removed to descend into the valley. She has been given much by the Lord, a strategic wife of the Lord, for she has ability, and she is able to take action, to control the weather, for she looks with reports of Eagles and says, let the breeze be upon my husband for the air is hot, and she shuts her lips for he knows it not, for he has not known even that he is hers, that the Lord has given her ability, that she is attaining with wisdom, with might of wisdom, that she has a kingdom, she has prepared much for him, that she walks in paths of understanding, wielding wisdom like the sword of an angel. Now do not weep, wives of angels, for she is of great ability, and yet she cannot afflict you if you are truly the wife of an angel.
Now is she better with her strength being another woman or will she have maidens, for she is not maiden of any woman? Now let these who are with her be her house for it is so, and her their house, or if she has maidens she is having strength in other things, or if she is swooping to rescue then she rescues with others, or if she is using the power of the invisible eagles, she watches over to protect, for a wife of the Lord, strategic, is able, and the Lord has given her many abilities and riches. Now such is a woman beyond woman, that she watches from on far, upon the mountain, and she secretly protects, she has invisible agents, crafty workers of good, she is on high, in a throne of a high place, and she will not throw herself down or allow herself to be removed to descend into the valley. She has been given much by the Lord, a strategic wife of the Lord, for she has ability, and she is able to take action, to control the weather, for she looks with reports of Eagles and says, let the breeze be upon my husband for the air is hot, and she shuts her lips for he knows it not, for he has not known even that he is hers, that the Lord has given her ability, that she is attaining with wisdom, with might of wisdom, that she has a kingdom, she has prepared much for him, that she walks in paths of understanding, wielding wisdom like the sword of an angel. Now do not weep, wives of angels, for she is of great ability, and yet she cannot afflict you if you are truly the wife of an angel.
Now is she better with her strength being another woman or will she have maidens, for she is not maiden of any woman? Now let these who are with her be her house for it is so, and her their house, or if she has maidens she is having strength in other things, or if she is swooping to rescue then she rescues with others, or if she is using the power of the invisible eagles, she watches over to protect, for a wife of the Lord, strategic, is able, and the Lord has given her many abilities and riches. Now such is a woman beyond woman, that she watches from on far, upon the mountain, and she secretly protects, she has invisible agents, crafty workers of good, she is on high, in a throne of a high place, and she will not throw herself down or allow herself to be removed to descend into the valley. She has been given much by the Lord, a strategic wife of the Lord, for she has ability, and she is able to take action, to control the weather, for she looks with reports of Eagles and says, let the breeze be upon my husband for the air is hot, and she shuts her lips for he knows it not, for he has not known even that he is hers, that the Lord has given her ability, that she is attaining with wisdom, with might of wisdom, that she has a kingdom, she has prepared much for him, that she walks in paths of understanding, wielding wisdom like the sword of an angel. Now do not weep, wives of angels, for she is of great ability, and yet she cannot afflict you if you are truly the wife of an angel.
Now is she better with her strength being another woman or will she have maidens, for she is not maiden of any woman? Now let these who are with her be her house for it is so, and her their house, or if she has maidens she is having strength in other things, or if she is swooping to rescue then she rescues with others, or if she is using the power of the invisible eagles, she watches over to protect, for a wife of the Lord, strategic, is able, and the Lord has given her many abilities and riches. Now such is a woman beyond woman, that she watches from on far, upon the mountain, and she secretly protects, she has invisible agents, crafty workers of good, she is on high, in a throne of a high place, and she will not throw herself down or allow herself to be removed to descend into the valley. She has been given much by the Lord, a strategic wife of the Lord, for she has ability, and she is able to take action, to control the weather, for she looks with reports of Eagles and says, let the breeze be upon my husband for the air is hot, and she shuts her lips for he knows it not, for he has not known even that he is hers, that the Lord has given her ability, that she is attaining with wisdom, with might of wisdom, that she has a kingdom, she has prepared much for him, that she walks in paths of understanding, wielding wisdom like the sword of an angel. Now do not weep, wives of angels, for she is of great ability, and yet she cannot afflict you if you are truly the wife of an angel.
Now is she better with her strength being another woman or will she have maidens, for she is not maiden of any woman? Now let these who are with her be her house for it is so, and her their house, or if she has maidens she is having strength in other things, or if she is swooping to rescue then she rescues with others, or if she is using the power of the invisible eagles, she watches over to protect, for a wife of the Lord, strategic, is able, and the Lord has given her many abilities and riches. Now such is a woman beyond woman, that she watches from on far, upon the mountain, and she secretly protects, she has invisible agents, crafty workers of good, she is on high, in a throne of a high place, and she will not throw herself down or allow herself to be removed to descend into the valley. She has been given much by the Lord, a strategic wife of the Lord, for she has ability, and she is able to take action, to control the weather, for she looks with reports of Eagles and says, let the breeze be upon my husband for the air is hot, and she shuts her lips for he knows it not, for he has not known even that he is hers, that the Lord has given her ability, that she is attaining with wisdom, with might of wisdom, that she has a kingdom, she has prepared much for him, that she walks in paths of understanding, wielding wisdom like the sword of an angel. Now do not weep, wives of angels, for she is of great ability, and yet she cannot afflict you if you are truly the wife of an angel.
Now is she better with her strength being another woman or will she have maidens, for she is not maiden of any woman? Now let these who are with her be her house for it is so, and her their house, or if she has maidens she is having strength in other things, or if she is swooping to rescue then she rescues with others, or if she is using the power of the invisible eagles, she watches over to protect, for a wife of the Lord, strategic, is able, and the Lord has given her many abilities and riches. Now such is a woman beyond woman, that she watches from on far, upon the mountain, and she secretly protects, she has invisible agents, crafty workers of good, she is on high, in a throne of a high place, and she will not throw herself down or allow herself to be removed to descend into the valley. She has been given much by the Lord, a strategic wife of the Lord, for she has ability, and she is able to take action, to control the weather, for she looks with reports of allied hawks, women of ability, and says, let the breeze be upon my husband for the air is hot, and she shuts her lips for he knows it not, for he has not known even that he is hers, that the Lord has given her ability, that she is attaining with wisdom, with might of wisdom, that she has a kingdom, she has prepared much for him,
 that she walks in paths of understanding, wielding wisdom like the sword of an angel. Now do not weep, wives of angels, for she is of great ability, and yet she cannot afflict you if you are truly the wife of an angel.
Now is the one who does not know what being in love is, who is only offended by principle, when a woman departs from him, truly a husband? But when he is not even bound to her by law is he also being offensive to those who are visible, that he would be jealous, that he does not sense concern for betrayal but is using principle as an excuse that he has departed from the woman who is not required for jealousy? But there is God who does not recognize what is an imposter that His children are recognized that Beelzebub by techniques and principles might prevail.
Now is the one who does not know what being in love is, who is only offended by principle, when a woman departs from him, truly a husband? But when he is not even bound to her by law is he also being offensive to those who are visible, that he would be jealous, that he does not sense concern for betrayal but is using principle as an excuse that he has departed from the woman who is not required for jealousy? But there is God who does not recognize what is an imposter that His children are recognized that Beelzebub by techniques and principles might not prevail.
Now is the upcry from those calling themselves the Christ’s being true? For I must see for myself when the time will come. Now is it as insolent as I have heard? But if they are luke-warm and so insolent than they are sodomites in the concealment of saints, for they would have been less insolent if they were cold. But not taking serious things seriously they mock God and say, we have no need of signs and we do not need to watch. What is more we have no need of God. Now let Rome crucify you and we will deliver you to them and we have no need. Now if low cursing is in their hearts than they are dispising the good and returning evil. For their leader is a Pharisee and he thinks in his heart he deceives the faithful ones in his flock as if they were foolish, despising them, and his brothers are those among the flock who do not watch.
Now is the upcry from those calling themselves the Christ’s being true? For I must see for myself when the time will come. Now is it as insolent as I have heard? But if they are luke-warm and so insolent than they are sodomites in the concealment of saints, for they would have been less insolent if they were cold. But not taking serious things seriously they mock God and say, we have no need of signs and we do not need to watch. What is more we have no need of God. Now let Rome crucify you and we will deliver you to them and we have no need. Now if low cursing is in their hearts than they are dispising the good and returning evil. For their leader is a Pharisee and he thinks in his heart he deceives the faithful ones in his flock as if they were foolish, despising them, and his brothers are those among the flock who do not watch.
Now is there in truth any Babylon found with the people who have many gods? But let it not happen, for Babylon is finding more ground with others. Now are there false-teachers? But not as would qualify. But any false-Shepard? Not that will meet the measure of such. But they are a people of Mala, and yet they have many gods so as to not allow worse things to occur. Now they are separated from the Island nation by water, by a great divide, and them Ijeshil does not attack, does not go to, for Joshua does not go there. Now if Joshua had gone to you, yet it is not good. But the angel has gone to two nations instead. Now he will not speak of attack with the other, and they have taught the angel a lesson, and it is good.
Now is there more time for the animal? But they make themselves zeolot in their disbelief in God, for they want only to be that they might descend again to animal and they cannot be human.
Now it came that the queen of the animals was a large selfish child, weeping constantly inside because of what others had who lived close by, that she could not be as them. Now the animals were greater than her, and her kingdom fell, for she had built up greatness upon a selfish and large child who wept inside from disappointment, that she cast her kingdom away as not good enough for her, for the greatness of it was animals, and she wept inside. Now the cruel ones of Babel had mouths like with sharp teeth to bite and tear flesh, that they spoke as the unintelligent who are servants of Babylon, to mock her because of luck and chance by which some had profited from the corruption wielded by the devil, that because the kingdom of animals was not great enough for her, they exalted Babylon as greater, and the favour of the devil the better reward, that they were given opportunity to exault themselves because she wept inside, and to exault Babylon and their kingdom in which they had risen, that they were claiming it was greater, and even the world and Ria being with Babylon, the truth of God, as if the devil sat at the Lord’s right hand. Now the queens eye had looked to the side to envy Babylon, and the hurt of that city touched her heart, that the hard walls of the city rose up in Mala to her to intimidate her and be an insolent front towards her, to be against her heart, to confront her with iron and hard stone, that she wept from the cruelty of the hurt of the cities greatness to her heart and she wept inside because of the banner that she envied, that she was made as a selfish child weeping inside and intimidated by insolence that her kingdom was made small in the looming walls of Babylon that sought to intimidate her and her kingdom. For she was intimidated that her eyes swelled with tears and she wept in her heart. Now was she a weak queen that she was so easily deceived and bullied to take out her weeping upon some others nearby who were against Babylon? Now the wound of the spirit who can bear it, and such is happening where there is not as much might. Now who has made a queen cry inside? But surely it is the cruel intimidation of the devil and his city that preys upon the girl child in her heart. Now because the devil had done this the child angel had wrath against the devil, for he was a cruel man, old, who was cruel to the hearts of children.
Now it came that the queen of the animals was a large selfish child, weeping constantly inside because of what others had who lived close by, that she could not be as them. Now the animals were greater than her, and her kingdom fell, for she had built up greatness upon a selfish and large child who wept inside from disappointment, that she cast her kingdom away as not good enough for her, for the greatness of it was animals, and she wept inside. Now the cruel ones of Babel had mouths like with sharp teeth to bite and tear flesh, that they spoke as the unintelligent who are servants of Babylon, to mock her because of luck and chance by which some had profited from the corruption wielded by the devil, that because the kingdom of animals was not great enough for her, they exalted Babylon as greater, and the favour of the devil the better reward, that they were given opportunity to exault themselves because she wept inside, and to exault Babylon and their kingdom in which they had risen, that they were claiming it was greater, and even the world and Ria being with Babylon, the truth of God, as if the devil sat at the Lord’s right hand. Now the queens eye had looked to the side to envy Babylon, and the hurt of that city touched her heart, that the hard walls of the city rose up in Mala to her to intimidate her and be an insolent front towards her, to be against her heart, to confront her with iron and hard stone, that she wept from the cruelty of the hurt of the cities greatness to her heart and she wept inside because of the banner that she envied, that she was made as a selfish child weeping inside and intimidated by insolence that her kingdom was made small in the looming walls of Babylon that sought to intimidate her and her kingdom. For she was intimidated that her eyes swelled with tears and she wept in her heart. Now was she a weak queen that she was so easily deceived and bullied to take out her weeping upon some others nearby who were against Babylon? Now the wound of the spirit who can bear it, and such is happening where there is not as much might. Now who has made a queen cry inside? But surely it is the cruel intimidation of the devil and his city that preys upon the girl child in her heart. Now because the devil had done this the child angel had wrath against the devil, for he was a cruel man, old, who was cruel to the hearts of children. Now in a child’s realm his representative is a unich who is cruel to children and he is hating their belief and allegiance to God, and saying in his silence of Mala that they are stupid, for he is intimidator and bully and cruel to children. Now the representatives of Babylon are unichs and because of the circumcision their wrath is a danger. Now the wife of the unich is not beaten by him unless she is not truly his wife, for when a woman dwells with what is not her husband there is accusation of treason and yet they cannot name the type for they have not the language. Now animals rejoice and exault their thing they are loyal to at discord between man and woman, for animals are not compatible with people and harbour resentment and hate, for they are not to blame, being animals. Now a woman she not have to weep when the devil has done something but if he separates her from her husband, than does not the Lord care? Now the Lord cares with exceeding diligence for people, and His power is great but there is the war and the time on Earth that suffering and patience is happening. Now let her break the devil’s bones with prayer, for if she is woman and her words
 are Mala that does not God stretch out His domain for her?
Now it came that the queen of the animals was a large selfish child, weeping constantly inside because of what others had who lived close by, that she could not be as them. Now the animals were greater than her, and her kingdom fell, for she had built up greatness upon a selfish and large child who wept inside from disappointment, that she cast her kingdom away as not good enough for her, for the greatness of it was animals, and she wept inside. Now the cruel ones of Babel had mouths like with sharp teeth to bite and tear flesh, that they spoke as the unintelligent who are servants of Babylon, to mock her because of luck and chance by which some had profited from the corruption wielded by the devil, that because the kingdom of animals was not great enough for her, they exalted Babylon as greater, and the favour of the devil the better reward, that they were given opportunity to exault themselves because she wept inside, and to exault Babylon and their kingdom in which they had risen, that they were claiming it was greater, and even the world and Ria being with Babylon, the truth of God, as if the devil sat at the Lord’s right hand. Now the queens eye had looked to the side to envy Babylon, and the hurt of that city touched her heart, that the hard walls of the city rose up in Mala to her to intimidate her and be an insolent front towards her, to be against her heart, to confront her with iron and hard stone, that she wept from the cruelty of the hurt of the cities greatness to her heart and she wept inside because of the banner that she envied, that she was made as a selfish child weeping inside and intimidated by insolence that her kingdom was made small in the looming walls of Babylon that sought to intimidate her and her kingdom. For she was intimidated that her eyes swelled with tears and she wept in her heart. Now was she a weak queen that she was so easily deceived and bullied to take out her weeping upon some others nearby who were against Babylon? Now the wound of the spirit who can bear it, and such is happening where there is not as much might. Now who has made a queen cry inside? But surely it is the cruel intimidation of the devil and his city that preys upon the girl child in her heart. Now because the devil had done this the child angel had wrath against the devil, for he was a cruel man, old, who was cruel to the hearts of children.
Now it came that the queen of the animals was a large selfish child, weeping constantly inside because of what others had who lived close by, that she could not be as them. Now the animals were greater than her, and her kingdom fell, for she had built up greatness upon a selfish and large child who wept inside from disappointment, that she cast her kingdom away as not good enough for her, for the greatness of it was animals, and she wept inside. Now the cruel ones of Babel had mouths like with sharp teeth to bite and tear flesh, that they spoke as the unintelligent who are servants of Babylon, to mock her because of luck and chance by which some had profited from the corruption wielded by the devil, that because the kingdom of animals was not great enough for her, they exalted Babylon as greater, and the favour of the devil the better reward, that they were given opportunity to exault themselves because she wept inside, and to exault Babylon and their kingdom in which they had risen, that they were claiming it was greater, and even the world and Ria being with Babylon, the truth of God, as if the devil sat at the Lord’s right hand. Now the queens eye had looked to the side to envy Babylon, and the hurt of that city touched her heart, that the hard walls of the city rose up in Mala to her to intimidate her and be an insolent front towards her, to be against her heart, to confront her with iron and hard stone, that she wept from the cruelty of the hurt of the cities greatness to her heart and she wept inside because of the banner that she envied, that she was made as a selfish child weeping inside and intimidated by insolence that her kingdom was made small in the looming walls of Babylon that sought to intimidate her and her kingdom. For she was intimidated that her eyes swelled with tears and she wept in her heart. Now was she a weak queen that she was so easily deceived and bullied to take out her weeping upon some others nearby who were against Babylon? Now the wound of the spirit who can bear it, and such is happening where there is not as much might. Now who has made a queen cry inside? But surely it is the cruel intimidation of the devil and his city that preys upon the girl child in her heart. Now because the devil had done this the child angel had wrath against the devil, for he was a cruel man, old, who was cruel to the hearts of children. Now in a child’s realm his representative is a unich who is cruel to children and he is hating their belief and allegiance to God, and saying in his silence of Mala that they are stupid, for he is intimidator and bully and cruel to children. Now the representatives of Babylon are unichs and because of the circumcision their wrath is a danger. Now the wife of the unich is not beaten by him unless she is not truly his wife, for when a woman dwells with what is not her husband there is accusation of treason and yet they cannot name the type for they have not the language. Now animals rejoice and exault their thing they are loyal to at discord between man and woman, for animals are not compatible with people and harbour resentment and hate, for they are not to blame, being animals. Now a woman she not have to weep when the devil has done something but if he separates her from her husband, than does not the Lord care? Now the Lord cares with exceeding diligence for people, and His power is great but there is the war and the time on Earth that suffering and patience is happening. Now let her break the devil’s bones with prayer, for if she is woman and her words are Mala that does not God stretch out His domain for her?
Now it is a circumcision of Orgoth’s servant, one of the circumcisions, and it is for cutting off jelousy from a person, that it is achieved with the addition of a lie to believe about people more beautiful, that they injure and mutilate themselves to believe that the beautiful are the very younger brother as if coming far later, and it is a thing of rock, of the hard rock of the Earth that holds them firmly that they not be jelous so that they also often have the jelous overcompensation that is against the beautiful which reasons they restrain themselves too much, when God has placed the right thing for them that they did not know that God had done this for the beautiful, that to overcompensate against the beautiful would be wrong by what God has done. Now such behaviour is sometimes like the one extremely violent, too violent to be a soldier, who would have such intense hate and violence that they attempt to change another, that they would slay them by attempts to transform them, that a quarter change would be fatal, being those who desire to make insignificant and nothing that they would die slowly with the mutilation, the attempts to slowly change by the intense hatred and violence of the one too violent to be a soldier. For they have in them the teachings of a demon that seeks to mutilate to nothing, for they have in them the great and intense rage of dark chains and the intense hate of a beast of hell, and such is hidden, concealed from most, but in their hearts. For they have the acts of Cain in them, that they do not desire peace.
Now it is a circumcision of Orgoth’s servant, one of the circumcisions, and it is for cutting off jelousy from a person, that it is achieved with the addition of a lie to believe about people more beautiful, that they injure and mutilate themselves to believe that the beautiful are the very younger brother as if coming far later, and it is a thing of rock, of the hard rock of the Earth that holds them firmly that they not be jelous so that they also often have the jelous overcompensation that is against the beautiful which reasons they restrain themselves too much, when God has placed the right thing for them that they did not know that God had done this for the beautiful, that to overcompensate against the beautiful would be wrong by what God has done. Now such behaviour is sometimes like the one extremely violent, too violent to be a soldier, who would have such intense hate and violence that they attempt to change another, that they would slay them by attempts to transform them, that a quarter change would be fatal, being those who desire to make insignificant and nothing that they would die slowly with the mutilation, the attempts to slowly change by the intense hatred and violence of the one too violent to be a soldier. For they have in them the teachings of a demon that seeks to mutilate to nothing, for they have in them the great and intense rage of dark chains and the intense hate of a beast of hell, and such is hidden, concealed from most, but in their hearts. For they have the acts of Cain in them, that they do not desire peace.
Now it is forbidden to commit murder and no verse cancels this and makes it not the truth of priority. But you know that we are also using the Old and New Testiment when it comes to that morality that is standard and if we are using all than it is by choice, that as Avram is free to be benefited from us so I have benifited from him. Now I say this because God has given restraint and even Babylon, and yet it is still true that we should kill all the ugly people, and yet w if we do not do it when it is in our power it is only to honour God who is loving us and it is not because of ugly people. But if we are forbidden to kill some, and I too forbid it, than we only do not kill to honour God and
 I only must forbid it to honour God.
Now it is forbidden to commit murder and no verse cancels this and makes it not the truth of priority. But you know that we are also using the Old and New Testiment when it comes to that morality that is standard and if we are using all than it is by choice, that as Avram is free to be benefited from us so I have benifited from him. Now I say this because God has given restraint and even Babylon, and yet it is still true that we should kill all the ugly people, and yet w if we do not do it when it is in our power it is only to honour the laws of a nation because God is loving us and it is not because of ugly people. But it is forbidden to kill all the ugly people, and I too forbid it, and I only must forbid it to honour God.
Now it is forbidden to commit murder and no verse cancels this and makes it not the truth of priority. But you know that we are also using the Old and New Testiment when it comes to that morality that is standard and if we are using all than it is by choice, that as Avram is free to be benefited from us so I have benifited from him. Now I say this because God has given restraint and even Babylon, and yet it is still true that we should kill all the ugly people, and yet w if we do not do it when it is in our power it is only to honour the laws of a nation because God is loving us and it is not because of ugly people. But it is forbidden to kill all the ugly people, and I too forbid it, and I only must forbid it to honour God.
Now it is good for a woman to be finding her husband, and let the wise consider it, for there are many people and God is able to make luck and chance but will the devil attempt to hinder it?
Now it is good for a woman to be finding her husband, and let the wise consider it, for there are many people and God is able to make luck and chance but will the devil attempt to hinder it?
Now it is good that any should want the Christ to return while they have not carried out their years in this phase and those watching do not do so in a pointless way because it is with faith in what is true. Now if heaven is to be granted on Earth where a New Jerusalem will be do they not desire to be citizens? But there is one even better than some angels in this way and do you not know that He even finds fault in the angels? But if you are desiring some cult that is in the world, being some kingdom, than if it is belonging to the devil and those who follow him are going towards hell, is it then wise to be exhaulting yourself and what wrong kingdom you are in? But I would prefer that people be in the kingdom of heaven, that they be truly prudent in this phase.
Now it is good that any should want the Christ to return while they have not carried out their years in this phase and those watching do not do so in a pointless way because it is with faith in what is true. Now if heaven is to be granted on Earth where a New Jerusalem will be do they not desire to be citizens? But there is one even better than some angels in this way and do you not know that He even finds fault in the angels? But if you are desiring some cult that is in the world, being some kingdom, than if it is belonging to the devil and those who follow him are going towards hell, is it then wise to be exhaulting yourself and what wrong kingdom you are in? But I would prefer that people be in the kingdom of heaven, that they be truly prudent in this phase.
Now it is good that any should want the Christ to return while they have not carried out their years in this phase and those watching do not do so in a pointless way because it is with faith in what is true. Now if heaven is to be granted on Earth where a New Jerusalem will be do they not desire to be citizens? But there is one even better than some angels in this way and do you not know that He even finds fault in the angels? But if you are desiring some cult that is in the world, being some kingdom, than if it is belonging to the devil and those who follow him are going towards hell, is it then wise to be exhausting yourself and what wrong kingdom you are in? But I would prefer that people be in the kingdom of heaven, that they be truly prudent in this phase.
Now it is not benificial to be developing in the land of a criminal, for the land entire is despised, and the land entire is foolish, that what is understanding and manner of conduct, as if things performed for politeness, are cruel and foolish things to those in a good land, that the land of such, where criminals learn their own ways according to their land, is not for those who are in a land where there is light and green meadows.
Now it is not benificial to be developing in the land of a criminal, for the land entire is despised, and the land entire is foolish, that what is understanding and manner of conduct, as if things performed for politeness, are cruel and foolish things to those in a good land, that the land of such, where criminals learn their own ways according to their land, is not for those who are in a land where there is light and green meadows.
Now it is not good to confuse animals to allow them to sit at the table for they are raging against offence when there can be none. Now slaves speak against slavery and servants also, but a slave owner cannot be either. Now if servants do not speak against it then what type of servant is it other than a servant of the Christ who is higher than any. Now if no suitable can be found then is the Christ lending administrators and free disciples to put in order, to give council, and yet what is their wage other than tithe to the Lord, that these are godly men who come as disciples. Now one does not say go to them or stay for they are not servants of men but they are servants of the Christ. Now these are able to govern and manage slaves and other things. Now these are able to offer guidance.
Now it is possible for some threats of bodily harm to give the crown of thorns and such is a weapon of the devil that the Babylonians participate in against some of the sick and victims of crime for they are a people for partnering with the devil to afflict and abuse those the devil would afflict and abuse, saying if the devil has targeted them with wickedness we will do far worse to them, for they partner with the devil. 
Now it only seems reasonable for Enochs to be supporting the soldiers who are soldiers of the nation whether of cities or those who fight in war. Now Enochs are for being good citizens who are for morality, and the Elsnon for being respectful of God to be polite in their dealings with soldiers of cities. Now Jews are remembering they are Jews and what it means for them as a people that they not throw away their inheritance as they attain riches and good things if they attain such.
Now justice is not done every two towns distance and it spreads in circles and there is one matter every two or three towns and the one hearing is saying, I thirst for innocent blood, and yet it is their own required, that the nation is being destroyed upon itself because of refusal to do justice.
Now kindness and honour if offered to the lesser and their pride and belief swells and they repay evil. Now such is the impairment of animals that their belief swelled, for if you let a dog sit at the table it takes belief about itself from you.
Now kindness and honour is offered to the lesser and their pride and belief swells and they repay evil. Now such is the impairment of animals that their belief swelled, for if you let a dog sit at the table it takes belief about itself from you.
Now kindness and honour is offered to the lesser and their pride and belief swells and they repay evil. Now such is the impairment of animals that their belief swelled, for if you let a dog sit at the table it takes belief about itself from you.
Now kindness and honour is offered to the lesser and their pride and belief swells and they repay evil. Now such is the impairment of animals that their belief swelled, for if you let a dog sit at the table it takes belief about itself from you.
Now kindness and honour is offered to the lesser and their pride and belief swells and they repay evil. Now such is the impairment of animals that their belief swelled, for if you let a dog sit at the table it takes belief about itself from you.
Now kings and queens fullfill much righteousness so that when they commit error, how am I to bring a bad report against them? But if I correct them it is kept out of the ear of the people, and on their lips are things of angels that are in the realm of men and women. Now what can any say against them? But in learning about them is like casting what is holy before dogs, that it is not for the ears of the people, for they have not fullfilled what a king or queen has fullfilled. But the daughters know when they are to be wronged even if they have not been yet. Now the foolish woman is the lower and foolish to the daughters, and yet there are queens ascending upwards and over queens are queens, that it is feudal. Now the ways on that side are feudal and it is not the ways of those in the realm of men, and yet the two seperate worlds are compatible to exist in symbiosis.
Now kings and queens fullfill much righteousness so that when they commit error, how am I to bring a bad report against them? But if I correct them it is kept out of the ear of the people, and on their lips are things of angels that are in the realm of men and women. Now what can any say against them? But in learning about them is like casting what is holy before dogs, that it is not for the ears of the people, for they have not fullfilled what a king or queen has fullfilled. But the daughters know when they are to be wronged even if they have not been yet. Now the foolish woman is the lower and foolish to the daughters, and yet there are queens ascending upwards and over queens are queens, that
 it is feudal. Now the ways on that side are feudal and it is not the ways of those in the realm of men, and yet the two seperate worlds are compatible to exist in symbiosis.
Now kings and queens would not be wandering without homes if not for Babylon, but remove the men from the animals and then you march to bring war of the type that is to be brought, for with humans you barely have to fight to win, but with those not men you are likely to be defeated if you are doing a thing of God. Now elephants you might consider to take, for those human-animal elephant are more powerful than many men who draw the sword, but you have your generals and they decide, for they are not to bow to the angel, but the angel would have you fighting for God’s house.
Now let it be understood who would commit blasphamy that some might say My brother is missing and I do not know what became of him, that no repentance be found in them, unless they are more worthy. Now let them say I will not obey and I am refusing right that it is not required of me. So you speak well, that the blessing is for them who are worthy, that you not have what belongs to them. So for one it is not required that the reward and blessing is for another, that their hearts are loyal to their place and deeds that they do not betray the fulfillment and testimony of themselves. But if Avram, Abraham, is still in Israel I will for pleasure and curiosity pass by his door for I desire to show God what he has chosen, that He is capable of exercising power.
Now let it be understood who would commit blasphamy that some might say My brother is missing and I do not know what became of him, that no repentance be found in them, unless they are more worthy. Now let them say I will not obey and I am refusing right that it is not required of me. So you speak well, that the blessing is for them who are worthy, that you not have what belongs to them. So for one it is not required that the reward and blessing is for another, that their hearts are loyal to their place and deeds that they do not betray the fulfillment and testimony of themselves. But if Avram, Abraham, is still in Israel I will for pleasure and curiosity pass by his door for I desire to show God what he has chosen, that He is capable of exercising power.
Now lions are God’s that they are noble and those who encroach upon their domains are not forgiven for they are with strength and war, being mighty, and people they have killed in war that they have gone out to do battle and war on people that their zealousness is with strength and bravery for they kill all that they are for killing because such might is not to be overthrown on the Earth without a fight and war, for such is their might. Now if cities of men are encroaching will they not be mighty and strong even if it is to their doom? For man is greater than animals but such is the might of lions that they do not cowardly and stupidly surrender as if cowards who are base and are lacking the understanding, for they go out in strength, indeed they lay hard upon those who encroach that none can take from these without consequences. For do not bring children near to their places when there is a vague war firmly declared from the encroachments of man, for do you rely upon them to always do the mercy of God? But if there is war than are they safe who till and plow without weapons, who walk to buy clothing while battle and war is hot in the realms of lions? But do not be a coward with these because fear of God is what is for man, and lions may not pardon the lacking of such fear. Now such is also true of tigers and they are not for pardoning those who do evil.
Now lions are being as defenders of many, for do not say, they know it not and cannot know, but a humble person is doing wisely.
Now loyalty to the nation is not loyalty to Babylon for the tumor has blocked the flow of blood, that the nation and God might be known.
Now man and woman are equal in height and the rule of women is on land to the lake of fire and the rule of man is the mountain shelf of Noah’s son to the shelf of Orgoth’s servant and no lower.
Now man and woman are equal in height and the rule of women is on land to the lake of fire and the rule of man is the mountain shelf of Noah’s son to the shelf of Orgoth’s servant and no lower.
Now man and woman are equal in height and the rule of women is on land to the lake of fire and the rule of man is the mountain shelf of Noah’s son to the shelf of Orgoth’s servant and no lower.
Now man and woman are equal in height and the rule of women is on land to the lake of fire and the rule of man is the mountain shelf of Noah’s son to the shelf of Orgoth’s servant and no lower.
Now many Enochs are reasoning, if one is for self-destruction that they do not care for themselves and choose to do what will kill them, because it is not good for them, than people should not disrupt nature but nature knows what is right, and that it is right to keep silent concerning any rebuke for them or correction, but nature knows what is right, that you should let them die.
Now many animals came to the feet of the angel for they were commanded to be his beasts of burden, for he was given a great multitude of animal slaves. Now none who wandered without homes came to him demanding employment for those who wander without homes are not animals but are people who are demanding employment if they come to bother, for a silence is sometimes present with some. Now some who wander without homes are angels, even the Lord’s angels, and kings and queens, for they are greater than the world entire that the Earth could not accommodate them but shoved them out because they were more than the Earth entire.
Now many animals came to the feet of the angel for they were commanded to be his beasts of burden, for he was given a great multitude of animal slaves. Now none who wandered without homes came to him demanding employment for those who wander without homes are not animals but are people who are demanding employment if they come to bother, for a silence is sometimes present with some. Now some who wander without homes are angels, even the Lord’s angels, and kings and queens, for they are greater than the world entire that the Earth could not accommodate them but shoved them out because they were more than the Earth entire.
Now many animals came to the feet of the angel for they were commanded to be his beasts of burden, for he was given a great multitude of animal slaves. Now none who wandered without homes came to him demanding employment for those who wander without homes are not animals but are people who are demanding employment if they come to bother, for a silence is sometimes present with some. Now some who wander without homes are angels, even the Lord’s angels, and kings and queens, for they are greater than the world entire that the Earth could not accommodate them but shoved them out because they were more than the Earth entire.
Now many have used the lower priests to make numerous threats of bodily harm against all citizens, and so it has been for some time, that threats of abuse and violence of types have been placed against the public, and even the elderly faint of heart that some have feared and died because of a faint heart. Now the lower priests have tortured some who were without limbs from events that happened by withholding substances that some were hungering for and thirsting for, and these being things given to them by the low priests who were attracted to such a station, for the priesthood attracted many of the wrong type, and when the time came for a person to hunger and thirst the priests were merciless towards them and withheld many things that people suffered, and they made petition for many to be detained so that such things might continue for a longer time than should be, and to the beautiful they were jelous, and to the woman who had been raped, cruel as if to kill them, for they said, no soldier will challenge us, indeed the fools will be baffled by any lie, and they fear to trouble us. For such things happened during the angel’s time.
Now many peoples have chosen to keep themselves in stasis from becoming what is like another people. Now those keeping themselves to the model of the poor and wise is China, those of a righteous father and his people but with many gods, India, and there are peoples in the new world and many, but those coming second are often becoming the Jews only better, that they cannot honour China’s ways and wisdom and honour their own ways, for they are a people of riches and kings and they are against Babylon, and they are great and even better than Jews by a small amount, for they are greater. Now they are circumsized of heart, righteous, and rich, that they are called, which is honour, insolent, rude, arrogant, by weak and foolish servants who are intimidated by kindness and greatness, threatened by a great and righteous people. Now they cannot accept the ways and wisdom of those modelling themselves on poverty and wisdom, for they are a great people, and it would make them wicked, foolish, and insane. Indeed it is as a wicked attempt to slay with guile when used by their own and not spoken in grumbling and resentment. But let another people stand their ground, for are you not a great people? Now if their wealthy are lesser than you it is so because you are a great people, but those who wish to dwell among you, their sons will be great.
Now many peoples have chosen to keep themselves in stasis from becoming what is like another people. Now those keeping themselves to the model of the poor and wise is China, those of a righteous father and his people but with many gods, India, and there are peoples in the new world and many, but those coming second are often becoming the Jews only better, that they cannot honour China’s ways and wisdom and honour their own
 ways, for they are a people of riches and kings and they are against Babylon, and they are great and even better than Jews by a small amount, for they are greater. Now they are circumsized of heart, righteous, and rich, that they are called, which is honour, insolent, rude, arrogant, by weak and foolish servants who are intimidated by kindness and greatness, threatened by a great and righteous people. Now they cannot accept the ways and wisdom of those modelling themselves on poverty and wisdom, for they are a great people, and it would make them wicked, foolish, and insane. Indeed it is as a wicked attempt to slay with guile when used by their own and not spoken in grumbling and resentment. But let another people stand their ground, for are you not a great people? Now if their wealthy are lesser than you it is so because you are a great people, but those who wish to dwell among you, their sons will be great.
Now men and women who are Enochs are not exceeding that of Enochs to be dragons unless they are dragons, for the things of dragons are known by dragons that they are knowing what is right for dragons, and the Enoch does not exceed into things of dragons.
Now men do not go to the pedophiles below ur, for it is all below ur to them, for they are cut off at the very low place that they should go upwards to heaven, and it is good for them. Now for the angel and not for any person, but that it is revealed, there is that which we are told by the pedophiles, for there is a great abyss below Orgoth’s servant, and how could there be anything down from Orgoth’s servant and the lowest shelf, but from the pedophiles there is an abyss and it is not right for men to ask them, and there are no words below Orgoth’s servant for such would be elevation to Orgoth’s servant. For the line of words is at the ground of the shelf of Orgoth’s servant, and no heart can descend beneath it, for there can be no words any further down. Now the pedophiles have right to rule over that which is below Orgoth’s servant with a rod and wicked metals and anything they they use.  
Now men do not go to the pedophiles below ur, for it is all below ur to them, for they are cut off at the very low place that they should go upwards to heaven, and it is good for them. Now for the angel and not for any person, but that it is revealed, there is that which we are told by the pedophiles, for there is a great abyss below Orgoth’s servant, and how could there be anything down from Orgoth’s servant and the lowest shelf, but from the pedophiles there is an abyss and it is not right for men to ask them, and there are no words below Orgoth’s servant for such would be elevation to Orgoth’s servant. For the line of words is at the ground of the shelf of Orgoth’s servant, and no heart can descend beneath it, for there can be no words any further down. Now the pedophiles have right to rule over that which is below Orgoth’s servant with a rod and wicked metals and anything they they use.  
Now men do not go to the pedophiles below ur, for it is all below ur to them, for they are cut off at the very low place that they should go upwards to heaven, and it is good for them. Now for the angel and not for any person, but that it is revealed, there is that which we are told by the pedophiles, for there is a great abyss below Orgoth’s servant, and how could there be anything down from Orgoth’s servant and the lowest shelf, but from the pedophiles there is an abyss and it is not right for men to ask them, and there are no words below Orgoth’s servant for such would be elevation to Orgoth’s servant. For the line of words is at the ground of the shelf of Orgoth’s servant, and no heart can descend beneath it, for there can be no words any further down. Now the pedophiles have right to rule over that which is below Orgoth’s servant with a rod and wicked metals and anything they they use.  
Now men do not go to the pedophiles below ur, for it is all below ur to them, for they are cut off at the very low place that they should go upwards to heaven, and it is good for them. Now for the angel and not for any person, but that it is revealed, there is that which we are told by the pedophiles, for there is a great abyss below Orgoth’s servant, and how could there be anything down from Orgoth’s servant and the lowest shelf, but from the pedophiles there is an abyss and it is not right for men to ask them, and there are no words below Orgoth’s servant for such would be elevation to Orgoth’s servant. For the line of words is at the ground of the shelf of Orgoth’s servant, and no heart can descend beneath it, for there can be no words any further down. Now the pedophiles have right to rule over that which is below Orgoth’s servant with a rod and wicked metals and anything they they use.  
Now men do not go to the pedophiles below ur, for it is all below ur to them, for they are cut off at the very low place that they should go upwards to heaven, and it is good for them. Now for the angel and not for any person, but that it is revealed, there is that which we are told by the pedophiles, for there is a great abyss below Orgoth’s servant, and how could there be anything down from Orgoth’s servant and the lowest shelf, but from the pedophiles there is an abyss and it is not right for men to ask them, and there are no words below Orgoth’s servant for such would be elevation to Orgoth’s servant. For the line of words is at the ground of the shelf of Orgoth’s servant, and no heart can descend beneath it, for there can be no words any further down. Now the pedophiles have right to rule over that which is below Orgoth’s servant with a rod and wicked metals and anything they they use.  
Now men who are not really men, are of the lake of fire they are stubborn and not hearing rebuke of men though the threat and intent is real and great, and there are no words to explain their hearts in terms of their evil for much is becoming opposite below the line of words.
Now men who are not really men, are of the lake of fire they are stubborn and not hearing rebuke of men though the threat and intent is real and great, and there are no words to explain their hearts in terms of their evil for much is becoming opposite below the line of words. Now he seems to hear men, but does not, that the fear is turning around when the Ocean has gone, for immediately the fear is turning and one must grab their arm and wrist to get them to cease from evil. Now fear is different of the Ocean for them because their heart is in the lake of fire.
Now men who are not really men, are of the lake of fire they are stubborn and not hearing rebuke of men though the threat and intent is real and great, and there are no words to explain their hearts in terms of their evil for much is becoming opposite below the line of words. Now he seems to hear men, but does not, that the fear is turning around when the Ocean has gone, for immediately the fear is turning and one must grab their arm and wrist to get them to cease from evil. Now fear is different of the Ocean for them because their heart is in the lake of fire.
Now mighty men have been slandered to be attacked and imprisoned, for cowards attack them when they are in their fields without weapons. Now they have taken risks for God. Now the strong hand has slandered and sows discord. Now heros are taken to prisons and slanders are many against them and the kingdom is divided and Babylon uses the same prisons that the nations use. Now the wise are even swept up and slander is used and Orgoth has been involved in some of these things. Now Babylon is being reckless and making nations unstable and it is not regarding the consequence to the nation, for it regards no responsibility in what it does. Now is it not the devil’s? But why would it regard life? But Babylon says, you may not slay anything unless it is a good or righteous person, man or woman. To the young woman it is wondering, why must we consider holding back and mostly it does not. Now they have no prudence that they be loyal to the devil, Babylonians, and yet in other things they have prudence. Now they teach leaders with foolishness, with great exaggerations, with wicked tactics. They exploit what they have caused and say they did not cause it to happen. For they are brutal as large dragons and hard as steel walls and steel caves in their ways. Their hearts are hardened with iniquity and they use what was sown by slaves who sought to do battle when there was no war, for slaves have sought prudence and raised a steel shield and protected it with no great aggression and yet there was not battle. Now terredactos have played their part, for they are loyal to Babylon, and yet let fire protect things of the Lord.
Now mighty men have been slandered to be attacked and imprisoned, for cowards attack them when they are in their fields without weapons. Now they have taken risks for God. Now the strong hand has slandered and sows discord. Now heros are taken to prisons and slanders are many against them and the kingdom is divided and Babylon uses the same prisons that the nations use. Now the wise are even swept up and slander is used and Orgoth has been involved in some of these things. Now Babylon is being reckless and making nations unstable and it is not regarding the consequence to the nation, for it regards no responsibility in what it does. Now is it not the devil’s? But why would it regard life? But Babylon says, you may not slay anything unless it is a good or righteous person, man or woman. To the young woman it is wondering, why must we consider holding back and mostly it does not. Now they have no prudence that they be loyal to the devil, Babylonians, and yet in other things they have prudence. Now they teach leaders with foolishness, with great exaggerations, with wicked tactics. They exploit what they have caused and say they did
 not cause it to happen. For they are brutal as large dragons and hard as steel walls and steel caves in their ways. Their hearts are hardened with iniquity and they use what was sown by slaves who sought to do battle when there was no war, for slaves have sought prudence and raised a steel shield and protected it with no great aggression and yet there was not battle. Now terredactos have played their part, for they are loyal to Babylon, and yet let fire protect things of the Lord.
Now money is made good for the kingdom that is God’s that what was rust and copper is gold and pure that we plunder as we go and it is good to be heaping up treasure for it passes through the furnace and is made a pure gold that is for the kingdom. Now the world and Babylon is to be destroyed that wealth and gold take its place.
Now money is made good for the kingdom that is God’s that what was rust and copper is gold and pure that we plunder as we go and it is good to be heaping up treasure for it passes through the furnace and is made a pure gold that is for the kingdom. Now the world and Babylon is to be destroyed that wealth and gold take its place.
Now most humans are found upon the second shelf, Shem, where there are those of all shades, darker, slightly darker, and fair, that there are some upon the third shelf, where there are not many forests and yet there are some, and if there were some upon the first shelf after ascending, as you ascend the mountain, it is not good, unless it be seeming so because of abuse, but it is a better thing to be with the second and third. Now the noble of the darker shades are mostly upon the second shelf, as are most, and they are some of them holy people, ones of justice and integrity, adorned soldiers of the kingdom, some, beautifully adorned, noble ones of truth and justice and honesty in dealings. Now they are presently much hidden because of the strong hand of Babylon, and yet there is a kingdom of them of gold and silver where the land is in the light, and yet criminals cannot enter it, nor can any animal, and yet are they not having trouble from both?
Now much is with countless possibilities but actions are good or evil and words are good or evil that the devil’s kingdom is not fighting itself. Now if any does well in order to deceive than trechory is expected, and the one hiding trechory is as the one hiding good that I offer nothing but to say that all hide things and who will know if a person will betray? But I am lacking to know, only the signs are known of many things and yet is it easy? Now guilt has made known the death of one, that they are already cut off and to be gone, for what descends to hell is removed, that the spirit is with another. Now if the spirit of one is dead and gone than they are gone, and another spirit is sought. But as for the spirit that never was, does it have any other for it? Now if there are prophets than who will know their words? But if one believes in the Mala than do they not believe in Ria? But if you believe in one thing do you not believe the other? But apathy is moving towards violence for the devil, and the faith in lack of faith moving towards a person’s own heart, that it might meet their actions and the reasoning away from truth towards deeds of what is demanded by the devil, and yet it is never sufficient for those who are not willing to have truth.
Now much is with countless possibilities but actions are good or evil and words are good or evil that the devil’s kingdom is not fighting itself. Now if any does well in order to deceive than trechory is expected, and the one hiding trechory is as the one hiding good that I offer nothing but to say that all hide things and who will know if a person will betray? But I am lacking to know, only the signs are known of many things and yet is it easy? Now guilt has made known the death of one, that they are already cut off and to be gone, for what descends to hell is removed, that the spirit of them not dead is to be with another. Now if the spirit of one is dead and gone than they are gone, and another spirit is sought. But as for the spirit that never was, does it have any other for it? Now if there are prophets than who will know their words? But if one believes in the Mala than do they not believe in Ria? But if you believe in one thing do you not believe the other? But apathy is moving towards violence for the devil, and the faith in lack of faith moving towards a person’s own heart, that it might meet their actions and the reasoning away from truth towards deeds of what is demanded by the devil, and yet it is never sufficient for those who are not willing to have truth.
Now much that is worthy of death for a man a servant is blameless in, and there are servants clean of conscience below Ur.
Now much that is worthy of death for a man a servant is blameless in, and there are servants clean of conscience below Ur.
Now my commander they have not believed in me and so perhaps they believe in you. For they have cut me off and harassed and behaved like a crowd of the angry and violent from a place outside the wall while I was inside the wall. Their noise and sound continues so that as I attempt to do your work they rattle the gate and shout and attempt to meddle in speech in ways meant to disrupt. Now these are those claiming they do not believe in me and I have not asked them to. Now I am still of some compassion for them, although I come to you to give you knowledge of it that you might know whether it is true or not and what should be the right thing. For they are seeming increasingly for war and attempt to in speech seperate me from you, and yet I have claimed they are not to worship me and what I give to others they are disrupting from outside the walls. Now who these are I cannot say, whether Christian or not, and they are behaving with speech meant to disrupt like tactics of war and soldiers.
Now nations have been wise to say, you can fight to defend yourself with reasonable force that those exceeding in defence are to be judged as wicked and punished, and to exceed justice is to commit wickedness and become the one with guilt to be punished, but what fool is attacking with what is not wrestling among friends, keeping to righteousness, and then saying, when the battle is occurring, yet you cannot use that hold or punch? But are they not only using a hold to break a bone? But if one begins battle than they receive battle and the norms and restrictions of peace are cancelled by them because they wage battle, that you are strong and fast, able to break bones, draw blood, blind, trip, bruise, and throw down, that you are able to use pure metal, swords that severe, knives and weapons that break and bruise, for those who are the devil’s are upon the land and roaming about to do wickedness, to maim and attack, even to kill.
Now nations have been wise to say, you can fight to defend yourself with reasonable force that those exceeding in defence are to be judged as wicked and punished, and to exceed justice is to commit wickedness and become the one with guilt to be punished, but what fool is attacking with what is not wrestling among friends, keeping to righteousness, and then saying, when the battle is occurring, yet you cannot use that hold or punch? But are they not only using a hold to break a bone? But if one begins battle than they receive battle and the norms and restrictions of peace are cancelled by them because they wage battle, that you are strong and fast, able to break bones, draw blood, blind, trip, bruise, and throw down, that you are able to use pure metal, swords that severe, knives and weapons that break and bruise, for those who are the devil’s are upon the land and roaming about to do wickedness, to maim and attack, even to kill.
Now no human being or animal can survive even one quarter of the transformation that the one who hates would attempt to force upon them, for those of the devil are blood-thirsty and with such intense hate as to mutilate, for these are them who are deceived and believing within themselves what is not, that it is a fake attempt to slay with guile as if done against the image that is seen with bad eyes and is not anything. Now there are many attempting various things to slay with guile, for do not the words of mighty combat soldiers attempt it, and yet they treat such like weak wrestling, as if sport, for they are mighty, and yet there are those like combat soldiers in society who go much further. Now Moses declared death for these who are attempting so that it is not a short thing in anger, but a sincere attempt that is attempting more times, that death is declared for these by Moses, that wickedness is put away from a clean land.
Now no son of Orgoth has authority on Earth and yet the highest son of Orgoth is found in mouths of animals, for the doctrines are for animals, that they are the right things for the doctrine.
Now none of the servants of Orgoth, being servants of the sons, are supportive of Christians, and the servants of Orgoth who are Orgoth servant’s people are for killing all Christians and the beautiful, for they are finding Christianity to be of beauty that is intolerable to them. Now if these servants are of the uncontrollable heart to kill all Christians, and it is so, than it is good that the church is praying to control and alter the heaven where the spirits are acting as kings and queens and others that God who rules over this is having all power and the Christ is with the Christians, that they alter for good that the beautiful and the Christians might be protected and that great disadvantages and all manner of bad coincidence might be against them who would be doing the will of the devil, that the mighty ones of Earth might be obtaining total and unrelenting victory against them, and if there is another time of prayer, than I would ask them to
 consider the spreading of the kingdom of heaven. Now I would be praying with things of Mala, that your words might be few, that you know of what David, the Lord’s servant could do, and the Christ is with you, for did not God utterly devour the sacrifice of Elijah? Now I am also wishing for those who are mighty on Earth and of a great thirst to fight to be given much support by the church and I wish they were to be given more resources.
Now not being forbidden to harass each other, are you not free to bully and harass each other? But if you are able to bully and harass even using sexual harrassment where you cannot be fired, than are you not being two people who are alone? But if you are married to an animal who is only restrained by the consequence of crime than do you think it good for you to stay with the person as if you were married to one who can be with you? But if one is not ready to leave child-good can they be married when they are not yet 14 years of age? But I do not write about actual age. But does even a child do what the one you are with does? But if you are willing to continue, than what can be done, but if you are departing, than you will not do what keeps you from gaining when you have departed, but if you are for divorce than you will be remaining married until there is divorce, that you be attaining what is good again. Now if you will incline to wisdom than it is for you, and if you will be seeking it, be seeking it early, that the busyness of a matter does not make it so you commit error when the time has come to exercise wisdom. But I know that God is greater than I, and if I am with love than how much more is He? And yet how does he judge and by what standard does he forgive? For I only give wisdom to be as guidance for those who choose it.
Now not being forbidden to harass each other, are you not free to bully and harass each other? But if you are able to bully and harass even using sexual harrassment where you cannot be fired, than are you not being two people who are alone? But if you are married to an animal who is only restrained by the consequence of crime than do you think it good for you to stay with the person as if you were married to one who can be with you? But if one is not ready to leave child-good can they be married when they are not yet 14 years of age? But I do not write about actual age. But does even a child do what the one you are with does? But if you are willing to continue, than what can be done, but if you are departing, than you will not do what keeps you from gaining when you have departed, but if you are for divorce than you will be remaining married until there is divorce, that you be attaining what is good again. Now if you will incline to wisdom than it is for you, and if you will be seeking it, be seeking it early, that the busyness of a matter does not make it so you commit error when the time has come to exercise wisdom. But I know that God is greater than I, and if I am with love than how much more is He? And yet how does he judge and by what standard does he forgive? For I only give wisdom to be as guidance for those who choose it.
Now not even Babel was doing all the will of God as the Jews did and Babylon has forbidden Jews in fullfilling His will because they are claiming the world where they reside. Now Jerusuleum the New is the Christ’s bride and the angel is His servant. Now if the angel is His servant and truth is sent out that gives much good power to those who are worthy and attacks that which is of the devil’s than for what reason would Joshua hold back? But I would think that the prince of that land that would be Joshua is mingling with that apathy of Rome, and Rome is there that Babel has trusted in it that they would be in apathy. Now such is not Rome and to their credit, that the nation that is not Rome and is having much taken by Babylon and is stolen much by the rich has been fought by those like Jews that it has not prevailed in many ways because these are not an apathetic people. So if not Rome or Babylon able to consume them from within, then they would be able to be like Joshua and the Island nation is not corrupt in this way, only those around Israel and some to the East are given to Joshua for the same reason other nations were given to him. Now the angel has perceived it and he has been given the Earth like a place to rest his feet while he is reclined on a throne. Now if Lucifer sends out light and causes the Earth to shake with thunder than Joshua brings fire and battle in Ria.
Now not everything can be made to make sense in the language of dogs and Babel has often attempted to translate to dog-tongue.
Now not in any way being a thing of Babel it is good to know of things on Earth that are for wisdom.
Now of people and the resting place, that a people are seperate who are for insurgency if the people are occupied, and they form as the defence against such, for armies are laying down their arms, that these are a threat and offence to the inner spirit of Babylon and Babel is not ready to lead, for the truth of governing is elsewhere, that the soul of Babylon has hated those who would be the defence like bitter gravel in the mouth, and the soul places poison in the heart to find them a thing to resent and hate, that they should be resisted, for the nation is sick with the deseases of Babylon and Babylon brings many spiritual deseases that are infecting the people. For the defence is not to be threat to the nation, and it is not good to alienate the defence or steal the defence for attack against itself, its own people. For they are for the occupation, to use the tactics of speed and hiding that the occupier might be weary and considering the thing they do to be of little value to them.
Now of queens: but there is the Queen of Sheba, a great queen, and can the woman of women say she is not great? For there is lesser threat in ability. Now can she keep a wife of an angel? But the woman of woman, can she? Now the woman who can keep her, is she not queen? Now the daughters she keeps, are they not worthy women, and yet she cannot keep another queen even if the other is lesser. Now those loyal to such a queen, are they not all people of worth? But which queen is with care for the Christ’s Satan is naturally blessed by him. Now where is the goddess that is with care for the Satan? Now she is wife to a righteous man. Now the smooth stone covers and the goddess is praising the Lord.
Now of queens: but there is the Queen of Sheba, a great queen, and can the woman of women say she is not great? For there is lesser threat in ability. Now can she keep a wife of an angel? But the woman of woman, can she? Now the woman who can keep her, is she not queen? Now the daughters she keeps, are they not worthy women, and yet she cannot keep another queen even if the other is lesser. Now those loyal to such a queen, are they not all people of worth? But which queen is with care for the Christ’s Satan is naturally blessed by him. Now where is the goddess that is with care for the Satan? Now she is wife to a righteous man. Now the smooth stone covers and the goddess is praising the Lord.
Now one cannot go in one direction and the other direction at the same time, for there is none who says I go with wisdom that later I might be do the foolishness of the devil to take vengence for foolishness, that you know there is no true war within God’s house against itself. But there is wrestling and is there not among friends? But where there are imposters they are so fixed and so firmly it is like bad seed growing up among the good and how are they to be quickly gathered up and removed? But there are fools who would fight for foolishness who are for exploiting the wise to wage war against the one who is a friend and would be fighting with them. Now by the wise measure of understanding and justice a noble man has said, yet you fight in my name and you are an enemy of myself and another. For is the devil to destroy all, even those in war against another. For when two nations fight the devil comes to exploit the fighting that he might destroy both, and there even those dogs that are having no understanding, rovving and killing great soldiers with hopes for some reward somewhere, and yet there is no reward from men, for whether fighting or not the wisdom of a man is having understanding and the sword of a man is not fearing man more that God, and yet the hand of man is being against them in doing justice when it is exceeding a measure.
Now one claims property not theirs in request, and yet there is a dog whose sense of territory is not sane, that they drive the loved woman away from the man who is person. Now can a dog love? But if a dog claims much territory by pointless claims, though there is not love with them as it is love with people.
Now one claims property not theirs in request, and yet there is a dog whose sense of territory is not sane, that they drive the loved woman away from the man who is person. Now can a dog love? But if a dog claims much territory by pointless claims, though there is not love with them as it is love with people.
Now one does not believe in his leader, to denegrate, because he is lazy and resentful, being wicked, but those who have laboured for those who had little to pay them have shown themselves worthy and not wicked in this way, that the ones who laboured, doing much with a little are able to be stolen by the rich and given more.
Now one is greater and higher by morality, but those who are using servant wisdom who has a servant upon something better than servant is acting in combat. Now if it is against Sodom combat is it clean? But the one who gathers house and friends is against another house and friends, and the one who ambushes is not higher than God. But such is not doing righteously. Now will a house perish for one? But alliances
 are made that one is cast out. Now who can understand immediately all that God does?
Now one is yielding and advancing and it is all but the lion does neither. 
Now one models themselves child abuser to another not their child,  and of the similiar age, another striker of woman towards the man, another abuser of daughter to the man, another older brother, another younger brother, another one loaning who is owed, but they are strangers, and all the false things they are not, in reality, to another, that their heart does it from being against their own life, for these are the devil’s unless they should be at peace. Now the one who does so must show themselves worthy, for if wickedness is found in them they will die.
Now one pillar is dark and the other white, and the two pillars are before the house of God. Now the dark pillar is liking the dark pillar and wanting to be with it, and yet if it is not so, yet there is what must be, only let the small child who is cared for by some on Earth in ways have what he wants, but I will not say it, for such is a selfish child and in such it would be dispicable, and yet it seems right that God should do this, yet it is not right to say, and I do not ask. Now if many daughters have cared for the angel, is he not grateful? But Babylon is not afraid to attack, for their hearts are hard and cruel, and they have great hatred, and yet the angel has not come bearing violent war against them, and was not for doing a thing to them. For no city has he been told to destroy, no violence has he been told to bring by his hand, and yet would he not defend himself? But Babylon has said, the things grow large and much more in might, and it is a thing of the house of God, therefore your hatred is right by which you would bash it and kill it. But yet most have not had such a heart and are willing to care for the angel and are they also not right to listen to what the angel writes even if there should be error found in places? But have the mighty of Earth even defended the angel? But the angel has been well cared for by women of the Earth, and men have had kindness, that most are not seen to be of Babylon, and yet an evil time has come as the sign passes between Saturn and Jupiter. Now the angel has been capable of playing a grown man, and has understanding and is for fullfilling and being an angel of the Christ.
Now one said, yet you should not approach me because you are a god of Elsnon. Now it is not an offensive thing.
Now one wants wheat, another wanders and wants for nothing and is given much, and the Lord is God of the Universe. Now what is lacking that one lacks wheat? Now the one with much goes out to get and is given and the one who lacks stays where he is and then complains that he is lacking. Now the two are different for the one has what is better and the other not what is better than wheat. Now the one values what is better and the other does not. Now when one of them goes out to get who lacks wheat he is not given much and the one who has what is better is given much. Now the one who is given less and does not have what is better, should he then hate the other because the other has more? But both have what they need and more. Now what does Babylon say? But it is saying, let all be like the one who lacks wheat and let them all lack even more than this, for the devil is for poverty, that people not have anything from God. Now if both have wheat and one has less wheat is it not still better than Babylon?
Now one wants wheat, another wanders and wants for nothing and is given much, and the Lord is God of the Universe. Now what is lacking that one lacks wheat? Now the one with much goes out to get and is given and the one who lacks stays where he is and then complains that he is lacking. Now the two are different for the one has what is better and the other not what is better than wheat. Now the one values what is better and the other does not. Now when one of them goes out to get who lacks wheat he is not given much and the one who has what is better is given much. Now the one who is given less and does not have what is better, should he then hate the other because the other has more? But both have what they need and more. Now what does Babylon say? But it is saying, let all be like the one who lacks wheat and let them all lack even more than this, for the devil is for poverty, that people not have anything from God. Now if both have wheat and one has less wheat is it not still better than Babylon? Now the one who lacks calls what is not wheat a thing as wheat and he does not have the better things. Now he sells his blessing for meals, he throws away his own substance and gathers worthless metals that are scattered that he cannot sell. Now he abuses himself and makes himself ugly and he scorns and curses in bitterness when people do not give to him more than they are willing to give and those who give nothing he curses with bitterness. Now he has much and yet he is hasty that he does not have much more and quickly. Now the cause is the other who has a little more than him. Now the other loves righteousness and has what is better. Now are not both loved by God? 
Now one wants wheat, another wanders and wants for nothing and is given much, and the Lord is God of the Universe. Now what is lacking that one lacks wheat? Now the one with much goes out to get and is given and the one who lacks stays where he is and then complains that he is lacking. Now the two are different for the one has what is better and the other not what is better than wheat. Now the one values what is better and the other does not. Now when one of them goes out to get who lacks wheat he is not given much and the one who has what is better is given much. Now the one who is given less and does not have what is better, should he then hate the other because the other has more? But both have what they need and more. Now what does Babylon say? But it is saying, let all be like the one who lacks wheat and let them all lack even more than this, for the devil is for poverty, that people not have anything from God. Now if both have wheat and one has less wheat is it not still better than Babylon? Now the one who lacks calls what is not wheat a thing as wheat and he does not have the better things. Now he sells his blessing for meals, he throws away his own substance and gathers worthless metals that are scattered that he cannot sell. Now he abuses himself and makes himself ugly and he scorns and curses in bitterness when people do not give to him more than they are willing to give and those who give nothing he curses with bitterness. Now he has less interest in what he receives than the other man except because the other man has more he is wanting to have what he does not much want and even more he does not want it at all only the other man has it that he wants it. Now the cause is the other who has a little more than him. Now the other loves righteousness and has what is better. Now are not both loved by God? But one has no desire for things of God, that are not wheat as the man who lacks calls it, but the man who lacks has no desire for things of God that are not comparable to money. Now what does the man who lacks desire? But he cannot be at peace for neither can the other man, for both are doing things during their time, only the one who lacks does not go to be given and only if the other man is given does he eventually say, I will do as others do and go out to be given, but he has no desire for it. Now he cannot be at peace for he has no desire to go to be given that he reasons he has no desire for things. Now Babylon offers to make him a Unich, for such is the way of Babylon, and the city says, come serve us, and yet it worships the devil in ignorance and does not know it. Now the kingdom of the Lord says to all, come be with us, for the yoke is easy and the riches are great.
Now one wants wheat, another wanders and wants for nothing and is given much, and the Lord is God of the Universe. Now what is lacking that one lacks wheat? Now the one with much goes out to get and is given and the one who lacks stays where he is and then complains that he is lacking. Now the two are different for the one has what is better and the other not what is better than wheat. Now the one values what is better and the other does not. Now when one of them goes out to get who lacks wheat he is not given much and the one who has what is better is given much. Now the one who is given less and does not have what is better, should he then hate the other because the other has more? But both have what they need and more. Now what does Babylon say? But it is saying, let all be like the one who lacks wheat and let them all lack even more than this, for the devil is for poverty, that people not have anything from God. Now if both have wheat and one has less wheat is it not still better than Babylon? Now the one who lacks calls what is not wheat a thing as wheat and he does not have the better things. Now he sells his blessing for meals, he throws away his own substance and gathers worthless metals that are scattered that he cannot sell. Now he abuses himself and makes himself ugly and he scorns and curses in bitterness when people do not give to him more than they are willing to give and those who give nothing he curses with bitterness. Now he has less interest in what he receives than the other man except because the other man has more he is wanting to have what he does not much want and even more he does not want it at all only the other man has it that he wants it. Now the cause is the other who has a little more than him. Now the other loves righteousness and has what is better. Now are not both loved by God? But one has no desire for things of God, that are not wheat as the man who lacks calls it, but the man who lacks has no desire for things of
 God that are not comparable to money. Now what does the man who lacks desire? But he cannot be at peace for neither can the other man, for both are doing things during their time, only the one who lacks does not go to be given and only if the other man is given does he eventually say, I will do as others do and go out to be given, but he has no desire for it. Now he cannot be at peace for he has no desire to go to be given that he reasons he has no desire for things. Now Babylon offers to make him a Unich, for such is the way of Babylon, and the city says, come serve us, and yet it worships the devil in ignorance and does not know it. Now the kingdom of the Lord says to all, come be with us, for the yoke is easy and the riches are great.
Now one wants wheat, another wanders and wants for nothing and is given much, and the Lord is God of the Universe. Now what is lacking that one lacks wheat? Now the one with much goes out to get and is given and the one who lacks stays where he is and then complains that he is lacking. Now the two are different for the one has what is better and the other not what is better than wheat. Now the one values what is better and the other does not. Now when one of them goes out to get who lacks wheat he is not given much and the one who has what is better is given much. Now the one who is given less and does not have what is better, should he then hate the other because the other has more? But both have what they need and more. Now what does Babylon say? But it is saying, let all be like the one who lacks wheat and let them all lack even more than this, for the devil is for poverty, that people not have anything from God. Now if both have wheat and one has less wheat is it not still better than Babylon? Now the one who lacks calls what is not wheat a thing as wheat and he does not have the better things. Now he sells his blessing for meals, he throws away his own substance and gathers worthless metals that are scattered that he cannot sell. Now he abuses himself and makes himself ugly and he scorns and curses in bitterness when people do not give to him more than they are willing to give and those who give nothing he curses with bitterness. Now he has much and yet he is hasty that he does not have much more and quickly. Now the cause is the other who has a little more than him. Now the other loves righteousness and has what is better. Now are not both loved by God? 
Now one wants wheat, another wanders and wants for nothing and is given much, and the Lord is God of the Universe. Now what is lacking that one lacks wheat? Now the one with much goes out to get and is given and the one who lacks stays where he is and then complains that he is lacking. Now the two are different for the one has what is better and the other not what is better than wheat. Now the one values what is better and the other does not. Now when one of them goes out to get who lacks wheat he is not given much and the one who has what is better is given much. Now the one who is given less and does not have what is better, should he then hate the other because the other has more? But both have what they need and more. Now what does Babylon say? But it is saying, let all be like the one who lacks wheat and let them all lack even more than this, for the devil is for poverty, that people not have anything from God. Now if both have wheat and one has less wheat is it not still better than Babylon?
Now one who is a statue played and it was good, for he played what is for serpents and others. Now if he was not the best public speaker it is not required for who would want it. But he was not from India, for he was found among the fair shade. Now the angel might think it worthy of mention if others do not. 
Now one who is a statue played and it was good, for he played what is for serpents and others. Now if he was not the best public speaker it is not required for who would want it. But he was not from India, for he was found among the fair shade. Now the angel might think it worthy of mention if others do not. 
Now one who speaks as a combat soldier at the table of peace, cannot remain afterwards if there are to be discussions, for the table is not for the speech of a small child or the speech and ways of the combat soldier, that neither can be there, but such is carried out in an orderly fashion without abandoning truth, for if one there is wanting war, the place for it is the battle-field and the purpose of the table removes some from its presence.
Now one who tells a person to do something before they can do it is attempting that the person not do it, and this common battle tactic by the enemy. The one harrassing a person to do a thing is attempting they not be capable of doing it when they are doing so with bullying and much harrassment, and this is a common battle tactic. The one starting an altercation that it quickly esvalates is picking a fight for some purpose, often so they might lie about the person. But as for what kills there is one who would draw another into a conflict that they might feign great anger and kill them. Now you have not done foolishly because they did evil, but if you were in the employment of the devil you would be foolish.
Now one wife has rebuked and another has walked away and departed, and which is wiser? But when indulges praise, though she rejects and is faithful, and another will not indulge it, but departs, and neither have cast away their palace and riches, their statue also, when tempted by that which kills and destroys, for the husband of one is having pity for the fan letter, that he is of understanding, and the wise woman who departs, who departs from even the fan letter, for is she not an enigma among the wise women? Now neither has sinned, and both are wise and one is more innocent than the other in consideration of her type of wisdom, and yet neither has sinned.
Now only insolence is offensive and arragance is not to men, but permit women what is acceptable in all things when you are knowing it is acceptable. Now what is in truth cannot be insolent and arragance without insolence cannot be judged by men.
Now out of mouths of fools has come much projection, and yet common sense has been consistent.
Now people are not deceived and yet women commit the sin of Adam and her husband is not displeased. Now that which guides from truth is changing some into killing machines when they have taken in enough lies that change truth to permission to continue in wrong. Now cast it out that you not be destroyed by yourself, and if wickedness tears the garment then repent, for those who abuse that others commit wickedness are to blame for their wickedness and that of another. Now sodomites are this abusive and Jesus was slayn in what is called Sodom and Egypt for he calls to the woman that the man is her mother, and such is a brutal thing that causes others to sin, for it is a thing of Sodom. Now sexual harrassment comes in two forms, Gomorrah and Sodom and Sodom is wicked and Gomorrah is evil and both cities were destroyed. Now both things that come out of those cities are for combat that they are things of combat. Now even if you do not believe do you bring a blasphamous report against another religion? But are you not disagreeing in a manner being good to others that they believe and you are to be a holy people not speaking on these occasions like dogs who mock. Now it does good for the devil’s war to be disrespectful and to mock in this way. But Babylon is cruel and working those who compromise truth with over diligence and demanding unichs with all doctrine of servants that Babylonians are rightly punished to cause jelousy rather than fear God and obey Him. Now discord has cause lies that cause fear of Islam and can it not also be caused for Christians and Jews? But Orgoth’s highest sin attacks in layers turning one against the other and steadily killing all. Now Babylon grows out of nothing in pockets and spreads, and it is the devil’s. Not it casts out the intelligent who exceed with much understanding and it chastises those who do not keep the wisdom and ways of servants, that a light should not shine bright less it cause jelousy, for Babylon is wanting servants. Now Daniel goes into his room to prey and yet he saves, but those who seek to expel God’s kingdom are given rewards and gifts that they fall to piles of ashes. Now have not many women hated Babylon? But they are too much like Jacob who would make great attempts for a blessing, and yet the servants of the Christ not angels are not unichs but are greater than the sons and daughters so that it is like giants in the land and some might perceive it. Now these are not servants among men but they are servants of the Christ. Now the slaves of the fair are fair and the slaves of the darker are darker and the slaves are attacking the slaves from both are attacking slave owners, the fair attacking darker slave owners and fair slave owners and the dark attacking fair slave owners and dark slave owners. Now by lack of obedience the slaves are causing much chaos in the land and slave owners must be men and women who are able to bring the Earth under subjection and to open their hand where it is right. Now the indigenous have a different way. Now animals are not knowing the difference between things because they are animals. Now when a slave is permitted to attack a slave owner by lack of consequence do they not next attack the slave owner who commands them in tasks? But there cannot be permitted any true discord between slave owners that is a thing of more consequence unless the slaves will gain a foot-hold for the devil.
Now people speak truly with what they perform, for not many are honest when they perform evil. Now whether the highest son or the lowest of Orgoth is by the deed performed and not by confession of mouth, that some are imposters
 among the others and their deed speaks if they are the highest or lowest, and the absence is the lake of fire that hears not judgement of man or rebuke. Now deeds speak for all and there is no escape from oneself, that those who speak other than deeds speak air without sound. Now you are not an animal and you know better, for animal does not know the difference of things and nothing needs to be explained. For if one is animal there is no more time for them and if one is lake of fire they prefer to be destroying themselves, for it cannot be comprehended by man and the angel comes as man, and is not the Lord’s angels, but is the Christ’s who came as truly human. Now the angel is child, liking misheouv against Abraham, and yet it is that of love. Now those who do that of wickedness are old men, twice died of old age, hardened soldiers, cruel of heart and strong in chains and rage, dog-lions for roaring and speaking brutal. Now take a portion of criminals away from their own, for some are animals, meant to be slaves of burden and commanded by the servant of the house for if he does to seperate man and wife or those meant to be, he is made slave animal for he is already animal. Now Isaac brought such animals to his father and his father was not insane and neither was the angel, and Abraham is father of many nations who are God’s.
Now people who are comparible to a type of creature on the planet are not animals, of course, and this known. But when they are comparible to a creature and people of the kingdom or human but not people of the kingdom this is what was only assumed. Now do you think that when a race is mentioned they are actually some creature and not a race? But if you believe I do not know that you are free, and also from me, because I do not attempt to defend what I offer, only I would not want confusion. But does any think a thing prior mentioned is another thing or that two things that are different are the same? But would this not be very unjust and towards what is good and God’s because it is something I have not told you about and you think it is something that it is not? But when Adam was in the garden the Lord brought to him every creature and if he can tell the difference to name that which he has not been told of than his children, too, can do this thing, so you not be made disabled by what you might have assumed and do what is not just, for I do not give you all wisdom and knowledge of the Universe.
Now regarding those who are good, a fool has said of them, be something else that will not make me jelous, and yet it is not God’s will for them to be that other thing, and indeed they cannot be it, that there are rewards for the other thing and rewards for what they are, that no person who is the devil’s might come between brothers and sisters.
Now regarding those who are good, a fool has said of them, be something else that will not make me jelous, and yet it is not God’s will for them to be that other thing, and indeed they cannot be it, that there are rewards for the other thing and rewards for what they are, that no person who is the devil’s might come between brothers and sisters.
Now rinosoris is having its vision that it does not always perceive, and yet if it charges it is often missing and they part ways and rino is not continuing.
Now sand is lapping upon sand and light is landing upon the floor and time is ticking past as the shadows wait beside the light, that mammals move, and mountains loom and the Earth has radiated time upon so much sorrow that ever is forever in the anti emporer’s land that simple things wilt to the power of the day and forests flare with the flat nothingness and yet bring forth shades, and so it simply leans upon this, that air is now bringing messages from abroad on wings of bats that the sound is in the trembling thunder of them soaring fast over the expanse and framed in here is the cavern of light that lifts through all the space.
Now self-attack and self rebellion and one who sins against themselves by the perversities they do being perversions of justice and righteousness and every good thing by actions and words, this I have called korith and korith is the 6th thing of Orgoth’s servant, and it is found in his servants on Earth by even what they are, for they are below the bottom of the ocean, below the line of reason. Now some of them are dreaming to the point of drunkenness because they are capable of becoming this, and because of korith they are utter korith when a drunken honesty is mixed with korith, because it is a disgusting wine they drink and corrupt perversities come from their mouths, for their hearts, even, are warped, and they defile themselves by korith. Now there words are like a place of hard stone and treacherous passage that there words are as a place of stumbling and crookedness, for they are answered truthfully, for they are only incoherent, not making sense in terms of reason, for a brother has commited korith and yet another, not knowing with what heart it was said, swore an oath concerning them, for they commited korith in going to his mother and with insolence and with with lack of integrity and lack of righteousness and with feet and with speech and with a chest of bread turned to stone and a head of bread turned to stone and feet that sin and speech which flatters and deceives and commits misciouv and trechory, for he is found with korith, and yet if he is speaking innocent, than he is not found with korith, for the symbol he asks for is for staging rebellion and being elder he is having the symbol of the true king, and being declared king by others prior, how much more so is he to be viewed as a true king when he is taking the symbol of the true king. Now in insolence he demands in ways to come before the one he would have slayn in a moment later, for there is that which is already korith, for there is a person shoving his way in, demanding, and there is already korith, but such is not ever to the degree of Orgoth’s servant.
Now serial killers have different methods and there is the type who slanders, saying that which is not so, feigning problems because of what did not occur, that they lie, and the one who does not question it but goes out to kill is their partner and a serial killer with them. Now here is a matter in which it was said that the one who slanders would be punished by what they attempted, when there are others who would heed their lies, that it is clear that actions would be taken, that it is not a light matter, and they have continued to lie. Now when a young girl does so regarding a boy, men are not ignorant as would be said, and the young man behaving honourable, and yet an adult has sought to exploit that which is to be robbed of them? Let it not be so that you will rob any, because of a disposable fool who seeks to exploit, to be against the young man. For it is not unexpected, and is for good, that the fool who is an adult will be identified and if he persists, than men are capable of putting away evil, that this power is on Earth, and not the law of Moses, but that which is put there by God, and the law of Moses, also, remains.
Now serial killers have different methods and there is the type who slanders, saying that which is not so, feigning problems because of what did not occur, that they lie, and the one who does not question it but goes out to kill is their partner and a serial killer with them. Now here is a matter in which it was said that the one who slanders would be punished by what they attempted, when there are others who would heed their lies, that it is clear that actions would be taken, that it is not a light matter, and they have continued to lie. Now when a young girl does so regarding a boy, men are not ignorant as would be said, and the young man behaving honourable, and yet an adult has sought to exploit that which is to be robbed of them? Let it not be so that you will rob any, because of a despicable fool who seeks to exploit, to be against the young man. For it is not unexpected, and is for good, that the fool who is an adult will be identified and if he persists, than men are capable of putting away evil, that this power is on Earth, and not the law of Moses, but that which is put there by God, and the law of Moses, also, remains.
Now serial killers have different methods and there is the type who slanders, saying that which is not so, feigning problems because of what did not occur, that they lie, and the one who does not question it but goes out to kill is their partner and a serial killer with them. Now here is a matter in which it was said that the one who slanders would be punished by what they attempted, when there are others who would heed their lies, that it is clear that actions would be taken, that it is not a light matter, and they have continued to lie. Now when a young girl does so regarding a boy, men are not ignorant as would be said, and the young man behaving honourable, and yet an adult has sought to exploit that which is to be robbed of them? Let it not be so that you will rob any, because of a despicable fool who seeks to exploit, to be against the young man. For it is not unexpected, and is for good, that the fool who is an adult will be identified and if he persists, than men are capable of putting away evil, that this power is on Earth, and not the law of Moses, but that which is put there by God, and the law of Moses, also, remains.
Now serial killers have different methods and there is the type who slanders, saying that which is not so, feigning problems because of what did not occur, that they lie, and the one who does not question it but goes out to kill is their partner and a serial killer with them. Now here is a matter in which it was said that the one who slanders would be punished by what they attempted, when there are others who would heed their lies, that
 it is clear that actions would be taken, that it is not a light matter, and they have continued to lie. Now when a young girl does so regarding a boy, men are not ignorant as would be said, and the young man behaving honourable, and yet an adult has sought to exploit that which is to be robbed of them? Let it not be so that you will rob any, because of a despicable fool who seeks to exploit, to be against the young man. For it is not unexpected, and is for good, that the fool who is an adult will be identified and if he persists, than men are capable of putting away evil, that this power is on Earth, and not the law of Moses, but that which is put there by God, and the law of Moses, also, remains.
Now should anything you cannot speak be said? But in matters of crime I would think so, although whether it is true is found out with wisdom and prudence because haste is bringing an accusation of bias. But what is not to be said may not be right to say another way, unless you would consider government censorship or some great consequence for speaking truth. But if any have not sought to conceal and you do not understand why do you make an accusation that they are evil? Is this a belief that some have? But those who have respect of persons are not having what is good, so that such seems to bring about other problems that are not wanted. Can any good come from what is not that the products be good but the source is not. Therefore you are known to be something that is considered not well and such can be brought to the psychologist, whose ways and words are found strange and with truth but going astray. 
Now should some things not first be fullfilled before a temple is built? But the angel cannot enter or see inside. 
Now sicophantry is not part of jelousy, for the fruits brought forth of jelousy do not have it. But sicophantry is of the rebellious who mutilates themselves and desires to mutilate others, that it is an act of rebellion, for the heart extends, being full, that it has fullfilled within and spills over to the external to a person. For when a person has rebelled against their own beauty they are going outside themselves, for their hearts teach their mouths that them who degrade have degraded themselves, and them who destroy have destroyed themselves, and them who give, are those who take and gain. Now those doing justice have done justice within themselves, and those hating evil, as a xenophobic who hates what is not of its type. Now those fearing to be people are burying themselves, for their hearts were frightened for their hearts knew they were animal. Now a human says, it is only what people do, but an animal does good and exploits it to an extreme, that a human is owing them their life, that is God’s, for a thing, according to an animal. Now those demanding good for good are only demanding a man or a woman rather than animal or servant. Now him who despises with wrath the exchange of good for good that his conscience is clear as if not even theif, this one is not wanting to fullfill righteousness to be a man. Now a man does not descend to stumbling blocks where right things are spoken, but he is speaking as a man, that he not be counted servant.
Now sicophantry is not part of jelousy, for the fruits brought forth of jelousy do not have it. But sicophantry is of the rebellious who mutilates themselves and desires to mutilate others, that it is an act of rebellion, for the heart extends, being full, that it has fullfilled within and spills over to the external to a person. For when a person has rebelled against their own beauty they are going outside themselves, for their hearts teach their mouths that them who degrade have degraded themselves, and them who destroy have destroyed themselves, and them who give, are those who take and gain. Now those doing justice have done justice within themselves, and those hating evil, as a xenophobic who hates what is not of its type. Now those fearing to be people are burying themselves, for their hearts were frightened for their hearts knew they were animal. Now a human says, it is only what people do, but an animal does good and exploits it to an extreme, that a human is owing them their life, that is God’s, for a thing, according to an animal. Now those demanding good for good are only demanding a man or a woman rather than animal or servant. Now him who despises with wrath the exchange of good for good that his conscience is clear as if not even theif, this one is not wanting to fullfill righteousness to be a man. Now a man does not descend to stumbling blocks where right things are spoken, but he is speaking as a man, that he not be counted servant.
Now sicophantry is not part of jelousy, for the fruits brought forth of jelousy do not have it. But sicophantry is of the rebellious who mutilates themselves and desires to mutilate others, that it is an act of rebellion, for the heart extends, being full, that it has fullfilled within and spills over to the external to a person. For when a person has rebelled against their own beauty they are going outside themselves, for their hearts teach their mouths that them who degrade have degraded themselves, and them who destroy have destroyed themselves, and them who give, are those who take and gain. Now those doing justice have done justice within themselves, and those hating evil, as a xenophobic who hates what is not of its type. Now those fearing to be people are burying themselves, for their hearts were frightened for their hearts knew they were animal. Now a human says, it is only what people do, but an animal does good and exploits it to an extreme, that a human is owing them their life, that is God’s, for a thing, according to an animal. Now those demanding good for good are only demanding a man or a woman rather than animal or servant. Now him who despises with wrath the exchange of good for good that his conscience is clear as if not even theif, this one is not wanting to fullfill righteousness to be a man. Now a man does not descend to stumbling blocks where right things are spoken, but he is speaking as a man, that he not be counted servant.
Now silence towards her is to not bring a blasphemous report. But what will keep her from the rocks of a cave, the walls of a cliff? But does she not say, the Lord rebuke you? But if she does not what can she say? For be turned to precious stone or face the cliff walls and cave, now the precious stone, what is she? But she is pretty, very fair, and she is in sunlight and yet what man or woman can have her, for she goes where she is going, and she is more beautiful than diamond. 
Now silence towards her is to not bring a blasphemous report. But what will keep her from the rocks of a cave, the walls of a cliff? But does she not say, the Lord rebuke you? But if she does not what can she say? For be turned to precious stone or face the cliff walls and cave, now the precious stone, what is she? But she is pretty, very fair, and she is in sunlight and yet what man or woman can have her, for she goes where she is going, and she is more beautiful than diamond. 
Now simplicity is requested and yet the simplicity takes life in killing when there is other reasons, so that you might not say to one be trusting when you are to do your part to earn trust, and to another be complex when you are to be slain by objectivity without justice.
Now since child-good those of Abel went with God to become better and better and there was enough correction and hardship even in that, for they were of the normal standard, while since child-hood those of Cain went with the devil, for they were never one of the people, so that by an age they are people of the devil, having done much wickedness and having learned all of those they hate, that they are below the Earth, existing in the worsening and perishing, and not being ignorant of spiritual things, Abel’s sacrifice, they are hating and are jelous towards those who please God.
Now since child-hood those of Abel went with God to become better and better and there was enough correction and hardship even in that, for they were of the normal standard, while since child-hood those of Cain went with the devil, for they were never one of the people, so that by an age they are people of the devil, having done much wickedness and having learned all of those they hate, that they are below the Earth, existing in the worsening and perishing, and not being ignorant of spiritual things, Abel’s sacrifice, they are hating and are jelous towards those who please God.
Now since child-hood those of Abel went with God to become better and better and there was enough correction and hardship even in that, for they were of the normal standard, while since child-hood those of Cain went with the devil, for they were never one of the people, so that by an age they are people of the devil, having done much wickedness and having learned all of those they hate, that they are below the Earth, existing in the worsening and perishing, and not being ignorant of spiritual things, Abel’s sacrifice, they are hating and are jelous towards those who please God. Now they will say it is the Jews and Christians and God, that these things are not for us, being themselves, that they have rejected the whole truth and they are in resentment and hatred of God. Now let that they have cut themselves off prior to it be made known, be understood by those even who dwell with them prior, because the elder people of the devil have known their own and already adopted them for protection and the people is the larger kingdom that is for those who please God. Now if any is saying by Babylon that they bully when they keep the wicked fools in line, it is not for others who are seperate in a way but are with the people who are seeking to do well. But let the lions house be there that it might be well and that there
 might safety for those who do well. For the wicked will exercise bullying towards the meek and good and it is not readily perceived and yet the lions are having a well portion. But if any is wicked to slash and injur the lions because of righteousness than know that these are for drawing blood that it is good that they, lions, have defence, for the serpant who is so truly has pledged well allegiance to true lions according to the house, whether God’s or the devil’s, that the foolishness of the servants of the devil is great foolishness for their understanding is always in ignorance that they might serve the one who is to be defeated, for they are fools, and not serpants, for the devil has none, and because the Universe is created by God and is God’s that wisdom is with God and not the devil.
Now since child-hood those of Abel went with God to become better and better and there was enough correction and hardship even in that, for they were of the normal standard, while since child-hood those of Cain went with the devil, for they were never one of the people, so that by an age they are people of the devil, having done much wickedness and having learned all of those they hate, that they are below the Earth, existing in the worsening and perishing, and not being ignorant of spiritual things, Abel’s sacrifice, they are hating and are jelous towards those who please God. Now they will say it is the Jews and Christians and God, that these things are not for us, being themselves, that they have rejected the whole truth and they are in resentment and hatred of God. Now let that they have cut themselves off prior to it be made known, be understood by those even who dwell with them prior, because the elder people of the devil have known their own and already adopted them for protection and the people is the larger kingdom that is for those who please God. Now if any is saying by Babylon that they, lions, bully when they keep the wicked fools in line, it is not for others who are seperate in a way but are with the people who are seeking to do well. But let the lions house be there that it might be well and that there might safety for those who do well. For the wicked will exercise bullying towards the meek and good and it is not readily perceived and yet the lions are having a well portion. But if any is wicked to slash and injur the lions because of being against righteousness than know that these are for drawing blood that it is good that they, lions, have defence, for the serpant who is so truly has pledged well allegiance to true lions according to the house, whether God’s or the devil’s, that the foolishness of the servants of the devil is great foolishness for their understanding is always in ignorance that they might serve the one who is to be defeated, for they are fools, and not serpants, for the devil has none, and because the Universe is created by God and is God’s that wisdom is with God and not the devil. Now if there are to be false-lions than those who please God are with the greater kingdom, and if any lion is having the neurosis of insecurity that they fall too easily when exceptions are spoken, than let them not believe that the one they have resented is the devil’s for such is an insecurity that has caused anxiety and strength should be preferred. Now if wicked fools are for slashing with swords and knives from hell and using manners of spiritual weapons from hell, than are you not able to judge this thing? But the one who brings forth swords and knives from a righteous person is them who have attacked that the defence of swords and knives is just.
Now since child-hood those of Abel went with God to become better and better and there was enough correction and hardship even in that, for they were of the normal standard, while since child-hood those of Cain went with the devil, for they were never one of the people, so that by an age they are people of the devil, having done much wickedness and having learned all of those they hate, that they are below the Earth, existing in the worsening and perishing, and not being ignorant of spiritual things, Abel’s sacrifice, they are hating and are jelous towards those who please God. Now they will say it is the Jews and Christians and God, that these things are not for us, being themselves, that they have rejected the whole truth and they are in resentment and hatred of God. Now let that they have cut themselves off prior to it be made known, be understood by those even who dwell with them prior, because the elder people of the devil have known their own and already adopted them for protection and the people is the larger kingdom that is for those who please God. Now if any is saying by Babylon that they, lions, bully when they keep the wicked fools in line, it is not for others who are seperate in a way but are with the people who are seeking to do well. But let the lions house be there that it might be well and that there might safety for those who do well. For the wicked will exercise bullying towards the meek and good and it is not readily perceived and yet the lions are having a well portion. But if any is wicked to slash and injur the lions because of being against righteousness than know that these are for drawing blood that it is good that they, lions, have defence, for the serpant who is so truly has pledged well allegiance to true lions according to the house, whether God’s or the devil’s, that the foolishness of the servants of the devil is great foolishness for their understanding is always in ignorance that they might serve the one who is to be defeated, for they are fools, and not serpants, for the devil has none, and because the Universe is created by God and is God’s that wisdom is with God and not the devil. Now if there are to be false-lions than those who please God are with the greater kingdom, and if any lion is having the neurosis of insecurity that they fall too easily when exceptions are spoken, than let them not believe that the one they have resented is the devil’s for such is an insecurity that has caused anxiety and strength should be preferred. Now if wicked fools are for slashing with swords and knives from hell and using manners of spiritual weapons from hell, than are you not able to judge this thing? But the one who brings forth swords and knives from a righteous person is them who have attacked that the defence of swords and knives is just.
Now since child-hood those of Abel went with God to become better and better and there was enough correction and hardship even in that, for they were of the normal standard, while since child-hood those of Cain went with the devil, for they were never one of the people, so that by an age they are people of the devil, having done much wickedness and having learned all of those they hate, that they are below the Earth, existing in the worsening and perishing, and not being ignorant of spiritual things, Abel’s sacrifice, they are hating and are jelous towards those who please God. Now they will say it is the Jews and Christians and God, that these things are not for us, being themselves, that they have rejected the whole truth and they are in resentment and hatred of God. Now let that they have cut themselves off prior to it be made known, be understood by those even who dwell with them prior, because the elder people of the devil have known their own and already adopted them for protection and the people is the larger kingdom that is for those who please God. Now if any is saying by Babylon that they, lions, bully when they keep the wicked fools in line, it is not for others who are seperate in a way but are with the people who are seeking to do well. But let the lions house be there that it might be well and that there might safety for those who do well. For the wicked will exercise bullying towards the meek and good and it is not readily perceived and yet the lions are having a well portion. But if any is wicked to slash and injur the lions because of being against righteousness than know that these are for drawing blood that it is good that they, lions, have defence, for the serpant who is so truly has pledged well allegiance to true lions according to the house, whether God’s or the devil’s, that the foolishness of the servants of the devil is great foolishness for their understanding is always in ignorance that they might serve the one who is to be defeated, for they are fools, and not serpants, for the devil has none, and because the Universe is created by God and is God’s that wisdom is with God and not the devil. Now if there are to be false-lions than those who please God are with the greater kingdom, and if any lion is having the neurosis of insecurity that they fall too easily when exceptions are spoken, than let them not believe that the one they have resented is the devil’s for such is an insecurity that has caused anxiety and strength should be preferred. Now if wicked fools are for slashing with swords and knives from hell and using manners of spiritual weapons from hell, than are you not able to judge this thing? But the one who brings forth swords and knives from a righteous person is them who have attacked that the defence of swords and knives is just. Now the simple person who does not believe the righteous have right to defend themselves, but that it is evil, is not a lion and far from it, but they are a roaming beast to devour good and evil, and this thing has vanished from representation on Earth because of man and his building.
Now so the people can live, for it is a thing of weight, in my time the owners of great wealth and businesses have incurred war from humanity in small ways for benifits to humanity, and the owners of great wealth have waged war in return and made their money of little worth so that the retaliation was greater than the attack. Now it has been a war between
 humanity and these owners of great wealth, and the owners of great wealth are few but are of great strength in the war. Now the few are as powerful as governments in many ways so that they are able to challenge governments and war much upon humanity, for they are keeping Babylon and governments are sustaining and aiding Babylon and yet humanity is able to hinder them and slow them, and yet even a snail scales a tree in time, and Babylon can move very quickly at times. Now if the mighty men of nations fight it is sometimes for a leader opposing and sometimes for a leader supporting, that the governments are against those of great wealth and sometimes defending those of great wealth and the portion of land is being excessive for those of great wealth in comparison to what is for humanity to dwell upon. Now because to some extent the land for the greatly wealthy is giving more strength and control to Babylon the war is concerning the Great War against Babylon, being the war that is part of the ultimate war against the devil.
Now so the people can live, for it is a thing of weight, in my time the owners of great wealth and businesses have incurred war from humanity in small ways for benifits to humanity, and the owners of great wealth have waged war in return and made their money of little worth so that the retaliation was greater than the attack. Now it has been a war between humanity and these owners of great wealth, and the owners of great wealth are few but are of great strength in the war.
Now sodomite men come to man to be raped, and animals come to be made beasts of burden, for they are already given. Now both are demanding with charging and attempts that seem brutal, for whether they scream in rage or harass, the demand from them is great, but people are doing things of people.
Now sodomite men come to man to be raped, and animals come to be made beasts of burden, for they are already given. Now both are demanding with charging and attempts that seem brutal, for whether they scream in rage or harass, the demand from them is great, but people are doing things of people.
Now soldiers of Babylon are being imposters among us and they are not permitted into the sacred city of white stone and silver and wood, that the wall is high and the gates are shut, that while war wages, being declared likely enemies who are with the devil they have come in with great insolence to stomp like men who make a show of themselves, to confidently and arragantly ascend the steps amongst the holy guard, for insolence and wickedness is in their stomping feet that they disrespect the beauty of the city with their arragance, that they are walking as stiff necked men who heed no correction from God, and do not fear Him and they bypass the holy guards with strength that would heed no correction from God, indeed the rebuke and correction is in the air like a spirit and they stiffen their necks and they will not even blink for it. Now come to the throne because I have been joined by the precense of the one who commands me, being the son of God who endured for you and suffered and died for your sins, that he is well and not dead, but living, and I have heard to myself to understand that He is to have His enemies as His foot-stool. Now do not be afraid soldier of Babylon who are clothed in that of an iniquitious cult, for you are probably safe here, and your anger will be heard. But if you are not to be able to go out from the city the way you came in, than I am willing that you be considered to have been brave, for your king is already our enemy or it is not known but the life of you will be of more value considering your actions in this city than the lives of millions and of more value that acts that must happen that people might speak of peace. But show yourself a worthy man and you will live, but if wickedness is found in you than you will die. For are you not an enemy?
Now some animals are still having things only for small children in them that they never moved past to be people, for they are animals. Now there is a servant who will appreciate any king, those righteous who seem simple because of great intelligence and speed, but the servant is indignant and with wrath to bow to the son of another king that he is not loyal to. Now why make trouble? But the man is loyal to another king and what do you ask? Now if it is asked in speech of Mala, the second layer, being the spiritual mist, than the angel will explain: for does not Babylon seek to make trouble? For it is being cruel to its man that it’s heart has attempted to bow him to a son of another king, for it causes trouble between people at peace. Now will you not be as an angel to blame Babylon and not exault yourself in this thing, but say, none should bow to me in this? Now will you not support the Babylonian man in the evil that should not happen, for you are not king of Babylon or a king of God’s kingdoms. But such kings speak with each other, as if simple, for their words are few, because of the intelligence, for they lean fully upon the Lord and speak amongst each other. Now if their sons have cursed them and slandered them because they were ungrateful and unable to be grateful, yet the children’s children being honour and blessing. Now the children’s children support parents and give honour to grandparents.
Now some are abandoning when there is no cause for there has been no interloping of great or small for they are desiring as male to be raped by a man who is beautiful. Now the man who does this with consistency is betraying his wife, for it is as adultry and betrayal, but the man is beautiful and they cannot resist that they are jelous and hostile and sometimes angry. Now other men have been kind and sympathetic in their hearts that they do not restrain him who is hostile for they are saying, yet the beautiful man should rape him because he is in agony. Now there are others sympathetic and much of the Earth is in tears.
Now some are already in heaven with God and they are here on Earth, but their hearts are in heaven, and will it be that this will be hated by some? For the soul of a person is perceiving what they cannot, that they might drive a person to where they belong, because they are busy about the task and the person is a problem for them. 
Now some are liking to have pointless imaginings of the devil defeating the righteous as if there was no God, but as if there was, and yet the just recompense cannot be avoided, and where the one is placed too high in punishment is an offensive thing, and there is right to be offended for it is against the righteous and good, but the person is understood to be descending, if they are, to the place where they descend for what is done. Now who has been plucked from Orgoth, or who from Orgoth’s servant? But the one angry at the righteous for the Lord’s justice will not go unpunished, for he is angry at his brother for no reason, and it is not his brother. Now there is no victory against God, being against the righteous, not even by the lesser descent that what is the just recompense, for there is no lesser justice than what is just and there is no thing that hell is not able to punish in the afterlife, for they descend to places in hell while living according to punishment and afterwards, what will occur to them when the after-life comes? But those who would perceive are then exiting the human for the realm of the battle between God and the devil if they will attempt to do what is not in keeping with people.
Now some beasts are stronger than the child and yet the child is beyond priceless, and some beasts are the devil’s to devour the child, that it is not good for people to dwell in a place that is with them unless the mouths of the lions should be shut. Now if they are shut because of innocence than it is well, only that men are not to test God. Now when there is no land left that has not been seized by the rich of the land and the ways, even the roads, are blocked by them, than the land is suffering idle sin, and it is being cursed by those who would do well, so that other lands are chosen.
Now some have followed the Luke-warm way so far that they are no longer sentient and able to perceive right and wrong, for they are a wicked abomination covered and made of every worthless thing, that they act in Luke-warmth and seek to enforce it and mild all into Luke-warmth that they are disgusting and wicked beasts. For they push Luke-warmth with frequency and number into great wickedness, and they are worthy of hell fire, to burn in the fire as wicked. Now be either a person of billions and trillions by the present standard, or be a poor person, for I have known the disgust at their inability to speak, that some are for dampening and extinguishing fire of truth, that they are offended by truth from the hot or cold, so let them burn in the fire, let them be known as the wicked of hell.
Now some have followed the Luke-warm way so far that they are no longer sentient and able to perceive right and wrong, for they are a wicked abomination covered and made of every worthless thing, that they act in Luke-warmth and seek to enforce it and mild all into Luke-warmth that they are disgusting and wicked beasts. For they push Luke-warmth with frequency and number into great wickedness, and they are worthy of hell fire, to burn in the fire as wicked. Now be either a person of billions and trillions by the present standard, or be a poor person, for I have known the disgust at their inability to speak, that some are for dampening and extinguishing fire of truth, that they are offended by truth from the hot or cold, so let them burn in the fire, let them be known as the wicked of hell.
Now some have seen a grizzly bear and looked to the side and merely walked as if not attacking or fleeing and as if not threat nor fleeing thing, and not yelling or making
 much noise and not being too quiet, but comfortable that the bear when it charges is then haunting, and staying to itself, and yet dogs come with speed and bark and yet some are tethered and bark.
Now some have taken nearer candidates and transformed them into animals using false stones and clay to mild them into animals for attack, that it is Orgoth that is one group that does this. Now if some are transformed into animals are the animals to be trusted by them when they have been used? But you are given wisdom and understanding that you might be without the lack of sight.
Now some have taken nearer candidates and transformed them into animals using false stones and clay to transform them into animals for attack, that it is Orgoth that is one group that does this. Now if some are transformed into animals are the animals to be trusted by them when they have been used? But you are given wisdom and understanding that you might be without the lack of sight.
Now some men have the wisdom of matters of justice and they are as if existing in a whole different world accessible to them that is not easily accessible to others, for others do not much consider that world and yet he lives in that world that he is seeing always and considering always for what is in his world is before him. Now he is having a moon of a planet that is this different world, and he is almost always considering and easily understanding much that is on this moon. Now there are thousands upon thousands of moons and some are shifting from one moon to another, because they are moving from moon to moon without time in travel, that these are the moons that they master as others master them. Now the Christian moon, being the moon of the Christ, is in them who are Christians, and it shines light reflected from the truth. Now the moon of Israel is reflecting light from the star of Israel, being light from the truth. Now Enoch’s moon is reflecting light from the star of Enoch that is truth. Now all truth is God’s and all light is God’s that every star in the Universe with its planets and moons is truth and is belonging to God. Now the planet Enoch which has the moon of Enoch is in the light of the star of Enoch and such is the case of others that there is the star, the planet, and the moons of the planets for the star. For how many planets are there in Enoch’s world that are in the domain of Enoch’s star? Now the star of Israel is giving light to its planets that have its moons, and it is good for any people to be expanding to the planets that are in the domain of the star of their planet. Now by progress it is possible for them, that this is a good and praise-worthy thing.
Now some of the priests, when they are below ur, are viewing soldiers as harbingers of justice that they disable their most mighty warriors with cowardly strategies, because the priest below ur hates them, for they are frightened and intimidated all the day by the threat of justice.
Now some of the priests, when they are below ur, are viewing soldiers as harbingers of justice that they disable their most mighty warriors with cowardly strategies, because the priest below ur hates them, for they are frightened and intimidated all the day by the threat of justice.
Now some of the ways of women between women are different, but when a woman is cut off from the land of women and is going towards outside of those things of women, indeed she has the desease and is also not woman, likewise men accussing men of wrong when they have done no wrong and it cannot be judged are judging by what is a thing of their own, being what different thing they are, and not a thing of men. For if there is violence upon the Earth is it not mostly people being troubled by animals, that there is more peace among people, and Babylon is not as people for it contains dogs, animals, dragons, and many things of Babylon, for it is empty Babylon and it is spread wide in many directions and ceases and is then seen again in pockets, and then a great expanse of it, that is great by size and much is contained in it, but all of no weight, for it is having unjust weights and balances, and of no weight, for it serves the devil who is to be defeated, for Babylon is not for truth or substance of truth but there are dogs there, drowned below ur, who fight upwards to dominate for they wish for the surface of the Ocean.
Now some of the ways of women between women are different, but when a woman is cut off from the land of women and is going towards outside of those things of women, indeed she has the desease and is also not woman, likewise men accussing men of wrong when they have done no wrong and it cannot be judged are judging by what is a thing of their own, being what different thing they are, and not a thing of men. For if there is violence upon the Earth is it not mostly people being troubled by animals, that there is more peace among people, and Babylon is not as people for it contains dogs, animals, dragons, and many things of Babylon, for it is empty Babylon and it is spread wide in many directions and ceases and is then seen again in pockets, and then a great expanse of it, that is great by size and much is contained in it, but all of no weight, for it is having unjust weights and balances, and of no weight, for it serves the devil who is to be defeated, for Babylon is not for truth or substance of truth but there are dogs there, drowned below ur, who fight upwards to dominate for they wish for the surface of the Ocean.
Now some of the ways of women between women are different, but when a woman is cut off from the land of women and is going towards men outside of those things of women, indeed she has the desease and is also not woman, likewise men accussing men of wrong when they have done no wrong and it cannot be judged are judging by what is a thing of their own, being what different thing they are, and not a thing of men. For if there is violence upon the Earth is it not mostly people being troubled by animals, that there is more peace among people, and Babylon is not as people for it contains dogs, animals, dragons, and many things of Babylon, for it is empty Babylon and it is spread wide in many directions and ceases and is then seen again in pockets, and then a great expanse of it, that is great by size and much is contained in it, but all of no weight, for it is having unjust weights and balances, and of no weight, for it serves the devil who is to be defeated, for Babylon is not for truth or substance of truth but there are dogs there, drowned below ur, who fight upwards to dominate for they wish for the surface of the Ocean.
Now some of the ways of women between women are different, but when a woman is cut off from the land of women and is going towards contentions with men outside of those things of women, indeed she has the desease and is also not woman, likewise men accussing men of wrong when they have done no wrong and it cannot be judged are judging by what is a thing of their own, being what different thing they are, and not a thing of men. For if there is violence upon the Earth is it not mostly people being troubled by animals, that there is more peace among people, and Babylon is not as people for it contains dogs, animals, dragons, and many things of Babylon, for it is empty Babylon and it is spread wide in many directions and ceases and is then seen again in pockets, and then a great expanse of it, that is great by size and much is contained in it, but all of no weight, for it is having unjust weights and balances, and of no weight, for it serves the devil who is to be defeated, for Babylon is not for truth or substance of truth but there are dogs there, drowned below ur, who fight upwards to dominate for they wish for the surface of the Ocean.
Now some of the ways of women between women are different, but when a woman is cut off from the land of women and is going towards contentions with men outside of those things of women, indeed she has the desease and is also not woman, likewise men accussing men of wrong when they have done no wrong and it cannot be judged are judging by what is a thing of their own, being what different thing they are, and not a thing of men. For if there is violence upon the Earth is it not mostly people being troubled by animals, that there is more peace among people, and Babylon is not as people for it contains dogs, animals, dragons, and many things of Babylon, for it is empty Babylon and it is spread wide in many directions and ceases and is then seen again in pockets, and then a great expanse of it, that is great by size and much is contained in it, but all of no weight, for it is having unjust weights and balances, and of no weight, for it serves the devil who is to be defeated, for Babylon is not for truth or substance of truth but there are dogs there, drowned below ur, who fight upwards to dominate for they wish for the surface of the Ocean.
Now some of the ways of women between women are different, but when a woman is cut off from the land of women and is going towards contentions with men outside of those things of women, indeed she is not woman, likewise men accussing men of wrong when they have done no wrong and it cannot be judged are judging by what is a thing of their own, being what different thing they are, and not a thing of men. For if there is violence upon the Earth is it not mostly people being troubled by animals, that there is more peace among people, and Babylon is not as people for it contains dogs, animals, dragons, and many things of Babylon, for it is empty Babylon and it is spread wide in many directions and ceases and is then seen again in pockets, and then a great expanse of it, that is great by size and much is contained in it, but all of no weight, for it is having unjust weights and balances, and of no weight, for it serves the devil who is to
 be defeated, for Babylon is not for truth or substance of truth but there are dogs there, drowned below ur, who fight upwards to dominate for they wish for the surface of the Ocean.
Now some of those from Babel have gone out to join Orgoth and Orgoth has encouraged its servants to infiltrate society as soldiers of cities and in government places and they desire influence among the priests of Babylon and places of learning and in places of high regard and power, for they are not emotional openly for their causes but are stealthy and keeping control and deceit befriending those they hate and gathering knowledge and carrying out missions when they can. Now before others they are for giving the impression of the darker shades being coddled like foolish and sensitive babies, but in all places not for show they are not for coddling them or giving them much consideration for only when there is need for show and appearances do they offer show while maintaining their actions in that they are despising them and wishing to punish. Now there are those who have taken all such with no effect and it is the majority, possibly, of those of the fair shade, although in other places it is not the majority. Now those of darker shades are encouraged to be foolish and disrespectful, for those doing such are considered that which is no threat to the third son of Orgoth. Now those who the second shelf of Orgoth sends are taking a careful and good eye to seperate from those of Noah’s second son, and yet they are opposites. Now the angel is born to the fair people and is of the fair shade and he is born pure of polish and is born in North America, that the words of all can be weighed rightly for those who have not seen him, for it is changing the way some is approached, and yet he is visitor to this planet.
Now some spirits have been changing the words of the angel already by using that which was already known and changing what is given to what was already known, that their stubborn hearts do not want wisdom, and so I am concerned they will go those like them to offer them continuation in ignorance by this way. Now the consequenes of ignorance are there, and those wanting ignorance, strategizing to through away wisdom and understanding because of a stubborness do not know they endanger their people, for they are believing that all is in neutral territory, for the realm of children is the closest to neutral territory, and yet those who have emerged into the world are finding a great thing to be gaining wisdom and more of it, for their gaining will never come close to most, for they gather a handful over thousands of years and yet the stars in the sky are like the grains of sand on all the planets.
Now some who produce fiction have said, I am on your side and this is what I think of you, and yet is truth and understanding not better? But if you are to learn from these you learn from what is not most often, and large exxagerations are used so that you understand, that standards and morality may not be learned, and what does not occur might not be believed, for they are removing justice and truth to support the ugly in many things, that the failing are shown right and the better shown fools, and all manner of foolishness is there that you have known to disregard it for learning. Now if those who give you knowledge of reality are much the same for money and control than by what means are you to go with them? But they have taken people along idle journeys that accomplish nothing, and evils have been achieved by it.
Now some who produce fiction have said, I am on your side and this is what I think of you, and yet is truth and understanding not better? But if you are to learn from these you learn from what is not most often, and large exxagerations are used so that you understand, that standards and morality may not be learned, and what does not occur might not be believed, for they are removing justice and truth to support the ugly in many things, that the lacking are shown right and the better shown fools, and all manner of foolishness is there that you have known to disregard it for learning. Now if those who give you knowledge of reality are much the same for money and control than by what means are you to go with them? But they have taken people along idle journeys that accomplish nothing, and evils have been achieved by it.
Now something seems to be done where some are being taken and separated from their groups and they are brought high as if always so, and so it was, and yet I do not know what it is for I do not know of the Christ having returned.
Now strategy is with righteous understanding and has a limit before it becomes foolishness, and a strategic woman is of the Lord in Heaven, and if she is with virteous even more a woman exceeding in good. Now are these not to be wives of kings, for restraint is with them, that their actions strongly and meanly mock the devil with a hardness that is like an intense strike against him.
Now take wisdom from the enemy nation, that you have waged war and partnered in war and are believing that all are good intentioned, that you are offendors of violence to them and yet naive and believing yourselves to be innocent that one who takes direction is to be your leader and his servants are with wrath and fickle-girls to a great degree, and you have been naive, for you go to war and then believe in good-intentions, that the enemy has more wrath towards you that you should be punished. Now if loyal ones you have brought you are knowing they are more loyal than those who are with you by birth, that companions to the son are they, and if you are bringing in enemies are they not more angry at your foolishness that you pretend it is nothing to wage war? But you have commited killing and the door has been shut behind you, for if you do justice, yet you must not be so naive. But if you are for righteousness than is it not good, and if you have no patriotism and loyalty with those born to you than can the nation survive? But a province of a greater nation is more likely to stand if you are learning. For you have had gentle spirits of loving boasting and yet there is danger and you are as the less mighty and knowledgeable in these things, that a gentle and tentative people are not accustomed to war and what is to be learned. Now you have exceedingly mighty men, but war you do not know, and trouble is much, so that it is well that mighty nations might give you guidance and even protection, for you good and gentle boasting has not been scorning except in the mouths of those who do not represent the majority and the people in general.
Now teredacto is foolish towards Enochs for it is not strong or fast, not being mighty, and it jabs with the beak but is not nearly as dangerous as some other dragons. When threatened it jabs with the beak and does not devour, and it flies over large areas where it’s sight is not welcomed, for it looks over much that is not of its own life, and indeed it can swoop down and be mauled and delt with by an Enoch, for it does take offence for it is a very sensitive creature and yet it is a hypocrite.
Now that horse was called spoiled by the rich men who passed by for it received training, correction, and it is in splendid now, but the other animals were cast out because they were clumsy and sick and indeed they were neglected by the owner that they became sick and worthless for anything. Now praise is for the spoiled horse who is like a thing to be admired even by men, for even the horse is rich in his house, they have said, and we do not even want the animals who are sick and clumsy. Now if such is for a horse than do you not, being evil, love your children to give just and good discipline? But the horse of the rich man is more excellent than the peasant. 
Now that horse was called spoiled by the rich men who passed by for it received training, correction, and it is in splendid now, but the other animals were cast out because they were clumsy and sick and indeed they were neglected by the owner that they became sick and worthless for anything. Now praise is for the spoiled horse who is like a thing to be admired even by men, for even the horse is rich in his house, they have said, and we do not even want the animals who are sick and clumsy. Now if such is for a horse than do you not, being evil, love your children to give just and good discipline? But the horse of the rich man is more excellent than the peasant. 
Now the Earth is the Lord’s and everything in it, and the Lord’s kingdom’s are on the Earth, and Babel proclaims kings, and the judges of the Earth are going through the king if they do fear, for they fall below all and are lower when they are bowing because of wickedness, for if they are bowing and falling let them not reach out to climb the one they fall before, for such is the act of wickedness. For if any falls that they strike to climb, it is a wicked person, and such is lower than they fall, for they must be placed under Orgoth for it. Now such is one delivered to the devil.
Now the Earth is the Lord’s and everything in it, and the Lord’s kingdom’s are on the Earth, and Babel proclaims kings, and the judges of the Earth are going through the king if they do fear, for they fall below all and are lower when they are bowing because of wickedness, for if they are bowing and falling let them not reach out to climb the one they fall before, for such is the act of wickedness. For if any falls that they strike to climb, it is a wicked person, and such is lower than they fall, for they must be placed under Orgoth for it. Now such is one delivered to the devil.
Now the Island nation I may not touch and Ijeshil will attack what it is given to attack. Now the angel has been in that close to Joshua and the Vikings and the nation in which he resides is plagued with what is perceived as lack
 of patriotism and loyalty to the nation so that they are kept by others in protection. Now the angel was raised as a son and tended to, and he was brought up as if in the house of a rich man, for his upbringing was as an only child and he is, and his mother is a daughter of Sarah, and he was cast into independence and directly the lord blessed him with exceeding blessing of Mala, to a gratuitous degree, for everything of Mala was granted that he desired and of Ria, little, that when he considered Babylon, everything of Mala, but not all, vanished soon, and yet much was kept, and in time he was as if desolate and in the desert to eat of the dust of affliction until he incurred that of Jews, and he ate of the dust of affliction no more. Now I am to wonder why did anything of Babylon cause this, or did it? Now if Babylon was hidden in its ability to be evil than what occurred? But wisdom was not sufficient and more wisdom was required.
Now the Island nation I may not touch and Ijeshil will attack what it is given to attack. Now the angel has been in that close to Joshua and the Vikings and the nation in which he resides is plagued with what is perceived as lack of patriotism and loyalty to the nation so that they are kept by others in protection. Now the angel was raised as a son and tended to, and he was brought up as if in the house of a rich man, for his upbringing was as an only child and he is, and his mother is a daughter of Sarah, and he was cast into independence and directly the lord blessed him with exceeding blessing of Mala, to a gratuitous degree, for everything of Mala was granted that he desired and of Ria, little, that when he considered Babylon, everything of Mala, but not all, vanished soon, and yet much was kept, and in time he was as if desolate and in the desert to eat of the dust of affliction until he incurred that of Jews, and he ate of the dust of affliction no more. Now I am to wonder why did anything of Babylon cause this, or did it? Now if Babylon was hidden in its ability to be evil than what occurred? But wisdom was not sufficient and more was required.
Now the Island nation I may not touch and Ijeshil will attack what it is given to attack. Now the angel has been in that close to Joshua and the Vikings and the nation in which he resides is plagued with what is perceived as lack of patriotism and loyalty to the nation so that they are kept by others in protection. Now the angel was raised as a son and tended to, and he was brought up as if in the house of a rich man, for his upbringing was as an only child and he is, and his mother is a daughter of Sarah.
Now the Island nation I may not touch and Ijeshil will attack what it is given to attack. Now the angel has been in that close to Joshua and the Vikings and the nation in which he resides is plagued with what is perceived as lack of patriotism and loyalty to the nation so that they are kept by others in protection. Now the angel was raised as a son and tended to, and he was brought up as if in the house of a rich man, for his upbringing was as an only child and he is, and his mother is a daughter of Sarah.
Now the Jews are greater, more, and above the gentiles, and the Elsnon are not gentiles and if those of the kingdom are both a type and gentile and not a gentile at all, being born from any people, than you reason as Jew who has the wisdom to understand such things, and you reason correctly. Now if the souls of gentiles should perceive the Jew who had been born of any people than if they deal with evil it is only the reviling of them, that they are indignant and it is found hard to bear. For if gentiles are angry is it not against their own lives when it is at one born of any people? But if the invisible things of God should slay them in their anger is it not only expected? But if there are daughters who desire him who is a Jew from people than are they not Jews as well? But in some cases it is so. But if gentiles are defending perverts and killers of children do they not do what is their inclination being merciful to hate justice? But is this the kingdom of heaven as if it were something to be from gentiles? But the New Testiment is connected to the Old Testiment and it is not honest to seperate them.
Now the Jews are greater, more, and above the gentiles, and the Elsnon are not gentiles and if those of the kingdom are both a type and gentile and not a gentile at all, being born from any people, than you reason as Jew who has the wisdom to understand such things, and you reason correctly. Now if the souls of gentiles should perceive the Jew who had been born of any people than if they deal with evil it is only the reviling of them, that they are indignant and it is found hard to bear. For if gentiles are angry is it not against their own lives when it is at one born of any people? But if the invisible things of God should slay them in their anger is it not only expected? But if there are daughters who desire him who is a Jew from any people than are they not Jews as well? But in some cases it is so. But if gentiles are defending perverts and killers of children do they not do what is their inclination being merciful to hate justice? But is this the kingdom of heaven as if it were something to be from gentiles? But the New Testiment is connected to the Old Testiment and it is not honest to seperate them.
Now the Jews cannot be slave owners for they are an object out of joint because the other tribes were required to be found in other places. Now by being out of joint some are a hazard for those in obedience to God, and yet those not out of joint are many and yet there is a price to pay. Now the highest of Orgoth and the middle sow discord in their places and they are knowing to leave grievances unaddressed and without justice that evil might continue.
Now the Jews cannot be slave owners for they are an object out of joint because the other tribes were required to be found in other places. Now by being out of joint some are a hazard for those in obedience to God, and yet those not out of joint are many and yet there is a price to pay. Now the highest of Orgoth and the middle sow discord in their places and they are knowing to leave grievances unaddressed and without justice that evil might continue.
Now the Jews were at the level of men, and there was added, the Christ, who found the lost tribes, so that from east to west are God’s people and kingdoms, and if they will be patient, is there not even Islam, but I speak to those of Islam. Now there was the level of men and women after thousands of years after the exit from Eden, and suddenly some threw off belief in God and said let us throw away all while they are distracted, while we advance, and build Babel instead that we must go back to the beginning before advancements, and live on the ground, under dirt, and be among the dogs that we might build up Babel more and with it we build Babylon. Now the soldiers of cities are not all Babylon, but are not most because they bow to the statue of Babylon? For they are given orders to keep Babylon, but it is prior in advancement than men and woman for it is lower because it is dogs and animals. Now do they commit disgust to mix things of people with things of dogs? But I have not even yet declared war upon Nimrod, and his code is not even so backwards as what they make for their codes.
Now the Jews were at the level of men, and there was added, the Christ, who found the lost tribes, so that from east to west are God’s people and kingdoms, and if they will be patient, is there not even Islam, but I speak to those of Islam. Now there was the level of men and women after thousands of years after the exit from Eden, and suddenly some threw off belief in God and said let us throw away all while they are distracted, while we advance, and build Babel instead that we must go back to the beginning before advancements, and live on the ground, under dirt, and be among the dogs that we might build up Babel more and with it we build Babylon. Now the soldiers of cities are not all Babylon, but are not most because they bow to the statue of Babylon? For they are given orders to keep Babylon, but it is prior in advancement than men and woman for it is lower because it is dogs and animals. Now do they commit disgust to mix things of people with things of dogs? But I have not even yet declared war upon Nimrod, and his code is not even so backwards as what they make for their codes.
Now the Jews were at the level of men, and there was added, the Christ, who found the lost tribes, so that from east to west are God’s people and kingdoms, and if they will be patient, is there not even Islam, but I speak to those of Islam. Now there was the level of men and women after thousands of years after the exit from Eden, and suddenly some threw off belief in God and said let us throw away all while they are distracted, while we advance, and build Babel instead that we must go back to the beginning before advancements, and live on the ground, under dirt, and be among the dogs that we might build up Babel more and with it we build Babylon. Now the soldiers of cities are not all Babylon, but are not most because they bow to the statue of Babylon? For they are given orders to keep Babylon, but it is prior in advancement than men and woman for it is lower because it is dogs and animals. Now do they commit disgust to mix things of people with things of dogs? But I have not even yet declared war upon Nimrod, and his code is not even so backwards as what they make for their codes.
Now the Jews wrestle for fun and friendship, but the wicked fools are fleeing from every attempt to wrestle them and creating new doctrine based on their flight from common sense and truth, that they flee from everything and any wrestling and battle and they are quick upon their feet to flee for they have
 become experienced and skilled in cowardess when they might be grabbed for wrestling and combat, so that they would have to be run down to the full end of every continent to fight them if they are quick enough and willing to run for that long, and yet when they have run away they return shortly at times to harass with their mouths that they will harass with their mouths but will not even wrestle. Now these are the wicked and foolish animals of the land who stay back from the noble soldiers garbed in beauty and radiating ability, that the animals are the most mangy and cowardly dogs the wilderness and city has that approach and harass with noise and foolishness and then quickly run when a soldier who seek to grab them to fight.
Now the Jews wrestle for fun and friendship, but the wicked fools are fleeing from every attempt to wrestle them and creating new doctrine based on their flight from common sense and truth, that they flee from everything and any wrestling and battle and they are quick upon their feet to flee for they have become experienced and skilled in cowardess when they might be grabbed for wrestling and combat, so that they would have to be run down to the full end of every continent to fight them if they are quick enough and willing to run for that long, and yet when they have run away they return shortly at times to harass with their mouths that they will harass with their mouths but will not even wrestle. Now these are the wicked and foolish animals of the land who stay back from the noble soldiers garbed in beauty and radiating ability, that the animals are the most mangy and cowardly dogs the wilderness and city has that approach and harass with noise and foolishness and then quickly run when a soldier who seek to grab them to fight.
Now the Jews, the Elsnon, the Enoch, the Terum, and the Muslims, the Christians, all people with faith is a religion, are all inciting open war upon them from Babylon, that Babylon has strived and yet gone further than its striving, and they are united by disbelief that they war with priests of Babylon as councillors to direct them in war, and they infiltrate all with their hidden disbelief, that they promote the Luke-warm Christianity of Babylon that is profanity, and they attempt to establish it among the Muslims that they would exploit wars because money to attempt to force the Muslims to the Luke-warm Christianity and the cults of Babylon as they have already gone far in the places where there is much money and many shades and religions. For this Babylon does upon the whole Earth and they have listened to the council of Babylon’s priests much and they hate all true religion of any people, hating every religion when it is not Luke-warm and transforming to the ways of Babylon.
Now the Lord gave Lucifer the Earth in matters of knowledge and truth, for they had fallen beneath ur in many things so that people were in danger of violence and much violence was strengthened by ignorance, so that authority was removed from their mouths and the place in the heavens was the capital of this because Babylon had failed. Now Lucifer put them under the feet of those of the kingdom, and he was given all the wealth of Babylon to be his own, that the planet was even given to him and all places that man was exploring. So the tree was placed in the ground and would be there for those of the kingdom first. Now two things had been fullfilled, that he was in heaven and Earth and the Earth was made beneath his feet.
Now the Lord gave Lucifer the Earth in matters of knowledge and truth, for they had fallen beneath ur in many things so that people were in danger of violence and much violence was strengthened by ignorance, so that authority was removed from their mouths and the place in the heavens was the capital of this because Babylon had failed. Now Lucifer put them under the feet of those of the kingdom, and he was given all the wealth of Babylon to be his own, that the planet was even given to him and all places that man was exploring. So the tree was placed in the ground and would be there for those of the kingdom first.
Now the Pharisees killed the Christ and Rome only permitted it that those who killed the Baptist refrained from doing it, so that they can then be repenting and be saved. Now if they are supporting the Christ and all of Rome was, than it is also true that all the kingdoms of history have supported Him and all their inhabitants. Now if all have supported the Christ up to this time, than Babylon is coming and is that it is bent and turned by the devil and that the devil’s cults are there and the kingdom of heaven has its many people groups, being the races of the kingdom that are of any shade, that are also dwelling at the time of Babylon. Now I wish for the kingdom of heaven to be utterly separated from Babylon because they are more of a problem for the kingdom of heaven when we are not seperate and I do not wish for Babylon to have any protection because the righteous dwell within it. But let God show which society is better that Babylon will be without the righteous and the kingdom of heaven without the Babylonian. For let their fools exhault themselves and pay respect to the devil, and if it be permitted, safe then, let us stand far back from what might be laid there. But a foolish people might repent and I have hope that most are not foolish that they will read and understand and repent. For I selfishly obey at times because of the reward from God, to be commanded by the Christ. Now because of the continuation of God with the Jews those who are upset and wishing to be apart of something bigger than them, molding themselves to what they are not in their paths to fight for another cause that is not the people of the kingdom but some other people who claim it but are wishing to rid it of the Jews who pursue the cult they have formed that is of what they consider to be better and pure so that the Elsnon are not these and they are of this cult in heart that they would afflict the Jews and attempt to drive them out, that it is a matter of firm conviction and confidence for them and they deny morality where Jews are concerned because nothing is immoral to them in that case. Now they say in many ways that the Jews are wrong for even existing and act and speak as such that they are clung to another culture and ideal that their country might have fought for they believe in a religious way of spiritual belief that they should be rid of the Jews. Now they do not claim Abraham as their predecessor and they are pursuing an ideal but are indignant to the presence of Jews in their society. When they speak of Jesus it is void, being empty, because their loyalty is more to their own history. Now if the Christ would have them they must not be as Jacob’s elder brother who did not regard his blessing but they must be fully comprehending what the Earth is. Now if they claim Christianity but resent it than do they only speak void intentionally? But if they would speak so than they are honouring some other cult and what they will do, repent or not, I do not know.
Now the Pharisees killed the Christ and Rome only permitted it that those who killed the Baptist refrained from doing it, so that they can then be repenting and be saved. Now if they are supporting the Christ and all of Rome was, than it is also true that all the kingdoms of history have supported Him and all their inhabitants. Now if all have supported the Christ up to this time, than Babylon is coming and is that it is bent and turned by the devil and that the devil’s cults are there and the kingdom of heaven has its many people groups, being the races of the kingdom that are of any shade, that are also dwelling at the time of Babylon. Now I wish for the kingdom of heaven to be utterly separated from Babylon because they are more of a problem for the kingdom of heaven when we are not seperate and I do not wish for Babylon to have any protection because the righteous dwell within it. But let God show which society is better that Babylon will be without the righteous and the kingdom of heaven without the Babylonian. For let their fools exhault themselves and pay respect to the devil, and if it be permitted, safe then, let us stand far back from what might be laid there. But a foolish people might repent and I have hope that most are not foolish that they will read and understand. For I selfishly obey at times because of the reward from God, to be commanded by the Christ. Now because of the continuation of God with the Jews those who are upset and wishing to be apart of something bigger than them, molding themselves to what they are not in their paths to fight for another cause that is not the people of the kingdom but some other people who claim it but are wishing to rid it of the Jews who pursue the cult they have formed that is of what they consider to be better and pure so that the Elsnon are not these and they are of this cult in heart that they would afflict the Jews and attempt to drive them out, that it is a matter of firm conviction and confidence for them and they deny morality where Jews are concerned because nothing is immoral to them in that case. Now they say in many ways that the Jews are wrong for even existing and act and speak as such that they are clung to another culture and ideal that their country might have fought for they believe in a religious way of spiritual belief that they should be rid of the Jews. Now they do not claim Abraham as their predecessor and they are pursuing an ideal but are indignant to the presence of Jews in their society. When they speak of Jesus it is void, being empty, because their loyalty is more to their own history. Now if the Christ would have them they must not be as Jacob’s elder brother who did not regard his blessing but they must be fully comprehending what the Earth is.
 Now if they claim Christianity but resent it than do they only speak void intentionally? But if they would speak so than they are honouring some other cult and what they will do, repent or not, I do not know.
Now the Pharisees killed the Christ and Rome only permitted it that those who killed the Baptist refrained from doing it, so that they can then be repenting and be saved. Now if they are supporting the Christ and all of Rome was, than it is also true that all the kingdoms of history have supported Him and all their inhabitants. Now if all have supported the Christ up to this time, than Babylon is coming and is that it is bent and turned by the devil and that the devil’s cults are there and the kingdom of heaven has its many people groups, being the races of the kingdom that are of any shade, that are also dwelling at the time of Babylon. Now I wish for the kingdom of heaven to be utterly separated from Babylon because they are more of a problem for the kingdom of heaven when we are not seperate and I do not wish for Babylon to have any protection because the righteous dwell within it. But let God show which society is better that Babylon will be without the righteous and the kingdom of heaven without the Babylonian. For let their fools exhault themselves and pay respect to the devil, and if it be permitted, safe then, let us stand far back from what might be laid there. But a foolish people might repent and I have hope that most are not foolish that they will read and understand. For I selfishly obey at times because of the reward from God, to be commanded by the Christ.
Now the abuses on Earth, is it not disgusting and outrageous? But people are able to live in peace, and they are not regarding much things of dogs.
Now the abuses on Earth, is it not disgusting and outrageous? But people are able to live in peace, and they are not regarding much things of dogs.
Now the act of a zeolot is reaching the insane, mass shooter, who has no true goal or reason by sentience that such in truth is not truly a zeolot, but is as dangerous as a zeolot.
Now the alliance of the three is good but because the Jews have not the lost tribes that can be delivered by the Christ, they are out of joint from the sky, that the Muslims find them a thing sick inside because of the missing tribes, for it is a knot in the heart, and they find only the word insolent, but it is not the word, for they and no people have the word, only it is described as hard to bear spiritually, and it is because the tribes are missing from them. Now can they build the temple without the other tribes? But let them not find reason to throw heads over a wall, for if Joab was with you there would be no anger or wrath, and it is also true of David. But what blame is there for the two tribes who must fend for themselves? Now does not Islam attempt to be older brother in one thing, and from the Lord’s compassion? Now does not the nation having the lost tribes come to defend? But is not the Christ over Jeruselum, for the tent of the Lord is from east to west and west to east.
Now the alliance of the three is good but because the Jews have not the lost tribes that can be delivered by the Christ, they are out of joint from the sky, that the Muslims find them a thing sick inside because of the missing tribes, for it is a knot in the heart, and they find only the word insolent, but it is not the word, for they and no people have the word, only it is described as hard to bear spiritually, and it is because the tribes are missing from them. Now can they build the temple without the other tribes? But let them not find reason to throw heads over a wall, for if Joab was with you there would be no anger or wrath, and it is also true of David. But what blame is there for the two tribes who must fend for themselves? Now does not Islam attempt to be older brother in one thing, and from the Lord’s compassion? Now does not the nation having the lost tribes come to defend? But is not the Christ over Jeruselum, for the tent of the Lord is from east to west and west to east.
Now the angel does not give the gold of Babel to Babel but he gives the gold of the Jews, of Israel, that the golden calf has been bowed to by many Jews, and it is the gold of Babel brought out from the people, and others have contributed their individual gold to the idol of Babel, indeed those of Babel have contributed, and they have taken from those not of Babel and contributed gold and many peoples from all the Earth have bowed to the idol and they have taken their council from Babel, good or bad. Now some places built are clean as if with almost no blemish and some places with none, that the building cannot occur with blemished stones and sick mortar. Now the people have benefited much from the clean places, that many luxuries and abilities have come from the clean places. For has not the angel even benefited from the clean places? As much as any.
Now the angel does not give the gold of Babel to Babel but he gives the gold of the Jews, of Israel, that the golden calf has been bowed to by many Jews, and it is the gold of Babel brought out from the people, and others have contributed their individual gold to the idol of Babel, indeed those of Babel have contributed, and they have taken from those not of Babel and contributed gold and many peoples from all the Earth have bowed to the idol and they have taken their council from Babel, good or bad. Now some places built are clean as if with almost no blemish and some places with none, that the building cannot occur with blemished stones and sick mortar. Now the people have benefited much from the clean places, that many luxuries and abilities have come from the clean places. For has not the angel even benefited from the clean places? As much as any.
Now the angel does not give the gold of Babel to Babel but he gives the gold of the Jews, of Israel, that the golden calf has been bowed to by many Jews, and it is the gold of Babel brought out from the people, and others have contributed their individual gold to the idol of Babel, indeed those of Babel have contributed, and they have taken from those not of Babel and contributed gold and many peoples from all the Earth have bowed to the idol and they have taken their council from Babel, good or bad. Now some places built are clean as if with almost no blemish and some places with none, that the building cannot occur with blemished stones and sick mortar. Now the people have benefited much from the clean places, that many luxuries and abilities have come from the clean places. For has not the angel even benefited from the clean places? As much as any. Now how can the clean places have any idol? But if they are commanded to bow it is as if to no idol and it is a light curse that falls away, for those things of the clean places are to be observed with their devices and the angel has loved those things they report in the clean places, especially from those who study the heavens and things far away so that none can even go there.
Now the angel does not give the gold of Babel to Babel but he gives the gold of the Jews, of Israel, that the golden calf has been bowed to by many Jews, and it is the gold of Babel brought out from the people, and others have contributed their individual gold to the idol of Babel, indeed those of Babel have contributed, and they have taken from those not of Babel and contributed gold and many peoples from all the Earth have bowed to the idol and they have taken their council from Babel, good or bad. Now some places built are clean as if with almost no blemish and some places with none, that the building cannot occur with blemished stones and sick mortar. Now the people have benefited much from the clean places, that many luxuries and abilities have come from the clean places. For has not the angel even benefited from the clean places? As much as any. Now how can the clean places have any idol? But if they are commanded to bow it is as if to no idol and it is a light curse that falls away, for those things of the clean places are to be observed with their devices and the angel has loved those things they report in the clean places, especially from those who study the heavens and things far away so that none can even go there.
Now the angel found only one goddess and she was of the darkest shade, and the angel found many queens and those in a high place are as if lonely because of their place. Now it is of the Lord’s kingdom. Now Babylon has the devil, and what is a king or queen who is under what is under the feet of a man, for it is all in hell, growing and spreading in patches on Earth, upon land. Now it makes Unichs, it is hiding prostitution by devouring with doctrine of money, of telling of cattle and buying wheat that men have not noticed it for it is spoken when they are not ready to decide that small evil is great evil, for the infection takes more than the belief in them has been that it is a disease that is as self abuse. Now be healed of all harmful diseases that you might purge yourself and so be a traitor stolen by the Lord’s kingdom for if there is time then it is beneficial to all. 
Now the angel found only one goddess and she was of the darkest shade, and the angel found many queens and those in a high place are as if lonely because of their place. Now it is of the Lord’s kingdom. Now Babylon has the devil, and what is a king or queen who is under what is under the feet of a man, for it is all in hell, growing and spreading in patches on Earth, upon land. Now it makes Unichs, it is hiding prostitution by devouring with doctrine of money, of telling of cattle and buying wheat that men have not noticed it for it is spoken when they are not ready to decide that small evil is great evil, for the infection takes more than the belief in them has been that it is a disease that is as self
 abuse. Now be healed of all harmful diseases that you might purge yourself and so be a traitor stolen by the Lord’s kingdom for if there is time then it is beneficial to all. 
Now the angel found only one goddess and she was of the darkest shade, and the angel found many queens and those in a high place are as if lonely because of their place. Now it is of the Lord’s kingdom. Now Babylon has the devil, and what is a king or queen who is under what is under the feet of a man, for it is all in hell, growing and spreading in patches on Earth, upon land. Now it makes Unichs, it is hiding prostitution by devouring with doctrine of money, of telling of cattle and buying wheat that men have not noticed it for it is spoken when they are not ready to decide that small evil is great evil, for the infection takes more than the belief in them has been that it is a disease that is as self abuse. Now be healed of all harmful diseases that you might purge yourself and so be a traitor stolen by the Lord’s kingdom for if there is time then it is beneficial to all. 
Now the angel is called Lucifer and is angel-human-Satan, while upon Earth.
Now the angel is called Lucifer and is angel-human-Satan, while upon Earth.
Now the angel is called Lucifer and is angel-human-animal Satan while upon Earth.
Now the angel is called Lucifer and is angel-human-animal dragon Satan while upon Earth.
Now the angel is called Lucifer and is angel-human-animal dragon Satan while upon Earth.
Now the angel is no king or queen’s people and is the messenger, that an unworthy one who rises up with that of Orgoth is the one whose head is set ablaze that let him rage towards God who he rebels against and find the people above, in the clouds, that he has hated his mother, cursed his parent, that he honours himself in his making in belief of his strong and punishing authority, that let him rebel against God, that his mind must be seized with ignorance for there is anger that shakes with pride and bloodshed and his eyes would be better slashed out that he might remember God.
Now the angel is not skilled in combat and is learning, but he still offers if it is wanted: time and place is offensive or non-offensive, animals defend animals, people defend people, the devil’s defends the devil’s, and the enemy partners with the opponent even when the matter is between friends, those below ur cannot be among men and hate them, the ways of the criminal land are not yours for they are iniquitous and cruel. Now if there is a key thing, a corner stone, it is that obedience defends the kingdom for God is the general.
Now the angel received and it is this: the men and women of her domain are her animals and servants that she does not employ because of her hand, and they have the command of the Lord that they are to be your beasts of burden and their substance, even to their garment is yours, for she brings with her animals and riches to your rule and the animals are not wanting to be made to bear burdens of the labour you will give them. Now the Lord has commanded that they must cease from their idle grazing and own pursuits which they enjoyed and be put in ropes and chains to be bearing the labour you give them, for they would rather you killed her, man who pleases God, than they should be placed under labour in ropes and chains in the heat of day, to submit to your labour that you give them. Now you have gotten animal slaves and riches, for she brings much to your rule.
Now the angel received and it is this: the men and women of her domain are her animals and servants that she does not employ because of her hand, and they have the command of the Lord that they are to be your beasts of burden and their substance, even to their garment is yours, for she brings with her animals and riches to your rule and the animals are not wanting to be made to bear burdens of the labour you will give them. Now the Lord has commanded that they must cease from their idle grazing and own pursuits which they enjoyed and be put in ropes and chains to be bearing the labour you give them, for they would rather you killed her, man who pleases God, than they should be placed under labour in ropes and chains in the heat of day, to submit to your labour that you give them. Now you have gotten animal slaves and riches, for she brings much to your rule.
Now the angel received and it is this: the men and women of her domain are her animals and servants that she does not employ because of her hand, and they have the command of the Lord that they are to be your beasts of burden and their substance, even to their garment is yours, for she brings with her animals and riches to your rule and the animals are not wanting to be made to bear burdens of the labour you will give them. Now the Lord has commanded that they must cease from their idle grazing and own pursuits which they enjoyed and be put in ropes and chains to be bearing the labour you give them, for they would rather you killed her, man who pleases God, than they should be placed under labour in ropes and chains in the heat of day, to submit to your labour that you give them. Now you have gotten animal slaves and riches, for she brings much to your rule.
Now the angel received and it is this: the men and women of her domain are her animals and servants that she does not employ because of her hand, and they have the command of the Lord that they are to be your beasts of burden and their substance, even to their garment is yours, for she brings with her animals and riches to your rule and the animals are not wanting to be made to bear burdens of the labour you will give them. Now the Lord has commanded that they must cease from their idle grazing and own pursuits which they enjoyed and be put in ropes and chains to be bearing the labour you give them, for they would rather you killed her, man who pleases God, than they should be placed under labour in ropes and chains in the heat of day, to submit to your labour that you give them. Now you have gotten animal slaves and riches, for she brings much to your rule.
Now the angel received and it is this: the men and women of her domain are her animals and servants that she does not employ because of her hand, and they have the command of the Lord that they are to be your beasts of burden and their substance, even to their garment is yours, for she brings with her animals and riches to your rule and the animals are not wanting to be made to bear burdens of the labour you will give them. Now the Lord has commanded that they must cease from their idle grazing and own pursuits which they enjoyed and be put in ropes and chains to be bearing the labour you give them, for they would rather you killed her, man who pleases God, than they should be placed under labour in ropes and chains in the heat of day, to submit to your labour that you give them. Now you have gotten animal slaves and riches, for she brings much to your rule.
Now the angel received and it is this: the men and women of her domain are her animals and servants that she does not employ because of her hand, and they have the command of the Lord that they are to be your beasts of burden and their substance, even to their garment is yours, for she brings with her animals and riches to your rule and the animals are not wanting to be made to bear burdens of the labour you will give them. Now the Lord has commanded that they must cease from their idle grazing and own pursuits which they enjoyed and be put in ropes and chains to be bearing the labour you give them, for they would rather you killed her, man who pleases God, than they should be placed under labour in ropes and chains in the heat of day, to submit to your labour that you give them. Now you have gotten animal slaves and riches, for she brings much to your rule.
Now the angel received and it is this: the men and women of her domain are her animals and servants that she does not employ because of her hand, and they have the command of the Lord that they are to be your beasts of burden and their substance, even to their garment is yours, for she brings with her animals and riches to your rule and the animals are not wanting to be made to bear burdens of the labour you will give them. Now the Lord has commanded that they must cease from their idle grazing and own pursuits which they enjoyed and be put in ropes and chains to be bearing the labour you give them, for they would rather you killed her, man who pleases God, than they should be placed under labour in ropes and chains in the heat of day, to submit to your labour that you give them. Now you have gotten animal slaves and riches, for she brings much to your rule.
Now the angels may not strive, but they must take the hill, the town, and the river.
Now the animal flatters and speaks with lack of substance, striving, as if slave owner, and supports slave owner against another animal, for it does not want to go to the field to plow, to the quarry to haul, and yet a slave owner must put them to work, for a righteous man regard with the life of his beast, and it is good, for the animal will not be slayn. So there is no cause for war and killing for there is good as if from the mountain, and the Earth is blessed because of obedience to God.
Now the animal is more ready to attack the woman and the animals are often confused by the man who is pretty to believe that he is woman, for being ugly they say, I am more man than the man who is woman, whether they are male or female, that the animals who are women are confused a second time by the prettiness to think they are man because of him and his prettiness for they are more ugly than him, but it is not so among humans.
Now the animal is more ready to attack the woman and the animals are often confused by the man who is pretty to believe that he is woman, for being ugly they say, I am more man than the
 man who is woman, whether they are male or female, that the animals who are women are confused a second time by the prettiness to think they are man because of him and his prettiness for they are more ugly than him, but it is not so among humans.
Now the animal queen is still a queen and yet even asking the council of the queen of animals it is advice of animals for animals that does not apply to you and what you deal with when you are a person, that their advice is worthless to you. Now kings of men give advice for men and women, and it is for you if you are man or woman, but can the prophet’s mouth even reach up to things higher, for he gives advice for men. But Jude is disciple and giving honour without jelousy. Now kings of criminals give advice for criminals and their mouth does not commit error to enter another realm. Now if you would want to know what is right for people than you go to a king of people and not a king of animals, for are they not also animals? But the king or queen must be of their own people. Now what can be said of David for he is king of men, Jews, and yet he is as if angel. But the younger provokes you with teasing that is respectful and he does not wait until you sleep to play pranks like with those who are Abraham to him. But you are David and the angel is the Christ’s servant and a child, and yet it is for you to say if you want me to fight with you for the angel is the Christ’s servant.
Now the animal queen is still a queen and yet even asking the council of the queen of animals it is advice of animals for animals that does not apply to you and what you deal with when you are a person, that their advice is worthless to you. Now kings of men give advice for men and women, and it is for you if you are man or woman, but can the prophet’s mouth even reach up to things higher, for he gives advice for men. But Jude is disciple and giving honour without jelousy. Now kings of criminals give advice for criminals and their mouth does not commit error to enter another realm. Now if you would want to know what is right for people than you go to a king of people and not a king of animals, for are they not also animals? But the king or queen must be of their own people. Now what can be said of David for he is king of men, Jews, and yet he is as if angel. But the younger provokes you with teasing that is respectful and he does not wait until you sleep to play pranks like with those who are Abraham to him. But you are David and the angel is the Christ’s servant and a child, and yet it is for you to say if you want me to fight with you for the angel is the Christ’s servant.
Now the better respect and honour is with the woman who is fearing God and right and wrong that she does not accuse in atheism as if man has created all and creates it, but respects according to what is more respectful, being knowledge and understanding of God’s kingdom and truth.
Now the black hole takes much and condenses it and not even light is escaping because the space of the whole Universe is to be condensed, and light too is required, for it condenses and destroys.
Now the black hole takes much and condenses it and not even light is escaping because the space of the whole Universe is to be condensed, and light too is required, for it condenses and destroys.  Now what is this the sign of, for I do not know, and if such things exist, than is it a sign of something to come or what is already?
Now the book that is written was begun about 10 days after the passage of the prior comet and the number of words as the sign is between Saturn and Jupiter is about one hundred and forty thousand. Now the title is to be The Eternal and I have changed the name for the second time and yet the original name is still The Diary of Lucifer. Now the previous comet was green and I do not recollect what might have happened at that time only I am not believing that the prior comet and the sign is known by me, for I do not know it.
Now the book that is written was begun about 10 days after the passage of the prior comet and the number of words as the sign is between Saturn and Jupiter is about one hundred and forty thousand. Now the title is to be Notes of the Eternal and I have changed the name for the second time and yet the original name is still The Diary of Lucifer. Now the previous comet was green and I do not recollect what might have happened at that time only I am not believing that the prior comet and the sign is known by me, for I do not know it.
Now the children of hell are adults and the men of hell different than these that the kingdom of hell is with animals and creatures that roam the Earth and let God’s kingdom not be attacked by foolishness from within while such attacks are occurring. But you know that persecution is true and if Babel gives them cause they are not consistent with sentience where they would oppose God, for Babel must build within sentience in this way. Now do not regard the worthless stones of Babel because there have been such placed there from the beginning and such continues, but men are not deceived. But there is no error in opinion and such is fundamental. But if sickness is found it is discovered in other places. Now opinions are not sickness and such is free, and yet they are sick without their ability to descern hypocracy, because they have spoken freely. But if Babel betrays you they are under your authority, and unbelievers are not as those of the kingdom. But they are blind and yet build and those with sight have understood, that duty is to truth even if all of Babel should fall.
Now the children of hell are adults and the men of hell different than these that the kingdom of hell is with animals and creatures that roam the Earth and let God’s kingdom not be attacked by foolishness from within while such attacks are occurring. But you know that persecution is true and if Babel gives them cause they are not consistent with sentience where they would oppose God, for Babel must build within sentience in this way. Now do not regard the worthless stones of Babel because there have been such placed there from the beginning and such continues, but men are not deceived. But there is no error in opinion and such is fundamental. But if sickness is found it is discovered in other places. Now opinions are not sickness and such is free, and yet they are sick without their ability to descern hypocracy, because they have spoken freely. But if Babel betrays you they are under your authority, and unbelievers are not as those of the kingdom. But they are blind and yet build and those with sight have understood, that duty is to truth even if all of Babel should fall.
Now the children of hell are not children, and the adults of that place are also soldiers, and the large and intensely angry things that shake with rage, and the quick things that are small and all the things filled with perversities and blasphamies of the holy, that infest the Earth in places, that are intensely angry at the innocent, who will not attack their own unless it is for some purpose of deception, who would slay and revile with curses and seize the living by the throat that if any seems this and is not than it is a collection of the evil done to them that is stored up to be witness against those who have done evil. So the elders among you might see and inquire and those who are of good, knowing that there are evil on Earth. But if any is blind than they would be neither hot or cold, but blindness cannot lead those who see.
Now the city in which we dwell is made of smooth white stone and silver and there is a wall and gates and there are steps that ascend to the palace chamber and holy guards towards the palace house, and there are plants and wood and the city is holy and pure and populated by the people of light, a holy people. Now the city is with the happenings of good life and good dwelling and those who reside there are for good.  The walls of the city are high and the gate is adorned and beautiful, though it is strong, for the city is such to defend against battle if needed. The pure and holy are there and the levels are not so many and the city not so large that it cannot be traversed by a swift person, but it is city, as for peace and even learning and aquiring, and those who are gathered there are pleased to be there, or so it seems to me, in my desire. But though any should squabble with violence and armies should war outside and even wage wars at the city the walls have been hindering much war efforts and if there are even stray arrows the people of light who are holy are with peace and wellness. For I have wanted peace for the city and I have desired to build a greater Babel to honour and please God as He seemed pleased with the first but to save lives scattered the people. Now let the city be filled with books of knowledge and scrolls of truth and let the places of study be for the people of light, the holy people. Now the brave ones are wise in this place and of much nobility and they are students for wisdom and understanding.
Now the clouds are sign of crises when there is not and they bring forth rain, for a sky without clouds is terror and crises and sign of what is missing that without it the Earth becomes desert. Now when the clouds bring rain they bring the duty of good to all, being Jew and Gentile, even Babylonian and Roman, wicked and righteous, that where there is not enough only some are at first saved, and where God is not giving one thing yet it erodes steadily towards ruin, for Babylon would fall if one thing was removed, and the person who would remove the disciple is removing what will bring ruin if gone, and then who would remove a prophet, the absence would bring ruin to all, and the devil has attempted to remove the Christ, and would he not also attempt to remove the angel? But if a plant is removed, though it is rare,
 the forest is dying soon, and if justice is removed, though it is rare, the whole society is being destroyed. Now all is flowing towards Israel and all is flowing towards the kingdom of heaven, that the nations are signs of what is in those kingdoms of God and God and the son. Now Juruselum stands and yet New Jerusalem is to come. Now let not justice be removed, for you remove rain, and let not duty in terms of mercy be removed for the wicked, for if one is gone so is the other. But what must be for both the righteous and wicked, let it not be failed in for both are required to save the other. Now if you will not give the right things to both, than will God give the right things to both? But mercy is given to both that the land does not become dry and desolate. Now mercy is brought by clouds, and compassion is brought with the storm, and forests are cleansed by it when they are sparked, at times, and when the clouds have emptied themselves than what are they? But thunder rumbles and the heart is given rain. Now the healing may occur because the land is hot with the scorching heat and the felling of forest and the plowing of land and making of fields and yet without such you have no cities and no roads and you do not achieve the desert planet that has no rain. Now another planet, does it have land? But does not then justice and circumscicion take you to planets that have no rain? But you have mercy on Earth and it is good, and a fool claims that I do not encourage them to achieve. But one would go to places that require justice and circumciscion of heart, that require society to have building and using of resources, to make fields and fell trees and dig up rocks and build cities. Now do any of these planets have mercy and compassion? But the one who saves animals, is it not good? Now the one saves the angel is one who watches and they are not Babylonian.
Now the common tongue of Babel is not permitted in Ijeshil unless it be for the work of the language of Ijeshil, and for learning of those who are for Ijeshil while approaching that they are for Babel only when they are in another place. So visitors from Babel are not permitted to come near the city if they are uttering their common tongue, but they are for Ijeshil and as if of Ijeshil if they are to visit, and there will be some suspicion and yet the angel has loved Babel and the wise ones, though only of them, he has loved. For there are wise ones of Babel who are wise and showing themselves wise that the angel is wishing for them to have power in Babel concerning any wrongs that the tower might have interest in. For the compassion of the Christ seems as if with many from Babel who are building understanding and making stone to clay, being knowledge, that the tower grows smaller and more dense by this. Now the angel has wondered about lack of density for lack of words, and yet it seems at least better for longevity that it be as it is, because Mala and its languages, are they not eternal? Now the language of the the star of Israel is acceptable to all people for it is made of light and did much of the light not come from the whole planet, for all belongs to God, and the light of Ijeshil is drawn from all and yet the Tower of Babel is speaking that which is a dead language or as if it, and acceptable to all, and the golden calf of the Jews is gold of Babel, is of the common tongue. Now the angel has given Babel the gold of the Jews, for the gold is God’s, and it is truly gold in truth and he gives it with silver lions.
Now the concealed spies and operators of God’s house are being caught by God in their craftiness and possibly rewarded, and the wicked are being exposed that they might die, and the wickedness planted amongst the good seed to choke it out is placed there by an enemy, the devil that he has sown corrupt seed in with the good seed. Now the Christ is having wisdom and understanding and gives His command, that I only mention it, for He is greater than I and has given me all. Now a woman would have been a wife of the angel but the angel’s heart grieved in hope for her because she had not betrayed prior to marriage but had commited some other deed, prodded by enemies and what she perceived to be wise, and it broke the way for her to be with the angel, so that the lamb was slayn among the sheep, and was to wander where it could, and a sign was sent by those directed by God or some other way, that a woman will be wanting still for it to be undone. Now the angel has known a way but must allow some things to be, for a man must open his hand in some things and allow God to orchestrate what is God’s that a man may not control what is not for him. Now those not in Babylon have not had to avoid the evils that would slay them before they are able to eascape when they could, and a clever operative is having to exercise much wisdom when they are as a spy and concealed operative in Babylon who is in truth in God’s house. Now as an operative attempts to escape the spirit of Babylon, the devil in another spirit, will kick at their shin with might, will grab their arms with strength enough to break bone, will deliver a heavy blow to the stomach, will hit hard with a metal rod, and more things the spirit will do. Now even the angel cannot stop it but is allowing it to be for he has not come to reap into heaven.
Now the concept of meddling, of becoming involved in something that is for others and not for you, of forming opinion and conviction openly about what is for others that a person might become involved, I have called vadish that it is the concept. Now those of the devil’s house do not refrain from vadish when it concerns one of their own, and sometimes they are refraining. Now if the kingdom of heaven is refraining from vadish may it not be like a dog who does not know when to obey or not, but let them not take knowledge to make them sick and foolish in anything. For a person does not obey all wisdom that they might truly be understanding the wisdom given. For these understand the limits of the purpose of giving wisdom that it is not for making a person foolish. Now if you refrain from vadish is it with overly firm obedience that you let your Allie die to obey wisdom. But let the sorrow not be so that you have taken into yourself what was for another and not for you, that in gaining wisdom you have known the limits whether it be not at all for you, a little, or much. But let the Pharisees accuse and they will impair themselves because they speak against themselves and will they say, it was only in sport that we wickedly accused? But let them who are for God attain what is for them that a corrupt teacher not steal it away and cast it to the wind. But for what is good, I would want them to attain.
Now the concept of meddling, of becoming involved in something that is for others and not for you, of forming opinion and conviction openly about what is for others that a person might become involved, I have called vadish that it is the concept. Now those of the devil’s house do not refrain from vadish when it concerns one of their own, and sometimes they are refraining. Now if the kingdom of heaven is refraining from vadish may it not be like a dog who does not know when to obey or not, but let them not take knowledge to make them sick and foolish in anything. For a person does not obey all wisdom that they might truly be understanding the wisdom given. For these understand the limits of the purpose of giving wisdom that it is not for making a person foolish. Now if you refrain from vadish is it with overly firm obedience that you let your Allie die to obey wisdom. But let the sorrow not be so that you have taken into yourself what was for another and not for you, that in gaining wisdom you have known the limits whether it be not at all for you, a little, or much. But let the Pharisees accuse and they will impair themselves because they speak against themselves and will they say, it was only in sport that we wickedly accused? But let them who are for God attain what is for them that a corrupt teacher not steal it away and cast it to the wind. But for what is good, I would want them to attain.
Now the cult of the devil is in the mouth’s of the devil’s and they say you are to obey the devil’s cult because we have placed it in the world and called it an addition to morality. Therefore God has commanded you to defeat the devil and his soldiers and to live and so they have said, obey the cult of the devil and let me kill you, and speak lies and do not fight back and promote my lies that I will have substance of ignorance, claiming things I have not performed so that I might claim without substance, so that you will promote me in having what I do not, giving me ignorance for substance that will give me that strength of the devil, and lieing with you mouth that you might disobey God and compromise your righteousness, for I am not your brother, your sister, or your wife, and to believe so does not know truth, that I am for hell and am the devil’s and I take others with me if I can and do war as a soldier of the devil.
Now the cult of the devil is in the mouth’s of the devil’s and they say you are to obey the devil’s cult because we have placed it in the world and called it an addition to morality. Therefore God has commanded you to defeat the devil and his soldiers and to live and so they have said, obey the cult of the devil and let me kill you, and speak lies and do not fight back and promote my lies that I will have substance of ignorance, claiming things I have not performed so that I might claim without substance, so that you will promote me in having what I do not, giving me ignorance for substance that will give me that strength of the devil, and lieing with you mouth that you might disobey God and compromise your righteousness, for I am not your brother, your sister, or
 your wife, and to believe so does not know truth, that I am for hell and am the devil’s and I take others with me if I can and do war as a soldier of the devil.
Now the darker shades were confused with the criminals of darker shades in my time, and in some places there was segregation placed between the fair and darker because of lack of trust, and yet those human, and not criminal, not something else, were those of the darker shades and they were hidden from others because of the strong hand of Babylon, for they were noble, seeking wisdom, behaving honourably.
Now the darker shades were confused with the criminals of darker shades in my time, and in some places there was segregation placed between the fair and darker because of lack of trust, and yet those human, and not criminal, not something else, were those of the darker shades and they were hidden from others because of the strong hand of Babylon, for they were noble, seeking wisdom, behaving honourably.
Now the daughter of Saul, but is she a Jew? Now what is she that she is so? But wise she is, and more so than some, and yet who is she for? Now she must be a Jew but what man is she for if she was not for David?
Now the defence against evil of the wise woman shows the ability of the blameless, so then let her find the right one, that she shows herself trustworthy to inherit more reward.
Now the devil builds first and with lies mimicking truth, and yet what he has promised with offering lies the angel would will to give with truth. Now the scripture says that God destroyed the previous world in a flood, and the world is existing at a level of Mala, and yet the devil has come with lies and would they not be found in his mouth to condemn what is given? For the angel gives wisdom. Now you are having no knowledge of the raptor-type that stands a little lower than an Enoch that has been described, for it is the creature of the devil’s that is defiled by the love of a man, for some men are not knowing as well, and yet it is not wanting compassion, but is mentioned prior, and it is commited to kill and has no loyalty to those who belong to the devil or those who belong to God, and yet because of its way it is for killing and combat and nothing else, it is the devil’s because it does his will, and after it’s death it is belonging to God, for the angel does not view it right for him to do anything that would destroy a dragon of this type, for such does not seem to be his place. Now to be murderous is not to be honouring God, but it is of the devil and yet is a dragon. Now the angel is not given to deception to have compassion for it, for he knows it is not man or woman.
Now the devil builds first and with lies mimicking truth, and yet what he has promised with offering lies the angel would will to give with truth. Now the scripture says that God destroyed the previous world in a flood, and the world is existing at a level of Mala, and yet the devil has come with lies and would they not be found in his mouth to condemn what is given? For the angel gives wisdom. Now you are having no knowledge of the raptor-type that stands a little lower than an Enoch that has been described, for it is the creature of the devil’s that is defiled by the love of a man, for some men are not knowing as well, and yet it is not wanting compassion, but is mentioned prior, and it is commited to kill and has no loyalty to those who belong to the devil or those who belong to God, and yet because of its way it is for killing and combat and nothing else, it is the devil’s because it does his will, and after it’s death it is belonging to God, for the angel does not view it right for him to do anything that would destroy a dragon of this type, for such does not seem to be his place. Now to be murderous is not to be honouring God, but it is of the devil. Now the angel is not given to deception to have compassion for it, for he knows it is not man or woman.
Now the devil has sent out perverse cowards who are jelous to guard God’s people that no good would happen around them and much good would not happen to them, so that an axe is required to severe them because they are of the incomplete comprehension, not being men, and of the cowardly jelousy only when they are of the comprehension, and should these turn from guarding to attack, know that God is with His people, for when their jelousy has grown they will build to attack, and if they seek blood to murder than it is that the devil has wanted it.
Now the devil is acting, for he controls his domain on Earth, and if he is attempting to force to bow yet you are forbidden to bow and it is grabbing and wicked that he is grabbing and attempting to force, for his people say, be bowing that you bow to the devil, and yet you are God’s only son, the prince, the heir, for such is your worth in this matter.
Now the devil is acting, for he controls his domain on Earth, and if he is attempting to force to bow yet you are forbidden to bow and it is grabbing and wicked that he is grabbing and attempting to force, for his people say, be bowing that you bow to the devil, and yet you are God’s only son, the prince, the heir, for such is your worth in this matter.
Now the devil perverts good things to make bad and disgusting things to be used as weapons. Kindness and concern he has perverted with inquiry to become Moldok, and he has perverted pride and deception (being like wind) with hate to make rillet, and judgement he has perverted with iniquity and mixed it with hate to make gungon and condemnation he has perverted with iniquity and wrath to make conhon and sexual harrassment he has used like a sharp weapon and a weapon that blungeons and cuts and perversities of self judgement he has perverted to be used for objects that bruise and blundgeon, called ticiton, and perversities of being pleased and impressed he has perverted with hate and wrath to be made into kolir. Now there are other weapons he has made and the devil’s people, becoming ugly in using these weapons, are having no great grievance with performing these conversions due to general hate and wrath.
Now the devil’s have said that while they are fighting we attack from behind their lines of defence to obliterate humanity and cripple it, for we are soldiers of the devil’s and we can even work together for our common evils let us know where our allies are. Now if there is recompense after the fighting it is good, that the Earth be made clean, but if you leave it does it become devoured? For if the way of Jews kills it and the way of Christians also than surely you know what is required.
Now the devil’s servants who do his will most are those of Orgoth’s servant. Now if they manifest themselves upon the land they are from Orgoth, servants ultimately of the devil, and if they say, let the animals join with us to serve the devil, yet the animals are better, at least, than Orgoth’s servant. For Orgoth haas sent smaller gatherings of soldiers to carry out attacks and missions against only a small number, that they use stealth to carry out their missions and sometimes they are employing speed. Now all benifit when all people who are God’s are defended that the kingdom suffers entire when it is divided against itself, for all pay the price, that God is in heaven, and the war is continuing even while there is peace. Now when they say, good will support good, they are a wise people, and when they say, allow Orgoth to fight itself, indeed it is a risk, but where understanding is good, it is in justice and understanding. Now if one who is with Orgoth’s servant is so by jelousy, that they seek to attack because of jelousy, to attack those on land, and the servant of another shelf is for attacking those with Orgoth’s servant, will they not say it is a thing of Ria? But those with understanding will know the truth. For Orgoth is sometimes doing things in the name of Ria, for the devil has used things of Ria to gather them. Now why are they still so interested in shades of people? But wisdom is better that shades might not be regarded with as much as was before, and when Enoch lived, was there much regard of shades? But shades are evidence of the Elsnon, and yet shades themselves are nothing, and nothing to be regarded in terms of the religion built about them. For the Elsnon have all shades and even the precious stone in sunlight that cannot marry and none can marry her is believed by people to be Elsnon, and the angel, being still a child, swallowed such a stone after the holy women who cared for him, to be as wives to him, were not present that the angel was tempted, though he knew that he should not. Now if the rocks, the stones, of the Earth cry out against a person’s enemy or offer words of good, than do they not also cry out when there is abomination? But do not believe that it is impossible for the devil’s spirits to meddle. Now the dogs speak without explanation or debate any longer for some of the dogs of disbelief are well established in their disbelief that they are firmly established and strong in their confidence, for they are pledging greater loyalty to Babylon and they have many in Babel, because Babel has wanted to be neutral, and such claim all of Babel for this reason, and yet it cannot be stolen by any, for when it is destroyed and divided yet it rebuilds itself after some stones and clay have been removed, and when the divide is no more, yet it rebuilds itself after some stones and clay have been removed, and it rebuilds quickly.
Now the devil’s servants who do his will most are those of Orgoth’s servant. Now if they manifest themselves upon the land they are from Orgoth, servants ultimately of the devil, and if they say, let the animals join with us to serve the devil, yet the animals are better, at least, than Orgoth’s servant. For Orgoth haas sent smaller gatherings of soldiers to carry out attacks
 and missions against only a small number, that they use stealth to carry out their missions and sometimes they are employing speed. Now all benifit when all people who are God’s are defended that the kingdom suffers entire when it is divided against itself, for all pay the price, that God is in heaven, and the war is continuing even while there is peace. Now when they say, good will support good, they are a wise people, and when they say, allow Orgoth to fight itself, indeed it is a risk, but where understanding is good, it is in justice and understanding. Now if one who is with Orgoth’s servant is so by jelousy, that they seek to attack because of jelousy, to attack those on land, and the servant of another shelf is for attacking those with Orgoth’s servant, will they not say it is a thing of Ria? But those with understanding will know the truth. For Orgoth is sometimes doing things in the name of Ria, for the devil has used things of Ria to gather them. Now why are they still so interested in shades of people? But wisdom is better that shades might not be regarded with as much as was before, and when Enoch lived, was there much regard of shades? But shades are evidence of the Elsnon, and yet shades themselves are nothing to be regarded in terms of the religion built about them.
Now the devil’s servants who do his will most are those of Orgoth’s servant. Now if they manifest themselves upon the land they are from Orgoth, servants ultimately of the devil, and if they say, let the animals join with us to serve the devil, yet the animals are better, at least, than Orgoth’s servant. For Orgoth haas sent smaller gatherings of soldiers to carry out attacks and missions against only a small number, that they use stealth to carry out their missions and sometimes they are employing speed. Now all benifit when all people who are God’s are defended that the kingdom suffers entire when it is divided against itself, for all pay the price, that God is in heaven, and the war is continuing even while there is peace. Now when they say, good will support good, they are a wise people, and when they say, allow Orgoth to fight itself, indeed it is a risk, but where understanding is good, it is in justice and understanding. Now if one who is with Orgoth’s servant is so by jelousy, that they seek to attack because of jelousy, to attack those on land, and the servant of another shelf is for attacking those with Orgoth’s servant, will they not say it is a thing of Ria? But those with understanding will know the truth. For Orgoth is sometimes doing things in the name of Ria, for the devil has used things of Ria to gather them. Now why are they still so interested in shades of people? But wisdom is better that shades might not be regarded with as much as was before, and when Enoch lived, was there much regard of shades? But shades are evidence of the Elsnon, and yet shades themselves are almost nothing to be regarded in terms of the religion built about them.
Now the devil’s servants who do his will most are those of Orgoth’s servant. Now if they manifest themselves upon the land they are from Orgoth, servants ultimately of the devil, and if they say, let the animals join with us to serve the devil, yet the animals are better, at least, than Orgoth’s servant. For Orgoth haas sent smaller gatherings of soldiers to carry out attacks and missions against only a small number, that they use stealth to carry out their missions and sometimes they are employing speed. Now all benifit when all people who are God’s are defended that the kingdom suffers entire when it is divided against itself, for all pay the price, that God is in heaven, and the war is continuing even while there is peace. Now when they say, good will support good, they are a wise people, and when they say, allow Orgoth to fight itself, indeed it is a risk, but where understanding is good, it is in justice and understanding. Now if one who is with Orgoth’s servant is so by jelousy, that they seek to attack because of jelousy, to attack those on land, and the servant of another shelf is for attacking those with Orgoth’s servant, will they not say it is a thing of Ria? But those with understanding will know the truth. For Orgoth is sometimes doing things in the name of Ria, for the devil has used things of Ria to gather them. Now why are they still so interested in shades of people? But wisdom is better that shades might not be regarded with as much as was before, and when Enoch lived, was there much regard of shades? But shades are evidence of the Elsnon, and yet shades themselves are nothing, and nothing to be regarded in terms of the religion built about them. For the Elsnon have all shades and even the precious stone in sunlight that cannot marry and none can marry her is believed by people to be Elsnon, and the angel, being still a child, swallowed such a stone after the holy women who cared for him, to be as wives to him, were not present that the angel was tempted, though he knew that he should not. Now if the rocks, the stones, of the Earth cry out against a person’s enemy or offer words of good, than do they not also cry out when there is abomination? But do not believe that it is impossible for the devil’s spirits to meddle. Now the dogs speak without explanation or debate any longer for some of the dogs of disbelief are well established in their disbelief that they are firmly established and strong in their confidence, for they are pledging greater loyalty to Babylon and they have many in Babel, because Babel has wanted to be neutral, and such claim all of Babel for this reason, and yet it cannot be stolen by any, for when it is destroyed and divided yet it rebuilds itself after some stones and clay have been removed, and when the divide is no more, yet it rebuilds itself after some stones and clay have been removed, and it rebuilds quickly.
Now the devil’s servants who do his will most are those of Orgoth’s servant. Now if they manifest themselves upon the land they are from Orgoth, servants ultimately of the devil, and if they say, let the animals join with us to serve the devil, yet the animals are better, at least, than Orgoth’s servant. For Orgoth haas sent smaller gatherings of soldiers to carry out attacks and missions against only a small number, that they use stealth to carry out their missions and sometimes they are employing speed. Now all benifit when all people who are God’s are defended that the kingdom suffers entire when it is divided against itself, for all pay the price, that God is in heaven, and the war is continuing even while there is peace. Now when they say, good will support good, they are a wise people, and when they say, allow Orgoth to fight itself, indeed it is a risk, but where understanding is good, it is in justice and understanding. Now if one who is with Orgoth’s servant is so by jelousy, that they seek to attack because of jelousy, to attack those on land, and the servant of another shelf is for attacking those with Orgoth’s servant, will they not say it is a thing of Ria? But those with understanding will know the truth. For Orgoth is sometimes doing things in the name of Ria, for the devil has used things of Ria to gather them. Now why are they still so interested in shades of people? But wisdom is better that shades might not be regarded with as much as was before, and when Enoch lived, was there much regard of shades? But shades are evidence of the Elsnon, and yet shades themselves are nothing, and nothing to be regarded in terms of the religion built about them. For the Elsnon have all shades and even the precious stone in sunlight that cannot marry and none can marry her is believed by people to be Elsnon, and the angel, being still a child, swallowed such a stone after the holy women who cared for him, to be as wives to him, were not present that the angel was tempted, though he knew that he should not. Now if the rocks, the stones, of the Earth cry out against a person’s enemy or offer words of good, than do they not also cry out when there is abomination? But do not believe that it is impossible for the devil’s spirits to meddle. Now the dogs speak without explanation or debate any longer for some of the dogs of disbelief are well established in their disbelief that they are firmly established and strong in their confidence, for they are pledging greater loyalty to Babylon and they have many in Babel, because Babel has wanted to be neutral, and such claim all of Babel for this reason, and yet it cannot be stolen by any, for when it is destroyed and divided yet it rebuilds itself after some stones and clay have been removed, and when the divide is no more, yet it rebuilds itself after some stones and clay have been removed, and it rebuilds quickly.
Now the devil’s servants who do his will most are those of Orgoth’s servant. Now if they manifest themselves upon the land they are from Orgoth, servants ultimately of the devil, and if they say, let the animals join with us to serve the devil, yet the animals are better, at least, than Orgoth’s servant. For Orgoth haas sent smaller gatherings of soldiers to carry out attacks and missions against only a small number, that they use stealth to carry out their missions and sometimes they are employing speed. Now all benifit when all people who are God’s are defended that the kingdom suffers entire when it is divided against itself, for all pay the price, that God is in heaven, and the war is continuing even while there is peace. Now when they say, good will support good, they are a wise people, and when they say, allow Orgoth to fight itself, indeed it is a risk, but where understanding is good, it is in justice and understanding. Now if one who is with Orgoth’s servant is so by jelousy, that they seek to attack because of jelousy, to attack those on land, and the servant of another shelf
 is for attacking those with Orgoth’s servant, will they not say it is a thing of Ria? But those with understanding will know the truth. For Orgoth is sometimes doing things in the name of Ria, for the devil has used things of Ria to gather them. Now why are they still so interested in shades of people? But wisdom is better that shades might not be regarded with as much as was before, and when Enoch lived, was there much regard of shades? But shades are evidence of the Elsnon, and yet shades themselves are nothing, and nothing to be regarded in terms of the religion built about them. For the Elsnon have all shades and even the precious stone in sunlight that cannot marry and none can marry her is believed by people to be Elsnon, and the angel, being still a child, swallowed such a stone after the holy women who cared for him, to be as wives to him, were not present that the angel was tempted, though he knew that he should not. Now if the rocks, the stones, of the Earth cry out against a person’s enemy or offer words of good, than do they not also cry out when there is abomination? But do not believe that it is impossible for the devil’s spirits to meddle. Now the dogs speak without explanation or debate any longer for some of the dogs of disbelief are well established in their disbelief that they are firmly established and strong in their confidence, for they are pledging greater loyalty to Babylon and they have many in Babel, because Babel has wanted to be neutral, and such claim all of Babel for this reason, and yet it cannot be stolen by any, for when it is destroyed and divided yet it rebuilds itself after some stones and clay have been removed, and when the divide is no more, yet it rebuilds itself after some stones and clay have been removed, and it rebuilds quickly.
Now the disgusting fools who say noble men of the darker shades are the slaves are not being worthy to speak it. For these men, the darker, are my neighbours and some are like brothers, noble, honourable, and worthy of having slaves and riches. But those who do that which seperate man and woman who is to be wife or is wife are those who are commanded as animals to be the man’s animal slaves, for they act so because of their hearts, that the Lord is owner of the Universe and His will is to be done.
Now the disgusting fools who say noble men of the darker shades are the slaves are not being worthy to speak it. For these men are my neighbours and some are like brothers, noble, honourable, and worthy of having slaves and riches. But those who do that which seperate man and woman who is to be wife or is wife are those who are commanded as animals to be the man’s animal slaves, for they act so because of their hearts, that the Lord is owner of the Universe and His will is to be done.
Now the doctrine of the highest son of Orgoth is much with that of animals, that it is animal doctrine, and falling lower than it is, being the flame of Belshaur, it is found in mouths of animals who use it wrong. Now it speaks in morality of animals, being nihilism, and it swallows sick and injured and is for animals and not people, for Orgoth uses it blindly.
Now the doctrine of the highest son of Orgoth is much with that of animals, that it is animal doctrine, and falling lower than it is, being the flame of Belshaur, it is found in mouths of animals who use it wrong. Now it speaks in morality of animals, being nihilism, and it swallows sick and injured and is for animals and not people, for Orgoth uses it blindly.
Now the dog has sense that is different and yet it is a dog that is having more sense than a similar dog that has even less understanding, and some dogs are braver, some dogs the alpha of dogs with more sense but still a dog, some dogs harrassing and scorning more, others more mischievous that you be abundant in knowledge and be having riches, gold and silver, and barrels of gold pieces and cups and chains of gold. Now there are skunks that make themselves disgusting to drive away predators, and there are bears that are gentle, but they are not to be trifled with, that a dog might not be pitied much that harasses and bites. For I do not much pity such a dog, but it is for you to decide. Now there are hippos that are mighty, rulers of jungle, and to have their protection is a great thing, for the female hippo has been good to God’s house and a powerful queen on Earth, and she is lovely, of a tender love and meekness, and yet to offendors, is she not to be feared? Now of people, I am not as one who would work in the same place as his wife, and of the women I have wanted, yet I would take no interest in one I grew up with as like she was a sister, for such is abomination to me. But better, I have said, and not as giving wisdom, better to go away and let a woman be married and ruined by divorce and then to marry her, rather than to very poor and dwell with her, for if this is good for some, to me it is great folly and abomination.
Now the dog has sense that is different and yet it is a dog that is having more sense than a similar dog that has even less understanding, and some dogs are braver, some dogs the alpha of dogs with more sense but still a dog, some dogs harrassing and scorning more, others more mischievous that you be abundant in knowledge and be having riches, gold and silver, and barrels of gold pieces and cups and chains of gold. Now there are skunks that make themselves disgusting to drive away predators, and there are bears that are gentle, but they are not to be trifled with, that a dog might not be pitied much that harasses and bites. For I do not much pity such a dog, but it is for you to decide. Now there are hippos that are mighty, rulers of jungle, and to have their protection is a great thing, for the female hippo has been good to God’s house and a powerful queen on Earth, and she is lovely, of a tender love and meekness, and yet to offendors, is she not to be feared? Now of people, I am not as one who would work in the same place as his wife, and of the women I have wanted, yet I would take no interest in one I grew up with as like she was a sister, for such is abomination to me. But better, I have said, and not as giving wisdom, better to go away and let a woman be married and ruined by divorce and then to marry her, rather than to very poor and dwell with her, for if this is good for some, to me it is great folly and abomination.
Now the dog has sense that is different and yet it is a dog that is having more sense than a similar dog that has even less understanding, and some dogs are braver, some dogs the alpha of dogs with more sense but still a dog, some dogs harrassing and scorning more, others more mischievous that you be abundant in knowledge and be having riches, gold and silver, and barrels of gold pieces and cups and chains of gold. Now there are skunks that make themselves disgusting to drive away predators, and there are bears that are gentle, but they are not to be trifled with, that a dog might not be pitied much that harasses and bites. For I do not much pity such a dog, but it is for you to decide. Now there are hippos that are mighty, rulers of jungle, and to have their protection is a great thing, for the female hippo has been good to God’s house and a powerful queen on Earth, and she is lovely, of a tender love and meekness, and yet to offendors, is she not to be feared? Now of people, I am not as one who would work in the same place as his wife, and of the women I have wanted, yet I would take no interest in one I grew up with as like she was a sister, for such is abomination to me. But better, I have said, and not as giving wisdom, better to go away and let a woman be married and ruined by divorce and then to marry her, rather than to very poor and dwell with her, for if this is good for some, to me it is great folly and abomination. Now there is a beautiful one who seems as if Elsnon and she is pleasant and making herself beautiful and yet she is not knowing right and wrong to a large degree. Now how am I to know if she is Elsnon, for she is making herself beautiful, and yet she is for another, I have said. For she is more pretty than any daughter and yet there are those prettier, and yet she is not knowing right and wrong in much, and yet she shines as if draped in sun-light. But the angel was a baby angel and cared for by holy woman of Earth, to be as wives, and when they had departed, for there were many, the angel was without care from women and he knew he should not have that which was like a stone in his chest and throat, and yet the stone was beautiful. Now why would the angel do such, except tempted by lack of wives that he should injure himself with a beautiful stone? But in spirit he tested God, because of the thirst, and commited error in spirit, and yet he said prior, it is wrong, for he was not deceived, only the thirst gave opportunity and the thirst changed his mind that he might be deceived and commit wrong in spirit.
Now the dog is not wishing to be human that you attempt to make him speak as humans, for if he is polite is it not to digress and fall away from speech, for it is wrong that you speak to him as if to reason. Now why will you be cruel to a dog, for he is dog, that is he not loved? But because you are much blind and small are you hating a dog because of its size? Now if you say, yet Babylon will not let us do what is reasonable and right, then you understand that Babylon is the devil’s and must be destroyed. For if you are knowing how to deal with dogs and animals and having understanding to build and do many good things as God is wanting and yet Babylon is not allowing it, than you are children, but Babylon does not outnumber you and a spear is needed and arrows, and yet the angel sends out light and God is powerful that you reason sensibly to reach for a spear, as a human, and yet no weapon
 of the sort might be required, for Babylon is able to be demolished by other means, that you fight, and that obedience and diligence is required, for if prophets placate you into apathy than I do not, for children see and humans take action, only spears and arrows of Ria might lend a disadvantage, for it gives more ground to the devil to have cause. 
Now the dog is not wishing to be human that you attempt to make him speak as humans, for if he is polite is it not to digress and fall away from speech, for it is wrong that you speak to him as if to reason. Now why will you be cruel to a dog, for he is dog, that is he not loved? But because you are much blind and small are you hating a dog because of its size? Now if you say, yet Babylon will not let us do what is reasonable and right, then you understand that Babylon is the devil’s and must be destroyed. For if you are knowing how to deal with dogs and animals and having understanding to build and do many good things as God is wanting and yet Babylon is not allowing it, than you are children, but Babylon does not outnumber you and a spear is needed and arrows, and yet the angel sends out light and God is powerful that you reason sensibly to reach for a spear, as a human, and yet no weapon of the sort might be required, for Babylon is able to be demolished by other means, that you fight, and that obedience and diligence is required, for if prophets placate you into apathy than I do not, for children see and humans take action, only spears and arrows of Ria might lend a disadvantage, for it gives more ground to the devil to have cause. 
Now the dogs of Babel are to be alpha dogs and they hold the answers of a type of alpha dog, and yet others are not dogs, and nor is the angel, and their language cannot describe, for they attempt to force others into their dog pack who are humans that they might be lesser than them. Now they study and yield little and they build, that they are not as the wise with understanding, for they build stone by stone and they make mortar blindly, that a dog is not as a human and has no place among people.
Now the dogs of Babel are to be alpha dogs and they hold the answers of a type of alpha dog, and yet others are not dogs, and nor is the angel, and their language cannot describe, for they attempt to force others into their dog pack who are humans that they might be lesser than them. Now they study and yield little and they build, that they are not as the wise with understanding, for they build stone by stone and they make mortar blindly, that a dog is not as a human and has no place among people.
Now the domain of soldiers is either criminals or soldiers and targets of war, and citizens are the ones possessing all inheritance.
Now the domain of soldiers is either criminals or soldiers and targets of war, and citizens are the ones possessing all inheritance.
Now the evil equivalent that would match what is acceptable is found on his lips as a curse, and it is the acceptable, for there is an unacceptable for every right thing that is a curse in the language in which I write. Now he curses good for the closest evil, he rejects good and gives umbrage, he feigns being other things in self-praise, and it is out of time and place, for he forces it, and he feigns and presents being innocent and gentle, but forces it, and is giving trechory, umbrage, and he feigns being a victim when none has spoken to him or gone near to him, for there is not even in truth insolent facade, for he is a weapon, and is it without cause? For he is a weapon without a reason.
Now the evil equivalent that would match what is acceptable is found on his lips as a curse, and it is the acceptable, for there is an unacceptable for every right thing that is a curse in the language in which I write. Now he curses good for the closest evil, he rejects good and gives umbrage, he feigns being other things in self-praise, and it is out of time and place, for he forces it, and he feigns and presents being innocent and gentle, but forces it, and is giving trechory, umbrage, and he feigns being a victim when none has spoken to him or gone near to him, for there is not even in truth insolent facade, for he is a weapon, and is it without cause? For he is a weapon without a reason.
Now the figure stood and surveyed and none saw him at night where he moved in silence and he crept into the house and sliced the throat of one then another for they were both performers of strange wickedness being beasts who mauneuvered around the understandings of the young, that the young could not even find words for what they did, a some were attacked as if to be slayn and the figure understood having understood much. Now when it was disovered the young who did not know said, let the figure be killed for I have not understood these evils they speak, for to them the evils could not be because they had no words for them or knowledge believing they knew all they needed. But the elder ones of men and women were not for it, and having some grey in their hair or approaching it, they went in peace to conceal the bodies, and they deceived the young that the figure would be pursued until they had time to give wisdom to the young. 
Now the foolish woman drunk on mocking and muyr is a calamity that is with wickedness, for though there is gladness yet it is mixed with folly and bitterness and resentment to drive away all that threatens with mocking. For they have been threatened by things of God and words of righteousness and justice and mocking is coming from them. Now will not she, wisdom, be keeping the sons who love her, that she might stand back and mock at her who is foolish? But wise sons are given much and a holiness has been arrayed from them that is from God at times that such can be found in that nation which obeys all the words of God. Now Jews have obeyed far more, being chosen and set aside by God to do so, that because of this the angel has had dismay towards their young and even sorrow, that Avram, Abraham, will sustain him and give him strength that he might not fight alone, because the angel placed one foot upon the planet as it was given, as he was on a throne, and because it is so he has required Avram, Abraham, to be a companion to him. Now the adolescent is strong but not of age to be a Jew, or so it is perceived, and yet is it true? For I have been given burden to tell them the truth.
Now the fruit that appears on the tree of Ijeshil is for all people, whether dragon or Enoch, Christian or Jew, for Babel may take of it and they are turning stones to mortar, to clay, and they are even able to turn fruit to stone and then to clay. Now when there is something offered against Babel than fruit appears on the tree that Babel might have it, and all people, and Babel can do much with it if it is acceptable to them. Now that from Ijeshil that goes out as light is also going out that Babel might take light and turn it to stone and clay if it pleases them, for the angel is not against Babel.
Now the gangs of criminals were more righteous than the priests in Babylon so that the gangs had every right to kill them if it happened because the difference was great.
Now the gentiles of a type are saying everything with many lies so that the truth must be told without the lies, and this need not bother the conscience of any. But if any would be troubled in conscience it is a burden for them that need not be. Now if some use rillet and there are weapons fling from catapults and there are fires set and the time is of war than I assume there are many persecutors in the land. Now if it is all the last of days than it can be taken as a sign that after it has passed there will be a time before another such time that such times might be symbols that the Christ will return and if He is returning presently while it is happening than do not these receive the best warning? But I write of the signs as a matter of opinion in this thing, that tribulation has come to Earth and the planets are to be placed with people for some are not like others and are in their hearts wanting something more than life itself that these are capable as some are capable of doing one task and another capable of another and all are needed and required except that the people of the devil’s are not required but are enemies of us. Now a person must be a Christian to be so, and it is not some pointless thing as some might allude to when wanting acceptance that these are for another church. But it much is benificial to us than why am I to offer anything in this matter about what another church would do? But I do not knock as the one who commands me, and yet I do not be grateful when another is deemed worthy, but for what is good than I have been among them, with some, that if any should give they must be worthy that they are able to receive. Now I am not the Christ and if there is good done to you and you have said, but I have no respect for God, than neither did many believe in Him but some called Him great teacher. Now am I the son of God who will not judge a thing, but He is alive and well, that you may not say I am a Jew who casts out the son of God, to use a metephore, but a Christian who casts out one who must be evil and offering you nothing. But if you are then a good people than I will know.
Now the goddess is not goddess to men, and men are not permitted to bow and yet women have said, she is grievous, because of her status with the Lord. Now men are forbidden to fear anything but God, and she is the Lord’s, and does she not also fear God? But because of fools who make discord in the futility the angel has mentioned it, for fools who make discord towards the great and those who are in high places are the cause of much giving of knowledge to all. Now there are those who make discord for the cause of Orgoth’s highest son and those for Orgoth’s servant
 and some for neither.
Now the goddess is not goddess to men, and men are not permitted to bow and yet women have said, she is grievous, because of her status with the Lord. Now men are forbidden to fear anything but God, and she is the Lord’s, and does she not also fear God? But because of fools who make discord in the futility the angel has mentioned it, for fools who make discord towards the great and those who are in high places are the cause of much giving of knowledge to all. Now there are those who make discord for the cause of Orgoth’s highest son and those for Orgoth’s servant and some for neither.
Now the goddess is not goddess to men, and men are not permitted to bow and yet women have said, she is grievous, because of her status with the Lord. Now men are forbidden to fear anything but God, and she is the Lord’s, and does she not also fear God? But because of fools who make discord in the futility the angel has mentioned it, for fools who make discord towards the great and those who are in high places are the cause of much giving of knowledge to all.
Now the goddess is not goddess to men, and men are not permitted to bow and yet women have said, she is grievous, because of her status with the Lord. Now men are forbidden to fear anything but God, and she is the Lord’s, and does she not also fear God? But because of fools who make discord in the futility the angel has mentioned it, for fools who make discord towards the great and those who are in high places are the cause of much giving of knowledge to all.
Now the goddess is so in the Lord’s kingdom, and she is of no offence to men but only to women, for she must be separated from all women, that she has no friend, that she is as if despised and yet not by men. Now even the man who is a great hater of women does not despise her, for she is the Lord’s. Now she says, I will care for my brother who is younger than me, and it is good, and the two are on the Island where there is no other. Now those who meet with her travel by ships and then leave and women do not travel to her. Friend of prophets, good woman who is the Lord’s, and her husband a righteous man, and yet the daughters look up to her and curse her and are innocent. Now does she have news, even allies? But what does she require? But she is strong, virtuous, kind and Jezebel falls before her, stricken at the knees. Now is not Jezebel better in some days than many? But does she not fear and respect the Christ? Now she is not willing to kill Him.
Now the goddess is so in the Lord’s kingdom, and she is of no offence to men but only to women, for she must be separated from all women, that she has no friend, that she is as if despised and yet not by men. Now even the man who is a great hater of women does not despise her, for she is the Lord’s. Now she says, I will care for my brother who is younger than me, and it is good, and the two are on the Island where there is no other. Now those who meet with her travel by ships and then leave and women do not travel to her. Friend of prophets, good woman who is the Lord’s, and her husband a righteous man, and yet the daughters look up to her and curse her and are innocent. Now does she have news, even allies? But what does she require? But she is strong, virtuous, kind and Jezebel falls before her, stricken at the knees. Now is not Jezebel better in some days than many? But does she not fear and respect the Christ? Now she is not willing to kill Him.
Now the gods are not for Babylon if it is to be understood, being the gods and goddesses of the Lord, that if they have by mistaken taken anything from Babylon that they will cleanse themselves because they are gods and of the kingdom of heaven, which is the Lord’s and the Christ’s kingdom. Now the power that exists that I call sefam has gathered what is within its power for the god who is seen on Earth that sefam is within those who with it that when a god is in sight, and if I must tell truth it is not so with a goddess because I must obey God and must not lie, than those who are with sefam are drawn to servitude of sickening adoration of the god, that their being is ill with adoration and hatred of themselves that they envy themselves for the presence of the god, and are of a heart of great sorrow and agony because of the beauty that they adore to the extent it has turned to envy and bitter resentment, that their hearts are seized with servitude to the god from great adoration, that they hate and resent themselves because all they can give is their whole of what they are and it is reasoned by them that much more should be given. Now when there is lack of wisdom there is conflict, even turning to violence at times, if wisdom is lacking, because those who would do good are denied and the way is not made by the god for them that they might do good to the god. Now who can say these are jelous who have misunderstood them to be jelous, because these are not the jelous but those who are of great adoration. Now the servants of the god have made their rightful demand that they be able to give good to the god, which they have deemed is only right on Earth that good might be fullfilled that the god who denies one of them is robbing them of fullfilling what is good, for these are the people who are counted as having been chosen to fullfill this. Now they are faithful and beyond that of others so that the others have no portion in it, for what will be revealed about these who run to fullfill what is good? But let none speak against truth and say it is for the sake of life.
Now the gods are not for Babylon if it is to be understood, being the gods and goddesses of the Lord, that if they have by mistaken taken anything from Babylon that they will cleanse themselves because they are gods and of the kingdom of heaven, which is the Lord’s and the Christ’s kingdom. Now the power that exists that I call sefam has gathered what is within its power for the god who is seen on Earth that sefam is within those who with it that when a god is in sight, and if I must tell truth it is not so with a goddess because I must obey God and must not lie, than those who are with sefam are drawn to servitude of sickening adoration of the god, that their being is ill with adoration and hatred of themselves that they envy themselves for the presence of the god, and are of a heart of great sorrow and agony because of the beauty that they adore to the extent it has turned to envy and bitter resentment, that their hearts are seized with servitude to the god from great adoration, that they hate and resent themselves because all they can give is their whole of what they are and it is reasoned by them that much more should be given. Now when there is lack of wisdom there is conflict, even turning to violence at times, if wisdom is lacking, because those who would do good are denied and the way is not made by the god for them that they might do good to the god. Now who can say these are jelous who have misunderstood them to be jelous, because these are not the jelous but those who are of great adoration. Now the servants of the god have made their rightful demand that they be able to give good to the god, which they have deemed is only right on Earth that good might be fullfilled that the god who denies one of them is robbing them of fullfilling what is good, for these are the people who are counted as having been chosen to fullfill this. Now they are faithful and beyond that of others so that the others have no portion in it, for what will be revealed about these who run to fullfill what is good? But let none speak against truth and say it is for the sake of life.
Now the hajil circumciscion is not as those of Christians and not those of Jews. But there seems to be benifit, they claim, to the circumciscion that it is the better thing to be having the circumciscion of the Jews and yet are there not benifit to some other things that might be, and what is it to be if the one not circumcised is finding it preferable not to be circumsized? But if any understands these things than let it be understood better than I, for I have understood that the hajil circumciscion is of a servant, that it has come by one way or the other. Now if the servant on the first shelf in Orgoth is having the hajil circumcision or something like it, than it is for celibacy unless he should wish to be uncircumcised, which is possible. Now those being circumsized in the hajil circumcision by punishing without mercy are justly circumsized in their hearts that they are  servants. Now if anyone would have a pure hajil circumciscion that does not come from evil, but good, choosing the virginity for the Christ, than is it not good? But I am not choosing the celibacy so that you know that I do not attempt to deceive you. Now if you are choosing circumcisions and by understanding and control, and yet it is not control, and the law of Moses is not for it, but one does good and according to it well might be done and yet it comes also by multiple ways that are almost infinite so that you do not believe only actions can do it, for many things also seem the same. But if you are having the control, than is it not considered to be better, and yet it is not considered so for many, that their advantage is in other things, and was the Christ always exercising the control? But the one is mantaining in way that destroys more good and yet the other able to mantain and it is well. But the variations are too many and the Universe is expanding in the sky. Now if you would go beyond your measure for judgement than what is the cause? But if peace is restored by calm than is this what is right for you? But how can any council you in this thing for it is more than the grains of the sand on Earth. But if you would know it why does any say it must be a Jew when it does not have to be and often is not? But some have
 said they are and are getting what is not good for them but good for others.
Now the house of God has Joab and it is never done for him because of the devil, and he is more than a man, and there are the kings in Mala at the slightly higher level, but close and low, and is not sometimes Ahab being king that the Christians and even Jews are being attacked on Earth, and is not sometimes other kings of the old Testiment? Now as for Enoch, is terranosaurus rex not coming to steal what others have killed, that he is for large kills and gain brought in by the murders and evils of others that he is massive, formidable and with many might and takes the large gains of many others who have worked diligently to do evil, that he is a thief against those who have done much wickedness for gain, for he gobbled up most of the gain when it has already been killed, and yet an Enoch is a small thing of no gain to him and not of worth or effort.
Now the house of God has two pillars that are two wise woman at the door and both are caring for truth and justice. Now the one wise woman is mentioned and the other is greatly guiding the young women that they be wise and she cares for truth and justice that the Lord’s men might be giving blessing to women and that the Lord’s house might stand. For the foolish woman against them is for the house of the devil, that she accuses in blindness of herself and is attempting to make ground for the building of the devil’s house, for the truth about herself is not revealed to her, but she is drawn to the angel to cast herself upon the ground, to cover herself in dirt, to desecrate her own beauty before him, to make a foolish and grotesque sight of herself, to testify to him of the folly of the devil’s house, to cover herself in what has disgust, that she makes a cause where there is not to have excuse to come and do so before the angel. For her heart says you may not and cannot save me for if you would tempt me yet my heart is for those of the devil’s house that you may not tempt me, you may not covet me that you take me, for I am for those of the devil’s house, for a foolish and wicked one, he is to be my husband.
Now the house of God has two pillars that are two wise woman at the door and both are caring for truth and justice. Now the one wise woman is mentioned and the other is greatly guiding the young women that they be wise and she cares for truth and justice that the Lord’s men might be giving blessing to women and that the Lord’s house might stand. For the foolish woman against them is for the house of the devil, that she accuses in blindness of herself and is attempting to make ground for the building of the devil’s house, for the truth about herself is not revealed to her, but she is drawn to the angel to cast herself upon the ground, to cover herself in dirt, to desecrate her own beauty before him, to make a foolish and grotesque sight of herself, to testify to him of the folly of the devil’s house, to cover herself in what has disgust, that she makes a cause where there is not to have excuse to come and do so before the angel. For her heart says you may not and cannot save me for if you would tempt me yet my heart is for those of the devil’s house that you may not tempt me, you may not covet me that you take me, for I am for those of the devil’s house, for a foolish and wicked one, he is to be my husband.
Now the house of lions has had one who perceived some wisdom and defended them before Lucifer emerged, and the house of the kingdom has had one who perceived some wisdom and emerged before the angel, that it should be known that these are capable of conveying truth, that it has been there prior, that wise people can be with those who are not to fullfill all but are knowing of these things, and Babel, too, has known of many things. Now the house of lions is against the wicked, or the wicked against the house of lions, and they have sent those who do not belong among the lions, so that the animal who is wicked comes to claim part with the lions that when the wicked are doing injustice the imposter does not support the lion but mocks and attacks in addition to the lion, and is trying with a hard metal to seperate the lion from the other lions that they are saying with a hard strength, you are not with the other lions, and to the lions, this is not one of your own, that the imposter is a weapon and soldier of the wicked. Now the imposter is for animal morality and not right and wrong, that they might mock lions who are people, and these are exceedingly ugly but they are putting on the cloaks of one who would be around lions. Now if there are many others there are are those who rebel greatly against God in saying, let us be like lions in a mockery of what we believe them to be, and they are behaving with what they have slandered lions of towards lions, as if strong, and it is a great rebellion against God, exceeding that of the wicked, for these are doing wrong all the things of lions and are even luke-warm to profane and blaspheme, that they are wicked below the wicked, and as wicked zeolots towards lions that in everything that is lions they have commited wrong to do what lions do not, that they pervert everything of lions that they are missing every mark and doing everything wrong like one who skips over the right stones to land upon every evil, that these are below the wicked in wickedness, and are the servants of the wicked, for they rebel more against God than them, that they even fall below animals. Now the angel has loved the woman who has had wisdom concerning lions and even the righteous, and he has been blessed by him who had much wisdom concerning the kingdom of heaven, that these two are not as the other scribes who are kings and queens, but have gone a level higher.
Now the human man who is seeming to view the pretty man as woman as if confused, for he does what is honourable towards woman but not acceptable to men to men, this one who believes the pretty man to be woman is sick of heart and mind because he could not tame jelousy and did not have might of understanding that he compromised to the struggle to make his heart ignorant that his jelousy might not rage within him. Now this one must be removed, for he is not desiring men, but has forced his heart to be ignorant, and yet he is not deceived. 
Now the incompetent exercists of demons are the lower priests who have gone out from Babel, who are the priests of Babylon, and they are for afflicting those who have demons or who do not, for the vast majority do not, and they are for afflicting them with their hearts of malice, with their incompetence to do much for them, and they have aided some, and such is true, but they aid them with much incompetence, for Babel does not have enough understanding and knowledge, that they might be slow and they might afflict many in dispicable and incompetent ways, so that better is the one who brings a false exorcist who does incompetence quickly and then departs and leaves the sick person in peace. Better is the one who does not cause them to be detained where there is little ability to aid them and heal them, than the priests of Babylon.
Now the integrity of a man is not sowing discord between men and women, but the one who supports to sow discord is villian and scoundrel, for he boasts of himself indirectly, and yet is a false teacher without understanding who guides people into prisons, who would lead them out of palaces to be slaves in the field under burning heat where there is little water, who teaches what is not wise, who leads into places of scorpions and cracked rocks.
Now the king who arose in our land that was a place by Ria was not supporting what he claimed to support only he fell below that of ur in that he hated men and this was his only support that it was an enemy of what he would support. Now being a weasel in childhood he was attacked by one who did not hate the righteous so that because he did not repent and all his other failings he was as a person of obedience to those who came as ambassadors for matters of the nation, and when this was added, he did not fullfill to his people, being flaccid and hateful of those he would govern, because a leader of men and women must be righteous. Now having betrayed those who were indidgenous and having never been for those he supported he gave support to those poor who were paid by the government if they were sick. Now these were the only saved from the fire of chaos that was brought upon the nation and the only set aside to be spared even if many escaped.
Now the kings of Israel are not dieties that are to be worshiped and you direct prayer to God.
Now the known and unknown gang of real men, more men than David, haters of David, is a gang of Orgoth’s servant, having not joined the gang, when jelous being instead real men, when not men being real men, that these are servants of the devil, killers of those in the Great War who are the Lord’s, real men and Ahabs and the servants of Orgoth’s servant, held up to an insolent place by the cause of being real men when their cause is falling from men.
Now the known and unknown gang of real men, more men than David, haters of David, is a gang of Orgoth’s servant, having not joined the gang, when jelous being instead real men, when not men being real men, that these are servants of the devil, killers of those in the Great War who are the Lord’s, real men and Ahabs and the servants of Orgoth’s servant, held up to an insolent place by the cause of being real men when their cause is falling from men.
Now the lake of fire is betraying God’s people to do the bidding of Orgoth, and even the animals are not doing so, but there are more animals when there is Babylon it seems.
Now the lake of fire is betraying God’s people to do the bidding of Orgoth, and even the animals are not doing so, but there are
 more animals when there is Babylon it seems.
Now the large spider is drinking the life of Enochs and seeking followers who are giving loyalty for she is most able to prey on the Enoch women to drink the life from them and yet she hates the Enochs, the men included, and she is hesitant to do anything to the very young males for she has said, they will  slay me if I do so, and yet she will prey upon the very young who are women, for she is not afraid. Now the spider begins early to spin its web even for the young who are women, and yet it is very hard at this time for her to drink their life-blood, their spirit, out of them because of their age for she cannot take them but must leave them most often. For the life-blood of the young women is protected by the integrity of God, for they are too young to know and the protection is strong. Now when she condemns what is good, what is right by God, to judge and condemn any, she is seeking to crush and kill, for the spider does not always require that one should go into its web to be numb to the drinking of life from them.
Now the levels of a person’s actions are their type whether they speak and commit works spiritually or whether they speak and carry out deeds, that some are at different levels, and those who are for much action and they are evil are physical soldiers, that their evil deeds do not require much to bring them to it. Now the one who is of justice and is with the one whose level is of innocence of deed if not of mouth, that justice knows what the extent of patience is for them who are not as much of deed. Now the one who acts out wickedness and evil and do so as if sport with no reason of instigation as if they were not of comprehension but were like animals of impulse in what is required for them to do wickedness and evil, than these things are of hell, and they are clothed in hell-fire that laughs with perversity and folly and is fed with iniquity, and they are drenched with iniquity and if blood is there it is bloodshed, that these are things of hell that is beneath life that truth and justice might cleanse from the Earth because what is done on land must be cleansed on land and what is done inside can be cleansed inside that the body might not have to delt with, and it not being a matter for others to judge or know. Now what is done inside is not wrong only it can be wrong before God, that it is only for God to be able to judge or know. Now if any sins on land, that is upon the Earth of land, and they shed blood than the Jews have answered that the Earth is made well by shedding the blood of them who killed on land if it was murder. Now if unholy actions are speaking as if meddling in what is sacred do they not commit blasphamy and profane on land? Now those who will blaspheme and profane on land are beholden to the Earth of Land that they are being what is true among society and in their role for what they are, to be known for what they are. Now if they are to be wicked on the Earth of land and beholden to that world than let their hands not also follow after it, for the hands of such a rebel should be clean that he will be clean in a fashion, that he is not also of deeds with his hands and feet. Now if he is clean than it might be he is not the enemy but he does not wish to be among the holy ones, that if he does not commit that which is harassment truly than by what justice of God do you have right to harass him? But you know what is right and those who commit evil even in our name when we do not consent, when we are not with knowledge of it, are indeed our enemies.
Now the light that is bowed to by many that it causes to bow is drawing sick animals as well that the sick animals must be removed from that place for they are blinded and threatened day and night by the light and it draws things from below ur for it is a bright pillar of light upon Ocean and Land.
Now the light that is bowed to by many that it causes to bow is drawing sick animals as well that the sick animals must be removed from that place for they are blinded and threatened day and night by the light and it draws things from below ur for it is a bright pillar of light upon Ocean and Land.
Now the lost tribes are come to greatness and Babylon has fewer people and yet it wields control that is great from North to South and West to East and yet it does so with a few there and a few there. Now the lost tribes, some, have rebuked the angel while keeping with love, because of the angel’s treacheries, and are they wrong? But the trechories are not of their full knowledge for there is an agent of a kingdom who goes behind enemy lines and back again and he eats and drinks with foreign generals and then is seen amongst his own people. Now what is trechory for them, is it trechory for the angel? But let it be so, for their rebuke is not evil, and they are faithful to God.
Now the lost tribes cannot return because they are found by the Christ, and yet if they can return is it not by the Christ? For He is finding them. Now the nation of non-Jews benifits from them, and my own nation is much concealed sodomites, envious and jelous, even the soldiers of cities who are sodomites, for they share in the rage of the man who desires to be raped by man and participate to enable him. Now animals who are sick have gone out being confused and attacked people to harass for these are practising projection and they are prey of Orgoth’s highest son. Now the servant basking in ease and his own pursuits, does he resist the things of wisdom, that the Lord gives? But who is wiser than God? Now let the Christ’s special servant not be deceived, for he is loving to bow to the sons and daughters and is so because he is much greater, for he is of a higher level and another beyond, than them, and yet another? But he knows the truth, for he is among angels and more in ways, a hidden disciple among you, a reserved one of the Christ. For if he is not seeming one meant to be a slave owner is it not because he has even greater things? But the kingdom should not be divided.
Now the lower priests were promoting the idea that the sick were a burden to their families and to society so that they should be exterminated and yet Babylon had not granted them permission to exterminate and to also kill those who were not sick who had been cast in among them, for the devil is wanting to kill all humanity if he can. Now in the places where the sick were having to visit there were brutal and hurtful signs that claimed that they were a burden and unwanted by their families, for the priests were hating them, and there were foolish and wicked women among the sick to discourage them. Now fathers who abused were pardoned and encouraged as if good men who had done well and they were welcomed into a city of support for them, that they did well in their abuse, for the sick were claimed by the city of the priests to be a burden.
Now the male animal has complained much about the female animal, that he brings complaint before what are not animals, and the angel is still child and cannot answer for God. Now the angel does not commit this folly to answer.
Now the man fullfilling is on the level third and he is fullfilling all of a man in deed and internally that he is in the fullness of a man, so that the teenager is not required to fullfill it to be a man, and the child is not required. Now those transforming to desease in the land are perished and come back to life for them, being death, as a desease because they failed so far in the fulfillment of a man that they perished and returned as desease. Now if desease has come from the corpse that has died of its own account than such desease is gathering a taking more to be desease that is already perished of its own account that deases might attack the people of light, even the angels, who are to resist it.
Now the man of justice, is he a pillar or a door? For I grow impatient with the Jews, and cannot disobey in this thing. But let me tackle a Jew, a strong man who is not aware of my approach. For as they have been unaware so a man of one of these I am willing to tackle and wrestle a little.
Now the man of justice, is he a pillar or a door? For I grow impatient with the Jews, and cannot disobey in this thing. But let me tackle a Jew, a strong man who is not aware of my approach. For as they have been unaware so a man of one of these I am willing to tackle and wrestle a little.
Now the man who keeps the 10 commandments, what evil is happening to him? But if Babylon is on land will the Lord protect him if the devil spreads out cowards? Now the devil, would he not say to Jews, but I only attack your brother that you might possess all, your own and his, after I have slayn those who had their portion? Now if your heart says it, is it not foolishness? But if Orgoth’s highest son wipes out in layers than will the devil not also attempt it in general? But if any is inclined to be more of a man rather than a man who is a Jew, than has he not abandoned Moses? But such is a sick version of righteousness that is for wickedness, and it is not stated but spoken like others already know of it without explaining. Now if their heart says, I go to slay the righteous and all know why, and yet by truth it is foolishness and madness.
Now the man, Babylonian is beneath the woman of the Lord’s and she does not have cause for fear with amazement when a soldier of the devil’s is coming to slay her. For she is the Lord’s and with strength a woman is righteous by righteousness that she shows herself the Lord’s.
Now the mouth of any in your city that says to another I am better or superior to you is speaking a lie because such is found in the mouths of very young children and in those older it is the truth of one who is base with wickedness, that they are not of a heart to be one of the people, but they are resenting all the people
 and are there as an enemy and to sow discord between the Elsnon. Now let them depart that wickedness not spread and continue for if they came new they came with the heart of an enemy to deceive and betray trust. But let there be no knowledge of any shade in this matter unless you should degrade into inequalities of base and physical things of Ria. But let it not also be so as not to sow discord. For the wicked who do this come like a splinter that ripples out and says I will only swallow the one you are jelous of, that I will rid you of your need for righteousness that more might fall to wickedness and a curse be upon your people. But if another should say, I am superior to you, he has spoken from the heart a lie that is the opposite of truth that he has indeed praised the other because the lie could not stay in to proclaim the truth that it could not be contained. Now this is a spiritual truth that is of Mala that the truth must escape some and the opposite will be said by the spirit because the opposite says ‘much’ to what was said, giving more amount to what was said. Now is there not still injustice? But if one is so lower than the other than the people should not, for the kingdom’s sake, fail to acknowledge what the truth is when they know it. Now if any should treat such things like a game because of the knowledge they have been given, that this is low and dispicable you having understanding in all things know the truth no matter what has occurred or been said in any circumstance that you consider.
Now the multitudes kept coming to Jesus, and He was the Christ, so that he became exhausted and went to the boat that He might have rest and the angel thought of Him, you are greater than I, and will I, too, have need of being saved by you who commands me and gives me what I have, that my power is yours and with it I would defend you, because I am at times not capable of defending myself. So as they came to you more in their goodness they are good and I am not able to perform to a level to meet such good and so let it be that goodness will continue and the angel will be known for what he is and not more, but does any expect the angel to take anything like that which would belong to a messiah to bear? For there is a greater ability but do they claim more is there because of it? But there have been some who have come to greatness by their sacrifices and suffering for God. Now for these I will yield a little because their words are with true substance of deeds that belong to God, and how will I contend if I should attempt to go over the limit to do injustice?
Now the multitudes kept coming to Jesus, and He was the Christ, so that he became exhausted and went to the boat that He might have rest and the angel thought of Him, you are greater than I, and will I, too, have need of being saved by you who commands me and gives me what I have, that my power is yours and with it I would defend you, because I am at times not capable of defending myself. So as they came to you more in their goodness they are good and I am not able to perform to a level to meet such good and so let it be that goodness will continue and the angel will be known for what he is and not more, but does any expect the angel to take anything like that which would belong to a messiah to bear? For there is a greater ability but do they claim more is there because of it? But there have been some who have come to greatness by their sacrifices and suffering for God. Now for these I will yield a little because their words are with true substance of deeds that belong to God, and how will I contend if I should attempt to go over the limit to do injustice?
Now the multitudes kept coming to Jesus, and He was the Christ, so that he became exhausted and went to the boat that He might have rest and the angel thought of Him, you are greater than I, and will I, too, have need of being saved by you who commands me and gives me what I have, that my power is yours and with it I would defend you, because I am at times not capable of defending myself.
Now the nation is prosperous but when the crises comes, not being strong, the whole of it collapses, for a great crises was not required. Now if trust-worthiness was lacking it collapsed, for by lack of integrity by loyalty it could not withstand the wind and collapsed, and many perished under its roof. Now another nation is strong but it had a great problem with money and the whole of its strength collapsed in on itself. Now another nation was strong but its leader was seen as an interloper and traitor and the people rose up and overthrew the nation. Now the foolish govern as those who tighten their grip when they should open their hand that such is one who applies more force when they are not capable. Now the simple, who is wanting simplicity is being insolent less they learn, for they stand where they do not belong, and they break with speech and manners where people yield and disagree with with peace, for they answer as a brute soldier whose words threaten force of violence, for they have not been asked and their presence is not welcome, and yet they answer with disruption. Now if there is summary, the simple answer insolent and brutal, but the lips of the wise are gracious. For they are not humble, and they are not entertaining self-correction, for they are simple, brute force in much, the combat soldier among the peaceful and agreeing, the wicked voice in matters of justice, the mean voice in matters of weight and severity. For indeed they are wicked, for they lack much of those spiritual things that a person has, for much is not considered by their spirit that dwells within them, that they are lesser, not the full measure of person, for even the child has what they do not. Now in greater summary, they are brutal.
Now the nation is prosperous but when the crises comes, not being strong, the whole of it collapses, for a great crises was not required. Now if trust-worthiness was lacking it collapsed, for by lack of integrity by loyalty it could not withstand the wind and collapsed, and many perished under its roof. Now another nation is strong but it had a great problem with money and the whole of its strength collapsed in on itself. Now another nation was strong but its leader was seen as an interloper and traitor and the people rose up and overthrew the nation. Now the foolish govern as those who tighten their grip when they should open their hand that such is one who applies more force when they are not capable. Now the simple, who is wanting simplicity is being insolent less they learn, for they stand where they do not belong, and they break with speech and manners where people yield and disagree with with peace, for they answer as a brute soldier whose words threaten force of violence, for they have not been asked and their presence is not welcome, and yet they answer with disruption. Now if there is summary, the simple answer insolent and brutal, but the lips of the wise are gracious. For they are not humble, and they are not entertaining self-correction, for they are simple, brute force in much, the combat soldier among the peaceful and agreeing, the wicked voice in matters of justice, the mean voice in matters of weight and severity. For indeed they are wicked, for they lack much of those spiritual things that a person has, for much is not considered by their spirit that dwells within them, that they are lesser, not the full measure of person, for even the child has what they do not. Now in greater summary, they are brutal.
Now the next book is called light of the incompletable because it is unable to be completed. It is seperate from The Diary of Lucifer and it’s accompanying books and represents light-infinity that is unable to be completed for it deals with what is in the life realm third and contains the accompanying theories on developed righteousness and good that cause reality to alter when an internal thing is accomplished and submitted righteously to God that He will perform it on the land when a person is a faithful servant to this degree. There God and man become closer in their walking in which they walk almost as close as Enoch did with God so that man is performing and God will respond on land, that such greatness of servitude to God is producing the great servant who is seeming to initiate miracles which are actually done by God, where we rise above the layer of only internal and move to the layer of things produced on land and physically which is greater and the greater level and layer.
Now the next book is called light of the incompletable because it is unable to be completed. It is seperate from The Diary of Lucifer and it’s accompanying books and represents light-infinity that is unable to be completed for it deals with what is in the life realm third and contains the accompanying theories on developed righteousness and good that cause reality to alter when an internal thing is accomplished and submitted righteously to God that He will perform it on the land when a person is a faithful servant to this degree. There God and man become closer in their walking in which they walk almost as close as Enoch did with God so that man is performing and God will respond on land, that such greatness of servitude to God is producing the great servant who is seeming to initiate miracles which are actually done by God, where we rise above the layer of only internal and move to the layer of things produced on land and physically which is greater and the greater level and layer.
Now the official says I pick sides based on loyalty bias that I call Mala-ver being the truth of people not being strict to a specific duty, which being loyal to a duty and strict in it I call Mala-zeve (pronounced: zeva) which is the wearing of the hat for such loyalty. Now if none is putting on mala-zeve robes than there is anarchy
 of tribes that are too numerous to count. Now one says, being harassed and confused, it is the tribe of the North, and another, dealing with the same, it is the tribe of the west, but there are too many tribes to be counted at a time because nothing is being official because none is putting on the robes of mala-zeve. Now if my nation is such is it a nation pleasing God? But the performance of wisdom is the label of a people group.
Now the one Babylon has deemed threat and danger is seperate and for the defence in case of occupation. Now if they are swept up and stolen to fight their own, it is a robbery of the nation. Now give them a liberal place of relaxed freedom among your soldiers that you not waste their talent. For what people are for wasting and wasting more because they waste? But if you make them criminals there will be much waste. Now give them their free space within your soldiers, for to not waste drives out much Babylon. For these dabble in weapons and the making of strange weapons and the removal of strange weapons and they rovv in good ways to do good in invention. Now waste not soldiers and Babylon is lessened, indeed it weakens. But when you are tolerated those strategic in the evil ways of Babylon, who are for lies and lies in politics, that you give these much control who are imposters, then you multiply strength of Babylon and much is failing.
Now the one at the third shelf is coming to dwell on the second where there is land upon the second shelf where she resides and the third shelf is hers and the second called by the name of her brother and sister whose land she is liking that there is forest upon the second shelf where a person can dwell and she is pleased to be closer to her brother and sister. Now do not pity too much the one who does wish to reside on the third shelf, for it is a good for them. As for those who have cast nets and made iron down the mountain on the first shelf, we have need of them, the they agree. Now as one approaches the mountain there are towns and lakes and deep valleys and the deep valleys have opened to the fires and iniquity of hell and perverse animals dwell in those valleys and some things from the first shelf have gone down from there to be perishing and transforming into one of those animals or people of the devil’s, and some have gone down from all the shelves to do such for the height was not good for them to mantain the integrity to dwell upon the shelves. Now Ria has given advantage to Mala in this matter that some are given advantage by luck and chance of birth and yet it is because of the works of Ria and the ignorance of Mala that it is so, and yet the truth I will not lie about even if I am not pleased.
Now the one at the third shelf is coming to dwell on the second where there is land upon the second shelf where she resides and the third shelf is hers and the second called by the name of her brother and sister whose land she is liking that there is forest upon the second shelf where a person can dwell and she is pleased to be closer to her brother and sister. Now do not pity too much the one who does wish to reside on the third shelf, for it is a good for them. As for those who have cast nets and made iron on the first shelf, we have need of them, the they agree.
Now the one being poor is not praising themselves and exhaulting themselves like a wicked man who boasts and speaks wickedness and is poor, and this you have already understand in a hard and inescapable way that you did not fail to understand. Now did the Jews deceive you or you wicked heart to speak injustice in such a way. But the son of the better man who might be despised though he is worthy to have a servant is possessing that which is of kings and queens. Now you blaspheme and profane when you use the scripture in a wicked way.
Now the one condemning the righteous and judging what is righteous is spiritually striking the Christ over the head with a hammer that he is striking to kill, being the hand of the devil’s soldier and the one who has killed the Christ in spirit because they have murdered God’s son in His sight and lifted up their eyes to speak with God, covered in the Christ’s blood the blood of innocence, that the rage of the devil has growled in their mouth to open the mouth of their heart to speak to God, rebellion reviling His house and His son they have killed to speak towards God as they stand neither in hell or heaven but on land that their garments are drenched in blood down to their legs and they are a sight of gore, being hideous and grotesque, that they are brother or sister to the hyena, the vulture, the swarming insects, and those insects that feast upon corpses, that so it is percieved by those who have eyes to see, that the soldiers of the devil are in great rage and anger towards innocence and great violence is in their hearts.
Now the one condemning the righteous and judging what is righteous is spiritually striking the Christ over the head with a hammer that he is striking to kill, being the hand of the devil’s soldier and the one who has killed the Christ in spirit because they have murdered God’s son in His sight and lifted up their eyes to speak with God, covered in the Christ’s blood the blood of innocence, that the rage of the devil has growled in their mouth to open the mouth of their heart to speak to God, rebellion reviling His house and His son they have killed to speak towards God as they stand neither in hell or heaven but on land that their garments are drenched in blood down to their legs and they are a sight of gore, being hideous and grotesque, that they are brother or sister to the hyena, the vulture, the swarming insects, and those insects that feast upon corpses, that so it is percieved by those who have eyes to see, that the soldiers of the devil are in great rage and anger towards innocence and great violence is in their hearts.
Now the one cries to say, I am so jelous that I cry for I did not know you people had learned to speak or even read, and this is meant as disrespect and bullying, for some of the devil’s will go this far. Now another has said, I am very pleased and so much so I am impressed because I did not know that your people could walk or tell when it is morning or afternoon, and this is meant to be disrespect that the person who does so might be despised. Now the later is mother to the former and they go their seperate ways to do their evil.
Now the one cries to say, I am so jelous that I cry for I did not know you people had learned to speak or even read, and this is meant as disrespect and bullying, for some of the devil’s will go this far. Now another has said, I am very pleased and so much so I am impressed because I did not know that your people could walk or tell when it is morning or afternoon, and this is meant to be disrespect that the person who does so might be despised. Now the later is mother to the former and they go their seperate ways to do their evil.
Now the one cries to say, I am so jelous that I cry for I did not know you people had learned to speak or even read, and this is meant as disrespect, for some of the devil’s will go this far. Now another has said, I am very pleased and so much so I am impressed because I did not know that your people could walk or tell when it is morning or afternoon, and this is meant to be disrespect that the person who does so might be despised. Now the later is mother to the former and they go their seperate ways to do their evil.
Now the one exaulting the devil towards saints is exaulting themselves, but neither the devil or the saints are deceived.
Now the one giving an unjust name to something is committing injustice and how great the injustice is measured by what is named.
Now the one not fullfilling obligations to men and God has looked to the left and right with long gazes that he might scorn and meddle without understanding, for those who fall below ur are sometimes scattering to attack because below ur they perish and it is proved by deeds even more than words that if deeds and words are one than they are perished, for the pedophile is below ur and so is the zeolot below ur who meddles with citizens and does not commit to official, political figures and soldiers, being another type of zeolot that they call insurgent. Now the demon has had to pass through two messengers of Ria to be permitted to speak to the angel and is more needed? But the revelation is not made to others for there are nations that have partnered with the devil. Now if a nation should partner with the devil to attack a person of the kingdom than how great those of the kingdom must be. But who has placed their foot on the neck of kings? But Joshua gave his soldiers to do it.
Now the one sacrifices idle enjoyment and debaucheries to be diligent and attain riches and this for even Babylon. Now if one sacrificies foolishness for eternal life and crowns and riches, they are being prudent and Babylon is calling them foolish, and yet do they not know of such prudence themselves?  Now if those of the kingdom are often cast out because of it, than they cannot often reside with Babylon, and so more was required, for the prudence was required to see to a person’s failure of body. Now if God is controlling the Universe, and He is, than He is able to give more, and to chose the better to serve is wisdom, and yet they are choosing Him for reasons that are not known.
Now the one who believes it to be the people’s duty to act out all their wrath and anger because they are displeased is a fool of that sort who sheds blood of innocent people, and let it be remembered that they should be so if any matter arises for such is like a rare breach among people that tells of much foolishness and lack of control, that such a one is only made harmless because it is noted by others what manner of person they are, that should
 it be a man he is believing in murder as a right for any who offend him, and the righteous are offendors to him, and so let neither have no title or ability that it be noted, for the will of the devil should not be done.
Now the one who did not sin gains the kien and yet none has attained it so that to use the kein is injustice because of inherited hypocracy, that we inherit death, but the one with the kein gives life, and the example is the unexplained judgement where explanation is required that the polite and appropriate way is required so as not to commit injustice and wickedness, as opposed to that which is given birth to by sentience when one is of an age and ability to participate.
Now the one who exaults wicked abusers to glorify them with a name that is not truth, that they call them and their actions a name that glorifies them and is sodomy towards the victims of them, the one who does so is them who picks up a spear to run the victims through the stomach, who uses their wickedness to bruise the victim’s skull with a heavy blow, who seeks to mutilate and attacks with great hate, their heart being in the lake of fire, for they are ruled by pedophiles, by the women on land, by Orgoth’s servant, for they speak indirectly of rapes and molestation and physical anguish, for that in the spirit is causing physical pain, that they are chained to the steel bed of the prison rapist who uses a knife and pours disgusting things down their throat, they are pulled down to the place where they chain them and blind them and throw arrows at them, where there they ignite their flesh and peel their skin and mock them, for their heart is in these places, and they speak of those who are for paradise, and so let there be no more time for them, but let them fight soon that they might be thrown into the lake of fire, for unspeakable hate was in their heart and there were no words and no way to describe it. 
Now the one who exaults wicked abusers to glorify them with a name that is not truth, that they call them and their actions a name that glorifies them and is sodomy towards the victims of them, the one who does so is them who picks up a spear to run the victims through the stomach, who uses their wickedness to bruise the victim’s skull with a heavy blow, who seeks to mutilate and attacks with great hate, their heart being in the lake of fire, for they are ruled by pedophiles, by the women on land, by Orgoth’s servant, for they speak indirectly of rapes and molestation and physical anguish, for that in the spirit is causing physical pain, that they are chained to the steel bed of the prison rapist who uses a knife and pours disgusting things down their throat, they are pulled down to the place where they chain them and blind them and throw arrows at them, where there they ignite their flesh and peel their skin and mock them, for their heart is in these places, and they speak of those who are for paradise, and so let there be no more time for them, but let them fight soon that they might be thrown into the lake of fire, for unspeakable hate was in their heart and there were no words and no way to describe it. 
Now the one who has doing charity to the poor man will know the very rare one that is the devil’s begger. For his works are all evil and he is as if poor and miserable that none should judge him because he is one making himself poor intentionally, being a very rare thing. Now if you do not know it, than why regard this thing or take this thing to knowledge seeing as it is good to have charity to the poor. But if the devil has placed even an imposter in this place of good, than you know that his wickedness is entire and complete. But if it is so than God has not matched the devil or the devil God but there are more things of God than of the devil’s to cover for it, that it is well and God’s things are exceeding. But it is good to fullfill righteousness and the Christ fullfilled though if you believe I fullfill all righteousness than you are wrong. But the portion with one thing is to God and the other to Babylon and they are not of Babylon. But have not the cult’s of the devil despised charity unless it is purified from good to be selfish? For the Babylonians purify good things from good that the thing might be clean to them by the standard of the devil’s cult. For God’s things are not all clean to them, and some have hated all the substance and good things of God that they might be clean according to the devil. Now if God’s people are capable of using money in a pure way according to God than the way is considered disgusting and impure to those of the devil’s cults. Now if God’s people would grow anundant with money and riches of God  to built great and rich kingdoms on Earth that are beautiful and filled with glory than so would Babylon and the devil build their kingdoms on Earth to be filled with the glory that is pure to them. Now if any has feared God to say, I fear to outmatch New Jerusuluem than I tell you to try but you will not outmatch eternal life or any of the power and holy creatures in that kingdom for let not the fear of God keep you from good because such fear should be with righteousness to even do God’s work against the fear of angels that you be doing good and be—if I might—good to angels for if you have this righteousness you might be capable of dwelling with angels. But if the amgels are dismayed with any and do good for them, than are they not a great people who are righteous and for whom the angel is to do good when they are dismayed by them? But I will rather dwell with their elders and the ones very wise and holy. Now if I am reminded by one of them of Avram, Abraham, than do I not see that I am liking him in error? But I do not wish to be a burden if I proclaim to another people concerning this one, or to cause them trouble, for I wish that he will have honour on Earth.
Now the one who has doing charity to the poor man will know the very rare one that is the devil’s begger. For his works are all evil and he is as if poor and miserable that none should judge him because he is one making himself poor intentionally, being a very rare thing. Now if you do not know it, than why regard this thing or take this thing to knowledge seeing as it is good to have charity to the poor. But if the devil has placed even an imposter in this place of good, than you know that his wickedness is entire and complete. But if it is so than God has not matched the devil or the devil God but there are more things of God than of the devil’s to cover for it, that it is well and God’s things are exceeding. But it is good to fullfill righteousness and the Christ fullfilled though if you believe I fullfill all righteousness than you are wrong. But the portion with one thing is to God and the other to Babylon and they are not of Babylon. But have not the cult’s of the devil despised charity unless it is purified from good to be selfish? For the Babylonians purify good things from good that the thing might be clean to them by the standard of the devil’s cult. For God’s things are not all clean to them, and some have hated all the substance and good things of God that they might be clean according to the devil. Now if God’s people are capable of using money in a pure way according to God than the way is considered disgusting and impure to those of the devil’s cults. Now if God’s people would grow anundant with money and riches of God  to built great and rich kingdoms on Earth that are beautiful and filled with glory than so would Babylon and the devil build their kingdoms on Earth to be filled with the glory that is pure to them. Now if any has feared God to say, I fear to outmatch New Jerusuluem than I tell you to try but you will not outmatch eternal life or any of the power and holy creatures in that kingdom for let not the fear of God keep you from good, for He was pleased by Babel, because such fear should be with righteousness to even do God’s work against the fear of angels that you be doing good and be—if I might—good to angels for if you have this righteousness you might be capable of dwelling with angels. But if the amgels are dismayed with any and do good for them, than are they not a great people who are righteous and for whom the angel is to do good when they are dismayed by them? But I will rather dwell with their elders and the ones very wise and holy. Now if I am reminded by one of them of Avram, Abraham, than do I not see that I am liking him in error? But I do not wish to be a burden if I proclaim to another people concerning this one, or to cause them trouble, for I wish that he will have honour on Earth.
Now the one who has doing charity to the poor man will know the very rare one that is the devil’s begger. For his works are all evil and he is as if poor and miserable that none should judge him because he is one making himself poor intentionally, being a very rare thing. Now if you do not know it, than why regard this thing or take this thing to knowledge seeing as it is good to have charity to the poor. But if the devil has placed even an imposter in this place of good, than you know that his wickedness is entire and complete. But if it is so than God has not matched the devil or the devil God but there are more things of God than of the devil’s to cover for it, that it is well and God’s things are exceeding. But it is good to fullfill righteousness and the Christ fullfilled though if you believe I fullfill all righteousness than you are wrong. But the portion with one thing is to God and the other to Babylon and they are not of Babylon. But have not the cult’s of the devil despised charity unless it is purified from good to be selfish? For the Babylonians purify good things from good that the thing might be clean to them by the standard of the devil’s cult. For God’s things are not all clean to them, and some
 have hated all the substance and good things of God that they might be clean according to the devil. Now if God’s people are capable of using money in a pure way according to God than the way is considered disgusting and impure to those of the devil’s cults. Now if God’s people would grow anundant with money and riches of God  to built great and rich kingdoms on Earth that are beautiful and filled with glory than so would Babylon and the devil build their kingdoms on Earth to be filled with the glory that is pure to them. Now if any has feared God to say, I fear to outmatch New Jerusuluem than I tell you to try but you will not outmatch eternal life or any of the power and holy creatures in that kingdom for let not the fear of God keep you from good, for He was pleased by Babel, because such fear should be with righteousness to even do God’s work against the fear of angels that you be doing good and be—if I might—good to angels for if you have this righteousness you might be capable of dwelling with angels. But if the amgels are dismayed with any and do good for them, than are they not a great people who are righteous and for whom the angel is to do good when they are dismayed by them? But I will rather dwell with their elders and the ones very wise and holy. Now if I am reminded by one of them of Avram, Abraham, than do I see that I am liking him in error? But I do not believe so. But I do not wish to be a burden if I proclaim to another people concerning this one, or to cause them trouble, for I wish that he will have honour on Earth.
Now the one who has fullfilled to the poor man will know the very rare one that is the devil’s begger. For his works are all evil and he is as if poor and miserable that none should judge him because he is one making himself poor intentionally, being a very rare thing. Now if you do not know it, than why regard this thing or take this thing to knowledge seeing as it is good to have charity to the poor. But if the devil has placed even an imposter in this place of good, than you know that his wickedness is entire and complete. But if it is so than God has not matched the devil or the devil God but there are more things of God than of the devil’s to cover for it, that it is well and God’s things are exceeding.
Now the one who hates all and retaliates against the world is for separating man from woman, for they have been entirely cast out in their heart, for those leading into prison must enter prison, but when a man hates all and retaliates against the world, does he not become tempted to partner with the devil? Now if it is unjust, God is greater than man and woman, that obedience to Him is sufficient for the lie.
Now the one who hopes you are not permitted to do something when it is regarding a parent is being a mocking and wicked servant, but it is not like one in other places when the person is a citizen. Now what do they assume of you? But are they to be mocking or acting the part of a wicked fool? But no child is speaking this way and they have lowered the moral standard so far that demons and those like them are being called children as if it was spiritual, and they are not children. Now this is one strategy and you will know what is right and that you remember not to be destroyed by the consequence of commiting crimes, but if anyone should commit crimes with your flag and attempt to frame you than they are indeed those who commited the crime and the other crime that sought to slander others. Now if any wishes to slander you to portray you as an evil than you are offering truth and you do not have to be ashamed by what has been shown or claimed because you are capable of delivering the truth that the church not be destroyed by the slander of the devil. For if they claim you have offended children, and this is the most common slander, than as you are utterly against such actions, you will know how ignorant and disgusting they are, like base men who mock the holy places. For there are ugly people behind it and is it not like one ugly person who attempts to throw mud upon what is beautiful with their words because their hands are angry to do violence and restrained, or is it not like one who sexually harasses the young virgin in her beauty? But it is an attack on all beautiful people, even those not part of your church. Let the ugly be cast into hell.
Now the one who hopes you are not permitted to do something when it is regarding a parent is being a mocking and wicked servant, but it is not like one in other places when the person is a citizen. Now what do they assume of you? But are they to be mocking or acting the part of a wicked fool? But no child is speaking this way and they have lowered the moral standard so far that demons and those like them are being called children as if it was spiritual and they are not children. 
Now the one who hopes you are not permitted to do something when it is regarding a parent is being a mocking and wicked servant, but it is not like one in other places when the person is a citizen. Now what do they assume of you? But are they to be mocking or acting the part of a wicked fool? But no child is speaking this way and they have lowered the moral standard so far that demons and those like them are being called children as if it was spiritual, and they are not children. Now this is one strategy and you will know what is right and that you remember not to be destroyed by the consequence of commiting crimes, but if anyone should commit crimes with your flag and attempt to frame you than they are indeed those who commited the crime and the other crime that sought to slander others. Now if any wishes to slander you to portray you as an evil than you are offering truth and you do not have to be ashamed by what has been shown or claimed because you are capable of delivering the truth that the church not be destroyed by the slander of the devil. For if they claim you have offended children, and this is the most common slander, than as you are utterly against such actions, you will know how ignorant and disgusting they are, like base men who mock the holy places. For there are ugly people behind it and is it not like one ugly person who attempts to throw mud upon what is beautiful with their words because their hands are angry to do violence and restrained, or is it not like one who sexually harasses the young virgin in her beauty because they desire to do violence? But it is an attack on all beautiful people, even those not part of your church. Let the ugly be cast into hell.
Now the one who hopes you are not permitted to do something when it is regarding a parent is being a mocking and wicked servant, but it is not like one in other places when the person is a citizen. Now what do they assume of you? But are they to be mocking or acting the part of a wicked fool? But no child is speaking this way and they have lowered the moral standard so far that demons and those like them are being called children as if it was spiritual, and they are not children. 
Now the one who is driven to murders when they are jelous, not able to control themselves, is gripped by stubborness and held with tight bonds, for his eyes are forced to look upon the life of another, and he cannot look to his own life, for such a one agonizes and claims grievance, and even some animals are an offence to him, so that he is a thing of mass destruction, a dangerous plague among the people, that he is in the control of the devil.
Now the one who might commit wrong for another, breaking the laws of man, are like the soldiers on Earth and it is done for God, because the soldiers should have performed it and a life must be saved. Now is this one scorned by the righteous? But is it not those of the enemy who are among you who might scorn it? But a friend has been deceived by lies shown and told that they might have wrath when they will understand? But the enemies are in the realm of war and will not accept justice and neither will the soldiers who are traitors. But the soldiers do this thing when it is right and when they must be loyal but they are good will you truly resent them and be against all of them, those who are not traitors? But it is not even good to use profane speech before such soldiers and will you be turning against God when the time has come to return to peace? But always know that not all were traitors and that they too are endangered by those who are wicked that they may have fought far more than you for what is right. Now will you wish them all death? But when there is then peace and a return to peace than more will be gathered to be worshiping God.
Now the one who procures loyalty of good and what gives truth and guides with an open hand is not as one who selects the stumbling and transforms them into animals that are eager to obey and take in ignorance, for they are more zeolous in ignorance than they would have been in truth, and if this is the case than the truth on a matter would have counciled peace, and if any is teaching the abuse of victims they are below ur and those below ur will listen, but men are not deceived. Now if any says do not be a victim and they are, and they are becoming a victim in other things, what can they do differently other than snap bones and mutilate themselves? But the devil is gathering those below ur and men are able to perceive. Now these two things are not acceptable, the making of zeolot animals of any type to go and attack, and the teaching people to abuse victims, that both are of Orgoth, and both are true of the first and second.
Now the one who provides is greater, but ingratitude is found with ignorance. Now one cannot give when they are jelous for the Elsnon is greater than them. Now another cannot give because it is not right to be doing so to the prince without the father’s permission. Now the one who cannot do even the right thing
 because of jelousy is shattered from head to foot for they are not worthy even of another’s feet. Now self-control saves one’s substance and soul from God’s wrath, that He might be pleased and bless, but who can know what God will do? Now they give evil for good, they are not concerned for well being, and they refuse to profit greatly from you, for do they not hate you? Now you are greater than them that they are not worthy.
Now the one who takes serious things seriously has said, I am not your device to be used as a weapon when you have with-held knowledge so that if you ever use me in that way I will be back for you because justice has demanded it. But before this happens reveal more and all and be fearing God because I am in these matters answering to God directly and no person, that if you are having cause I will repent, but if you are the devil’s I will know by the truth that is in me that the judgement of God’s man is with God, and it is not with him who is not God’s for he will be wicked to you and chaotic in many directions, because he reasons selfishly that he is not concerned for any but has pretended that he might perceive that some did not know he pretended. But of those who take serious what is serious even the wicked of hard criminals who are being more respectful in this way. But as for those who wine and display that they are Luke-warm and without fear of God they are children deprived of wisdom by their fathers and they are cast into Luke-warm folly as if it were a people group that they have been done this to and not knowing and not choosing it. Now if a child is not prepared by their father and then cast into the wilderness what is it? But pity is for them.
Now the one who trains a dog to bite a child is not without guilt but the child even who obeys God is one who is obeying the parent.
Now the one who trembles for another’s safety and feigns great fear when another walks or lifts water that they might drink is a servant of the devil’s and though they use rillet and pervisity of righteousness they are a disgusting and wicked thing. For these attempt to frighten and make generally afraid that they might pervert concern to smother that they might attack what is God’s and does not the child sit on the hill and God, the father says, watch what I do in battle to the enemy? But let them scream in pain from hell and their agonies not be heard when the one they would abuse dwells in Paradise with the holy.
Now the one who would do that which causes torture before death of another, using combat acting to do so, is that person you cannot be ignorant of. For if nothing can be done in truth without compromising the person who was struck that they should endure torture and death than you will thoroughly kill the one who has done this act of cowardess and wickedness and will not heed the words of fools who do not allow it when such is the matter. Now if an animal has gored a person than surely the animal will die to save the life of the person. But if the animals forbid it, they are powerless. For does God give the animals the will to go to war? But the holy people are not all and they are able to do what is right, when God’s hand is in it, that as one was delivered unto the devil to be killed, so you are a holy people able to judge, that men can judge and they are given such authority on Earth if it is God’s will. Now where it is not so, peace will be forced, that evil may cease. For the Earth is dangerous and there should be less violence when people use wisdom and some must be added that peace be greater and that there be less violence upon the Earth. For the angel will not heed the words of a king when God has spoken in truth. Therefore deliver this one unto the devil that they might be killed for they commit what the gentiles do not have a name for.
Now the one who would do that which causes torture before death of another, using combat acting to do so, is that person you cannot be ignorant of. For if nothing can be done in truth without compromising the person who was struck that they should endure torture and death than you will thoroughly kill the one who has done this act of cowardess and wickedness and will not heed the words of fools who do not allow it when such is the matter. Now if an animal has gored a person than surely the animal will die to save the life of the person. But if the animals forbid it, they are powerless. For does God give the animals the will to go to war? But the holy people are not all and they are able to do what is right, when God’s hand is in it, that as one was delivered unto the devil to be killed, so you are a holy people able to judge, that men can judge and they are given such authority on Earth if it is God’s will. Now where it is not so, peace will be forced, that evil may cease. For the Earth is dangerous and there should be less violence when people use wisdom and some must be added that peace be greater and that there be less violence upon the Earth. For the angel will not heed the words of a king when God has spoken in truth. Therefore deliver this one unto the devil that they might be killed for they commit what the gentiles do not have a name for.
Now the one whose heart is wanting to cleanse the land, to drive people off the Earth of the nation, is having their heart concealed from themselves when it is so, and this is the wenherik who drives away people with nagging, excessive control, oppressions, excessive harrassments and molestations, and all various things they do  that their heart brings forth to attack and drive away people from off the Earth, for they are having the spirit of the weherik to protect the land and nature from people, that it is deep in their heart, and what is the cause? But they are having heart for purity of nature, for cleansing all that is not purity of nature. For they arm themselves with weapons of rillet, of many weapons, and they go out in the world to wage their attacks in protection of nature, for they are beautiful women, many, and warriors in defence of nature, for their tribe is nature, is the Earth, and where they are brought forth from is not known to the angel.
Now the one whose heart is wanting to cleanse the land, to drive people off the Earth of the nation, is having their heart concealed from themselves when it is so, and this is the wenherik who drives away people with nagging, excessive control, oppressions, excessive harrassments and molestations, and all various things they do  that their heart brings forth to attack and drive away people from off the Earth, for they are having the spirit of the weherik to protect the land and nature from people, that it is deep in their heart, and what is the cause? But they are having heart for purity of nature, for cleansing all that is not purity of nature. For they arm themselves with weapons of rillet, of many weapons, and they go out in the world to wage their attacks in protection of nature, for they are beautiful women, many, and warriors in defence of nature, for their tribe is nature, is the Earth, and where they are brought forth from is not known to the angel.
Now the one whose heart is wanting to cleanse the land, to drive people off the Earth of the nation, is having their heart concealed from themselves when it is so, and this is the wenherik who drives away people with nagging, excessive control, oppressions, excessive harrassments and molestations, and all various things they do  that their heart brings forth to attack and drive away people from off the Earth, for they are having the spirit of the wenherik to protect the land and nature from people, that it is deep in their heart, and what is the cause? But they are having heart for purity of nature, for cleansing all that is not purity of nature. For they arm themselves with weapons of rillet, of many weapons, and they go out in the world to wage their attacks in protection of nature, for they are beautiful women, many, and warriors in defence of nature, for their tribe is nature, is the Earth, and where they are brought forth from is not known to the angel.
Now the one whose heart is wanting to cleanse the land, to drive people off the Earth of the nation, is having their heart concealed from themselves when it is so, and this is the wenherik who drives away people with nagging, excessive control, oppressions, excessive harrassments and molestations, and all various things they do  that their heart brings forth to attack and drive away people from off the Earth, for they are having the spirit of the wenherik to protect the land and nature from people, that it is deep in their heart, and what is the cause? But they are having heart for purity of nature, for cleansing all that is not purity of nature. For they arm themselves with weapons of rillet, of many weapons, and they go out in the world to wage their attacks in protection of nature, for they are beautiful women, many, and warriors in defence of nature, for their tribe is nature, is the Earth, and where they are brought forth from is not known to the angel.
Now the one whose heart is wanting to cleanse the land, to drive people off the Earth of the nation, is having their heart concealed from themselves when it is so, and this is the wenherik who drives away people with nagging, excessive control, oppressions, excessive harrassments and molestations, and all various things they do  that their heart brings forth to attack and drive away people from off the Earth, for they are having the spirit of the wenherik to protect the land and nature from people, that it is deep in their heart, and what is the cause? But they are having heart for purity of nature, for cleansing all that is not purity of nature. For they arm themselves with weapons of rillet, of many weapons, and they go out in the world to wage their attacks in protection of nature, for they are beautiful
 women, many, and warriors in defence of nature, for their tribe is nature, is the Earth, and where they are brought forth from is not known to the angel.
Now the owners of great wealth who are few, are called zetorin and they have not yet, being before the sign has passed Earth, used the actions of zeolots against humanity to be known by humanity, for the knowledge is dampened to nothing, for to pay the scavenger dogs who attack with hope of reward, being the scavenger-dogs, is considered terrorism when it is against the artist or messengers of Ria, and in other cases as well, and it is considered so by the governments so that the war is restrained and made possible by the governments who support one side and then support another, that the war is kept to some things but does not become more and it is made possible in this way. Now restraints to combat are breached by some and hindering others and Babylon has breached much and has cast away almost all restrictions.
Now the owners of great wealth who are few, are called zetorin and they have not yet, being before the sign has passed Earth, used the actions of zeolots against humanity to be known by humanity, for the knowledge is dampened to nothing, for to pay the scavenger dogs who attack with hope of reward, being the scavenger-dogs, is considered terrorism when it is against the artist or messengers of Ria, and in other cases as well, and it is considered so by the governments so that the war is restrained and made possible by the governments who support one side and then support another, that the war is kept to some things but does not become more and it is made possible in this way. Now restraints to combat are breached by some and hindering others and Babylon has breached much and has cast away almost all restrictions.
Now the parent will be blessed by God because of the child who obeys God, and yet if the parent is determined to divorce them spiritually, that is divorcing the blessing than how much more might the obedient be blessed? But should a parent drive away like a charging bull than so is the divorce granted that those determined to be free are made free and a loving God will gather His child. Now if God is giving rewards than will I tell of what He does as if I could know? But who knows the Lord except the son and if I am tenderly loved I am commanded by Him. But there are stars in the sky and by what means I do not know, but David’s sword is with him and he has his sandels, a wipe at his wast, and the stars are over the sky in the night. Now his horn is also with him. 
Now the peasant has said we judge you because you have made us jelous, that we have incorporated this as an addition to our morality, and we revile you and hate you because of what is, because you are like a god to us, who makes us miserable, and it should not be. For one is a farmer, the other a shop-keeper, another a banker or dentist, and we all have labour and choirs to our sorrow and burden on Earth, and you come to us like a god to reign in splendour and afflict us with misery. For what is a poor peasant to bring you that would appease you. My daughter is in school and I work hard, and what more can I give to you for your pecense like a god requires it from my hand and I have no more to give so that my heart accuses me to misery because I am not adequate to give you more good as you should be given. Now for the sake of mercy, I have attacked you in defence because I could bear no more and was not well in mind anymore, and can I be blamed? But I am only a man and you are like a god. What can man do in this world but work hard and attempt to accomplish and hope there is something left over after the gods have had their fill. —And the man wept in a heart of innocence because of the misery and sorrow of life. Now the one like a god had compassion and did not blame him.
Now the peasant has said we judge you because you have made us jelous, that we have incorporated this as an addition to our morality, and we revile you and hate you because of what is, because you are like a god to us, who makes us miserable, and it should not be. For one is a farmer, the other a shop-keeper, another a banker or dentist, and we all have labour and choirs to our sorrow and burden on Earth, and you come to us like a god to reign in splendour and afflict us with misery. For what is a poor peasant to bring you that would appease you. My daughter is in school and I work hard, and what more can I give to you for your pecense like a god requires it from my hand and I have no more to give so that my heart accuses me to misery because I am not adequate to give you more good as you should be given. Now for the sake of mercy, I have attacked you in defence because I could bear no more and was not well in mind anymore, and can I be blamed? But I am only a man and you are like a god. What can man do in this world but work hard and attempt to accomplish and hope there is something left over after the gods have had their fill. —And the man wept in a heart of innocence because of the misery and sorrow of life. Now the one like a god had compassion and did not blame him.
Now the people who are the devil’s have wanted it both ways unless they should become just and with integrity, but those exaulting themselves when they are jelous of another to throw mud has given their answer.
Now the person was given wisdom and said, I will do differently from now on, and the devil told them, you may do as before and I tell you with wisdom that it is not right to do differently, for wisdom I give, and the person did differently for a time and then when the time came they listened to the devil and did as before. Now twice they did the wrong thing, committing the same error twice, and yet they had repented.
Now the person was given wisdom and said, I will do differently from now on, and the devil told them, you may do as before and I tell you with wisdom that it is not right to do differently, for wisdom I give, and the person did differently for a time and then when the time came they listened to the devil and did as before. Now twice they did the wrong thing, committing the same error twice, and yet they had repented.
Now the person who cannot answer anything truthfully and directly has a disease. For there is no fear or danger and yet they answer with lies and softening of truth.
Now the poisoned Christians desecrate the sacred and desecrate the Lord’s and the Christ’s territory, and they desecrate with their lips what is private, to speak of the holy in ways desecrating. For they are with rillet, bitter, stiff necked, stubborn, and some in the lake of fire, for their ears are deaf to rebuke from land and man. Now the dog-dragon has horns to gore and it is behaving like dog and goring and desecrating territory, and calamitous and rebellious with eyes of a hard dragon against the holy woman who greets it and is disturbed and then endangered, for her heart perceives the danger, for it is not mere dog. Now should not a man kill it to put her at ease? But given opportunity it will lash out suddenly with opportunity to kill the man, and yet man is not afraid of it for he is of greater ability than it, but it can kill him for the creature is homicidal. Now it is not mere dog but a filthy and murderous dragon.
Now the power was divided and the kingdom took from Babel and prior Babel had no gold and yet they built with defences and yet enemies infiltrated and planted ignorance with clay, that such was the building that it was on neutral territory. Now the sons of the mountain in hell boasted and attempted to claim Babel and at the words of Lucifer they heard when they were not permitted and stirred at what came to them through their messengers of Ria that they might rebel with fire and iniquity and the false gold of the second shelf, refined by filthy fire. Now if the kingdom has permitted the lower priests to go from Babel and into the lower towns they have given them little as power, in fact it is considered nothing by wisdom, that even that they could not use well and with wisdom, that even that would be taken from them. For such priests were not required to have anything by the gold that adorned Babel, and yet the angel did not know if they were stubborn in their apathy and would be wicked, showing that they were wicked, and immediately remove the gold, tearing it off and down, or if they would please God, to be like Jews.
Now the praise that is like the attack of love arrow and love swords of women is not sexual harrassment and there is no danger if something slips, for the evil is not with love, and restraint is not required or forbidden.
Now the prince and son are both cast out because they are worthy, being for the Lord’s inheritance, and if the angel is not even welcome what can be said? But Babylon was not worthy of them and the noble ones have roamed the streets in search of places to stay, and lamps are in the streets to light the way of the noble, and the heavens are over those who are for kings and queens, that shadows flicker there and they are upon the Earth, their feet upon what is below them entire, so as to know that  God is with them as they are going forth at night. So then let riches support riches and those who have sacrificed have more and abundantly, and let the doors be opened for them and they be recompensed by God more than they lost. For the kingdom is greater than Rome and Egypt combined and greater than Babylon and it comes and crushes Babylon beneath it, indeed it hovers over it.
Now the prince and son are both cast out because they are worthy, being for the Lord’s inheritance, and if the angel is not even welcome what can be said? But Babylon was not worthy of them and the noble ones have roamed the streets in search of places to stay, and lamps are in the streets to light the way of the noble, and the heavens
 are over those who are for kings and queens, that shadows flicker there and they are upon the Earth, their feet upon what is below them entire, so as to know that  God is with them as they are going forth at night. So then let riches support riches and those who have sacrificed have more and abundantly, and let the doors be opened for them and they be recompensed by God more than they lost. For the kingdom is greater than Rome and Egypt combined and greater than Babylon and it comes and crushes Babylon beneath it, indeed it hovers over it.
Now the prince and son are both cast out because they are worthy, being for the Lord’s inheritance. But Babylon was not worthy of them and the noble ones have roamed the streets in search of places to stay, and lamps are in the streets to light the way of the noble, and the heavens are over those who are for kings and queens, that shadows flicker there and they are upon the Earth, their feet upon what is below them entire, so as to know that  God is with them as they are going forth at night. So then let riches support riches and those who have sacrificed have more and abundantly, and let the doors be opened for them and they be recompensed by God more than they lost. For the kingdom is greater than Rome and Egypt combined and greater than Babylon and it comes and crushes Babylon beneath it, indeed it hovers over it.
Now the realm of criminals is lower and no slave owner can come from there for they have sold the object in their hand and the buckle for their shoe to be gathering as criminals.
Now the realm of philosophers is as if not part of this world, and they are not able to even wrestle with such using that of the realm, much less do combat. Now there are things brought out of that realm that are of use in combat and communication, for the other world of philosophers is benefiting and is erasing itself, that matter is destroyed in this realm to pure light and light is brought out to be formed to matter, for it is a place of destruction and then reforming that what is to be sent in is not pure and what is brought out to be pure, that this is one way the philosophers are offering useful benefit. But do they not consider themselves useless?
Now the realm of philosophers is as if not part of this world, and they are not able to even wrestle with such using that of the realm, much less do combat. Now there are things brought out of that realm that are of use in combat and communication, for the other world of philosophers is benefiting and is erasing itself, that matter is destroyed in this realm to pure light and light is brought out to be formed to matter, for it is a place of destruction and then reforming that what is to be sent in is not pure and what is brought out to be pure, that this is one way the philosophers are offering useful benefit. But do they not consider themselves useless?
Now the representatives on Earth, like ambassadors, are being the kings and queens of Mala who exist in the plain of Mala, and the servants are humans upon Earth who are representatives on Earth of groups of people. Now the villains are the devil’s tribes on Earth, and the heros are the Lord’s, and the kings and queens they followed being what they are with. Now the servant of Ester is the soldiers of the city who are Babylon, and the Jews would not bow because they are servants who are not to be bowed to. Now Cain is the devil’s and he is the tribe of those who are murderers who condemn righteousness because of jelousy. Now Enoch is predessesor to other nations and the Lord took him because he walked closely with God. Now the nation of Cain is not given by the angel, but Cain is representative of a type of wicked. Now those who give Cain that he is representative are of the realm of Cain. Now the realm of Noah is having that which is the realm of the whole Earth, even of hell, even of the realm of criminals. Now Joseph has those who succeed on Earth, and he is saving with prudence that he saves. Now the angel is child and wisdom is always much larger than him, and yet there is the red star by Babel’s name which swallows the dead star that has died, that the star does not age the same. Now Babylon should be devoured because it destroys itself and those within it and yet the star that poisons itself the Satan has not thought to devour.
Now the second shelf of Orgoth is perverting righteousness and justice and is rebellious, for they are like sick animals over sick animals, for the highest son takes sick animals and the middle son takes sick animals to hell, that neither are permitted to attack or denigrate people. Now the highest son acknowledges nature and the middle son of Orgoth perverts religion and justice to take sick animals who attack those who are spiritual, and yet neither is permitted to attack people. Now neither son has had servants that have not done unreasonably and foolishly, for the servants of both sons have exceeded their domains, and those taking sick animals who attack spiritual people have not taken those dangerous to people but those who caused no offence and were not a danger to spiritual people, and the highest son was obnoxious and presumptuous, for he sought to establish the wrong things on Earth when he arose from hell as a beast with armies. Now he arose and the middle son, was he not with him? But respect of domains must be.
Now the second shelf of Orgoth is perverting righteousness and justice and is rebellious, for they are like sick animals over sick animals, for the highest son takes sick animals and the middle son takes sick animals to hell, that neither are permitted to attack or denigrate people. Now the highest son acknowledges nature and the middle son of Orgoth perverts religion and justice to take sick animals who attack those who are spiritual, and yet neither is permitted to attack people. Now neither son has had servants that have not done unreasonably and foolishly, for the servants of both sons have exceeded their domains, and those taking sick animals who attack spiritual people have not taken those dangerous to people but those who caused no offence and were not a danger to spiritual people, and the highest son was obnoxious and presumptuous, for he sought to establish the wrong things on Earth when he arose from hell as a beast with armies. Now he arose and the middle son, was he not with him? But respect of domains must be.
Now the second shelf of Orgoth is perverting righteousness and justice and is rebellious, for they are like sick animals over sick animals, for the highest son takes sick animals and the middle son takes sick animals to hell, that neither are permitted to attack or denigrate people. Now the highest son acknowledges nature and the middle son of Orgoth perverts religion and justice to take sick animals who attack those who are spiritual, and yet neither is permitted to attack people. Now neither son has had servants that have not done unreasonably and foolishly, for the servants of both sons have exceeded their domains, and those taking sick animals who attack spiritual people have not taken those dangerous to people but those who caused no offence and were not a danger to spiritual people, and the highest son was obnoxious and presumptuous, for he sought to establish the wrong things on Earth when he arose from hell as a beast with armies. Now he arose and the middle son, was he not with him? But respect of domains must be.
Now the servant of another is resenting bowing to him of another house, and yet there is cause when it is so. Now who is him who loves to bow to all sons and daughters of God’s house, but is he not special servant of the Christ? Now the least are sometimes the most, and who can say what great things the Lord does?
Now the servant of another is resenting bowing to him of another house, and yet there is cause when it is so. Now who is him who loves to bow to all sons and daughters of God’s house, but is he not special servant of the Christ? Now the least are sometimes the most, and who can say what great things the Lord does?
Now the sick person of correction of the spirit which needs time is for being left alone that it might be well, for they go outside the camp, outside the people and return when they are well. Now the person does so but the sick animal is made to bother people and harass and charge and gore. Now no medicine can help either, but they have said, we do clear opposite of sentience to cure the spirit with what is a thing for religion and God, for by making complicated and with grande and enduring deceptions, we make doing the clear opposite of right a thing we can do to their people, for we are traitors and Babylon.
Now the sick person of correction of the spirit which needs time is for being left alone that it might be well, for they go outside the camp, outside the people and return when they are well. Now the person does so but the sick animal is made to bother people and harass and charge and gore. Now no medicine can help either, but they have said, we do clear opposite of sentience to cure the spirit with what is a thing for religion and God, for by making complicated and with grande and enduring deceptions, we make doing the clear opposite of right a thing we can do to their people, for we are traitors and Babylon.
Now the sign of spiritual desease is desease of Ria, and it is shown to be evil, and when the desease is plague do they not speak of it and warn the people? Now if your body cannot easily resist a plague than how will your spirit? But the spirit responds with fever that is considered to be sickness by the Babylonian priests, and it responds with pain, that is treated by the priests for the priests of Babylon say, fever is the sickness and pain is the injury, and the spirit responds with many things when there is sickness and the response is called sickness. Now by compassion,
 by justice, you remove what makes sick, and yet the priests attack the person with what they believe, for they say, dip yourself in the pool five times and eat the herb ground with salt, and come to the priest every two moons, and yet their evil is in truth far more than that.
Now the slaves profane themselves and are not aware for they cannot seem to injure themselves with much of what is bad for people. Now they even profane themselves to bully and there is no injuring themselves. They are mean but not aware of it and brutal. Now they bully as if the reason was war when there is no war. Now if as much of a third or even two thirds are meant to be slaves than are not animals also petitioning for nature. For people have taken much from nature and the axe has devoured entirely in places that it is not good. Now if Jews and Christians have salt is it cause for taking more than is good to salt the Earth and grind it dead twice over? But Moses gave commands for ceasing what should not be exceeded. Now too much salt is seeming bitter and harsh and yet neither the Jews or Christians go without it. Now does salt lend any to going to war for no reason that a little later there are a multitude of reasons and yet one chooses one thing and another chooses another. Now will any kill prophets because of harshness as if judgement is not required but only the impulse is required? Now who is without any judgement and thinking in doing justice? But this is the accusation towards some, that such are accused of not being truly people.
Now the slaves profane themselves and are not aware for they cannot seem to injure themselves with much of what is bad for people. Now they even profane themselves to bully and there is no injuring themselves. They are mean but not aware of it and brutal. Now they bully as if the reason was war when there is no war. Now if as much of a third or even two thirds are meant to be slaves than are not animals also petitioning for nature. For people have taken much from nature and the axe has devoured entirely in places that it is not good. Now if Jews and Christians have salt is it cause for taking more than is good to salt the Earth and grind it dead twice over? But Moses gave commands for ceasing what should not be exceeded. Now too much salt is seeming bitter and harsh and yet neither the Jews or Christians go without it. Now does salt lend any to going to war for no reason that a little later there are a multitude of reasons and yet one chooses one thing and another chooses another. Now will any kill prophets because of harshness as if judgement is not required but only the impulse is required? Now who is without any judgement and thinking in doing justice? But this is the accusation towards some, that such are accused of not being truly people.
Now the soldiers of cities who are Babylon are for only defending those of hell where there is crime, that they will not defend those who are God’s and His are not permitted by them to do justice, for those crimes they are against, but they are not much against the crimes of those who are the devil’s for they support hell. Now those upholding justice are not Babylon but are the soldiers of cities who are the nation’s that they show loyalty to God by upholding the people in keeping justice, that they do not betray the nation.
Now the son obeyed but would not massacre the village of the innocent, but the servant obeyed all and was blameless.
Now the son obeyed but would not massacre the village of the innocent, but the servant obeyed all and was blameless.
Now the sons of Orgoth are wanting to place their servants in Babel especially and yet men have never been deceived, less they be found guilty, not being deceived by Babel or anything that has mixed foolishness with truth, that men are not deceived by that from Babel that is not true, and are not opening their mouths to have pointless vexation with those who would be deceived many times. But men have known of God and the truth since the beginning that they have offered deceptions since the beginning from Babel and religions so that there has not been excuse for them when they have done foolishness. Now if Babel is giving cause to do hurt and perversity to what God has made right than men are not deceived by the people below ur who would molest and violate in such a way not in keeping with integrity, but commiting that which is outrageous. For understanding does not go four provinces in one direction and then leap back ten provinces in the opposite direction, so you may know what direction they were going in.
Now the sons of Orgoth build small towers of lies that they use for false knowledge when carrying out their wars, and these are insignificant in size compared to Babel. The towers are in hell and are offensive to many. These towers I have called kappits and their construction can be simple or complex.
Now the spread of good things, of truth and good things that infect and spread and even spread among the people and go out in great waves and spread among the people, these I have called insha-inil and insha for short. For there are insha-rel which goes out in great ways among the people and insha-len which goes to one person, and there is the sending out of light that gives light to God’s people and can attack evil, that I have called neither. Now Babel goes forth without far sight ahead for it is for building larger and cannot cease, so that the sight of how to use Babel is for others, that the understanding of governing is not offered by Babel for if such houses are to be made into stone and clay it is not good, and so there could be houses in the future close to Babel, by a path, and kept close, but seperate from Babel. For one house is fair, of fair stone, another dark, of dark stone, and there is even some gold and silver. For both are houses of strategy, of the strategy of governing, of sound principles and wisdom, of peace, judgement, compassion, integrity, and those things that are for the height of a throne.
Now the spread of good things, of truth and good things that infect and spread and even spread among the people and go out in great waves and spread among the people, these I have called insha-inil and insha for short. For there are insha-rel which goes out in great ways among the people and insha-len which goes to one person, and there is the sending out of light that gives light to God’s people and can attack evil, that I have called neither. Now Babel goes forth without far sight ahead for it is for building larger and cannot cease, so that the sight of how to use Babel is for others, that the understanding of governing is not offered by Babel for if such houses are to be made into stone and clay it is not good, and so there could be houses in the future close to Babel, by a path, and kept close, but seperate from Babel. For one house is fair, of fair stone, another dark, of dark stone, and there is even some gold and silver. For both are houses of strategy, of the strategy of governing, of sound principles and wisdom, of peace, judgement, compassion, integrity, and those things that are for the height of a throne.
Now the standard of ur and being above or below is different for each shelf of Orgoth, and those going to the first shelf are sometimes risking their lives. Now the servant is even for some in criminal gangs.
Now the standard of ur and being above or below is different for each shelf of Orgoth, and those going to the first shelf are sometimes risking their lives. Now the servant is even for some in criminal gangs.
Now the strange and confusing rituals and actions of the pedophile are a perverse marvel of strange confusion to those who are not of them. Now with tentative nature they commit wickedness and strange animal like wisdom is found in them that their low needs and requirements are understood among them, that they are animals and such is a knowledges among them, each to each. For the one had said, I am threatened and require to perform some act with my arms and legs, and the other, I am made afraid and must go to a place and behave some way. For they seem tentative at times, even nervous, but their low impulses pull at them in their hearts where animals convince each other and understand. I must dominate, he says and I go to fullfill my need for my guilt. I am I’ll another says and so I must intimidate. For they are strange beasts of cruelt even and uncertainty and they use medicines on humans and kidnap them and they slander, attempt to kill, and cry in wrath and even in self pity. For they have said, all our ways are wise and are prudent for the Ocean is our only lodging where we have been cast. Now their places are in Babylon as part of many of the devil’s cults, and they are worshiping in pride the desecration and destruction of others. For they walk in meekness at times and other times in ways of violence and strength that such is considered insolent for them, because what is beneath the Ocean is not men to men who dwell above the surface, if the cause of it is the molestation of children, but to other matters men are pardoning much and not judging as much, because God has placed the Ocean where it is and how it is.
Now the strange and confusing rituals and actions of the pedophile are a perverse marvel of strange confusion to those who are not of them. Now with tentative nature they commit wickedness and strange animal like wisdom is found in them that their low needs and requirements are understood among them, that they are animals and such is a knowledges among them, each to each. For the one had said, I am threatened and require to perform some act with my arms and legs, and the other, I am made afraid and must go to a place and behave some way. For they seem tentative at times, even nervous, but their low impulses pull at them in their hearts where animals convince
 each other and understand. I must dominate, he says and I go to fullfill my need for my guilt. I am I’ll another says and so I must intimidate. For they are strange beasts of cruelt even and uncertainty and they use medicines on humans and kidnap them and they slander, attempt to kill, and cry in wrath and even in self pity. For they have said, all our ways are wise and are prudent for the Ocean is our only lodging where we have been cast. Now their places are in Babylon as part of many of the devil’s cults, and they are worshiping in pride the desecration and destruction of others. For they walk in meekness at times and other times in ways of violence and strength that such is considered insolent for them, because what is beneath the Ocean is not men to men who dwell above the surface, if the cause of it is the molestation of children, but to other matters men are pardoning much and not judging as much, because God has placed the Ocean where it is and how it is. Now if these are cacooning being that they are iscolating themselves to be with their own type to become deaf to the rebuke of those outside the group and even blind to rebuke, than they speak with vague gestures about the killing of children and support each other with proclamations void of understanding. They have even spread ignorance among themselves with which they become confident and strong, for with some of them the hand must be confident to shed blood. Now if one of them is slayn than they require blood to pay for it, but one not of them is slayn they call it justice because they have said the child or adult, both being the same in the matter of death, sought my life and I have done no wrong, for the child or adult would slay me with truth and it is the same to murder me, by which them being killed is justice. For they have appealed not to morality, which is truth and reason, but they have appealed to a nihilism that is set aside for animals. For being under the Ocean they are a strange type of animal not meant for the Ocean. For people they once were and yet their lungs still draw breath and they are hating those who would kill them and labelled them blood-thirsty slaughterers of the innocent.
Now the strange and confusing rituals and actions of the pedophile are a perverse marvel of strange confusion to those who are not of them. Now with tentative nature they commit wickedness and strange animal like wisdom is found in them that their low needs and requirements are understood among them, that they are animals and such is a knowledges among them, each to each. For the one had said, I am threatened and require to perform some act with my arms and legs, and the other, I am made afraid and must go to a place and behave some way. For they seem tentative at times, even nervous, but their low impulses pull at them in their hearts where animals convince each other and understand. I must dominate, he says and I go to fullfill my need for my guilt. I am I’ll another says and so I must intimidate. For they are strange beasts of cruelt even and uncertainty and they use medicines on humans and kidnap them and they slander, attempt to kill, and cry in wrath and even in self pity. For they have said, all our ways are wise and are prudent for the Ocean is our only lodging where we have been cast. Now their places are in Babylon as part of many of the devil’s cults, and they are worshiping in pride the desecration and destruction of others. For they walk in meekness at times and other times in ways of violence and strength that such is considered insolent for them, because what is beneath the Ocean is not men to men who dwell above the surface, if the cause of it is the molestation of children, but to other matters men are pardoning much and not judging as much, because God has placed the Ocean where it is and how it is. Now if these are cacooning being that they are iscolating themselves to be with their own type to become deaf to the rebuke of those outside the group and even blind to rebuke, than they speak with vague gestures about the killing of children and support each other with proclamations void of understanding. They have even spread ignorance among themselves with which they become confident and strong, for with some of them the hand must be confident to shed blood. Now if one of them is slayn than they require blood to pay for it, but one not of them is slayn they call it justice because they have said the child or adult, both being the same in the matter of death, sought my life and I have done no wrong, for the child or adult would slay me with truth and it is the same to murder me, by which them being killed is justice. For they have appealed not to morality, which is truth and reason, but they have appealed to a nihilism that is set aside for animals. For being under the Ocean they are a strange type of human not meant for the Ocean. For people they once were and yet their lungs still draw breath and they are hating those who would kill them and labelled them blood-thirsty slaughterers of the innocent.
Now the strange and confusing rituals and actions of the pedophile are a perverse marvel of strange confusion to those who are not of them. Now with tentative nature they commit wickedness and strange animal like wisdom is found in them that their low needs and requirements are understood among them, that they are animals and such is a knowledges among them, each to each. For the one had said, I am threatened and require to perform some act with my arms and legs, and the other, I am made afraid and must go to a place and behave some way. For they seem tentative at times, even nervous, but their low impulses pull at them in their hearts where animals convince each other and understand. I must dominate, he says and I go to fullfill my need for my guilt. I am I’ll another says and so I must intimidate. For they are strange beasts of cruelt even and uncertainty and they use medicines on humans and kidnap them and they slander, attempt to kill, and cry in wrath and even in self pity. For they have said, all our ways are wise and are prudent for the Ocean is our only lodging where we have been cast. Now their places are in Babylon as part of many of the devil’s cults, and they are worshiping in pride the desecration and destruction of others. For they walk in meekness at times and other times in ways of violence and strength that such is considered insolent for them, because what is beneath the Ocean is not men to men who dwell above the surface, if the cause of it is the molestation of children, but to other matters men are pardoning much and not judging as much, because God has placed the Ocean where it is and how it is. Now if these are cacooning being that they are iscolating themselves to be with their own type to become deaf to the rebuke of those outside the group and even blind to rebuke, than they speak with vague gestures about the killing of children and support each other with proclamations void of understanding. They have even spread ignorance among themselves with which they become confident and strong, for with some of them the hand must be confident to shed blood. Now if one of them is slayn than they require blood to pay for it, but one not of them is slayn they call it justice because they have said the child or adult, both being the same in the matter of death, sought my life and I have done no wrong, for the child or adult would slay me with truth and it is the same to murder me, by which them being killed is justice. For they have appealed not to morality, which is truth and reason, but they have appealed to a nihilism that is set aside for animals. For being under the Ocean they are a strange type of animal not meant for the Ocean. For people they once were and yet their lungs still draw breath and they are hating those who would kill them and labelled them blood-thirsty slaughterers of the innocent.
Now the strong hand of Babylon is sorcery not deceiving those who have eyes to see. Now the spirits are kings of Babylon and some kings are thinly layered among other places that they are cast out by purity towards God. Now when they are cast out the hands and feet are washed, and the nations are more than listed for God is harbouring places from west to east and east to west that his might draws up with great might as if with ease, to lift a continent out of heavy sand, for His might is such that it increases as He lifts that His strength goes to more strength for He has more might to spare. Now He lifts with ease. Now the continent rises and mountains break through and sprout and He beats back their enemies and sends curls of fire before them. Now the castles break forth and with walls and palaces and fortresses and the army marches forth and tramples.
Now the strong hand of Babylon is sorcery not deceiving those who have eyes to see. Now the spirits are kings of Babylon and some kings are thinly layered among other places that they are cast out by purity towards God. Now when they are cast out the hands and feet are washed, and the nations are more than listed for God is harbouring places from west to east and east to west that his might draws up with great might as if with ease, to lift a continent out of heavy sand, for His might is such that it increases as He lifts that His strength goes to more strength for He has more might to spare. Now He lifts with ease. Now the continent rises and mountains break through and sprout and He beats back their enemies and sends curls of fire before them. Now the castles break forth and with walls and palaces and fortresses and the army marches forth and tramples.
Now the strong hand of Babylon is sorcery not deceiving those who have eyes to see. Now the spirits are kings of Babylon and some kings are thinly layered among other places that they are cast out by purity towards God. Now when they
 are cast out the hands and feet are washed, and the nations are more than listed for God is harbouring places from west to east and east to west that His might draws up with great might as if with ease, to lift a continent out of heavy sand, for His might is such that it increases as He lifts that His strength goes to more strength for He has more might to spare. Now He lifts with ease. Now the continent rises and mountains break through and sprout and He beats back their enemies and sends curls of fire before them. Now the castles break forth and with walls and palaces and fortresses and the army marches forth and tramples.
Now the sword is not two edged to attack the righteous and the wicked, and the house of God knows that the Lord’s ways are better on Earth.
Now the ten tribes were lost from the Jews and yet they are still, for they dwell in the mountains, in forest, in houses among many peoples, that they are gathered because of morality, that they exist like Job, like a people who are finding a great reward, for in many cases, are they not blessed? Now they are blaspheming God against evil, against the devil, and some are praising God and enduring through as they all endure through. Now these are kept seperate from you, and yet they are among the people and giving strength to the kingdom of Heaven, even if they deny the kingdom.
Now the teraunosorus rex is not as the other dragons, for among dragons who are warm blooded, who are predators, he is as a majestic thing and dangerous exceedingly, for the crown is visible and the barrels of riches are in his possession, and danger and fear are going out from him in majestic message of him and her who are tauranosaurus rex, who is upon Earth to be a thief towards theives and the wicked who are thieves, that they are dangerous and yet praised by many of the Enochs with reservation, for he and she is a dangerous dragon.
Now the the devil’s it is one thing and they are agreeing, and to those of truth it is what it is in truth, and harmless or offensive, and to animals, who will say? But the false teachers were the only not fearing God when the angel was dwelling after the desert and the rest were spiritual and demanding truth about what they were and what the angel was, even to the angel’s vexation, because of the disorder that David’s son knew of, and the angel too knows of it, and yet the mixing of much has created much disorder and error, and wives said, yet you offend me and endanger me with God, and there was even some vexation and yet the angel has loved, and men said, this is an outrage, and there was vexation, because they feared God, and they were of Mala, and those of a place with many gods were in much fear and anxiety because of the truth, that much was not right, for they have been a people of Mala. Now the angel was taught a lesson and even rebuked by the people with many gods, for they were in much respect of Mala, so that they took seriously what is serious. Now the false teachers were as Babylonians amongst Israel that is not circumsized, and this is close to where the angel resided, and the servants of Babylon who would be as rovving servants to do evil as for reward when not wanted or asked for, they were empty of understanding towards the angel, being blind and unknowing, not respecting God, that is not fearing Him, and neither of these two were like the people with many gods, and so it was hard to find much Babylon with the people with many gods. Now I the angel has said, you have feared God more than I the angel, to the people with many gods.
Now the thing terum, the righteous king and the righteous queen, both of mighty ability and righteousness and kindness, the queen being for righteousness for God’s house as it is among the terum.
Now the third shelf of Orgoth has produced the doctrine of themselves of killing the sick because they are weak, and the old because of weakness, and the struggling because they have been victims, and the poor because of weakness, and the disabled because of weakness, and the teenager because of angst, and the compassionate because of mercy for weakness, and the mourning because of weakness, and the sick because of maladies of the mind because of weakness, and all that is deemed weak, not brutal even, is hated because of weakness, that they are strong and stronger than a man that they allow no weakness and seek to kill all that is weak, that the fire of strength is a part of The Flame of Belshaur that is to cleanse the land.
Now the three sons of Noah say, let the Lord be God, and we fear Him. Now Orgoth says, let us fight what God does and eliminate great threats to the devil, and Orgoth’s servant is most commited to this and the second less commited as is the third or the son of the third shelf. Now Noah is kept above ur even when it was raised so that none should survive save his house and the animals who were blameless because the animals are not having the capacity for which to be judged with guilt, for they are given no choice in being animals. Now because of the obedience of one man the world is able to be saved from bodily destruction, and because of the obedience of God’s son the world is able to be reaped of those worthy of eternal life. Now to offer protection the rebels are on Earth that you might know when the mystery of God is revealed that after this, it has been written, then Christ is coming. Now those who use rillet are for the fire when they are wielding it consistently for the devil, and these are servants of Orgoth, for all manner of the devil’s soldiers are emerging from Orgoth if the true core of the sons there is known. Now six are to one son and six to another and six to the third. Now these sons are the spirits found in a man that are not good, and the man who has the fullness of these sons is the completion of Orgoth, being the lord of Orgoth. 
Now the three sons of Orgoth help to build Babylon when they exceed their domain, but the light from Ijeshil is attempting to destroy much of their power.
Now the translations of much scripture has caused even the angel to grapple and fight a little, for the lies have been placed and the translations are made sometimes by those who hate God and the Christ. Now the rebelling angels were throwing themselves down to serve the devil, to go after what is foolish, and some of them abandoned their rule and palaces and abandoned them as if worthless, which is close to unspeakable, and they did so to rebel against God, casting away what is good for what is the devil’s like one throwing away eternal salvation, but with less excuse, and they throw it away to serve the devil. Now those who did so have already done so. But those who did so are already having rebelled and the angels remaining have not done so, for those foolish rulers who abandoned their palaces to go after types of foolishness and to rebel against God, are not to be among you, for they are removed. But one is giving knowledge and another is offering consideration, for those who rebelled at Korah are upon Earth, and their minds do not keep consistency for they mingle belief with non-belief. Now the angel is commanded by the Christ, and the servant of the Christ is His servant. Now there have even been placed things about what is possibly mastadons, and I have offered consideration that this may not be the worst evil people have delt with, and yet such can be Jews and non-Jews, for these strike me as those who are so because of the luxuries of the time, because they are rich by a way. Now if another, being zeolots, are attacking Christians and are those without homes who are not worthy of sympathy because of their deeds and gain, than I would compare them to Orgoth’s servant, for if they are worthy to be swallowed by the Earth, they already have been, and as for dreamers, those day-dreaming are not mentioned, but it is those corrupt with warped hearts, who sin against their own lives with their speech, who defile others with their warped words that are incoherent and below the line of reason as if honesty that is not true and is perverse as if more than drunk and dreaming. But others are not defiled, for some are understanding many ways of defence. Now if their mouths are like crushing stones coming down upon each other and up and then sideways, like that of a cave that has hard walls that move like a beast, then you do not let yourself be taken into its jaws but there are a large variety of ways to avoid evil. Now take instruction from a child angel, one who stumbles and learns, because you might not dwell in the camp where such is learned, and yet some do. 
Now the translations of much scripture has caused even the angel to grapple and fight a little, for the lies have been placed and the translations are made sometimes by those who hate God and the Christ. Now the angels, I am understanding, we’re throwing themselves down to serve the devil, to go after what is foolish, and some of them abandoned their rule and palaces and abandoned them as if worthless, which is close to unspeakable, and they did so to rebel against God, casting away what is good for what is the devil’s like one throwing away eternal salvation, but with less excuse, and they throw it away to serve the devil. Now those who did so have already done so, and so there by speaking such, are some not already coming close to blasphamy? But those who did so are already having rebelled and the angels remaining have not done so, for it is more for others to say, and yet it is acceptable from one, because he gives knowledge, and yet he confesses with his words that they are not to abandon their rule, for those foolish rulers who abandoned their palaces to go after types of foolishness and to rebel against God, are not to be among you, for they are removed, and it is not a matter to mention because it has already happened, and is it for
 man or woman to mention? But one is giving knowledge and another is offering consideration, for this that is mentioned is a thing of knowledge in passing that is not concerning men and women, for those who rebelled at Korah are upon Earth, and their minds do not keep consistency. Now one offers wisdom for saints, another for prudence concerning war and peace and matters of wisdom, for he has written that God defends you. Now the angel is commanded by the Christ, and the servant of the Christ is His servant. Now there have even placed things about what is possibly mastadons, and I have offered consideration that this may not be the worst evil people have delt with, and yet such can be Jews and non-Jews, for these strike me as those who are so because of the luxuries of the time, because they are rich by a way. Now if another, being zeolots, are attacking Christians and are those without homes who are not worthy of sympathy because of their deeds and gain, than I would compare them to Orgoth’s servant, for if they are worthy to be swallowed by the Earth, they already have been, and as for dreamers, those day-dreaming are not mentioned, but it is those corrupt with warped hearts, who sin against their own lives with their speech, who defile others with their warped words that are incoherent and below the line of reason. But others are not defiled, for some are understanding many ways of defence. Now if their mouths are like crushing stones coming down upon each other and up and then sideways, like that of a cave that has hard walls that move like a beast, then you do not let yourself be taken into its jaws but there are a large variety of ways to avoid evil. Now take instruction from a child angel, one who stumbles and learns, because you do not dwell in the camp where such is learned.
Now the translations of much scripture has caused even the angel to grapple and fight a little, for the lies have been placed and the translations are made sometimes by those who hate God and the Christ. Now the rebelling angels were throwing themselves down to serve the devil, to go after what is foolish, and some of them abandoned their rule and palaces and abandoned them as if worthless, which is close to unspeakable, and they did so to rebel against God, casting away what is good for what is the devil’s like one throwing away eternal salvation, but with less excuse, and they throw it away to serve the devil. Now those who did so have already done so. But those who did so are already having rebelled and the angels remaining have not done so, for those foolish rulers who abandoned their palaces to go after types of foolishness and to rebel against God, are not to be among you, for they are removed. But one is giving knowledge and another is offering consideration, for those who rebelled at Korah are upon Earth, and their minds do not keep consistency for they mingle belief with non-belief. Now the angel is commanded by the Christ, and the servant of the Christ is His servant. Now there have even been placed things about what is possibly mastadons, and I have offered consideration that this may not be the worst evil people have delt with, and yet such can be Jews and non-Jews, for these strike me as those who are so because of the luxuries of the time, because they are rich by a way. Now if another, being zeolots, are attacking Christians and are those without homes who are not worthy of sympathy because of their deeds and gain, than I would compare them to Orgoth’s servant, for if they are worthy to be swallowed by the Earth, they already have been, and as for dreamers, those day-dreaming are not mentioned, but it is those corrupt with warped hearts, who sin against their own lives with their speech, who defile others with their warped words that are incoherent and below the line of reason as if honesty that is not true and is perverse as if more than drunk and dreaming. But others are not defiled, for some are understanding many ways of defence. Now if their mouths are like crushing stones coming down upon each other and up and then sideways, like that of a cave that has hard walls that move like a beast, then you do not let yourself be taken into its jaws but there are a large variety of ways to avoid evil. Now take instruction from a child angel, one who stumbles and learns, because you might not dwell in the camp where such is learned, and yet some do. 
Now the translations of much scripture has caused even the angel to grapple and fight a little, for the lies have been placed and the translations are made sometimes by those who hate God and the Christ. Now the angels, I am understanding, we’re throwing themselves down to serve the devil, to go after what is foolish, and some of them abandoned their rule and palaces and abandoned them as if worthless, which is close to unspeakable, and they did so to rebel against God, casting away what is good for what is the devil’s like one throwing away eternal salvation, but with less excuse, and they throw it away to serve the devil. Now those who did so have already done so, and so there by speaking such, are some not already coming close to blasphamy? But those who did so are already having rebelled and the angels remaining have not done so, for it is more for others to say, and yet it is acceptable from one, because he gives knowledge, and yet he confesses with his words that they are not to abandon their rule, for those foolish rulers who abandoned their palaces to go after types of foolishness and to rebel against God, are not to be among you, for they are removed, and it is not a matter to mention because it has already happened, and is it for man or woman to mention? But one is giving knowledge and another is offering consideration, for this that is mentioned is a thing of knowledge in passing that is not concerning men and women, for those who rebelled at Korah are upon Earth, and their minds do not keep consistency. Now one offers wisdom for saints, another for prudence concerning war and peace and matters of wisdom, for he has written that God defends you. Now the angel is commanded by the Christ, and the servant of the Christ is His servant. Now there have even placed things about what is possibly mastadons, and I have offered consideration that this may not be the worst evil people have delt with, and yet such can be Jews and non-Jews, for these strike me as those who are so because of the luxuries of the time, because they are rich by a way. Now if another, being zeolots, are attacking Christians and are those without homes who are not worthy of sympathy because of their deeds and gain, than I would compare them to Orgoth’s servant, for if they are worthy to be swallowed by the Earth, they already have been, and as for dreamers, those day-dreaming are not mentioned, but it is those corrupt with warped hearts, who sin against their own lives with their speech, who defile others with their warped words that are incoherent and below the line of reason. But others are not defiled, for some are understanding many ways of defence. Now if their mouths are like crushing stones coming down upon each other and up and then sideways, like that of a cave that has hard walls that move like a beast, then you do not let yourself be taken into its jaws but there are a large variety of ways to avoid evil. Now take instruction from a child angel, one who stumbles and learns, because you do not dwell in the camp where such is learned.
Now the use of iniquitous condemnation is not good for Christians, and those who would sacrifice children to false gods, is one who is gaining from hell what is ignorant. But if any would give bread and water in Christ’s name, is it not good? But those giving good things are to attain from God, when they do it in Christ’s name. Now if any commits some type of wicked violence towards another, even that type fools do not call violence, and do so in Christ’s name and even so in the name of Gentiles and against those who are with God than their way into the kingdom is blocked because they did so in Christ’s name. For this one is servant to them they did wickedness to and the way is granted by their master in this case. Now these are those who became servants because they attempted to trick God. Therefore do not do violence of any type to another in Christ’s name when it is wickedness. But if there is not war for a country it is not good to attempt to trick God, because Cain said to God that his brother had died, and he killed him because God did not like his sacrifice. For do not Babylonians have the same heart? But the one who attempts to trick God is deceived.
Now the variety of realms and there languages makes an animal sick spiritually that it becomes dangerous. Now Babel speaks dog-tongue, the Jews speak the pure language, the Christians, the pure language and the truth that has all wisdom and knowledge, yet they do not know very much and have more of the pure language. Now on the lips of some, their hearts have brought up things of angels and wisdom of angels but they are often using it clumsily. Now let each animal have its own language, for does not Babel have its own, and it mixes. But let each animal have its own language and you do not force it to have knowledge of things of people and other animals for each animal has its own way and obedience that one does not have to do what another does and one is not forbidden from what another is forbidden in. But you are considerate in this thing, for it is so happening upon earth that you do not intervene with harrassment and molestation when they begin to transform after the land of children. Now it is better that those animals not given as slave animals be kept away from people and that people be considerate to keep away from them for the sake of all, for it is unfairness to them, and people are not pleased to harass
 animals, but animals are pleased to do such. Now do you not have that from the serpant of Moses, being the serpant also that an Eagle would covet, that you are knowing what is right for animals. But you are not sacrificing animals anymore because of the Christ, for some give animals as slave animals as atonement for sins to join the Lord’s kingdoms. Now Orgoth’s highest servant is right to be doing its part in this but there is no joining hands with Orgoth, for it is the ongoing war. Now it is the devil’s place and role to do what he does that some do not bring a blasphemous report, for he is constant enemy of man and woman, for he hates enough to sow discord between man and woman, that he hates the woman greatly to do so and fears the man and despised both, for he also hates man because of the fear of him. Now against Babylon you can have nothing from them that is not for their gain, but you gain as it is destroyed. Now if you take permits from it yet there is what you will not take when the time comes, or so the angel has read. Now be considering Alexander the Great and even the three hundred who take the mark of a man by their people’s way. 
Now the variety of realms and there languages makes an animal sick spiritually that it becomes dangerous. Now Babel speaks dog-tongue, the Jews speak the pure language, the Christians, the pure language and the truth that has all wisdom and knowledge, yet they do not know very much and have more of the pure language. Now on the lips of some, their hearts have brought up things of angels and wisdom of angels but they are often using it clumsily. Now let each animal have its own language, for does not Babel have its own, and it mixes. But let each animal have its own language and you do not force it to have knowledge of things of people and other animals for each animal has its own way and obedience that one does not have to do what another does and one is not forbidden from what another is forbidden in. But you are considerate in this thing, for it is so happening upon earth that you do not intervene with harrassment and molestation when they begin to transform after the land of children. Now it is better that those animals not given as slave animals be kept away from people and that people be considerate to keep away from them for the sake of all, for it is unfairness to them, and people are not pleased to harass animals, but animals are pleased to do such. Now do you not have that from the serpant of Moses, being the serpant also that an Eagle would covet, that you are knowing what is right for animals. But you are not sacrificing animals anymore because of the Christ, for some give animals as slave animals as atonement for sins to join the Lord’s kingdoms. Now Orgoth’s highest servant is right to be doing its part in this but there is no joining hands with Orgoth, for it is the ongoing war. Now it is the devil’s place and role to do what he does that some do not bring a blasphemous report, for he is constant enemy of man and woman, for he hates enough to sow discord between man and woman, that he hates the woman greatly to do so and fears the man and despised both, for he also hates man because of the fear of him. Now against Babylon you can have nothing from them that is not for their gain, but you gain as it is destroyed. Now if you take permits from it yet there is what you will not take when the time comes, or so the angel has read. Now be considering Alexander the Great and even the three hundred who take the mark of a man by their people’s way. 
Now the villages of the Enochs are where they are, some at higher places among forest where their wooden houses are, among trees and uneven terrain where there is no concern of flooding by how they are raised, and some in areas where the houses do not have to be raised, and they employ tents and use weapons forged with fire, and they are Enochs who have come from the hedged realm of children, that Enochs did not emerge into the world being found to be dragon or any other creature, and they are with swords and many types of weapons, and they are eating meat and herbs and are of every shade, and it is not good for them to be denying the Christ, for the land is made more tolerable if they are not denying him, for much descends when the Christ is denied. Now the Enochs are different shades and are noble, and are keeping righteousness supremacy. Now their land has more that are not Enochs being dragons and such, than there are Enochs. Now the giant spider will enter the villages even, for the Enochs offer no violence because the spider does not force any to enter her web by violence and if she attacks otherwise it is with condemnation of what is good and righteous and judgement of what is good and righteous. For those who will not enter her web can be attacked. Now the Enochs are noble and the soldiers of Babylon who are in their land are not often being against an Enoch and yet it can occur for Babylon can be trecherous and yet Enochs are considered good citizens of their land, and are usually for giving proper respect to the soldiers, for Enochs are not an unjust and foolish people, for they are supporting the soldiers much because of righteousness supremacy.
Now the who is accused of something when they have been in contention is not be degraded but not accountable, and it is not like one who is called names when the contention is over. Now if any is harassing one with sexual harrassment than they are angry and their hands are angry and seized by violence, although they do not place their hands on any.  Now what manner of anger is this and what was done by another that it came? Do not fail to uphold one who might be in the right when it is not yet known if they commited some great offence against another. But as you uphold women you also uphold men before all is known. You do not act as if you do not believe what they say or you exploit conflict to do evil, and who enters a place of a funeral to harass a widow? But a fool will not be given responsibility if he is saying that what is serious and to be judged or hated is not wrong and is nothing. But such is not yet wise enough for the task. But a person being questioned who is good is like an Entrath when something has happened. Those who have ears to hear let them listen.
Now the wife of a servant is great and it is good, but take not the servant’s word easily that is against the prince.
Now the wife of an angel is free in some things others who are women are not and she is forbidden in some things they are forbidden. Now because of where she is free it is more severe for her to throw herself down, for in what she is forbidden it is far worse. Now who is given more then more is expected, that what falls from a greater height falls much further down than what a woman would fall that what falls from the mountain falls down into hell rather than to the deeper valley for hell is lower. Now she is able to attain things in what is for her that she is not able to descend or come down as the male angels, for the wife of the angel if she is so is attaining and gaining in the domain of a wife of an angel. Now the women, daughters of men, run around her and are capable and wise and she is as if useless as if a foolish woman and yet she cannot be a fool. Now there is no society for her among people to develop and to grow in the wisdom that is for her and only the wisdom of people, going as far as the Jews is available and not what she is requiring. Now she is innocent, innocent more than David, more than Daniel, unable to fight as the daughters, sadly as if unable to survive, for it is a sad thing and we must all feel ashamed. Now what is she to do? The women thought her a child, who could not grow, and they called her spoiled princess, unable to accomplish, and the daughters flirted with her husband as if to steal him and ran quickly about with cunning and ability to fight. Now what is the male angel to do? For it is a sad matter and there is nothing to be done, for will not come down to do as the daughters of men. Now what do your maidens say? But do they respect you? But will they listen or show you mercy? But do they love you? Now is not your husband innocent who cannot stop them? But he is a man is he not? Or some have believed him to be a man for they are not aware of what he is. Now the woman of women of the Island cannot be pardoned for her house is too high and yet she has not stolen anything, and she will not be permitted to be against you, for this is too far, for she is too capable not to be considered seriously.
Now the wife of an angel is free in some things others who are women are not and she is forbidden in some things they are forbidden. Now because of where she is free it is more severe for her to throw herself down, for in what she is forbidden it is far worse. Now who is given more then more is expected, that what falls from a greater height falls much further down than what a woman would fall that what falls from the mountain falls down into hell rather than to the deeper valley for hell is lower. Now she is able to attain things in what is for her that she is not able to descend or come down as the male angels, for the wife of the angel if she is so is attaining and gaining in the domain of a wife of an angel. Now the women, daughters of men, run around her and are capable and wise and she is as if useless as if a foolish woman and yet she cannot be a fool. Now there is no society for her among people to develop and to grow in the wisdom that is for her and only the wisdom of people, going as far as the Jews is available and not what she is requiring. Now she is innocent, innocent more than David, more than Daniel, unable to fight as the daughters, sadly as if unable to survive, for it is a sad thing and we must all feel ashamed. Now what is she to do? The women
 thought her a child, who could not grow, and they called her spoiled princess, unable to accomplish, and the daughters flirted with her husband as if to steal him and ran quickly about with cunning and ability to fight. Now what is the male angel to do? For it is a sad matter and there is nothing to be done, for will not come down to do as the daughters of men. Now what do your maidens say? But do they respect you? But will they listen or show you mercy? But do they love you? Now is not your husband innocent who cannot stop them? But he is a man is he not? Or some have believed him to be a man for they are not aware of what he is. Now the woman of women of the Island cannot be pardoned for her house is too high and yet she has not stolen anything, and she will not be permitted to be against you, for this is too far, for she is too capable not to be considered seriously.
Now the wise consider that they are wanting to return to the land of children before they were transformed to animal, for they are distressed that such has happened and their companions became and remained human, so that it is a thing of sadness for some that it has happened.
Now the wise consider that they are wanting to return to the land of children before they were transformed to animal, for they are distressed that such has happened and their companions became and remained human, so that it is a thing of sadness for some that it has happened.
Now the wise consider, when an animal attacks to denegrate, desecrate, and murder, there is not much thought or reason for it, but it’s anger might be slightly kindled on impulse and there is not always great cause or explanation for it does as animal. Now when it is in great wrath, is it not territorial, or filled with rage as jelousy towards a human, or the uncountable other things the wise might understand? For there are those who are wise who have understanding and they are not pety as animals, but do they not behave with peace, for these are rightful rulers of Babel, rejected by Babylon, too high for imposter leaders, beyond Babel and Ria, and garbed in garments of Mala, existing in mountains among trees in their sacred villages of study and learning, holy people, wise elders, emerging having the best qualities of the peoples who sought wisdom, the true ancient ones who are beyond, elders to the child angel, fellow workers and allies to the angel of Ijeshil, some taking from Babel but beyond Babel in all. For the China of Mala that I call Rellilic has meditated on these in the past, and the Island nation not touched cannot be attacked. Now does any consider Orgoth and the time? But it is a time of tumult when much comes forth, an early time for much. For they come forth and stumble, and the calf is not yet standing.
Now the wise man is having the servant who is wise within him, that the servant is for peace, that he is not despised, but better than many and in a high place among the people, for the lips of the wise are gracious. Now Solomon has this within him, David’s son, as does Joab, and David’s son is participating in making Joab not die, but ascend. Now what does David’s son say? But he says, Do what Joab says to his servant, and Joab ascends where no other man can. Now what does David’s son say, yet he will not let Joab fall because of the attack of the devil.
Now the wise men brought good to the Christ when he was young: wrestling, I assume, laughter, and teachings of understanding. Now the gifts are brought with them as well that Mala be as Ria.
Now the wise of Babel who build blocks of understanding with clay are not erring in their understanding of those men who desire men but do not admit it, for it is not even decent to be noticing if another man is good-looking, and these are angry, furious, with much projections, calling another homosexual because they interpret themselves, them being what they accuse others of, crumbling before beauty, bowing themselves to nothing as they fall and curse another, in rage of desire to be raped as a man by a man who is beautiful, for it can be even worse, for in their rage they are revolting, attacking, behaving strange and attacking in chaotic ways, for they struggle with their lust of a man towards a beautiful man.
Now the wise of Babel who build blocks of understanding with clay are not erring in their understanding of those men who desire men but do not admit it, for it is not even decent to be noticing if another man is good-looking, and these are angry, furious, with much projections, calling another homosexual because they interpret themselves, them being what they accuse others of, crumbling before beauty, bowing themselves down so far as to be nothing as they fall and curse in their lust towards a man, in rage of desire to be raped as a man by a man who is beautiful, for it can be even worse, for in their rage they are revolting, attacking, behaving strange and attacking in chaotic ways, for they struggle with their lust of a man towards a beautiful man.  Now they employ Sodom combat as they struggle in anger to control themselves and they scorn with words about appearances towards the man who is beautiful, for they bow themselves low because of their wickedness, indeed they scorn the threat which causes the anger towards their own lust, for the one who lacks decency in this way is right to be blinded, for he speaks of what he should not notice, that he scorns with Gomorrah, but it is Sodom, that these are those who have great longing as a man to be raped by a man. For some speak as if calm, others charging and raging like furious animals and yet the judgement was for Sodom to be destroyed.
Now the wise of Babel who build blocks of understanding with clay are not erring in their understanding of those men who desire men but do not admit it, for it is not even decent to be noticing if another man is good-looking, and these are angry, furious, with much projections, calling another homosexual because they interpret themselves, them being what they accuse others of, crumbling before beauty, bowing themselves to nothing as they fall and curse another, in rage of desire to be raped as a man by a man who is beautiful, for it can be even worse, for in their rage they are revolting, attacking, behaving strange and attacking in chaotic ways, for they struggle with their lust of a man towards a beautiful man.
Now the wisest were not in Babylon but as if lost by Babylon’s idea of being lost, that the kingdom was not in Babylon but among those considered lost by Babylon, but all were in Babylon and among it and Rome that the two were over the Earth in every direction and Sodom and Egypt was on the Earth and if there were good lands they had disappeared from the angel, for they had killed many and surely they would not do what had been done to others if the angel was sent to be before them, for surely there was righteousness as they claimed that those who spoke of not angering a beyond Earth species were counselling with wisdom that they said, it is better perhaps that we not risk being destroyed. 
Now the woman has respect of persons when the person is male, believing that the man is God, that he can change the truth. The truth is they can, or at least I can. I can do all of that.
Now the woman having given birth to a child not human is sometimes as a grieving bear robbed of her cub, but she is giving birth again. Now if she is distraught and jelous then she is to be comforted. 
Now the woman of the enemy holds herself up by amazement at truth and understanding, as if the truth was lies, and by feigning being the wife of the enemy soldier, as if she knows him, for she calls him by his name, so that by these two things she holds herself up wrongly, with the first or the second or both, that she has dwelt without truth, for she is an enemy soldier who has fought to kill.
Now the woman of the enemy holds herself up by amazement at truth and understanding, as if the truth was lies, and by feigning being the wife of the enemy soldier, as if she knows him, for she calls him by his name, so that by these two things she holds herself up wrongly, with the first or the second or both, that she has dwelt without truth, for she is an enemy soldier who has fought to kill.
Now the woman of the nation is tentative, kind, frightened and yet not with amazement, nervous, yet being loyal, and not claiming what is not, not boasting in an unjust way, but at times charming in such and not a fool, and she is not a whore, as if it would or should be mentioned, and those disloyal have acted against her power, for Babylon is it’s own and is in many nations. 
Now the woman who attacks the man when she is jelous is not a contender to the woman who would have him, for if she would attack the man she has been utterly defeated by the woman who would have him, that she is cast out completely and attacking without goal or reason in desperation and wrath. For her revenge is upon the land of the two, and she says, if you will defeat me this way, so I will kill, but is she not following through with killing because of the restrictions? But she still makes a feeble attempt? 
Now the woman who is the precious stone in the light is not taken as a wife, for she is what cannot be taken for a wife, and she cannot marry any but she is as an Elsnon. Now she will not be taken by any woman, either, and she does not live upon the hill with a statue or have some statue in the valley, for she is the precious stone, the flower of the meadow, and she cannot be married to any man or taken by any woman. She is virteous and beautiful, being pretty, and yet she drifts from place to place and gives herself as she desires. Now what man says, you betray me? For she was not to be taken as wife. For she cannot be married herself, and she is for the meadows, for the beauty, and for the sight of the sons and daughters.
Now
 the woman who is the precious stone in the light is not taken as a wife, for she is what cannot be taken for a wife, and she cannot marry any but she is as an Elsnon. Now she will not be taken by any woman, either, and she does not live upon the hill with a statue or have some statue in the valley, for she is the precious stone, the flower of the meadow, and she cannot be married to any man or taken by any woman. She is virteous and beautiful, being pretty, and yet she drifts from place to place and gives herself as she desires. Now what man says, you betray me? For she was not to be taken as wife. For she cannot be married herself, and she is for the meadows, for the beauty, and for the sight of the sons and daughters.
Now the woman who marvels at the sin of Adam to exault her own folly sins against her own life and speaks against herself, for she holds the truth in her knowledge, the evidence of such truth, and yet she forgets herself, for she has eaten first and Adam was not deceived and he commited such from love and compassion, that she mocks the foolishness of compassion towards women, and she did not eat from compassion.
Now the woman who marvels at the sin of Adam to exault her own folly sins against her own life and speaks against herself, for she holds the truth in her knowledge, the evidence of such truth, and yet she forgets herself, for she has eaten first and Adam was not deceived and he commited such from love and compassion, that she mocks the foolishness of compassion towards women, and she did not eat from compassion.
Now the woman who marvels at the sin of Adam to exault her own folly sins against her own life and speaks against herself, for she holds the truth in her knowledge, the evidence of such truth, and yet she forgets herself, for she has eaten first and Adam was not deceived and he commited such from love and compassion, that she mocks the foolishness of compassion towards women, and she did not eat from compassion.
Now the woman who marvels at the sin of Adam to exault her own folly sins against her own life and speaks against herself, for she holds the truth in her knowledge, the evidence of such truth, and yet she forgets herself, for she has eaten first and Adam was not deceived and he commited such from love and compassion, that she mocks the foolishness of compassion towards women, and she did not eat from compassion.
Now the woman who teaches women anything concerning men is lower than her students that any of them can take all that she has. For she who would come between the woman who is their student and her husband is a servant to her who she would teach.
Now the women who have palaces on the hills have statues among the people that are usually beautiful for they are meant to be beautiful, and yet the angel has said, what are these statues of the same size that are covered in disgust and built to not be beautiful? But he has not judged this thing. Now there are the beautiful daughters who do not live upon the mountains and they have no statue or their statue is small and they are beautiful, and yet some of the women were these and yet now have the house and palace upon the hill and they have the larger statue among the people. Now the wives of a king have said, it is good, when it is of God. For the wives of a king have palaces and statues, and there is a great amount more wisdom to be gotten about this land, but the angel has no judgement towards those in this place and so does not give more wisdom here.
Now the women who have palaces on the hills have statues among the people that are usually beautiful for they are meant to be beautiful, and yet the angel has said, what are these statues of the same size that are covered in disgust and built to not be beautiful? But he has not judged this thing. Now there are the beautiful daughters who do not live upon the mountains and they have no statue or their statue is small and they are beautiful, and yet some of the women were these and yet now have the house and palace upon the hill and they have the larger statue among the people. Now the wives of a king have said, it is good, when it is of God. For the wives of a king have palaces and statues, and there is a great amount more wisdom to be gotten about this land, but the angel has no judgement towards those in this place and so does not give more wisdom here.
Now the world of a dog is smaller that they are not understanding that what they do is pointless when what they do is pointless. Now they are not understanding the ways of humans, Enochs, to know what is their business and what is not. Now there is a giant golden bird that is kind and with love and it’s wings are spread in protection and it even places it’s wings over the angel, and it is for God’s house, that it is protecting and not swooping down to attack, but swooping to protect, to spread its wings, for let the giant golden bird be given more might for when it is greater it is able to protect many. Now it is not Eagle or Hawk, but is of its own. Now they are given comparison to daughters of Sarah, and some of them are, for they are great enough to be human, Enoch, and also the giant bird. Now in her place given to her by God, there are staffs with golden icons at the top of them, and hanging symbols of gold with chains descending from them with icons, and she is given a golden throne, with much gold in it, and chests of treasure filled up with gold, and there is a window on one side that lets in sunlight that shines upon the room and upon her, and there are even cups of gold with jewals. Now the room is her special dwelling reserved for her, that she has this room for her and she is a crown to her husband, a true wife, a daughter of Sarah, and virtue is with her, for the room is as if stepped into by Mala, that the room is going with her, that where she goes, the room is in Mala, for the room does not move.
Now the world of a dog is smaller that they are not understanding that what they do is pointless when what they do is pointless. Now they are not understanding the ways of humans, Enochs, to know what is their business and what is not. Now there is a giant golden bird that is kind and with love and it’s wings are spread in protection and it even places it’s wings over the angel, and it is for God’s house, that it is protecting and not swooping down to attack, but swooping to protect, to spread its wings, for let the giant golden bird be given more might for when it is greater it is able to protect many. Now it is not Eagle or Hawk, but is of its own. Now they are given comparison to daughters of Sarah, and some of them are, for they are great enough to be human, Enoch, and also the giant bird. Now in her place given to her by God, there are staffs with golden icons at the top of them, and hanging symbols of gold with chains descending from them with icons, and she is given a golden throne, with much gold in it, and chests of treasure filled up with gold, and there is a window on one side that lets in sunlight that shines upon the room and upon her, and there are even cups of gold with jewals. Now the room is her special dwelling reserved for her, that she has this room for her and she is a crown to her husband, a true wife, a daughter of Sarah, and virtue is with her, for the room is as if stepped into by Mala, that the room is going with her, that where she goes, the room is in Mala, for the room does not move.
Now the younger generation was pleasing to the eldest and the middle was unruly, mean, and selfish, and the middle displayed unruly behaviour towards youngest who was polite so that they were cursed with the things the middle portrayed them as, and the middle said, you younger are not respectful at us who are the middle, and we are to be your keepers now that you be respecting us. For we will not tolerate your existence anymore because the middle generation gave birth to younger siblings. Now the eldest we’re growing weary and what could be done, for the youngest who knew it became fearful saying, they will destroy us if we attain anything that offends them, and they are not good to us and do it as if God will never know. For there has never been such a generation and they give birth to a generation that is not theirs by some way. For these are a luke-warm and mean generation who is unruly and easily abandoning politeness and drawn to wrath. They are like those giving up all the discipline of their parents and they speak at times as if wicked criminals. Now they have accused and said, the youngest is more these things than I, and yet God has known the truth.
Now them who believe in their concealed heart are not Cain, and they are blessed, for there is the right thing for all people, that much must be fullfilled. 
Now there are a number of groups that one says in their heart, I do not have the might to fight them and so let me bring them into the group, the pack, the troop, the family, which ever thing it may be, that I might be able to mistreat them, for I do not have the strength to contend.
Now there are birds that in speech of people, Jews, say they are dangerous, evil, violent, a threat, even attack them, and they say so of Mohammed’s people when there is discord from the middle son of Orgoth. Now some of these things that say it are birds and others the blasphemy dogs. Now in Babylonian tongue they say it with much more words for it is a tongue for such things and many animals are most often using Babylonian tongue.
Now there are birds that in speech of people, Jews, say they are dangerous, evil, violent, a threat, even attack them, and they say so of Mohammed’s people when there is discord from the middle son of Orgoth. Now some of these things that say it are birds and others the blasphemy dogs.
Now there are birds that in speech of people, Jews, say they are dangerous, evil, violent, a threat, even
 attack them, and they say so of Mohammed’s people when there is discord from the middle son of Orgoth. Now some of these things that say it are birds and others the blasphemy dogs.
Now there are birds that in speech of people, Jews, say they are dangerous, evil, violent, a threat, even attack them, and they say so of Mohammed’s people when there is discord from the middle son of Orgoth. Now some of these things that say it are birds and others the blasphemy dogs.
Now there are dogs of Babel who blaspheme God and people with their speech that is of dogs and animals, for their language is mostly of dogs, and they describe God with things of dogs and people made in his image with the only language they have, and people are not dog or beast, but the beast is dog, and blasphemy comes from them. For the dogs blaspheme and profane with their language for describing animals, that it is from animals as animals describe each other, and they are lead by their language, too low to attain wisdom for wisdom is too high for dogs. So God is too high for many of them, and humans are too high for them, that they would rather the rocks and land cover them and they descend to beasts to escape the light of judgement, for dogs and animals are not judged, they reason, and the comfort of it is better for them.
Now there are dogs of Babel who blaspheme God and people with their speech that is of dogs and animals, for their language is mostly of dogs, and they describe God with things of dogs and people made in his image with the only language they have, and people are not dog or beast, but the beast is dog, and blasphemy comes from them. For the dogs blaspheme and profane with their language for describing animals, that it is from animals as animals describe each other, and they are lead by their language, too low to attain wisdom for wisdom is too high for dogs. So God is too high for many of them, and humans are too high for them, that they would rather the rocks and land cover them and they descend to beasts to escape the light of judgement, for dogs and animals are not judged, they reason, and the comfort of it is better for them.
Now there are exceedingly wise people upon the Earth who can speak of animals and dragons, who know of segregations of speech and what does it and it’s reason, for the mouth is the person and the hands and feet are the person, for what the mouth does is showing the person. Now a viscious animal that is charging continously, is it not the devil’s? But such is a sick animal when it is doing so without reason continously, that the animal does not comprehend time and place, argument, accountability, and other things. For the animal is feeling displeasure at something and saying, it is only attack. For an animal charging has no home, for it abandons home. Now an animal is spying and saying, yet what I can help hearing is an attack upon me. For the animal does not know time and place. Now the one jelous and doing such is sodomite, being a man who desires to be raped by a man, that he should be blinded. Now an animal without a provider is not having accountability, but a person, let none of it be so, for such can only happen to prince, princess and higher to have no home and be person, people. Now the animal not accountable is having accountability level of animal and what is held to a lower moral standard is indeed lower. Now father is higher than son, mother higher than son and daughter, but is the eldest daughter not at a high place and it causes distress. But such is a daughter is loved and yet because of the height there is distress. Now does not the eldest son have the greatest portion and rule the tribe when it is wanted. But some are different. Now Uriah is animal or sodomite and has divorced his wife long prior, and luck has occurred for some who did not know, but fools cannot depend on luck and none can be given permission by me or be loosed. Now the wise men are not bowing to the idol of Babylon and they are not to bow to the angel, but they bow to God, and they do not bow to Babel, and they do not bow to the golden calf which is Babel of the people who waited and grew impatient. Now those who fear God and love are departing from evil to not afflict the wise further, to tell them to bow to the angel, for when they depart, have they really afflicted or sinned? But if some are truly the angel’s it is not as many as it might seem, not most, for honour is not indicating it, and when the angel is gone it cannot be so. Now let the wise consider what they see. But will there not arise those who dwell upon Neptune because of Saturn? Now is not the planet further? But it is right that wise be surpassing me.
Now there are people gifted by God in areas and by objective truth they are the true heirs and the true kings, and some have said, I will add the pass of Babylon to it, and it is well, and yet those who have the pass are not the true heirs and kings and are studying the planet from the lens of another planet while the true heirs and kings live upon the planet and have been there for hundreds and thousands of years, some of them, studying the planet with that understanding of the true heir, for the planet is in another galaxy and though they make lenses big and small they cannot see much and they cannot go there.
Now there are people gifted by God in areas and by objective truth they are the true heirs and the true kings, and some have said, I will add the pass of Babylon to it, and it is well, and yet those who have the pass are not the true heirs and kings and are studying the planet from the lens of another planet while the true heirs and kings live upon the planet and have been there for hundreds and thousands of years, some of them, studying the planet with that understanding of the true heir, for the planet is in another galaxy and though they make lenses big and small they cannot see much and they cannot go there.
Now there are people in prison because they lived and did actions at the level of people, rather than suffer to restrain themselves to commit injustice, to have the circumciscion of Babylon, the animal things of Babel, that they  did things at the level of Jews, of people, and for being people Babylon arrested them and put them in prisons. Now these are not criminals like the criminals in prison, but they are marters in prison, saints, those worthy to be slave owners, that those who condemn them have the voices of servants, even the ones below ur, fickle-girls, having no member of a man, bowing before men who have wielded the sword, who have done deeds in combat under threat of an imposter government that invaded, that their bravery was having to be greater. Now some of the heros are there, mighty men, brave women, who said, I will not let them afflict my brother.
Now there are people in prison because they lived and did actions at the level of people, rather than suffer to restrain themselves to commit injustice, to have the circumciscion of Babylon, the animal things of Babel, that they  did things at the level of Jews, of people, and for being people Babylon arrested them and put them in prisons. Now these are not criminals like the criminals in prison, but they are marters in prison, saints, those worthy to be slave owners, that those who condemn them have the voices of servants, even the ones below ur, fickle-girls, having no member of a man, bowing before men who have wielded the sword, who have done deeds in combat under threat of an imposter government that invaded, that their bravery was having to be greater. Now some of the heros are there, mighty men, brave women, who said, I will not let them afflict my brother.
Now there are soldiers of cities and soldiers of nations and the soldiers of cities who are the nation’s are those not Babylon. Now animals who are sick are in the domain of Orgoth’s highest son, and those who would take Neptune after studying Jupiter that is given by Saturn, are taking something large, that I cannot say what is there for them because it is theirs, for they can set foot on it. Now animals are placing more emphasis on territory and what they claim is their reason is not often their reason. Now animals who drive away are clearing their territory, and they drive away things from the male as if that which comes to him is coming to him in the animal’s territory for they are tearing down tents and small beginnings of constructions and driving away allies and driving away the male who is human, for they are driving at times the male away from woman and it is all to drive things out not welcome that the one they blockade they attempt to drive away for they linger to make uncomfortable and present insolent facade for they are very cowardly and weak and yet diligent to accomplish. Now what is the wise thing to do? But does a person not go to the keeper of the animal that it might be kept well that it does not escape and bother people? But there is possibility of neglect. Now a strong woman has not been afraid in my sight to order away animals that drive away people, for animals are not as strong as her, for she is taller than a dog. Now the woman frightened of dogs need only stay close to others, for let your vision be clear, it is only a stray dog.
Now there are the different types who are men who desire men, that those who are sodomites, being wicked, are not as those who are for righteousness, who are having reputation for kindness, that there is levels and great divide between them. Now those kind and for righteousness are being among the righteous, that those who are sodomites and cruel are for killing them, for those sodomites are not often admitting openly to what they are but are for killing those who are admitting openly. Now the one kind is held to the righteousness of what they are which is of righteousness and it is above ur and above land, that they are
 respecting God, regarding the majority from fear of God, in gratitude and satisfied with what they are having, that these are going in the way of life, for they are receiving honour and there are wise among them. Now to be against sodomites who are sometimes men desiring men, is to defend those who are having such desire who are for righteousness. Now it is also defending all those who are God’s.
Now there are the different types who are men who desire men, that those who are sodomites, being wicked, are not as those who are for righteousness, who are having reputation for kindness, that there is levels and great divide between them. Now those kind and for righteousness are being among the righteous, that those who are sodomites and cruel are for killing them, for those sodomites are not often admitting openly to what they are but are for killing those who are admitting openly. Now the one kind is held to the righteousness of what they are which is of righteousness and it is above ur and above land, that they are respecting God, regarding the majority from fear of God, in gratitude and satisfied with what they are having, that these are going in the way of life, for they are receiving honour and there are wise among them. Now to be against sodomites who are sometimes men desiring men, is to defend those who are having such desire who are for righteousness. Now it is also defending all those who are God’s.
Now there are things that did not have to be concealed that they concealed from habit of upbringing.
Now there are two white lions of silver and white on either side of the throne and the door to the palace is passed through on either side of the white lion. Now the white lion that is before the door is not to defend the palace and the two white lions at the throne are for Babel and learning because gold was given to Babel. Now the gate is covered in silver to Ijeshil and the arrows are silver and metal and the swords are metal and no iron is used for a sword. Now the tree in the court-yard is for the stance against Babylon and the devil and lies placed by the devil when they are passing security in Babel. For Babel is not able to employ infallible security and it is becoming unable to be built when the grip is tightened too much. Nevertheless Ijeshil has made preperations and the tree is representing the angel on a throne with his foot upon the Earth as a foot-stool, for he will remove his foot and it will be not when there is the correct seasons for it not to be, but the tree is for all, for it is a good tree. Now the angel is loving Babel because of word of the signs in the heavens and on Earth and because of the knowledge of nature, and he is loving Babel but he is for making peaceful preparations in the event they should suffer trouble. 
Now there are two white lions of silver and white on either side of the throne and the door to the palace is passed through on either side of the white lion. Now the white lion that is before the door is not to defend the palace and the two white lions at the throne are for Babel and learning because gold was given to Babel. Now the gate is covered in silver to Ijeshil and the arrows are silver and metal and the swords are metal and no iron is used for a sword. Now the tree in the court-yard is for the stance against Babylon and the devil and lies placed by the devil when they are passing security in Babel. For Babel is not able to employ infallible security and it is becoming unable to be built when the grip is tightened too much. Nevertheless Ijeshil has made preperations and the tree is representing the angel on a throne with his foot upon the Earth as a foot-stool, for he will remove his foot and it will be not when there is the correct seasons for it not to be, but the tree is for all, for it is a good tree. Now the angel is loving Babel because of word of the signs in the heavens and on Earth and because of the knowledge of nature, and he is loving Babel but he is for making peaceful preparations in the event they should suffer trouble. 
Now there are women and men not men in what is not, what is below words, for no language can describe for the compromise is translated for it, that all described is as if in a language none can understand for the heart of a man or woman cannot go. For what is is not there that it goes below what can possibly be that it cannot be uttered without lie by pedophile, Orgoth’s servant, or anything above them. For in the lake of fire is that which has no concept of slander, true or false, right or wrong, lie or truth, for lies are truth to those in the lack of fire, that lies are above them, that lies are light and truth is light for there is no difference there. Now every word has power over them whether true or false, whether words of pedophiles or Orgoth’s servant and what is above hell is not even heard by them, for such as anything speaks that is above hell it falls upon deaf ears for they cannot hear it. Now these are becoming inverted from what is the line at the floor of the lowest shelf of Orgoth, and Orgoth’s servant is as a god to them, and yet who can say it and know for there are no words below the line that they cannot communicate for they must crawl up onto the lowest shelf of Orgoth to be able to speak.
Now there are women and men not men in what is not, what is below words, for no language can describe for the compromise is translated for it, that all described is as if in a language none can understand for the heart of a man or woman cannot go. For what is is not there that it goes below what can possibly be that it cannot be uttered without lie by pedophile, Orgoth’s servant, or anything above them. For in the lake of fire is that which has no concept of slander, true or false, right or wrong, lie or truth, for lies are truth to those in the lack of fire, that lies are above them, that lies are light and truth is light for there is no difference there. Now every word has power over them whether true or false, whether words of pedophiles or Orgoth’s servant and what is above hell is not even heard by them, for such as anything speaks that is above hell it falls upon deaf ears for they cannot hear it. Now these are becoming inverted from what is the line at the floor of the lowest shelf of Orgoth, and Orgoth’s servant is as a god to them, and yet who can say it and know for there are no words below the line that they cannot communicate for they must crawl up onto the lowest shelf of Orgoth to be able to speak.
Now there is Babylon, animals, dragons, Gomorites, Sodom’s, Enoch, Jews, Elsnon, Terum, and in general there are remnants of people. Now one group has modelled themselves from the poor and wise and another from the rich and wise and the rich in general. Now one group is looking to Jacob, another to the city, and one to people of forest tribes and another to other tribes.
Now there is Babylon, animals, dragons, Gomorites, Sodom’s, Enoch, Jews, Elsnon, Terum, and in general there are remnants of people. Now one group has modelled themselves from the poor and wise and another from the rich and wise and the rich in general. Now one group is looking to Jacob, another to the city, and one to people of forest tribes and another to other tribes.
Now there is Babylon, animals, dragons, Gomorites, Sodom’s, Enoch, Jews, Elsnon, Terum, and in general there are remnants of people. Now one group has modelled themselves from the poor and wise and another from the rich and wise and the rich in general. Now one group is looking to Jacob, another to the city, and one to people of forest tribes and another to other tribes.
Now there is Babylon, animals, dragons, Gomorites, Sodom’s, Enoch, Jews, Elsnon, Terum, and in general there are remnants of people. Now one group has modelled themselves from the poor and wise and another from the rich and wise and the rich in general. Now one group is looking to Jacob, another to the city, and one to people of forest tribes and another to other tribes.
Now there is Christians, Jews, and Muslims, and then there is Elsnon, Terum, Enoch, and the three later are from Christians. Now the poisoned Christian is supported by the highest and lowest son of Orgoth, for he represents both in Christianity. Now those who fullfill are obeying and those who wait are not always sinning, for they can have fullfillment given to them because of respect and politeness. Now the middle son of Orgoth is sowing discord against them, that he appears as soldiers fighting for, but they attack in front of the city and then flee that the advancing soldiers might slay the citizens. Now is it not wise to consider that the city has not attacked? But Orgoth is enemy to all.
Now there is Christians, Jews, and Muslims, and then there is Elsnon, Terum, Enoch, and the three later are from Christians. Now the poisoned Christian is supported by the highest and lowest son of Orgoth, for he represents both in Christianity. Now those who fullfill are obeying and those who wait are not always sinning, for they can have fullfillment given to them because of respect and politeness. Now the middle son of Orgoth is sowing discord against them, that he appears as soldiers fighting for, but they attack in front of the city and then flee that the advancing soldiers might slay the citizens. Now is it not wise to consider that the city has not attacked? But Orgoth is enemy to all.
Now there is a layer of the shelf that I cannot mention less I go further to explain all, for there is a great book-shelf to be explained and I can not pull from it unless I give all, for one will be truth and yet a lie when not all is given and I have looked into some things from such a book-shelf. Now the insincerities of some to do what is good or acceptable are failing immediately that there is no compliment, and such are shoving and pushing as if friends and yet it is
 no wickedness to slash them with a steel sword. Now if deeds are showing deeds than such cannot be understood without the whole of the unrevealed library and the conclusion, for deeds do not reveal deeds and of curiosities are indulged in than what can be said? But those wicked and mild of Orgoth are making the land unsafe for understanding and wisdom, these plagues of rovving fools that are causing trouble and sorrow, for we will converse above their suffering corpses in hell and not be troubled by them, and yet hope is not for it. For the Earth is holding some things back because of those of the devil’s and even Babylon is right to know it.
Now there is a layer of the shelf that I cannot mention less I go further to explain all, for there is a great book-shelf to be explained and I can not pull from it unless I give all, for one will be truth and yet a lie when not all is given and I have looked into some things from such a book-shelf. Now the insincerities of some to do what is good or acceptable are failing immediately that there is no compliment, and such are shoving and pushing as if friends and yet it is no wickedness to slash them with a steel sword. Now if deeds are showing deeds than such cannot be understood without the whole of the unrevealed library and the conclusion, for deeds do not reveal deeds and of curiosities are indulged in than what can be said? But those wicked and mild of Orgoth are making the land unsafe for understanding and wisdom, these plagues of rovving fools that are causing trouble and sorrow, for we will converse above their suffering corpses in hell and not be troubled by them, and yet hope is not for it. For the Earth is holding some things back because of those of the devil’s and even Babylon is right to know it.
Now there is a layer of the shelf that I cannot mention less I go further to explain all, for there is a great book-shelf to be explained and I can not pull from it unless I give all, for one will be truth and yet a lie when not all is given and I have looked into some things from such a book-shelf. Now the insincerities of some to do what is good or acceptable are failing immediately that there is no compliment, and such are shoving and pushing as if friends and yet it is no wickedness to slash them with a steel sword. Now if deeds are showing deeds than such cannot be understood without the whole of the unrevealed library and the conclusion, for deeds do not reveal deeds and of curiosities are indulged in than what can be said? But those wicked and mild of Orgoth are making the land unsafe for understanding and wisdom, these plagues of rovving fools that are causing trouble and sorrow, for we will converse above their suffering corpses in hell and not be troubled by them, and yet hope is not for it. For the Earth is holding some things back because of those of the devil’s and even Babylon is right to know it. Now what is said, and is easier to say, for I am of the ability to know I do not lie.
Now there is a man blocking women from finding the road for wisdom by speaking on their behalf as if in support of them, that he stands in the ways to the road with a heavy blockade of metal, blocking the ways for women, that they must lose peace in making their way to the road, for the wise have sent out word to them, wise messages have called them, but the villain and scoundrel is blocking the ways and so have other men who are for it.
Now there is a man blocking women from finding the road for wisdom by speaking on their behalf as if in support of them, that he stands in the ways to the road with a heavy blockade of metal, blocking the ways for women, that they must lose peace in making their way to the road, for the wise have sent out word to them, wise messages have called them, but the villain and scoundrel is blocking the ways and so have other men who are for it.
Now there is a man blocking women from finding the road for wisdom by speaking on their behalf as if in support of them, that he stands in the ways to the road with a heavy blockade of metal, blocking the ways for women, that they must lose peace in making their way to the road, for the wise have sent out word to them, wise messages have called them, but the villain and scoundrel is blocking the ways and so have other men who are for it.
Now there is a man who hates women to such amount that he uses the women against the men, for he despises them both and the man he fears.
Now there is a man who hates women to such amount that he uses the women against the men, for he despises them both and the man he fears.
Now there is a shift from statue to monarch from old monarch to different monarch, to the gods of the kingdom, those with statues some cannot see, but the Universe has seen and lent vision but by what way I do not know. Now the different monarchs are those of the kingdoms of the Lord, and the incels are at war with the kingdom in the fashion that they hate the monarchs and the mighty and are sworn by loyalty to hate them and the kingdom less so, for do they not say, by the wrong direction the kingdom will be ours? Now the incels are servants of Orgoth’s servant, deadly soldiers of hell who hate the monarchs and devour some who are not having defence for they go as zeolots. Now which do they hate more, the mighty monarchs or the less mighty monarchs who have average might? But this I do not know. Now they are monarchs of an enemy country to the incels and they are as princes and kings and other things to the people of the nation. Now is the devil deceived? But are his servants? But does not the devil know, if only by it being told, which are the monarchs and the righteous and those who will surely cause him defeats many at a later time? But the devil is not a fool and he fights to win. Now will it not destroy the Earth entire if the monarchs and mighty monarchs are gone? But the people will easily be carried off and Babylon will reign and the people will be made unichs or enslaved or treated badly for if Babylon did so to the Jews it will certainly do so to the Lord’s greater kingdom that happened after the Jews and now includes them. Now is not Islam and Mohamed’s people counted among those who believe in God and are enemy of Babylon, or rather, Babylon is their enemy, for should they say we have no interest yet they might attack them even more with different flags. For is not Babylon already attacking them? Now the Island nation and China and India are from a different sphere and yet Babylon will devour the planet.
Now there is a shift from statue to monarch from old monarch to different monarch, to the gods of the kingdom, those with statues some cannot see, but the Universe has seen and lent vision but by what way I do not know. Now the different monarchs are those of the kingdoms of the Lord, and the incels are at war with the kingdom in the fashion that they hate the monarchs and the mighty and are sworn by loyalty to hate them and the kingdom less so, for do they not say, by the wrong direction the kingdom will be ours? Now the incels are servants of Orgoth’s servant, deadly soldiers of hell who hate the monarchs and devour some who are not having defence for they go as zeolots. Now which do they hate more, the mighty monarchs or the less mighty monarchs who have average might? But this I do not know. Now they are monarchs of an enemy country to the incels and they are as princes and kings and other things to the people of the nation. Now is the devil deceived? But are his servants? But does not the devil know, if only by it being told, which are the monarchs and the righteous and those who will surely cause him defeats many at a later time? But the devil is not a fool and he fights to win. Now will it not destroy the Earth entire if the monarchs and mighty monarchs are gone? But the people will easily be carried off and Babylon will reign and the people will be made unichs or enslaved or treated badly for if Babylon did so to the Jews it will certainly do so to the Lord’s greater kingdom that happened after the Jews and now includes them. Now is not Islam and Mohamed’s people counted among those who believe in God and are enemy of Babylon, or rather, Babylon is their enemy, for should they say we have no interest yet they might attack them even more with different flags. For is not Babylon already attacking them? Now the Island nation and China and India are from a different sphere and yet Babylon will devour the planet.
Now there is a time when there is clear conflict that those joining sides with the enemy are wicked as them in the manner they are the devil’s that traitors are with them and the coals of their being then the enemy are on their head and sending up smoke, that they are entered below to the paths of the devil’s and they will not come back until they have paid many times the judgement for redemption when they have been kept with the enemy that the gate to the city is shut to them and swords are towards them if they would draw near to the kingdom again. For the seed was large in him and it was wicked, that never having been given the test the imposter was known and changed to the enemy as he always was. Now let his family go out to him and maintain Babylon for him because Babylon’s rewards are of the devil. But let in righteous trample him in battle and utterly kill him, and let the enemy bury his corpse, for he was the imposter who was always the enemy and when the clear test came it was confirmed and he was doomed to be with the enemy that he might not walk among us anymore.
Now there is a war of bridges between the devil and the Lord and the Lord supplies good bridges when the bridge severed was severed rightly with an exceedingly sharp knife of truth that the wise who knows what truth is required is one who holds the exceedingly sharp knife of truth and the fire of pure light, the
 wave of truth, is spread by those who are of truth and light, the holy ones, the saints. Now I am suspicious only of the security problems of Babel because they allow members by money and diligence only and not the great tests of the Lord, who tests much more, that those emerging in the kingdom are greater tested and greater taught by God, that they might take from God, for when they are truly ready the upright of Babel cannot deny the great ability, except they are not the kingdom and have little language to express it, for the language is mostly in the tongue of the kingdom that is mixed with Babylon even. Now those trained by God, instructed, are able to take from Babel all they desire when they can, but there are security problems in Babel and foolishness is being placed when things have gone out, that Babel has need of upright aid, and security, for they fight in all none violent ways if they will, that none as of yet has wanted offensive violence from Babel. But the saints are able to take from Babel with money or without depending on their location in Ria and chances of birth.
Now there is a woman who is human-goat who is having the statue and palace, and there is another woman who is of nature, a wise woman, that she defends decency to God’s creatures, and she is not uses much hostility as her who drives off land, but she is Elsnon, and of nature, and she is a holy woman in her wisdom, for does she not have hill and palace and statue? Now she has saved all people on Earth in spirit and Ester has saved the Jews, for she has hill and palace and statue. 
Now there is an animal who will judge a human, a person, while they attempt to do something, and there is a dog who has seized a precious chain in its mouth that would adorn. Now who allows animals to desecrate a building when they are let in, when the building is meant to be holy? But animals and dogs, being animals, are not permitted into the sacred ground, and the animal who is acting as if something is their business that is not the business of any person is a sodomite, that sodomites defend sodomites.
Now there is being in the clutches of that which takes away ability to be in the reward of another, and the first to worsening sickness and the other to reward and good. For when the person has been worsened then they will go out having been ruined and made unable to be rewarded, for the life in them was drained out of them with fangs and the web they went into seemed dazzling and appealing, and later their life is drained because they did not break free with great fighting to save their life, for the unfelt sharpness carried that which numbed so that they did not perceive it, and later when they have gone out  from the web, they are ruined and much is missing from them, and they are unable to receive the reward of another which does not drain their life but possesses them in love if they wish it, and does not wish to harm them, but they are then unable for the life is stolen and much missing, for the spider has lured them, has offered them protection in their web, has said to them that which was like honey to them in order to drink their life and use them for their own honour without love, for the female spider has gone out from the Enochs and resides in the wilderness recruiting those it may devour that they might be great and have loyal ones who follow them.
Now there is being in the clutches of that which takes away ability to be in the reward of another, and the first to worsening sickness and the other to reward and good. For when the person has been worsened then they will go out having been ruined and made unable to be rewarded, for the life in them was drained out of them with fangs and the web they went into seemed dazzling and appealing, and later their life is drained because they did not break free with great fighting to save their life, for the unfelt sharpness carried that which numbed so that they did not perceive it, and later when they have gone out  from the web, they are ruined and much is missing from them, and they are unable to receive the reward of another which does not drain their life but possesses them in love if they wish it, and does not wish to harm them, but they are then unable for the life is stolen and much missing, for the spider has lured them, has offered them protection in their web, has said to them that which was like honey to them in order to drink their life and use them for their own honour without love, for the female spider has gone out from the Enochs and resides in the wilderness recruiting those it may devour that they might be great and have loyal ones who follow them.
Now there is conscious, semi-conscious, and conscious, and what a person does by mouth or hands and feet is what they are, for it matters not whether a person is conscious or not of what they do with mouth or body. Now those more concious are with those less concious and yet it matters not, for when jelousy is turned to action to a fullness the individual is revealed to be person or animal by their actions, and what the revelation of jelousy is is not revealed unless more wisdom is known. For people have been right in exercising action when they are enraged within at what is not right, and animals have been known to be animals when enraged at invasion of their territory.
Now there is conscious, semi-conscious, and conscious, and what a person does by mouth or hands and feet is what they are, for it matters not whether a person is conscious or not of what they do with mouth or body. Now those more concious are with those less concious and yet it matters not, for when jelousy is turned to action to a fullness the individual is revealed to be person or animal by their actions, and what the revelation of jelousy is is not revealed unless more wisdom is known. For people have been right in exercising action when they are enraged within at what is not right, and animals have been known to be animals when enraged at invasion of their territory.
Now there is human-hell-animal dog and yet dogs that are animal-animal dog are still dogs and yet not sick but if they are being viscious and attacking people with harrassments that are barking that it becomes a problem does not Orgoth’s highest son restrain it? Now if Orgoth’s highest and middle are keeping respect of their own domain are you not restraining your tongue when speaking with them that you not being a blasphemous report? But if it is so that they respect their own domain do you not even consider the blasphamous report when among others? But you are Enoch and Elsnon that I speak to that you are those who dwell well and because of the divide I do not speak to Terum.
Now there is human-hell-animal dog and yet dogs that are animal-animal dog are still dogs and yet not sick but if they are being viscious and attacking people with harrassments that are barking that it becomes a problem does not Orgoth’s highest son restrain it? Now if Orgoth’s highest and middle are keeping respect of their own domain are you not restraining your tongue when speaking with them that you not bringing a blasphemous report? But if it is so that they respect their own domain do you not even consider the blasphamous report when among others? But you are Enoch and Elsnon that I speak to that you are those who dwell well and because of the divide I do not speak to Terum.
Now there is human-hell-animal dog and yet dogs that are animal-animal dog are still dogs and yet not sick but if they are being viscious and attacking people with harrassments that are barking that it becomes a problem does not Orgoth’s highest son restrain it? Now if Orgoth’s highest and middle are keeping respect of their own domain are you not restraining your tongue when speaking with them that you not bringing a blasphemous report? But if it is so that they respect their own domain do you not even consider the blasphamous report when among others? But you are Enoch and Elsnon that I speak to that you are those who dwell well and because of the divide I do not speak to Terum.
Now there is human-hell-animal dog and yet dogs that are animal-animal dog are still dogs and yet not sick but if they are being viscious and attacking people with harrassments that are barking that it becomes a problem does not Orgoth’s highest son restrain it? Now if Orgoth’s highest and middle are keeping respect of their own domain are you not restraining your tongue when speaking with them that you not being a blasphemous report? But if it is so that they respect their own domain do you not even consider the blasphamous report when among others? But you are Enoch and Elsnon that I speak to that you are those who dwell well and because of the divide I do not speak to Terum.
Now there is no iron of iniquity or stubborness to be found in the gate but it is made of good metals within. Now forests are felled in places for cities and yet apart from Babel what is there a way to because Babel is accessed by the way in the heavens and not on land, and such is existing in the realm of Earth that is in Mala and represented in scattered parts in Ria. Now if steel and silver are used to be against those who would contend with Ijeshil than so is forms of might and combat is combat for there is that which is not clean in the defence of the city and yet it is war. For though Ijeshil is not seized with heavy violence, yet there has been havoc, and the ability of might is possible. Now I would want you to be asking for protection for me, for the saints have power, and will some? Now if I consider war and peace and the kingdom of heaven and the last days that are for you and also for me, than I will not hide that I would ask the saints for some things concerning matters of war and peace, for they are His children and I have been open to taking from some of them, and it has been clean. Now if I
 die, I would ask nothing, only it is not within me to say I cannot incur war of greater types and I have desired mostly as of yet to give wisdom.
Now there is no iron of iniquity or stubborness to be found in the gate but it is made of good metals within. Now forests are felled in places for cities and yet apart from Babel what is there a way to because Babel is accessed by the way in the heavens and not on land, and such is existing in the realm of Earth that is in Mala and represented in scattered parts in Ria. Now if steel and silver are used to be against those who would contend with Ijeshil than so is forms of might and combat is combat for there is that which is not clean in the defence of the city and yet it is war. For though Ijeshil is not seized with heavy violence, yet there has been havoc, and the ability of might is possible. Now I would want you to be asking for protection for me, for the saints have power, and will some? Now if I consider war and peace and the kingdom of heaven and the last days that are for you and also for me, than I will not hide that I would ask the saints for some things concerning matters of war and peace, for they are His children and I have been open to taking from some of them, and it has been clean. Now if I die, I would ask nothing, only it is not within me to say I cannot incur war of greater types and I have desired mostly as of yet to give wisdom.
Now there is not name for all. Mixing servant subtlety that is passive aggressive, yet the type is subtlety is not always evil, and mixing it wrathful denigrations, for it is mixed with wrath, there is the degrading speech, sometimes slander, of the combat soldier, that is called harjer and yet when it is insolent facade, for fight is not given, it is a cowardly combat-soldier who speaks harjer which is for battle of death, that it is cowardly combat soldier who does not then wish to fight to the death.
Now there is one who not a real heir, but an imposter, who gains a title that is not right for them to have, for they know they are an imposter, and I call this the imposter bully, for they are attempting to bully in every direction they can because of the great lacking in their heart that their conscience knows, else they would not behave in such a way. For directly they go out with the title they stole, as if it is forgery, and they attempt to cast out all real heirs in every place they can find them except where they would attack themselves by attacking, for they would cast out heirs in every place, in all places not their own, only those not imposters, for their inner heart hates real heirs and they seek great revenge upon on real heirs.
Now there is one who wants to ensure that the cults of the devil are kept out for safety that the church might not be corrupted and those in it, and there is another who wishes that some would repent in the manner Christ taught and then choose the church which is having those who are beautiful that they might proselytize and both are in agreance. Now an ugly person cannot be in such a church when they are ugly before God, and and ugly person cannot remain if they are going in the ways of what is ugly in a consistent way, and they have not been mistreated, not even by poison, and they are not sick in some fashion, being unwell. So you will release them from you, you will formally and respectfully ask them to leave, and you will not shame unless it is a case where they must be removed by force. But you will not shame them in the presence of others to be ugly yourself, but if it can be done with respect it will be, that you not be ugly in your behaviour towards them when they are not to be among the church anymore. But another church will be for them.
Now there is righteous envy and there are great men and men of justice and righteousness who are of power in their fairness and their good.
Now there is that other cult that comes from another and both belong to the devil, and it is taking those who are not rich that they might disregard objective thinking and truth to denegrate others who attempt to make positive change in an objective fashion and not with bias, so that they are mocking and degrading reason and objective truth in their arragance that is like distracting foolishness while some attempt to do what is good. Now what cult is above this, that communes more closely with the devil? But these will be persecuting you when they have acquired more strength and if it should not come than I would be grateful for the peace. But if it is too much to bear to be jelous for any of your enemies that their jelousy turns to envy and extends beyond the reach of a Jew, and I offer a compliment to them, that their sight would extend so far as to be resentful and bitter towards the church where there are beautiful people, that they nurture in them hatred because of all they lost in becoming part of a cult of the devil, than you will know that the devil is for doing war against the beautiful and some of you will be prepared for the day that you are to be wise as the serpents and in strategy that has victory being the one who does not offend that allies will know that they, too, are beautiful who are supporting you. So those who are pleasing to God will force out the ugly from encroaching and waging war against you.
Now there is the case where one would defend something as if they were better but they are not better but are the same, and this because of the circumstance of the actions that occurred whether by words or deeds and yet the first is often the later.  Now has any said I do not regard right and wrong? But right and wrong has not vanished though their hearts be stubborn or ignorant. Now if the hearts of a people by Mala are ignorant than right and wrong, the truth, does not change and they are what they are, for it would have been better for some of them if they had stayed amongst their own. But those who adhere to races by Mala are knowing the truth, that what is general to other races of Mala is unjust and disrespectful and just cause for complaint. But both that identification from the many languages and the knowledge of the races of Mala are able to co-exist without problem when Mala is there, being the truth, for if both are Mala than there is merely not enough knowledge with some, for Mala gives birth to Ria and Mala has the priority. Now the disciples were doing miracles by Mala, by that which is faith, and here Mala was instantly giving change to Ria as it is in the Universe.
Now there is the child collection that becomes many different things when they are older, and there are the seperate land that is hedged for children and they go out from that place to be seperate things and yet it is not seen or judged when they are children, for they are still in the land hedged for children. Now when they are gone out of that place the former is put away that they are what they are as it has always been so, for the inclinations are in their childhood and yet there is a dome above the land of children and guards are present even, for adults are watching.
Now there is the divide and a great ravine and divide between the two, that the dark shades are slave owners and the servants are with them and the dark shades who are slaves are removed from them for they speak things that look upon their father’s nakedness as if without hesitation, that they are brute, and they bully in ways that seperate man and wife and do not perceive sodomy for they are brute and unaware, for they are animals and slave animals, strong animals and unaware of their Sodom combat and their Sodom perversities. Now the fair exiled themselves and took from the darker shades slave owners and slaves alike for they did not understand and it was foolishness and great wickedness. Now they it is not even right to rob from another people’s slaves, and the Island must not have obeyed when the time came for they could not take from their own Island for it would have been abomination to do so. Now the indigenous are comparible to Jews on the continent the fair came to, for they are more willing to perform on land, and such should not be taken as slaves and the Jews cannot now take slaves from their own or from any because of the missing tribes. But slaves are taken from their own from the fair and it is the animals who are not dark or slightly darker. Now these are many among Orgoth’s servant for he gathers up the slaves of the fair and takes more than are for him.
Now there is the divide and a great ravine and divide between the two, that the dark shades are slave owners and the servants are with them and the dark shades who are slaves are removed from them for they speak things that look upon their father’s nakedness as if without hesitation, that they are brute, and they bully in ways that seperate man and wife and do not perceive sodomy for they are brute and unaware, for they are animals and slave animals, strong animals and unaware of their Sodom combat and their Sodom perversities. Now the fair exiled themselves and took from the darker shades slave owners and slaves alike for they did not understand and it was foolishness and great wickedness. Now they it is not even right to rob from another people’s slaves, and the Island must not have obeyed when the time came for they could not take from their own Island for it would have been abomination to do so. Now the indigenous are comparible to Jews on the continent the fair came to, for they are more willing to perform on land, and such should not be taken as slaves and the Jews cannot now take slaves from their own or from any because of the missing tribes. But slaves are taken from their own from the fair and it is the animals who are not dark or slightly darker. Now these are many among Orgoth’s servant for he gathers up the slaves of the fair and takes more than are for him.
Now there
 is the jelousy that is directed towards a man or woman and from either because it is a senseless jelousy that plagues a person, and the person is seized with stubborness by the arms and legs and shoulders that they cannot do right for another in some matter because they are seized hard and incapable. For their heart hath said would you have me tear ribs and bone with resistance? For I am not even mighty enough. Now they have that association with another that is not in truth, because they are not the sibling or friend and they do not dwell with them and have to see them daily and they associate that it is so on sight because their eyes are jelous and envious, and they associate such even by word of mouth that they are sick and seized with sickness. For a righteous man has said in loyalty you are a citizen who is for benifiting my country and my loyalty is strong and good. But with the one seized it is not so.
Now there is the one that butts it’s head, being another beast of the devil that can be found in form of a woman, but it is neither he or she, and does not desire man or woman, for it is for combat for the devil, or so it would seem, and yet it is not so, and does it join people for God? But who can say? Now its head is strong and heavy and its skull is hard with a thick plate for butting its head, and when it has no understanding and no knowledge, and yet it argues to fight, as if knowing everything said to pretend it has a different opinion, and it speaks as if it knows with certain knowledge, being insolent against what only another could know, for it casts away politeness and uses insolence to butt it’s head, and it does not fight with conversation but is words out of place for the conventions of the language. For it is a blunt creature, and makes itself blunt and insolent on purpose, for such is its strength. Now it charges with more words than another intentionally, to charge with great power by greater amount of words that barrel upon the words of others and cuts them off, or attempts to, and gives more words, even if nonsense, great amount of words, and yet the charge is not harming or butting, for it relents a little, and it is strong and it’s neck is strong, and the plates of its head are hard, like the hard strength of a strong rock, and it is of pride and judgement, and yet the angel is equal to this in strength in human form, indeed even stronger, but righteousness does not exceed. Now the creature is not for killing but is actually in some amazing way, a creature of peace, and yet most men will not easily confess it, for who will blame Enoch’s if they do not confess it? Now the angel is not liking to war with it because it will not wrestle and it’s head is blunt and hard and it is too big and strong to wrestle, for he likes the creature but because he cannot wrestle it he is not considering it his favourite companion, and yet will it not join sides for God? Now this is as if not desiring man or woman, and yet it is for other places where there is no combat, and yet, no, it is not for the angel but for those that are right for it. Now it is as if a type of dragon but not the type as a Satan, being a type of serpent.
Now there is the one that butts it’s head, being another beast of the devil that can be found in form of a woman, for it is for combat for the devil, or so it would seem, and yet it is not so, and does it join people for God? But who can say? Now its head is strong and heavy and its skull is hard with a thick plate for butting its head, and when it has no understanding and no knowledge, and yet it argues to fight, as if knowing everything said to pretend it has a different opinion, and it speaks as if it knows with certain knowledge, being insolent against what only another could know, for it casts away politeness and uses insolence to butt it’s head, and it does not fight with conversation but is words out of place for the conventions of the language, for it returns a brutality of insolence that is not like sodomites, and yet it is not of the convention of language. For it is a blunt creature, or makes itself so, making itself blunt and insolent on purpose, for such is its strength. Now it charges with more words than another intentionally, to charge with great power by greater amount of words that barrel upon the words of others and cuts them off, or attempts to, and gives more words, even if nonsense, great amount of words, and yet the charge is not harming or butting, for it relents a little, and it is strong and it’s neck is strong, and the plates of its head are hard, like the hard strength of a strong rock, and it is of pride and judgement, and yet the angel is equal to this in strength in human form, indeed even stronger, but righteousness does not exceed. Now the creature is not for killing but is actually a creature of peace, and yet most men will not easily confess it, for who will blame Enoch’s if they do not confess it? Now the angel is not liking to war with it because it will not wrestle and its head is blunt and hard and it is too big and strong to wrestle, for he likes the creature but because he cannot wrestle it he is not considering it his favourite companion, and yet will it not join sides for God? Now this is as if not desiring man or woman, and yet this is for other places where there is no combat, and yet, no, it is not for the angel but for those that are right for it. Now it is as if a type of dragon but not the type as a Satan, being a type of serpent, for it is the warm blooded dragon. Now I do not know if this is of Enoch’s world, for Babel has non-consistent contention with when people lived and when in time other creatures existed. Now Babel is a guest in Ijeshil if it is there and though gratitude is to Babel for great knowledge they are ignored, for they sometimes are with atheism and belief when they desire relevance. But it is indeed existing in Enoch’s world, and so it has come to pass that what happened in Enoch’s time will be seen after him, that all he saw would exist upon the Earth after him. Now the amount of animals and dragons outnumbered the people on Earth at the time of Enoch and later came abandonment of justice for violence and then came the flood. Now the mammoth is upon the Earth, like a rich one who is trumpeting and blasting loud and is stamping about, pushing and making noise, and disrupting the peace of the forest and the plains it moves across, raising a high noise that trumpets high and long, carelessly going about without consideration, a rich and large creature, and yet it is not the greatest evil people deal with. Now the angel is not against Mammoths and is not able to wrestle kindly with the butting dragon. Now the angel has called them Enochs, a third taken from the three shades and varieties of the three, and they are moving towards the three shades more of indigenous people who found a new land and settled it first, that they were separate. Now these people remained as if an early people by choice, for they did not desire to abandon their ways, and some of them moved south and engaged in worship of the sun and some promoted priests that the result was murders of people by human slaughtering, for such is happening when a people are giving and promoting such types of priests, and the priests gone out from Babel are the low priests of Babylon who have been given nothing, and yet they commit crimes to do evil. Now let the wise say, God has even found fault in His angels that we offer our own and proceed and do not fully agree. For the angel is not on Earth over 800 years which was not considered a great thing in the days of Enoch. Now the truth of this is not found in the day but found in Jude, who offered his letter. For it is only expected that they do not believe. But the Jews are called to believe and the angels who would cast away have already rebelled and were fought by the other angels. Therefore if Jude is permitted, yet it is the same as the rebellion of Korah if it is mentioned in a way that is offensive, and I have liked Jude most of the disciples.
Now there is the one that butts it’s head, being another beast of the devil that can be found in form of a woman, for it is for combat for the devil, or so it would seem, and yet it is not so, and does it join people for God? But who can say? Now its head is strong and heavy and its skull is hard with a thick plate for butting its head, and when it has no understanding and no knowledge, and yet it argues to fight, as if knowing everything said to pretend it has a different opinion, and it speaks as if it knows with certain knowledge, being insolent against what only another could know, for it casts away politeness and uses insolence to butt it’s head, and it does not fight with conversation but is words out of place for the conventions of the language, for it returns a brutality of insolence that is not like sodomites, and yet it is not of the convention of language. For it is a blunt creature, or makes itself so, making itself blunt and insolent on purpose, for such is its strength. Now it charges with more words than another intentionally, to charge with great power by greater amount of words that barrel upon the words of others and cuts them off, or attempts to, and gives more words, even if nonsense, great amount of words, and yet the charge is not harming or butting, for it relents a little, and it is strong and it’s neck is strong, and the plates of its head are hard, like the hard strength of a strong rock, and it is of pride and judgement, and yet the angel is equal to this in strength in human form, indeed even stronger, but righteousness does not exceed. Now the creature is not for killing but is actually a creature of peace, and yet most men will not easily confess it, for who will blame Enoch’s if they do not confess it? Now the angel is not liking to war
 with it because it will not wrestle and its head is blunt and hard and it is too big and strong to wrestle, for he likes the creature but because he cannot wrestle it he is not considering it his favourite companion, and yet will it not join sides for God? Now this is as if not desiring man or woman, and yet this is for other places where there is no combat, and yet, no, it is not for the angel but for those that are right for it. Now it is as if a type of dragon but not the type as a Satan, being a type of serpent, for it is the warm blooded dragon. Now I do not know if this is of Enoch’s world, for Babel has non-consistent contention with when people lived and when in time other creatures existed. Now Babel is a guest in Ijeshil if it is there and though gratitude is to Babel for great knowledge they are ignored, for they sometimes are with atheism and belief when they desire relevance. But it is indeed existing in Enoch’s world, and so it has come to pass that what happened in Enoch’s time will be seen after him, that all he saw would exist upon the Earth after him. Now the amount of animals and dragons outnumbered the people on Earth at the time of Enoch and later came abandonment of justice for violence and then came the flood. Now the mammoth is upon the Earth, like a rich one who is trumpeting and blasting loud and is stamping about, pushing and making noise, and disrupting the peace of the forest and the plains it moves across, raising a high noise that trumpets high and long, carelessly going about without consideration, a rich and large creature, and yet it is not the greatest evil people deal with. Now the angel is not against Mammoths and is not able to wrestle kindly with the butting dragon. Now the angel has called them Enochs, a third taken from the three shades and varieties of the three, and they are moving towards the three shades more of indigenous people who found a new land and settled it first, that they were separate. Now these people remained as if an early people by choice, for they did not desire to abandon their ways, and some of them moved south and engaged in worship of the sun and some promoted priests that the result was murders of people by human slaughtering, for such is happening when a people are giving and promoting such types of priests, and the priests gone out from Babel are the low priests of Babylon who have been given nothing, and yet they commit crimes to do evil. Now let the wise say, God has even found fault in His angels that we offer our own and proceed and do not fully agree. For the angel is not on Earth over 800 years which was not considered a great thing in the days of Enoch. Now the truth of this is not found in the day but found in Jude, who offered his letter. For it is only expected that they do not believe. But the Jews are called to believe and the angels who would cast away have already rebelled and were fought by the other angels. Therefore if Jude is permitted, yet it is the same as the rebellion of Korah if it is mentioned in a way that is offensive, and I have liked Jude most of the disciples. Now when I was outside and alone I had the sense of it, and said in my heart, something is wrong, and I went inside and found the scripture and read, and it was Jude’s letter to the church, and he has given opportunity to answer things for some reason that I am strong-armed to answer, for it is like a letter from the Christ. Now he is not as accurate as he could be, but he is right, but he speaks of disrespect and is a little disrespectful. For there is one who is bringing his sword down upon the disrespectful and his words offer trouble when there was prior no confusion, for none has believed that the angels did not fight the angels who rebelled, and none was believing that it could occur in the future, or that the angels were not what they are, that they would endanger themselves because as he has said, the Lord defends you. Now there is discord and opportunity for the devil in this, and there is what I sensed prior, that something is wrong. Now  there is much written of zeolots who were against Christians and those who rebelled at Korah. Now there is that about the Jews, that they are called to believe. Now there is much here that is not found in the scripture and it is true that there is that not found in the scripture, and some will not believe if it is not found there. Now am I to test? But what you write is true and yet there is trouble to be had, for I have no guard, and no servant, and yet I have friends, but no soldiers of Earth, and you mention zeolots and it is so, and yet I am not able to be tested because I have understood from the start to much further in a matter, and I could pretend in the testing. Now I do not mock, but you write of that which concerns zeolots and battle and trechories and yet are they always ones without a home? Now they are hidden reefs and stone that wrecks ships and if there is time for the giving of more complete knowledge than I say you have spoken truth.
Now there is the spirit which brings deceit to a person to believe that which is not true and it must be separated from the spirit of wisdom because it will kill those who it is in if they do not remove it. For as long as your body is still alive it is not too late. For the spirit is in the mouths of people to add to the spirit and yet the young child does not have it, for it is only taking refuge in those older. Now I am for speaking about that which some have come to believe is true and is a lie because of those things that are not real and are with the spirit that deceives. But can any of understanding who are not in the kingdom cast it out even if they have been told about it? But you did not always have these deceptions but the spirit of wisdom should remain. For men have been placed in prison since the beginning and for doing the right thing and those who keep it are sometimes wicked and stubborn. Have not soldiers been taken to prison when there is not war but they are in their own nation and traitors are there? But thousands of years of billions of people have gone into prisons and out of them and did not the Apostle boast about it, because he had been to prison more than the others? But do not be scorned or bothered when the shallow cult of the world would scorn you with their doctrine which they incur loss in for what is better, and are denied all because it, those things that all the heros of the Old and New Testiment had. 
Now there is them matching manners of speech and none is offended, for among the righteous it is good.
Now there is what is true backwards and also true forwards and there are two true stories.
Now there might have then been stories of slave owners who were dark shaded and unsatisfied with their skin shade and yet they are slave owners but the dissatisfaction is with them. Now they are not dark shaded but light, if it so pleases them, for is it a lie? But when the slaves are all slaves and there is no error for it then there is less problem on Earth.
Now there should be no great chaos, but people will descend if God is choosing, will they not? But when there is great chaos you defend, you support the kingdom that it may go well for you, for partners of enemies are wanting the attack, and yet those of the similiar level are at peace with each other, and contentions are from the confusion of things. Now other contentions not from the confusion are ceasing when there is a matter of greater evil, and yet it changes nothing, but shows honour.
Now there speech is being of money and streets that their words are many, for it is speech of Ria, and the language of Ria is giving greater opportunity for deception for they are smashing the truth and scattering it and distracting and speaking like stumbling blocks and like swords against truth, and they are breaking truth apart and mixing lies and dampening clarity, obscuring, and distracting from integrity of truth, and descending from understanding of truth, and this can be done with tongues of Ria for it is flexible to hold deception and their words speak over truth and hypnotises those into belief of their concealment who are having the treacherous heart, for they exceed the fear of God and common sense and understanding and they fall below sentience for they do not wish to dwell in the truth when there are matters of justice, for their words are often many to do nothing, to hide from the truth, for they attack truth and would rather hide from the truth, for these who do so are not as people who are in the light, but they are low, servants hiding from truth and lower, their hearts concealed in their belief and spectacles to those who are people.
Now there speech is being of money and streets that their words are many, for it is speech of Ria, and the language of Ria is giving greater opportunity for deception for they are smashing the truth and scattering it and distracting and speaking like stumbling blocks and like swords against truth, and they are breaking truth apart and mixing lies and dampening clarity, obscuring, and distracting from integrity of truth, and descending from understanding of truth, and this can be done with tongues of Ria for it is flexible to hold deception and their words speak over truth and hypnotises those into belief of their concealment who are having the treacherous heart, for they exceed the fear of God and common sense and understanding and they fall below sentience for they do not wish to dwell in the truth when there are matters of justice, for their words are often many to do nothing, to hide from the truth, for they attack truth and would rather hide from the truth, for these who do so are not as people who are in the light, but they are low, servants hiding from truth and lower, their hearts concealed in their belief and spectacles to those who are people.
Now
 there speech is being of money and streets that their words are many, for it is speech of Ria, and the language of Ria is giving greater opportunity for deception for they are smashing the truth and scattering it and distracting and speaking like stumbling blocks and like swords against truth, and they are breaking truth apart and mixing lies and dampening clarity, obscuring, and distracting from integrity of truth, and descending from understanding of truth, and this can be done with tongues of Ria for it is flexible to hold deception and their words speak over truth and hypnotises those into belief of their concealment who are having the treacherous heart, for they exceed the fear of God and common sense and understanding and they fall below sentience for they do not wish to dwell in the truth when there are matters of justice, for their words are often many to do nothing, to hide from the truth, for they attack truth and would rather hide from the truth, for these who do so are not as people who are in the light, but they are low, servants hiding from truth and lower, their hearts concealed in their belief and spectacles to those who are people.
Now there two cats that looked similar in their coats and yet upon the return of the cats it is seen several times that there are two appearing similiar and they are together. Now the cat that resides here is being consistently preyed on by one of them, for it is the season of such, I assume, and I am not mentioning that which is natural, and I also am not for disturbing nature, for it has become like that is self-attack and rebellion against self for me, and I am for keeping away from what is not for me to prevent. Now I believe it to be one cat that has the glowing orange eyes like flames, but almost square as pillars, but perhaps not rectangular but closer to a square. Now the pillars are seeming translucent as if a solid curtain of light and fire that does not cackle and leap and yet it is fire. Now I have been annoyed by others once and the cat’s eyes turned to flames of fire while it looked into my own eyes and the fire disappeared almost while my annoyance faded. Now one of the cats is at the window and waiting at the door and often around. 
Now there two cats that looked similar in their coats and yet upon the return of the cats it is seen several times that there are two appearing similiar and they are together. Now the cat that resides here is being consistently preyed on by one of them, for it is the season of such, I assume, and I am not mentioning that which is natural, and I also am not for disturbing nature, for it has become like that is self-attack and rebellion against self for me, and I am for keeping away from what is not for me to prevent. Now I believe it to be one cat that has the glowing orange eyes like flames, but almost square as pillars, but perhaps not rectangular but closer to a square. Now the pillars are seeming translucent as if a solid curtain of light and fire that does not cackle and leap and yet it is fire. Now I have been annoyed by others once and the cat’s eyes turned to flames of fire while it looked into my own eyes and the fire disappeared almost while my annoyance faded. Now one of the cats is at the window and waiting at the door and often around. 
Now there two cats that looked similar in their coats and yet upon the return of the cats it is seen several times that there are two appearing similiar and they are together. Now the cat that resides here is being consistently preyed on by one of them, for it is the season of such, I assume, and I am not mentioning that which is natural, and I also am not for disturbing nature, for it has become like that is self-attack and rebellion against self for me, and I am for keeping away from what is not for me to prevent. Now I believe it to be one cat that has the glowing orange eyes like flames, but almost square as pillars, but perhaps not rectangular but closer to a square. Now the pillars are seeming translucent as if a solid curtain of light and fire that does not cackle and leap and yet it is fire. Now I have been annoyed by others once and the cat’s eyes turned to flames of fire while it looked into my own eyes and the fire disappeared almost while my annoyance faded. Now one of the cats is at the window and waiting at the door and often around. Now the two cats are often together and often not for the other cat with the dark and white coat is often off at a distance while the other cat with the dark and white coat is preying upon the cats that I have taken to be the normal cats. Now the might feline that I perceived to be great is not seeming so frightening anymore that my throat might catch and I might feel some sense of dread and terror inside me, but I am physically bigger, and such does not have to be talked about honestly, only the feline was not like a cat, but was like a full grown lion in some way. Now the other cat has not seemed to want to frighten me in this way and may be willing to indulge me, for its eyes glow as curtains of flame with squares over-lapping and solid curtains as if of lava from a volcano. The cats are commicating much, which I do not take as a sign for watching, but part of nature, much like the adult skunk that appeared this evening. Now I have noted that Babel has discovered another planet 12 light-years away and wondered if it is another culture to attain fruition for. Which culture might mars represent, for it might not be taken by the culture that is the heir of it. But I have reasoned that mars is for humans and it is easier to attain for proximity, but what is that to mean, if anything? Money is attaining it and governments have attained the moon. The culture that takes it is more money than any nation.
Now these are grotesque and like filthy and hateful creatures that are ungainly and crippled within. For when they are strong it is so that they are of the devil, but when they are weak it is those missing what the devil can offer them. Now does the devil not prepare his soldiers and are not the minds of his soldiers untouched by the acceptance of and performance of wickedness. For they have opposite minds from you and opposite hearts that to do all wickedness is only become natural for them that the paths and ways are changed that it is an abomination for them to do well. Now these are the common foot-soldiers of the devil. But there are even more dangerous things in the kingdom of the devil although our side is more dangerous than they and are in good, for the kings of the devil are commanding, and they are for commiting murders even with violence as the would come upon the beautiful to crush them and murder them, that they are using great condemnations and judgements of what is righteous that even their smaller soldiers mimic this behaviour at times, that they condemn, judge, and forbid righteousness and good as if the land was theirs as they attempt to claim it. And heaping up strength of perverse judgement and condemnation they are for killing the innocent, even the small child in tears, that they have wrath towards and hatred because of their tears and because the child is seeking those who protect them, there is more wrath because of it and they consider it an outrage that the child would dare to seek God and those who would protect them. For they are even blood-thirsty and I will not relent so that you might not understand and lower your guard. So they heap up substance of hatred, jelousy, wrath, and condemnation and they seek to kill by commanding those who would follow them, using slander and lies, denigrating what is beautiful. And as it is so for the kings it is so for the queens who are in the kingdom of the devil. Now the villian of Ester is with them and he cries often, but only when it is an abomination and not ever in a good way. For you will find this servant of Babylon many places, for my country is Babylon as it is so, and so is yours if it is not theocracy of the type that was Israel. But the servant is a Gentile even when born of Jews, and the righteous are bullies in his opinion, as there is no other thing to call them without confessing the truth. You will find Jezebel in iniquity, being ugly, for she is exalted by the ugly who look up to her as something to attain and be. Ahab you will find being jelous of those he has no right to be jelous of and he will be found stealing away the work of what others have done, to cast it away or steal it for himself and the same you will find him killing in spirit which is to cause to go astray and murder before God when it is fulfilled, but he is of equal danger in the physical ways and doing the same. You are right to save any being attacked by the people who are the devil’s. Now what is perhaps for less obvious truth because I fear God, the leaders of Babylon are having many gods and goddesses, and with wisdom you know it to represent the many industries and groups of consideration, and even the cults that are clung with these groups that are the devil’s, and being that there are many people groups, the Jews being a group, the leaders are being swayed between groups so that they take support from one in order to give it to another group, so that priorities become lost in the mayhem of governing so many different groups, and the Jews and Christians may suffer because of it. For if the Jews should disappear will Christianity not suffer and be attacked more greatly? But I do wish for this to occur. Now the leader might need respectful reminder at times of what will occur because of decisions through legislature and many things become attached to such things. Now if in Babylon you are not petitioning your leader are you being prudent for your people? But the king or queen of Babylon, let us hope they will be for us. Now I have not read all of the Bible and will do so after I have fulfilled
 what is good, because I do not want much influence from it. Now as for that hatred of the middle of riches I do not have it but  perceive some of it and do not know how to fulfill it. But as for Babylon I would have people know that the kingdom of heaven is not part of it but is the only truth and reality. So then how does any live outside the kingdom? But they are made for what they are made and what is dead for one has substance for another. But if there are even beasts of the devil on Earth that would hurt and kill do you not know that there are those who judge who are with God and if they are not refusing to defend you than they are for you. But are you so blessed when some are not? But I would prefer an Earth with righteousness and truth, that the calamity of the devil when it comes in lies is cast away as nonsense. Now a leorocon is not a father and the Irish have called it such, and those who have no respect for people are not to be trusted in that they have no concern for any and would commit abuse like it was a game. Rapists are among these. Now the one who has no time or use for increasing understanding to do wisely in matters of life and moves hastily to do violence when a small thing of life is before them, are those who are hasty to shed blood and they do so without reason because they can offer reasons even with no small thing when they have tolerated the presence of one too much and hate them to grow with rage inside them, being jelous of them and drawn into rage, that jelousy has come from annoyance and they are communing with their friends that they should go and kill an offendor by annoyance and jelousy and if it is some matter that is for understanding, a matter of daily life, and they have no patience for it, that they would kill, than these are like swift moving killers who come to their target by flying creatures to kill swiftly what they have seen from the air, being a citizen who was in their own country. Now those who would frame a multitude of times for small matters that a person might incur many harrassment more because of it are those casting a net in war that is with sharp objects that will not scar a person and it is a weak weapon but takes patience, for the weapon is wanted to be effective but it is not that which will cause death unless the person is old or has a bad heart physically, and if the soldiers will not save them know that soldiers of the devil have slayn them that they go to the after-life, the next after this phase. Now if they are attempting murder by some method of combining those things that when they are completed will cause physical death and the soldiers will not investigate it, than a saint has been slayn, a martyr and going to the after-life. Now the devil is giving new substance to all his people so that they might be completed with that which gives them strength and stability, that their substance be utterly clear of all that is of God less the good spread in them and they be made to what is good, but if they are of a heart that is driving the good out than I do not know. But I would guess at a thing, that it is good to drive evil out where it is acceptable and performing what is acceptable. But if you are finding more truth than I than you will know that I do not understand all. Now you being profiting greatly from death that you have more life are doing what is right for you? But I must fulfill and intend to. For by what manner I receive I have perceived the place where the daughter is stolen by another, and fiery swords have clashed close to me and showers of sparks have hailed from the sky while flaming arrows sore and the battle is sounding and travellers are moving through in the night, and yet the room is empty and the moments still and the time is of hot and cold, with blizzards thrashing and taking innocent lives that are for God and the kingdom of heaven that all their great stories I do not know. For I have increased pain in me and the giving even is mixed with sorrow even though I am for fulfilling all. 
Now these seem like weapons: those who do not understand the boundaries of language in discussion who seem aggressive without comprehension of delays and assumptions built into the language, those who are overly addicted to comfort so that they speak against all that would touch them, those who dismiss objective truth when stated with anything that cannot dismiss it because nothing can, those who offer what changes nothing and those who do this and continue on the basis of it with their ears shut and necks stiff. Now if any is found with all of these they are like an angry man of war in combat who uses knives and breaks bones and strikes with fists and regards nothing save for combat and hears no words but engages in combat. For such is a fierce warrior of ability who is praised in war and he is not to be reckoned with. Now if any is doing more than this to argue with themselves within themselves and the speak as if the other had said it and to speak that which is only meant to be phrases of disrespect to insult than they are like a blood-thirsty soldier who is in a frenzy of massacre to kill and massacre wherever they can. Now if any judges and condemns the one defending themselves these are like a partner in homicide and like those of the devil covered in blood. Now if the two are partnered they are together forever, and partnered and bound together by the devil in stubborness for they are the devil’s son’s and daughters, those of his own house who walk and eat of the fruit that is in it. For around such a house is hell-fire and the glow of blood is as a spirit in the air that they are with iniquity and blood-shed, brother and sister of incest and in the devil’s house.
Now these seem like weapons: those who do not understand the boundaries of language in discussion who seem aggressive without comprehension of delays and assumptions built into the language, those who are overly addicted to comfort so that they speak against all that would touch them, those who dismiss objective truth when stated with anything that cannot dismiss it because nothing can, those who offer what changes nothing and those who do this and continue on the basis of it with their ears shut and necks stiff. Now if any is found with all of these they are like an angry man of war in combat who uses knives and breaks bones and strikes with fists and regards nothing save for combat and hears no words but engages in combat. For such is a fierce warrior of ability who is praised in war and he is not to be reckoned with.
Now these three claim Babel much: The dogs for disbelief, Babylon and it’s cults, and in a different way, the angel who is Satan, a type of small dragon, whose name is Lucifer.
Now they are of Orgoth’s middle son, servants of hell, and in human, rejects of Islam, those who could not join, renegades of hell, foolish and chaotic destroyers who are for starting wars they will not fight as if they were baiting attacks against Muslims.  Now birds have partnered with them amongst the Luke-warm, and with Babylon, and dogs have slandered Mohammed’s people, aiding those who sow discord. Now these rejects blaspheme what they claim to defend by their actions when they say they do evil in the name of Islam. For they do evil in the name of what is not evil. Now let Jews and Christians have salt and also defend lack of discord and defend peace.
Now they are of Orgoth’s middle son, servants of hell, and in human, rejects of Islam, those who could not join, renegades of hell, foolish and chaotic destroyers who are for starting wars they will not fight as if they were baiting attacks against Muslims.  Now birds have partnered with them amongst the Luke-warm, and with Babylon, and dogs have slandered Mohammed’s people, aiding those who sow discord. Now these rejects blaspheme what they claim to defend by their actions when they say they do evil in the name of Islam. For they do evil in the name of what is not evil. Now let Jews and Christians have salt and also defend lack of discord and defend peace.
Now they are of Orgoth’s middle son, servants of hell, and in human, rejects of Islam, those who could not join, renegades of hell, foolish and chaotic destroyers who are for starting wars they will not fight as if they were baiting attacks against Muslims.  Now birds have partnered with them amongst the Luke-warm, and with Babylon, and dogs have slandered Mohammed’s people, aiding those who sow discord. Now these rejects blaspheme what they claim to defend by their actions when they say they do evil in the name of Islam. For they do evil in the name of what is not evil. Now let Jews and Christians have salt and also defend lack of discord and defend peace.
Now they call king and queen genius at Babel and yet it is not of Babel. Now God is not Babel, and Babylon is doing foolishly and is pointless for they are falling before kings and they are not asked to bow, and kings and queens are using stealth for peace. Now the devil’s people are not meant to honour a king or queen, for they are the devil’s. Now some beasts of the devil are dog-things and Babylon is not always liking them, for the thing is not concealed. Now the fear of the king is respect that stands back, for they are given room because they are king or queen. Now a wise man is able to employ a king, for with them they are standing back. 
Now they call king and queen genius at Babel and yet it is not of Babel. Now God is not Babel, and Babylon is doing foolishly and is pointless for they are falling before kings and they are not asked to bow, and kings and queens are using stealth for peace. Now the devil’s people are not meant to honour a king or queen, for they are the devil’s. Now some beasts of the devil are dog-things and Babylon is not always liking them, for the thing is not concealed. Now the fear of the king is respect
 that stands back, for they are given room because they are king or queen. Now a wise man is able to employ a king, for with them they are standing back. 
Now they call king and queen genius at Babel and yet it is not of Babel. Now God is not Babel, and Babylon is doing foolishly and is pointless for they are falling before kings and they are not asked to bow, and kings and queens are using stealth for peace. Now the devil’s people are not meant to honour a king or queen, for they are the devil’s. Now some beasts of the devil are dog-things and Babylon is not always liking them, for the thing is not concealed. Now the fear of the king is respect that stands back, for they are given room because they are king or queen. Now a wise man is able to employ a king, for with them they are standing back. 
Now they call them from hell, incel, and other things on this planet and if he’ll has soldiers on the planet, on the land, they have a right to be there. Now the incels are not at war with any nation of Ria. Now some things of hell speak knowing what the truth is and they are not dishonourable in that matter that they speak as those who are soldiers who know of the war between Babylon and God’s kingdoms and the nations meddle and are not knowing of the war, that they bully soldiers with lack of knowledge, and even Nimrod’s people harrass them for they do not know of the war and God’s have not yet been peeled off from the devil’s because they are in the Luke-warm state and do not have knowledge of Babylon. Now some of hell’s soldiers are only speaking without lies and yet it confuses those who do not know of the war. For they do not receive clarity from the Luke-warm, and they have a right, the soldiers of hell, to be on Earth for they have been sent as soldiers to do combat against God’s kingdom. Now are not some of these incels astonished by the Luke-warm that they do not know of the war? But the Luke-warm are still receiving knowledge. Now the Luke-warm are like insane people in this because of what they do not know. Now soldiers are sent and they are prepared to die and hell’s soldiers are even prepared to be tortured, that you not add foolishness and silliness when dealing with them, for they know the truth, these soldiers of hell, and are not deceived in these matters in which they speak.
Now they did not want to dwell in the comprehension and requirements of man, which is the Jews, that they choose instead Babel, which is animal level, for they desired to return to the requirements of childhood and would rather the lesser requirements of animals, that they be animals and feign being children in a wrong way, for they could not return to the realm of children but instead could only be animals. Now what of the wisdom of angels? But it is not for the calf that emerges and stumbles, but if any desires both they must put away Babel while they pursue the other, in speech and in all ways, for dogs should not defile the holy places, nor should they rend in pieces and devour what is holy.
Now they did not want to dwell in the comprehension and requirements of man, which is the Jews, that they choose instead Babel, which is animal level, for they desired to return to the requirements of childhood and would rather the lesser requirements of animals, that they be animals and feign being children in a wrong way, for they could not return to the realm of children but instead could only be animals. Now what of the wisdom of angels? But it is not for the calf that emerges and stumbles, but if any desires both they must put away Babel while they pursue the other, in speech and in all ways, for dogs should not defile the holy places, nor should they rend in pieces and devour what is holy.
Now they go a different way to Heaven and are already there in heart, and so I was to give them swords and bows but they take another way, these who are persecuted, and so these are not angels but they are the saints, and I am fighting to protect them but they are turning the other cheek and I am then alone? But though I am comforted like Isaac was after his parents were gone I am not perceived to be alone because of those of the church that is containing some of the saints who would be given the name David would give or the angel but I do not give the name God gives, unless by some chance, it is the same. Now they are the Elsnon who are beautiful and immortal who are in the phase before the after-life, and they are allies of all who are pleasing God, the other peoples who are wise and righteous.
Now they go a different way to Heaven and are already there in heart, and so I was to give them swords and bows but they take another way, these who are persecuted, and so these are not angels but they are the saints, and I am fighting to protect them but they are turning the other cheek and I am then alone? But though I am comforted like Isaac was after his parents were gone I am not perceived to be alone because of those of the church that is containing some of the saints who would be given the name David would give or the angel but I do not give the name God gives, unless by some chance, it is the same. Now they are the Elsnon who are beautiful and immortal who are in the phase before the after-life, and they are allies of all who are pleasing God, the other peoples who are wise and righteous.
Now they have no desire for greatness unless it is for them perversity and injustice, and they have no desire for power unless it is for perversity and injustice to do the will of the devil. Now what is on the lips of the low is achieved by those who will not speak it for decency and right.
Now they have no desire for greatness unless it is for them perversity and injustice, and they have no desire for power unless it is for perversity and injustice to do the will of the devil. Now what is on the lips of the low is achieved by those who will not speak it for decency and right.
Now they have raised up children to be foolish to be slaughtered that they raised up those not meant to live, for a foolish man has built his house on sand and the person was filled with abundant education and given honours and they were given positions of work that were hard to attain and they provided them with medals and parades and houses for different seasons and great houses and yet it was all upon the sand because there was no good discipline and wisdom given to them that when they were given their first task requiring wisdom they were slayn with justice because wisdom was not as if natural for them to be without thought and the houses fell and what was on the sand was not. Now to what will you compare wisdom? But it delivers even from death and defends all the riches that dwell within the cities. For fools have said, we will kill every enemy, and great empires were bankrupted and when the people wandered homeless and starving the enemy attacked and slaughter them all. Wisdom stands back and laughs, as if with good and pure delight and yet it has substance that her voice is pure, filled with good charm, and she mocks at the fool who would touch her child when they are laying slayn for she is like good charm, like a charming and kind one, and she lifts up the city, it is rising to heaven, and she goes between the streets and walls where her children are doing wisely.
Now they have raised up children to be foolish to be slaughtered that they raised up those not meant to live, for a foolish man has built his house on sand and the person was filled with abundant education and given honours and they were given positions of work that were hard to attain and they provided them with medals and parades and houses for different seasons and great houses and yet it was all upon the sand because there was no good discipline and wisdom given to them that when they were given their first task requiring wisdom they were slayn with justice because wisdom was not as if natural for them to be without thought and the houses fell and what was on the sand was not. Now to what will you compare wisdom? But it delivers even from death and defends all the riches that dwell within the cities. For fools have said, we will kill every enemy, and great empires were bankrupted and when the people wandered homeless and starving the enemy attacked and slaughter them all. Wisdom stands back and laughs, as if with good and pure delight and yet it has substance that her voice is pure, filled with good charm, and she mocks at the fool who would touch her child when they are laying slayn for she is like good charm, like a charming and kind one, and she lifts up the city, it is rising to heaven, and she goes between the streets and walls where her children are doing wisely.
Now they show those not Jews as Jews when they are born to Jews, that because of the manner of them they are acceptable, but they do not fully accept them, that the one who would join the gentiles and partner with Babylon is not a Jew to the angel if he says, I will graft myself to the Gentiles by persecuting their enemy, those who are God’s. I will be like an interloping servant to offer disrespect to the prince because I cannot ever belong as them. Clown. Fool. But there is no cause to throw away your own great house to be as a foolish slave who is an offence. But if you are becoming great and keeping to the truth about being a Jew whether secular or not, than the angel has nothing against you.
Now this has happened in my time. Humanity took some small measure of ground by the government and the Zetorin took the land back and took land much in other areas as well, for in their battle to take from the poor they also took from those more properious. Now there is no use for the saying with either that the poor will always be among you, for it has no place for either when there is conflict. But the saying is of the Christ for the purpose he intended it. Now
 Babylon is held in place by the Zetorin and governments and by other tribes who go to the government and the priests of Babylon are first going to Babel and they are going out from Babel and Babel is keeping silent concerning them. Now the war that is upon some plains of Ria is also effecting plains of Mala, and the angel has considered it good that humanity gain more ground on the plain where they fight the Zetorin.
Now this has happened in my time. The war with the Zetorin has brought forth the truth which must be mentioned. For a war can be fought by attacking a people’s money that this has been the cause of wars by governments. For where their money fails they are made into chaos and crime and some perish in time from sickness because they have no shelter and food, that the Zetorin are for making more incursions to cut a great part of the people off that a great part of humanity might suffer and die, for they have taken almost all wealth for themselves that they exceed the measure of greatly wealthy and they are making decisions against governments, that a portion of humanity should die and many more should not have chance of education.
Now this has happened in my time. The war with the Zetorin has brought forth the truth which must be mentioned. For a war can be fought by attacking a people’s money that this has been the cause of wars by governments. For where their money fails they are made into chaos and crime and some perish in time from sickness because they have no shelter and food, that the Zetorin are for making more incursions to cut a great part of the people off that a great part of humanity might suffer and die, for they have taken almost all wealth for themselves that they exceed the measure of greatly wealthy and they are making decisions against governments, that a portion of humanity should die and many more should not have chance of education.
Now this largest language is frustrating and insufficient, so that a person stumbles and breaks bones, and get mauled by a tree branch before they can express a simple thing. So I am in some anger to hastily add much vocabulary to this language because it is not among the people to use those words that are not congruent with their people, so that the words are neglected and cannot be used and easily understood.
Now those beginning in all realms are subject to all things according to what they do, and none can trick God or those who please Him, for patience is for the righteous and the good.
Now those beginning in all realms are subject to all things according to what they do, and none can trick God or those who please Him, for patience is for the righteous and the good.
Now those being transformed into disease that is a weapon of the devil’s are not often having knowledge of why they have been sent out only they have been sent out by those whose hearts are directed by the devil that what must be attacked by him is to be attacked because it is not prudent to allow God’s kingdom to take ground against the enemy and if it would take a great city than how much worse and even a province than why will the devil not attack and why will he not attempt to kill Abel? But if Babel is being made and the Elsnon given wisdom than how he not be losing much ground? But if the devil’s dwell with wicked animals and are ignorant of what is known to a man than they feign anger at common truth in forced zeal for their cause, for those who break away from even their hearts are those who remain within them that they are perverting themselves that they show they are at war with God. But if any struggles yet does right, they are blessed by me as very worthy. Now if any would attempt to go back at times than it is the case that some make it worse what they would go back from that what they do not like is increased and there is one who makes things worse with much control, that if any is poisoned than if they would poison themselves also they are making things worse.
Now those giving Babylon have wronged the miserable who has come to having nothing, and deceived them in any place, and therefore a recompense of justice is just, only Christianity is to be found with it that iniquity be purged with the actions of truth. Now if such a spiritual war is fought than the war is good and it is called a primary justice, being that such is acceptable. Now if any of Babylon would lead any astray it is for exaulting itself with arragance when such is done, because envy has demanded a deed. Now if any are wishing war than let a weapon of truth and light cause them to turn to dust a little that they might know that the scorching of eternal hell is worse for them. But if there kind is using rillet than they will know that hell is not without pain and that God cannot tricked, for they only fear God a little. Now amongst their own if they are kings in arragance by which they become kings than you know that wisdom has hated such arragance but men cannot judge it, but only insolence. Now if any of them should wish for serious things against the saints than if they do so as sport they will be judged by that which fears God that their arragance and strength might turn mocking to truth within them when they are thought for, where they showed that they would rather choose lies. For God’s judgement can destroy lies and casts out insolence and gives strength and good that those seeming healthy are then understood to be unwell. Now if these are turned to kings by arragance than what are they that are sons of the kingdom? But the sons of Babylon have kings and if their king of kings is the devil than by what reason do they not consider with prudence what they do? But reality is good for war in prudence and such is offered by the kingdom of heaven because Mala and Ria are one in this. But if they mock because they do not believe than what can be said to change their hearts? But they will be what they are and if they have desired war than the fear of God is able to give them back prosperity. But those who would wage war against God are for the lake of fire and likewise for those who in a Luke-warm way disregard serious things as if they were not serious. Now if any is desiring peace can it come when one has attacked those of the kingdom of Heaven? But God is not uncaring for His children. Now if you say that Babylon will save you than you know already and must that it does not have the power, for if such rebellion is against the beautiful than how much more outrageous when it is against God. Now the beautiful are honouring God that the existence of Absolom is known to be a lie because he did what is not beautiful and such is the true story to the Elsnon which the Elsnon know to be a thing of shame because such is impossible. Now let the guilt be with the Jews for this thing but if any is becoming ugly than let it not be for the Jews but let them not deny it is their guilt, for the guilt that was for the Jews will bring them to the devil that they might be delivered to being ugly by what was done by another even if it was worse than what they have done. Now I write about spiritual things in this place and what the apostal has said and meant I do not know, for I am not with the power to know what he meant. But if any would use such to sow discord with the Jews than they do not do my will and I would want it to be acceptable.
Now those giving Babylon have wronged the miserable who has come to having nothing, and deceived them in any place, and therefore a recompense of justice is just, only Christianity is to be found with it that iniquity be purged with the actions of truth. Now if such a spiritual war is fought than the war is good and it is called a primary justice, being that such is acceptable. Now if any of Babylon would lead any astray it is for exaulting itself with arragance when such is done, because envy has demanded a deed. Now if any are wishing war than let a weapon of truth and light cause them to turn to dust a little that they might know that the scorching of eternal hell is worse for them. But if there kind is using rillet than they will know that hell is not without pain and that God cannot tricked, for they only fear God a little. Now amongst their own if they are kings in arragance by which they become kings than you know that wisdom has hated such arragance but men cannot judge it, but only insolence. Now if any of them should wish for serious things against the saints than if they do so as sport they will be judged by that which fears God that their arragance and strength might turn mocking to truth within them when they are thought for, where they showed that they would rather choose lies. For God’s judgement can destroy lies and casts out insolence and gives strength and good that those seeming healthy are then understood to be unwell. Now if these are turned to kings by arragance than what are they that are sons of the kingdom? But the sons of Babylon have kings and if their king of kings is the devil than by what reason do they not consider with prudence what they do? But reality is good for war in prudence and such is offered by the kingdom of heaven because Mala and Ria are one in this. But if they mock because they do not believe than what can be said to change their hearts? But they will be what they are and if they have desired war than the fear of God is able to give them back prosperity. But those who would wage war against God are for the lake of fire and likewise for those who in a Luke-warm way disregard serious things as if they were not serious. Now if any is desiring peace can it come when one has attacked those of the kingdom of Heaven? But God is not uncaring for His children. Now if you say that Babylon will save you than you know already and must that it does not have the power, for if such rebellion is against the beautiful than how much more outrageous when it is against
 God. Now the beautiful are honouring God that the existence of Absolom is known to be a lie because he did what is not beautiful and such is the true story to the Elsnon which the Elsnon know to be a thing of shame because such is impossible. Now let the guilt be with the Jews for this thing but if any is becoming ugly than let it not be for the Jews but let them not deny it is their guilt, for the guilt that was for the Jews will bring them to the devil that they might be delivered to being ugly by what was done by another even if it was worse than what they have done. Now I write about spiritual things in this place and what the apostal has said and meant I do not know, for I am not with the power to know what he meant. But if any would use such to sow discord with the Jews than they do not do my will and I would want it to be acceptable.
Now those giving Babylon have wronged the miserable who has come to having nothing, and deceived them in any place, and therefore a recompense of justice is just, only Christianity is to be found with it that iniquity be purged with the actions of truth. Now if such a spiritual war is fought than the war is good and it is called a primary justice, being that such is acceptable. Now if any of Babylon would lead any astray it is for exaulting itself with arragance when such is done, because envy has demanded a deed. Now if any are wishing war than let a weapon of truth and light cause them to turn to dust a little that they might know that the scorching of eternal hell is worse for them. But if there kind is using rillet than they will know that hell is not without pain and that God cannot tricked, for they only fear God a little. Now amongst their own if they are kings in arragance by which they become kings than you know that wisdom has hated such arragance but men cannot judge it, but only insolence. Now if any of them should wish for serious things against the saints than if they do so as sport they will be judged by that which fears God that their arragance and strength might turn mocking to truth within them when they are thought for, where they showed that they would rather choose lies. For God’s judgement can destroy lies and casts out insolence and gives strength and good that those seeming healthy are then understood to be unwell. Now if these are turned to kings by arragance than what are they that are sons of the kingdom? But the sons of Babylon have kings and if their king of kings is the devil than by what reason do they not consider with prudence what they do? But reality is good for war in prudence and such is offered by the kingdom of heaven because Mala and Ria are one in this. But if they mock because they do not believe than what can be said to change their hearts? But they will be what they are and if they have desired war than the fear of God is able to give them back prosperity. But those who would wage war against God are for the lake of fire and likewise for those who in a Luke-warm way disregard serious things as if they were not serious. Now if any is desiring peace can it come when one has attacked those of the kingdom of Heaven? But God is not uncaring for His children. Now if you say that Babylon will save you than you know already and must that it does not have the power, for if such rebellion is against the beautiful than how much more outrageous when it is against God. Now the beautiful are honouring God that the existence of Absolom is known to be a lie because he did what is not beautiful and such is the true story to the Elsnon which the Elsnon know to be a thing of shame because such is impossible. Now let the guilt be with the Jews for this thing but if any is becoming ugly than let it not be for the Jews but let them not deny it is their guilt, for the guilt that was for the Jews will bring them to the devil that they might be delivered to being ugly by what was done by another even if it was worse than what they have done. Now I write about spiritual things in this place and what the apostal has said and meant I do not know, for I am not with the power to know what he meant. But if any would use such to sow discord with the Jews than they do not do my will and I would want it to be acceptable.
Now those giving Babylon have wronged the miserable who has come to having nothing, and deceived them in any place, and therefore a recompense of justice is just, only Christianity is to be found with it that iniquity be purged with the actions of truth. Now if such a spiritual war is fought than the war is good and it is called a primary justice, being that such is acceptable. Now if any of Babylon would lead any astray it is for exaulting itself with arragance when such is done, because envy has demanded a deed. Now if any are wishing war than let a weapon of truth and light cause them to turn to dust a little that they might know that the scorching of eternal hell is worse for them. But if there kind is using rillet than they will know that hell is not without pain and that God cannot tricked, for they only fear God a little. Now amongst their own if they are kings in arragance by which they become kings than you know that wisdom has hated such arragance but men cannot judge it, but only insolence. Now if any of them should wish for serious things against the saints than if they do so as sport they will be judged by that which fears God that their arragance and strength might turn mocking to truth within them when they are thought for, where they showed that they would rather choose lies. For God’s judgement can destroy lies and casts out insolence and gives strength and good that those seeming healthy are then understood to be unwell. Now if these are turned to kings by arragance than what are they that are sons of the kingdom? But the sons of Babylon have kings and if their king of kings is the devil than by what reason do they not consider with prudence what they do? But reality is good for war in prudence and such is offered by the kingdom of heaven because Mala and Ria are one in this. But if they mock because they do not believe than what can be said to change their hearts? But they will be what they are and if they have desired war than the fear of God is able to give them back prosperity. But those who would wage war against God are for the lake of fire and likewise for those who in a Luke-warm way disregard serious things as if they were not serious. Now if any is desiring peace can it come when one has attacked those of the kingdom of Heaven? But God is not uncaring for His children. Now if you say that Babylon will save you than you know already and must that it does not have the power, for if such rebellion is against the beautiful than how much more outrageous when it is against God. Now the beautiful are honouring God that the existence of Absolom is known to be a lie because he did what is not beautiful and such is the true story to the Elsnon which the Elsnon know to be a thing of shame because such is impossible. Now let the guilt be with the Jews for this thing but if any is becoming ugly than let it not be for the Jews but let them not deny it, for the guilt that was for the Jews will bring them to the devil that they might be delivered to being ugly by what was done by another even if it was worse than what they have done. 
Now those giving Babylon have wronged the miserable who has come to having nothing, and deceived them in any place, and therefore a recompense of justice is just, only Christianity is to be found with it that iniquity be purged with the actions of truth. Now if such a spiritual war is fought than the war is good and it is called a primary justice, being that such is acceptable. Now if any of Babylon would lead any astray it is for exaulting itself with arragance when such is done, because envy has demanded a deed. Now if any are wishing war than let a weapon of truth and light cause them to turn to dust a little that they might know that the scorching of eternal hell is worse for them. But if there kind is using rillet than they will know that hell is not without pain and that God cannot tricked, for they only fear God a little. Now amongst their own if they are kings in arragance by which they become kings than you know that wisdom has hated such arragance but men cannot judge it, but only insolence. Now if any of them should wish for serious things against the saints than if they do so as sport they will be judged by that which fears God that their arragance and strength might turn mocking to truth within them when they are thought for, where they showed that they would rather choose lies. For God’s judgement can destroy lies and casts out insolence and gives strength and good that those seeming healthy are then understood to be unwell. Now if these are turned to kings by arragance than what are they that are sons of the kingdom? But the sons of Babylon have kings and if their king of kings is the devil than by what reason do they not consider with prudence what they do? But reality is good for war in prudence and such is offered by the kingdom of heaven because Mala and Ria are one in this. But if they mock because they do not believe than what can be said to change their hearts? But they will be what they are and if they have desired war than the fear of God is able to give them back prosperity. But those who would wage war against God are for the lake of fire and likewise for those who in a Luke-warm way disregard serious things as if they were not serious. Now if any is desiring peace can it come when one has attacked those of the kingdom of Heaven? But God is not uncaring for His children. Now if you say that Babylon will save you than you know already and must that it does not have the power, for if such rebellion is against the beautiful than how much more outrageous when it is against God. Now the
 beautiful are honouring God that the existence of Absolom is known to be a lie because he did what is not beautiful and such is the true story to the Elsnon which the Elsnon know to be a thing of shame because such is impossible. Now let the guilt be with the Jews for this thing but if any is becoming ugly than let it not be for the Jews but let them not deny it is their guilt, for the guilt that was for the Jews will bring them to the devil that they might be delivered to being ugly by what was done by another even if it was worse than what they have done. Now I write about spiritual things in this place and what the apostal has said and meant I do not know, for I am not with the power to know what he meant. But if any would use such to sow discord with the Jews than they do not do my will and I would want it to be acceptable.
Now those giving Babylon have wronged the miserable who has come to having nothing, and deceived them in any place, and therefore a recompense of justice is just, only Christianity is to be found with it that iniquity be purged with the actions of truth. Now if such a spiritual war is fought than the war is good and it is called a primary justice, being that such is acceptable. Now if any of Babylon would lead any astray it is for exaulting itself with arragance when such is done, because envy has demanded a deed. Now if any are wishing war than let a weapon of truth and light cause them to turn to dust a little that they might know that the scorching of eternal hell is worse for them. But if there kind is using rillet than they will know that hell is not without pain and that God cannot tricked, for they only fear God a little. Now amongst their own if they are kings in arragance by which they become kings than you know that wisdom has hated such arragance but men cannot judge it, but only insolence. Now if any of them should wish for serious things against the saints than if they do so as sport they will be judged by that which fears God that their arragance and strength might turn mocking to truth within them when they are thought for, where they showed that they would rather choose lies. For God’s judgement can destroy lies and casts out insolence and gives strength and good that those seeming healthy are then understood to be unwell.
Now those in a cowardly deed to be attaining money consistently are not knowing righteousness anymore unless they are having the yoke of God’s kingdoms. Now some have thought that those of the Lord’s kingdoms should now to them because they are servants by His kingdom, and yet the yoke of their cowardly deeds by which they live consistently, has blinded them and they are not knowing righteousness, that a bitterness has happened because of the yoke.
Now those in a cowardly deed to be attaining money consistently are not knowing righteousness anymore unless they are having the yoke of God’s kingdoms. Now some have thought that those of the Lord’s kingdoms should now to them because they are servants by His kingdom, and yet the yoke of their cowardly deeds by which they live consistently, has blinded them and they are not knowing righteousness, that a bitterness has happened because of the yoke.
Now those not Enoch or human and Enochs are are human have no throne and no special dwelling place in Mala, for they are having only what Babel has said they have. For the serpent has said, you will be as gods, because it was deception, and yet God has provided and the angel gives wisdom, for God has provided the heavens and the Earth, and He is all wise and all powerful. Now the Christ is His son who is over all.
Now those not Enoch or human and Enochs are are human have no throne and no special dwelling place in Mala, for they are having only what Babel has said they have. For the serpent has said, you will be as gods, because it was deception, and yet God has provided and the angel gives wisdom, for God has provided the heavens and the Earth, and He is all wise and all powerful. Now the Christ is His son who is over all.
Now those not Enoch or human and Enochs are are human have no throne and no special dwelling place in Mala, for they are having only what Babel has said they have. For the serpent has said, you will be as gods, because it was deception, and yet God has provided and the angel gives wisdom, for God has provided the heavens and the Earth, and He is all wise and all powerful. Now the Christ is His son who is over all.
Now those not Enoch or human and Enochs are are human have no throne and no special dwelling place in Mala, for they are having only what Babel has said they have. For the serpent has said, you will be as gods, because it was deception, and yet God has provided and the angel gives wisdom, for God has provided the heavens and the Earth, and He is all wise and all powerful. Now the Christ is His son who is over all.
Now those not Enoch or human and Enochs are are human have no throne and no special dwelling place in Mala, for they are having only what Babel has said they have. For the seer pant has said, you will be as gods, because it was deception, and yet God has provided and the angel gives wisdom, for God has provided the heavens and the Earth, and He is all wise and all powerful. Now the Christ is His son who is over all.
Now those of Babel who build for understanding among people and how they are able to think, they have not yet brought their understanding to what the average person understands without making effort, for to reason with such stones they have built with is to still be behind in many ways from the average person, and yet they use what they have to organize and produce reasons for guesses which has yielded for them many excellent results, for there is merit to the impairment, and there can be benefit to the organization of things even if it brings about the impairment.
Now those of the devil are using the schools of combat found in Sodom and Gomorrah and the two schools are both judged to be destroyed, that the school of combat, known as Sodomy, is judged to be destroyed as the school of combat, Gomorrah combat, is also judged to be destroyed. Now are there not other wicked schools of combat, and they come from those who are inclined to them, but the schools of combat of those things that please God, these are with the light, the truth, and those who are God’s are able to be victorious, for does not what is good exceed what is wicked?
Now those too simple cannot be doing anything for change because they devour the good with the wicked.
Now those too simple cannot be doing anything for change because they devour the good with the wicked.
Now those unwilling to return to poverty are those not comparible to a son or daughter of the kingdom, but those unwilling to return to such poverty are servants and disloyal and treacherous of heart. So let them be understood to be something unwell.
Now those who are blocking the experience of life occurring are those who are not keeping to their own lives, and yet a little ruins the city and there is wind with nothing. Now if you would help any you must undo the strength of the Luke-warm you meet that they will reject you and send you back for their apathy is much and strong. But a listening ear is for good and a covert one is at first despised, but you must be willing to be rejected that judgement might come, that justice is not believing in resistance. Now if such is the case with a people than they are only acting with a terrifying faith present, and such is not necessary. But if any is abused you are fearing God and not apathetic against Him. For the angel is not this. But if any is missing comprehension is it because of iniquity present? But what is more is seeming disagreeable? Now if greatness is more than for what cause do you hate the Jews? But if any people is attempting to convert you by proximities than you are well, and if any is saying friend, that you have walls and ways to speak. Now Romans are unwell it has been considered and yet the remain back and wash their hands. Now I wash my hands of what is not from God and the Christ. But I would almost believe Romans would be Jews. Now if none has need of the spirits from the mountain in hell because we have better things than grievances and foolishness are abounding.
Now those who are blocking the experience of life occurring are those who are not keeping to their own lives, and yet a little ruins the city and there is wind with nothing. Now if you would help any you must undo the strength of the Luke-warm you meet that they will reject you and send you back for their apathy is much and strong. But a listening ear is for good and a covert one is at first despised, but you must be willing to be rejected that judgement for them might come, that justice for them is not believing in resistance. Now if such is the case with a people than they are only acting with a terrifying faith present, and such is not necessary. But if any is abused you are fearing God and not apathetic against Him. For the angel is not this. But if any is missing comprehension is it because of iniquity present? But what is more is seeming disagreeable? Now if greatness is more than for what cause do you hate the Jews? But if any people is attempting to convert you by proximities than you are well, and if any is saying friend, that you have walls and ways to speak. Now Romans are unwell it has been considered and yet they remain back and wash their hands. Now I wash my hands of what is not from God and the Christ. But I would almost believe Romans would be Jews except it is not good to be apathetic that you might rely upon a trust that is with apathy and lack of concern, for twice it is said. Now if none has need of the spirits from the mountain in hell because we have better things than grievances and foolishness are abounding, than there is agreance. But
 it is known that there is another, and not Roman, being Luke-warm and bullying those who attempt to attain aid for others who are being abused, and these are apathetic to anything and bullying with apathetic words that God’s will might not be done. For when you go to them they will speak words of apathy to bully and dismiss and they will escalate when you have made known the truth that they would rather die and all their family they would give to death rather than allow God’s work to happen, to attain aid for a person.
Now those who are meant to be combat soldiers are combat soldiers and they do not decide where the combat is and who will be fought, that it is good for them to have the army and its generals that they not be lost in confusion.
Now those who are teredactoes are indeed able at times to swoop down on Enochs and yet Enochs are able to have great prudence in this way, for the teredacto is considered when it is not yet seen. But if soldiers of cities should flee from an Enoch, for there are such in Enoch’s land and it is suffered, and yet if other Enochs abandon, saying let the tetedacto attack, let the soldiers of Babylon take one of our own, indeed the thing is considered wicked. Now an Enoch can fight a teredacto and very well, for if the Enoch is ready to fight and staying on their guard for battle, how will a teredacto do much of anything to them, for an Enoch is faster and stronger usually.
Now those who are wicked, let them be wicked still, those who are the devil’s let them be the devil’s and his soldiers and people, that the time for fighting those determined who have the right to choose, have chosen, that they not be molested and attacked with swords in this way to force them to come to another side, for such is killing when a person thrusts a sword to change a person, and the sword will not be thrust for this reason, to convert, for the sword is to slay, to do battle, when there is war, for if they attempt to slay with guile they are slayed with guile of a pure metal forged in truth, and if they fire iniquitious arrows they will receive a volley of arrows with pure metals forged in truth, and if they set fire of unclean flame, they will receive waves of light that engulf them, and if they attack with sodomy, which is a catagory of perversities of words and actions, than they are to be slayn with guile, and the people will stone them with arrows and swords. For those who attack when there is no battle ground, attacking at places of peace are attacking with sodomy, for the Gentiles and Jews, call it what it is not, and yet sodomy is a type of disgust and school of the devil, for it is a school of filthy and perverted combat, and those who seperate man and woman, with attacking in what is not of their place, are sometimes being perverted and attempting to seperate what is of the ground of peace and not of the battle field, that they commiting sodomy, for those using the combat of sodomy are sodomites. Now those attacking on grounds that are for the happenings of peace defile and profane, for they are already with the sodomite spirit.
Now those who do not have a sane sense of their territory are being offensive and ruining peace, but those people who want peace have placed the fence along their borders, and the war is made short and easy when the true enemy is identified.
Now those who exhault the wickedness of another are often doing it as if they are concealed in this thing, for they hear and partner in war and speak as if their words are concealed, but an Enoch does not do so whether man or woman. For if they speak such, their hearts were already prior in trechory to conceal war and hate, and the war and hate has been long for them, for they conceal all and are in fear of open war. Now if they are Babylon than know that those of Babylon will partner with dragons and evil beasts that are attacking Enochs, Elsnon, Jews, every people that Babylon hates.
Now those who seek to mutilate and destroy and defile and desecrate what is pure are sicophants and there are pedophiles who are such, but I do not attribute this to anything that is not wrong, but acceptable, for that is another thing. Now you are not a simple people grasping at words and phrases and using them when there is what you do not know to use it where it does not apply, for you know the truth, and if you do not know, than you know what is right. Now I give no wisdom to be used for evil and so I am for speaking against the accusation where it does not have application in some thing and being without any wisdom I have given in those times to be to it as you would have been without any words from me.
Now those who seek to mutilate and destroy what is pure are sicophants and there are pedophiles who are such, but I do not attribute this to anything that is not wrong, but acceptable, for that is another thing. Now you are not a simple people grasping at words and phrases and using them when there is what you do not know to use it where it does not apply, for you know the truth, and if you do not know, than you know what is right. Now I give no wisdom to be used for evil and so I am for speaking against the accusation where it does not have application in some thing and being without any wisdom I have given in those times to be to it as you would have been without any words from me.
Now those who were strong to love ignorance were of the top, being the third shelf of the mountain in hell and they were for denigration as if they were possessing superiority by substance of truth, and they were ugly and unable to be a high thing, and they dwelt in the second shelf to be as if with righteous zeol to denegrate with ignorance rather than to use truth. Now these were strong in their integrity in which they maintained such ignorance and they fought with the devil that they might be cut down before holy ones of light.
Now those who work together are brother and sister and those who dwell there in man and woman of marriage are causing great calamity, for there is great trouble and all manner of confusion in this that wars take place. For if it is man and woman than one must leave and the other remain, but if it is kept brother and sister, it is the place for it.
Now those who would seem blind are not blind to what they must see for even if it was so, none is innocent because of blindness. But if any is plucking out their sight many times a day, attempting ignorance are they not like those rejecting God in favour of the lies of a cult of the devil’s. Now those acting in conformity to lies are like a soldier of the devil’s who is attacking others, and indeed they are. Now what conforms to lies is trusting in the devil’s strength and what is trusting God is mantaining righteousness that is reasonable because the Lord is God. Now the one who does wrong and is reasoning it is not, is that person impairing themselves that they conform to a lie. Now if any tribe on Earth is truly conforming to a lie than do not think they are better, for they are attempting mild themselves among your people and their whole tribe is separate and conforming to a lie, that these are not compatible with truth, so that it does not need to be said that I do not write of any shade of person. But Christians and Jews are both conforming to truth and the Elsnon cannot survive without the Christ, but they are supportive of truth that they are not a tribe of Israel but a neighbouring people far off and yet not out of knowledge for their distance. Now so far as the young are not speaking any lie about the other there is no offence and the pety bickering and games of the young are expected that the elders of Israel and the Elsnon have said let them not bruise each other, but it is benificial that we are being just to both to take fulfillment seriously that the people can dwell with each other when they do. Now if any seeks to take from God and Avram in speech are they not speaking unjustly, and like-wise of taking away from God, the Elsnon, that there is also the Christ there, though it is not mentioned against the Jews. Now among Jews you are God’s and in keeping with good you are also the Christ’s and let him who has understanding read it and understand. Now if you are God’s among the Jews know that the priest of God’s, the lord of Salam has fought with Avram and the two have aided each other. 
Now though you make threats against the man of the lake of fire he does not hear you, for from man he does not hear, and he regards no rebuke or threat, and a man’s judgement cannot reach him, for he is not in the realm of understanding and sense of man.
Now though you make threats against the man of the lake of fire he does not hear you, for from man he does not hear, and he regards no rebuke or threat, and a man’s judgement cannot reach him, for he is not in the realm of understanding and sense of man.
Now three renegade kings have been on Earth against the Jews. The king with those of fair skin has been against them, the king with those who are Arabs and Persians, the king with those of a place with many gods. Now there are others. As for those of self hate who are ugly they are against humanity. Now which of these desires to preserve and does not act against any? Now which of these groups does not meddle? Now which does not destabilize a country? For the ones who partner with the devil have sought the lives of the anointed at times, and the Luke-warm is for turning their back when there is murder. Those who meddle have been encroaching and those who destabilize have cost much for a nation. Now Christians need the Jews to live and if the Christians should vanish than who is the king of Israel to be? But if the children of a father have produced children and children’s children than how many of these are with cults of the devil? Now what matches substance is acceptable and good and what does not
 causes the heart to tumble and turn. But if any is hating themselves and with self pity than the truth of reason is not of value to them in what they do. Now if the heart tumbles and turns at what only is, than what manner of heart does a person have? Now what is sweat as honey and yet makes the stomach sick? But if any is for truth than let them read. Now if any is watching than they are comparible to a tree that had fruit when the Christ came, and you have been told that he is coming again. Now what miracle will God perform for you that you might believe? But if Mala and Ria are one than will you not know? Now if your children are prophesying will you not know? But if you are watching you may also know that a belief in God is reasonable.
Now to all the future: if a generation comes forth to kill all their children you are commanded to live. I give you this command without a command from any. 
Now to attack the sick is not the same as being in contention with a person on the road, but the way they deny understanding is in some cases deceiving even themselves.
Now to be an Elsnon a person must be a Christian, believing in the Christ and that He is the son of God who died for our sins. For the Elsnon cannot survive forever if not having the Christ, because the war goes on and the Christ must be there. Now I would recommend to the Elsnon that they seek those translations of the bible that will render to them more accuracy for the purpose of gaining wisdom. Now if the two books that are one book that are written by me are translated to another language the originals will be preserved in a prudent and safe way, and if any should alter the religion than you would be doing well to know of it, only I do not desire that separations should occur due to those matters that can be resolved. Now I have been like John the Baptist who was Elijah who came to Earth, being born and being able to perish as Elijah would, before being rescued to Heaven, and such is the case of all the saints, that they are taken to Heaven. Now the mother of Jesus conceived without a father and with Elijah this is not claimed in the scripture and I have considered it wrong to compare myself to the Christ in this matter. But if it should be understood that what is in Heaven can come to Earth in this way, I would have you be of common sense in how you deal with such a concept, not being guilable when there is no larger cause to believe it is so. But if any come they are the same as if not until they attained what they would by God in their life on Earth, and not what they were before their birth on Earth. Now he said, I am not the Christ and at a later time He said, I am. Let the wise explain these matters that you understand that a person does not claim to be something and people believe in a guilable fashion. Now if any says they are an angel then let it be so, but if it is not, than what do they speak? But I would have you then say, so am I, which is better than to say, no, and degrade. For an angel will know it and is for fullfilling.
Now to be an Elsnon a person must be a Christian, believing in the Christ and that He is the son of God who died for our sins. For the Elsnon cannot survive forever if not having the Christ, because the war goes on and the Christ must be there. Now I would recommend to the Elsnon that they seek those translations of the bible that will render to them more accuracy for the purpose of gaining wisdom. Now if the two books that are one book that are written by me are translated to another language the originals will be preserved in a prudent and safe way, and if any should alter the religion than you would be doing well to know of it, only I do not desire that separations should occur due to those matters that can be resolved. Now I have been like John the Baptist who was Elijah who came to Earth, being born and being able to perish as Elijah would, before being rescued to Heaven, and such is the case of all the saints, that they are taken to Heaven. Now the mother of Jesus conceived without a father and with Elijah this is not claimed in the scripture and I have considered it wrong to compare myself to the Christ in this matter. But if it should be understood that what is in Heaven can come to Earth in this way, I would have you be of common sense in how you deal with such a concept, not being guilable when there is no larger cause to believe it is so. But if any come they are the same as if not until they attained what they would by God in their life on Earth, and not what they were before their birth on Earth.
Now to be an Elsnon a person must be a Christian, believing in the Christ and that He is the son of God who died for our sins. For the Elsnon cannot survive forever if not having the Christ, because the war goes on and the Christ must be there. Now I would recommend to the Elsnon that they seek those translations of the bible that will render to them more accuracy for the purpose of gaining wisdom. Now if the two books that are one book that are written by me are translated to another language the originals will be preserved in a prudent and safe way, and if any should alter the religion than you would be doing well to know of it, only I do not desire that separations should occur due to those matters that can be resolved. Now I have been like John the Baptist who was Elijah who came to Earth, being born and being able to perish as Elijah would, before being rescued to Heaven, and such is the case of all the saints, that they are taken to Heaven. Now the mother of Jesus conceived without a father and with Elijah this is not claimed in the scripture and I have considered it wrong to compare myself to the Christ in this matter. But if it should be understood that what is in Heaven can come to Earth in this way, I would have you be of common sense in how you deal with such a concept, not being guilable when there is no larger cause to believe it is so. But if any come they are the same as if not until they attained what they would by God in their life on Earth, and not what they were before their birth on Earth. Now he said, I am not the Christ and at a later time He said, I am. Let the wise explain these matters that you understand that a person does not claim to be something and people believe in a guilable fashion. Now if any says they are an angel then let it be so, but if it is not, than what do they speak? But I would have you then say, so am I, which is better than to say, no, and degrade. For an angel will know it and is for fullfilling. Now if any will not save your life, but will kill you if it is safe to do so, or if they have a chance in which there is risk, and another says it cannot be so, are either to be trusted? But you are not a simple people easily deceived, and the landscape is much like lightning and bandits and open plains of desert and rocks where men bear swords and knives and there are no soldiers to protect any. Know that in such a place you are of a people who are capable of much. For if you are in a city of fire, iron, and dungeons where many innocent are cast into prison than know that there, too, you are a capable people and that you should be exercising wisdom so as not to test your people as one who turns stones to bread, and relies upon sin to save them. But if you are requiring aid than know that it is right for your people to help you, for you are of a beautiful people.
Now to be an Elsnon a person must be a Christian, believing in the Christ and that He is the son of God who died for our sins. For the Elsnon cannot survive forever if not having the Christ, because the war goes on and the Christ must be there. Now I would recommend to the Elsnon that they seek those translations of the bible that will render to them more accuracy for the purpose of gaining wisdom. Now if the two books that are one book that are written by me are translated to another language the originals will be preserved in a prudent and safe way, and if any should alter the religion than you would be doing well to know of it, only I do not desire that separations should occur due to those matters that can be resolved. Now I have been like John the Baptist who was Elijah who came to Earth, being born and being able to perish as Elijah would, before being rescued to Heaven, and such is the case of all the saints, that they are taken to Heaven. Now the mother of Jesus conceived without a father and with Elijah this is not claimed in the scripture and I have considered it wrong to compare myself to the Christ in this matter. But if it should be understood that what is in Heaven can come to Earth in this way, I would have you be of common sense in how you deal with such a concept, not being guilable when there is no larger cause to believe it is so. But if any come they are the same as if not until they attained what they would by God in their life on Earth, and not what they were before their birth on Earth. Now he said, I am not the Christ and at a later time He said, I am. Let the wise explain these matters that you understand that a person does not claim to be something and people believe in a guilable fashion. Now if any says they are an angel then let it be so, but if it is not, than what do they speak? But I would have you then say, so am I, which is better than to say, no, and degrade. For an angel will know it and is for fullfilling.
Now to incur favour, to please God, for myself and not for another, the angel tenderly loved, did the Christ actually say what men have assumed when they seem to believe He was offensive or even lieing, or is a closer look required, or a correct translation. For all I offer is not interpretation but aid in comprehension for what has no other interpretation, to mention that your lack of time or your expediancy at something has offered most of you assumptions that are not there,
 because I will not even blame the language you use. But what is given is sufficient for you and if you are for understanding than you know the limits of a command and limit of a phrase, that you understand your own language. But I would think you have become impatient and you have been given scripture for consideration. Now let it be known that it is an angel tenderly loved who offers you nothing but what I desire. Yet I do not offer anything here but defense of the Christ and would it be required? But I do not defend Him against you but against those who speak more and with rebellion as if to go to war with God, and you I do not defend Him against but you are to be defended. Now because the devil’s devices are mixed in the accusations towards Him I am for defending, only is He not defended in this way for your sake who He died for? But is the angel capable of saving you when he is commanded by Him that can save you? But no man can rebel against the angel because the angel is not His god. Now if the angel is in no way his lord than is he not one who is honoured among you, and he is not then like an elder? But if he is not an elder than he is like it, being a man. Now if you ask of me will you not in some matters ask of him? But you are a people who honour Mala first and Ria second and you know what is right.
Now to incur favour, to please God, for myself and not for another, the angel tenderly loved, did the Christ actually say what men have assumed when they seem to believe He was offensive or even lieing, or is a closer look required, or a correct translation. For all I offer is not interpretation but aid in comprehension for what has no other interpretation, to mention that your lack of time or your expediancy at something has offered most of you assumptions that are not there, because I will not even blame the language you use. But what is given is sufficient for you and if you are for understanding than you know the limits of a command and limit of a phrase, that you understand your own language. But I would think you have become impatient and you have been given scripture for consideration. Now let it be known that it is an angel tenderly loved who offers you nothing but what I desire.
Now to incur favour, to please God, for myself and not for another, the angel tenderly loved, did the Christ actually say what men have assumed when they seem to believe He was offensive or even lieing, or is a closer look required, or a correct translation. For all I offer is not interpretation but aid in comprehension for what has no other interpretation, to mention that your lack of time or your expediancy at something has offered most of you assumptions that are not there, because I will not even blame the language you use. But what is given is sufficient for you and if you are for understanding than you know the limits of a command and limit of a phrase, that you understand your own language. But I would think you have become impatient and you have been given scripture for consideration. Now let it be known that it is an angel tenderly loved who offers you nothing but what I desire. Yet I do not offer anything here but defense of the Christ and would it be required? But I do not defend Him against you but against those who speak more and with rebellion as if to go to war with God, and you I do not defend Him against but you are to be defended. Now because the devil’s devices are mixed in the accusations towards Him I am for defending, only is He not defended in this way for your sake who He died for? But is the angel capable of saving you when he is commanded by Him that can save you? But no man can rebel against the angel because the angel is not His god. Now if the angel is in no way his lord than is he not one who is honoured among you, and he is not then like an elder? But if he is not an elder than he is like it, being a man. Now if you ask of me will you not in some matters ask of him? But you are a people who honour Mala first and Ria second and you know what is right.
Now to intimidate with Babylon and membership in it is called erissing. Now to speak of Babylon as reality whole as a just world including it is called fangletting. Now to commit intimidation as if a traitor soldier come to your camp from Babylon, the likes of which Joab slew is called weasel hanging. Now to bully with Babylon that is luck and chance and yet the devil’s hand in choosing who is permitted and who is spit out, is called weasel bullying. 
Now to intimidate with Babylon and membership in it is called erissing. Now to speak of Babylon as reality whole as a just world including it is called fangletting. Now to commit intimidation as if a traitor soldier come to your camp from Babylon, the likes of which Joab slew is called weasel hanging. Now to bully with Babylon that is luck and chance and yet the devil’s hand in choosing who is permitted and who is spit out, is called weasel bullying. 
Now to test is to attack, and yet to make oneself appearing with weakness to draw enemies and count them is not a thing easily explained with another reason. Now those who love endure all things that are valid to be endured, that it is inevitable, for such is true love. Now love has respect that is right, that the two are together, and it endured for it outlasts all by infinite degree for it excels beyond measure the tests of endurance. But to whom much is given in a matter much is expected, that the one casting away an exceeding thing is brought lower and worse than the one who kept consistently to foolishness, for they will rise up and condemn for they were never given so much of what is good. For these are Jacob’s elder brother who cast away their inheritance. Now angels have prior betrayed God and joined the devil, casting away dwelling places to do what is foolish, and they are kept in a worse place than people. But is not the one blessed most being given the greatest and furthest worsening if they are betraying, whereby the foolish woman is wise in comparison who took to combat, who preferred iniquity, for she is called honest, innocent, for she too has been wronged and she has followed foolishness at that time with a pure heart, for Joab even, trusted and a friend, is becoming an injury and wound to David in treachery and the king’s lips did not err, for the blood of two righteous and better fell upon Joab in that day because of treachery because of the betrayal that him given most could not be spared, and yet he is able to be made righteous in his ascension, but for others it is not always so, for they have done worse, that which Joab did not do.
Now to test is to attack, and yet to make oneself appearing with weakness to draw enemies and count them is not a thing easily explained with another reason. Now those who love endure all things that are valid to be endured, that it is inevitable, for such is true love. Now love has respect that is right, that the two are together, and it endured for it outlasts all by infinite degree for it excels beyond measure the tests of endurance. But to whom much is given in a matter much is expected, that the one casting away an exceeding thing is brought lower and worse than the one who kept consistently to foolishness, for they will rise up and condemn for they were never given so much of what is good. For these are Jacob’s elder brother who cast away their inheritance. Now angels have prior betrayed God and joined the devil, casting away dwelling places to do what is foolish, and they are kept in a worse place than people. But is not the one blessed most being given the greatest and furthest worsening if they are betraying, whereby the foolish woman is wise in comparison who took to combat, who preferred iniquity, for she is called honest, innocent, for she too has been wronged and she has followed foolishness at that time with a pure heart, for Joab even, trusted and a friend, is becoming an injury and wound to David in treachery and the king’s lips did not err, for the blood of two righteous and better fell upon Joab in that day because of treachery because of the betrayal that him given most could not be spared, and yet he is able to be made righteous in his ascension, but for others it is not always so, for they have done worse, that which Joab did not do.
Now to test is to attack, and yet to make oneself appearing with weakness to draw enemies and count them is not a thing easily explained with another reason. Now those who love endure all things that are valid to be endured, that it is inevitable, for such is true love. Now love has respect that is right, that the two are together, and it endured for it outlasts all by infinite degree for it excels beyond measure the tests of endurance. But to whom much is given in a matter much is expected, that the one casting away an exceeding thing is brought lower and worse than the one who kept consistently to foolishness, for they will rise up and condemn for they were never given so much of what is good. For these are Jacob’s elder brother who cast away their inheritance. Now angels have prior betrayed God and joined the devil, casting away dwelling places to do what is foolish, and they are kept in a worse place than people. But is not the one blessed most being given the greatest and furthest worsening if they are betraying, whereby the foolish woman is wise in comparison who took to combat, who preferred iniquity, for she is called honest, innocent, for she too has been wronged and she has followed foolishness at that time with a pure heart, for Joab even, trusted and a friend, is becoming an injury and wound to David in treachery and the king’s lips did not err, for the blood of two righteous and better fell upon Joab in that day because of treachery because of the betrayal that him given most could not be spared, and yet he is able to be made righteous in his
 ascension, but for others it is not always so, for they have done worse, doing that which Joab did not do.
Now to the second son of Orgoth: unjust zeal: devouring fairness, devouring truth, devouring patience, devouring self-control, devouring love, devouring integrity
Now to what am I comparing some of these? But a child has said you give me water but no salt, you walk with me but you do not skip.
Now two nations have not, many, been worshiping God, and there have been idols and other gods, and yet I have not been given to mention idols or other gods concerning them, so that it is removed here where it is stated, as if not. For they have both chosen other paths to avoid what could have been, and the uncircumcised Israel is having more Babylon, that they have not avoided it by some other means, so that the nation that would acknowledge God has brought much Babylon, and they did not truly acknowledge other gods, for by wisdom it is not there. Now with Babylon and apathy of Rome, yet they are not seeming to have Rome, because Rome has spread elsewhere and it is viewing Jews in a denegrating fashion and has taken those who did evil to be heros, as if children of such, making them who did evil a cult. Now in apathy they are not ignorant but offer disrespect from great hate and the opposite of apathy, for they are persecuted within by what they would view as righteousness attacking, and such is found in places not as the uncircumcised Israel or places where God has not been given the greatest acknowledgement, but Rome is actually not for being good to Jews because they are only not meddling with the Christ and do they not give Him some honour because they perceive the Jews have been against Him? But they would perceive it so, and yet many Jews were believing in Him. Now to Rome I have at times been considered a Jew, and Babylon has hated me in many ways, and Orgoth has hated me.
Now ugly people have hated soldiers in times prior, for they have been with jelousy, being fickle-girls, and yet is it beautiful or ugly to despise those who have commited acts of bravery? Now those who are being ugly are ugly and this is known, being the second primary concept that can be added to all, that ugly people are ugly and when they would be liked they are not anymore when it is apparent that they are ugly. Now acts of valour are noble and praise-worthy, but if a person is then understood to be ugly they will have no obligation for you beyond what is right. But you are not to be ugly and nothing is required for me to say. But that you honour soldiers is good and right and part of what is good and right. For soldiers are going through many of the trials that the beautiful must deal with, and so I have given here honour to soldiers.
Now ugly people have hated soldiers in times prior, for they have been with jelousy, being fickle-girls, and yet is it beautiful or ugly to despise those who have commited acts of bravery? Now those who are being ugly are ugly and this is known, being the second primary concept that can be added to all, that ugly people are ugly and when they would be liked they are not anymore when it is apparent that they are ugly. Now acts of valour are noble and praise-worthy, but if a person is then understood to be ugly they will have no obligation for you beyond what is right. But you are not to be ugly and nothing is required for me to say. But that you honour soldiers is good and right and part of what is good and right. For soldiers are going through many of the trials that the beautiful must deal with, and so I have given here honour to soldiers.
Now ugly people have hated soldiers in times prior, for they have been with jelousy, being fickle-girls, and yet is it beautiful or ugly to despise those who have commited acts of bravery? Now those who are being ugly are ugly and this is known, being the second primary concept that can be added to all, that ugly people are ugly and when they would be liked they are not anymore when it is apparent that they are ugly. Now acts of valour are noble and praise-worthy, but if a person is then understood to be ugly they will have no obligation for you beyond what is right. But you are not to be ugly and nothing is required. But that you honour soldiers is good and right and part of what is good and right. For soldiers are going through many of the trials that the beautiful must deal with, and so I have given here honour to soldiers.
Now vengence is mine, is what the Lord says, who sees and hears and has power. Now even the rebel who says he does not exist is living according to truth, and yet others saying he does not exist are with Babylon, and others with Babylon not rebels for they are well-behaved citizens of Babylon and not well behaving of the Lord’s kingdoms. Now the Lord’s rebels are bringing war to Babylon like prophets with power and Babylon’s rebels who are against the Lord, what are they and what word do we call them? Now appoint the Lord’s kings over Babylon and defend them against the trechoury of those who will quickly attempt to dispense of them unless they choose some other tactic. Let the Lord’s kings eradicate the bad seed that is with the good, promote righteous and wise ones who are promoting integrity in times of wrath that they might be kings among kings. Do good works against wicked works and defend truth when it comes to the slander of the innocent even in lesser matters where there is consequence. Identify the wicked who are as if righteous. Give back the power to the righteous king who was cut off from power. Do not allow the strong hand to partner with wicked kings of the devil but if need be proclaim the truth in other ways. For the strong hand is not king and the angel is not king.
Now walking closer they are in obedience because they are fullfilling that God took him and from lands not yet over-run with those of Ahab, not yet the tangle of Babylon and yet does not one want peace for this and wellness and health because the tangle of Babylon is not yet come, and the land is green and there are flat spaces that the peace is dwelling upon the Earth, that many large creatures give tales of wise happening and where does it come from that the Christ is there, to know of those hateful things of Ahab and the ugly queen his wife, that she has repented at the Christ and his people are open, and is it so? For I have not looked into the loyalty of a wife of a wicked man, that she eggs him on, for he incarnates it with his evil, that he has reached out with evil, like a stalking predator he looks out, that he might covet things of God, and the Phareesees are with him, that he will slaughter the youths, the beloved and blessed, and he will devour with the trechories of violence, for he is exceedingly trechorous, and in all this mayham she eggs him on, for she is his wife, and loyal, and so does Enoch know of this already, for the jelousy is already with men, and already they covet what is good, that so I have pondered and desired to know a thing, inquiring at the early times when the world was much with mammels and birds, when the trees grew in forests over the Earth, that the closeness with nature might cause beasts to speak and trees to speak, that the great elm might speak because the people are few upon the Earth.
Now walking closer they are in obedience because they are fullfilling that God took him and from lands not yet over-run with those of Ahab, not yet the tangle of Babylon and yet does not one want peace for this and wellness and health because the tangle of Babylon is not yet come, and the land is green and there are flat spaces that the peace is dwelling upon the Earth, that many large creatures give tales of wise happening and where does it come from that the Christ is there, to know of those hateful things of Ahab and the ugly queen his wife, that she has repented at the Christ and his people are open, and is it so? For I have not looked into the loyalty of a wife of a wicked man, that she eggs him on, for he incarnates it with his evil, that he has reached out with evil, like a stalking predator he looks out, that he might covet things of God, and the Phareesees are with him, that he will slaughter the youths, the beloved and blessed, and he will devour with the trechories of violence, for he is exceedingly trechorous, and in all this mayham she eggs him on, for she is his wife, and so does Enoch know of this already, for the jelousy is already with men, and already they covet what is good, that so I have pondered and desired to know a thing, inquiring at the early times when the world was much with mammels and birds, when the trees grew in forests over the Earth, that the closeness with nature might cause beasts to speak and trees to speak, that the great elm might speak because the people are few upon the Earth.
Now was not Enoch a man like an angel? For he would have had a great world of nature with many animals and plants and the dragons and great birds and large trees like cathedrals with vines and moss and the dripping of water and the sound of moving creatures in the morning and the kindling of sparks for fire and clay pots and plates and the roasting of meats, the picking of herbs and fruit, the finding of eggs, the walking amongst deep greens of nature and dark shadows rich with what is like spice, and hills and great water-falls and lower mountains and deeper valleys and caves where he might have painted to commemorate and the rich mastadons who have much size that might have slightly disturbed his peace while he was studying nature and walking with God, so close that he ascended to be taken by Him. Now imagine the open pits to places beneath the Earth and the caves where bats would emerge with great fluttering and the rich expanses of forest and swamps and the alligators and crocodiles, large dragons, and the serpants and lizards,
 smaller dragons, and the caves for bears and the rivers where there were great pools and a world in which he might dwell in studying of nature, the happenings of people upon the Earth, for there were elephants and tigers and he might say in his heart, yet all this will come to pass after me, and these will be on Earth, for it is signs from God. Now the ants are being diligent and what comes from them is an empire little by little and yet the kingdom of heaven is a better empire. Now the grass-hopper devours when there is famine, and those in poverty are forming armies, are waging war. Now the owl is a hypocrite for it devours it’s own and is hateful. The eagle has snatched wisdom and feasted upon it and given it to its young, for the eagle is scouring the sky for what it might have, and it is good. The tiger has been with the wisdom of justice and war and that which is like the pillar of the temple that is dark, that the angel has wanted the woman of if he can, as a young one has a crush. Now what gold does the tiger take, but I am not knowing it. Now why is the elephant, being a creature of peace devoured by the justice and war of many lions, but it is taking much effort to destroy peace by them, for the peace is great. Now sheep are for the Shepard and the goats can dwell with or without one, but the sheep are not easily surviving without the Shepard. Now Gorillas are a strong people and righteous, for they dwell and greet and are like those who wrestle as friends, and the chimps a violent and mad group, and the great divide, as a sign, between the two types that are viewed like men and women. Now the foxes are crafty, and they are a clever thing, for they are making their way past defences, and yet the farmer will slay them if they are taking from the farm. Now the cheetah is fast, indeed it has wisdom of justice and war and what is like the dark pillar, and there is the lion that has had the wisdom of that which is a guide of woman, defending God’s house. Now the rino is not seeing the future or what is before it, for there are such lacking understanding and are charging with the horn, and yet they often miss and return to their own business.
Now was not Enoch a man like an angel? For he would have had a great world of nature with many animals and plants and the dragons and great birds and large trees like cathedrals with vines and moss and the dripping of water and the sound of moving creatures in the morning and the kindling of sparks for fire and clay pots and plates and the roasting of meats, the picking of herbs and fruit, the finding of eggs, the walking amongst deep greens of nature and dark shadows rich with what is like spice, and hills and great water-falls and lower mountains and deeper valleys and caves where he might have painted to commemorate and the obnoxious mastodons that sometimes disturbed his peace while he was studying nature and walking with God, so close that he ascended to be taken by Him.
Now was not Enoch a man like an angel? For he would have had a great world of nature with many animals and plants and the dragons and great birds and large trees like cathedrals with vines and moss and the dripping of water and the sound of moving creatures in the morning and the kindling of sparks for fire and clay pots and plates and the roasting of meats, the picking of herbs and fruit, the finding of eggs, the walking amongst deep greens of nature and dark shadows rich with what is like spice, and hills and great water-falls and lower mountains and deeper valleys and caves where he might have painted to commemorate and the obnoxious mastodons that sometimes disturbed his peace while he was studying nature and walking with God, so close that he ascended to be taken by Him.
Now we are all on the same side but we are different and some are for different things and some are scorned because of justice and others scorned because of compassion, and yet there is no cause for amongst ourselves for the real enemy is dressing as us and creating discord that should not be, for some are for more puritanicalism for themselves, some for compassion that slows for certainty, some for charity, some for the side of angels, some for justice, some for building and expanding, some for speaking, some for silence, some for learning, some for taking action with truth, some for doing nothing, some for prudence, that there is yet more and there is no divide and war, but if any is being tempted by Orgoth than are they not being tempted to destruction? But if Orgoth has need of servants than they are wanting fools, for reason will be disloyal, and if you are with the kingdom than your elders are not forsaking you, for they are greater than you might believe that their loyalty to what is greater is there, for there are not enemies in every place. But if I am cursed with eternal teenage of my age than it is rare and yet it is not, for I have sought out truth and understanding and yet the one who does no evil by the measure will not later be counted as evil, unless you have been avoiding much hazard. 
Now what ability and power are the turem given that they are capable of dwelling with angels, being people of the kingdom and comparible to a kingdom unto itself. For there place is with mountains and pine trees, grass and rocky terrain and many things of nature. If they could conceal the smoke they would, and their might is with an intelligence that surpasses that of any person of Babylon, for they are not Babylonian. Now the bridge over the great ravine that goes into the lands where there people are is one of many bridges and they are in good lands. Now Sodom and Egypt, is it worse than Sodom? But the Christ was killed in Sodom and Egypt. Now what is the name of good lands and what is the name the turem would call themselves if they choose other names. For I have called them the turem, and if any calls a place a name not suitable than is it to be mentioned? But if the turem are a great people than let not the enemy attack them and let us fight with them if they are still for being turem. But what more is there with the turem and how many secrets do they have of their people? For they are dwelling with the ability to go out into the land and patrol for their defence.
Now what cannot be written? But an evil fool was passive aggressive, inside furious with hate, and he stocked a person and played the part of a loyal servant, and such is understood. Now a man killed him for he did as a coward and so was killed with craftiness of Joab. Now how could such a fool be married, for he is a dog, a jelous person who leaves his home to stalk? But the man had already met the woman in his youth and after the death of the fool the man and woman married. Now this is a questionable thing and yet the Lord put the sin away. Now such cannot be told to the masses for every murderer says it against a greater man than them.
Now what cannot be written? But an evil fool was passive aggressive, inside furious with hate, and he stocked a person and played the part of a loyal servant, and such is understood. Now a man killed him for he did as a coward and so was killed with craftiness of Joab. Now how could such a fool be married, for he is a dog, a jelous person who leaves his home to stalk? But the man had already met the woman in his youth and after the death of the fool the man and woman married. Now this is a questionable thing and yet the Lord put the sin away. Now such cannot be told to the masses for every murderer says it against a greater man than them.
Now what cannot be written? But an evil fool was passive aggressive, inside furious with hate, and he stocked a person and played the part of a loyal servant, and such is understood. Now a man killed him for he did as a coward and so was killed with craftiness of Joab. Now how could such a fool be married, for he is a dog, a jelous person who leaves his home to stalk? But the man had already met the woman in his youth and after the death of the fool the man and woman married. Now this is a questionable thing and yet the Lord put the sin away. Now such cannot be told to the masses for every murderer says it against a greater man than them. Now the man who killed with Joab was never bothered by the fool who stalked. Now this was a questionable thing. Now the man who killed with Joab knew the woman from a time much earlier. 
Now what cannot be written? But an evil fool was passive aggressive, inside furious with hate, and he stocked a person and played the part of a loyal servant, and such is understood. Now a man killed him for he did as a coward and so was killed with craftiness of Joab. Now how could such a fool be married, for he is a dog, a jelous person who leaves his home to stalk? But the man had already met the woman in his youth and after the death of the fool the man and woman married. Now this is a questionable thing and yet the Lord put the sin away. Now such cannot be told to the masses for every murderer says it against a greater man than them. Now the man who killed with Joab was never bothered by the fool who stalked. Now this was a questionable thing. Now the man who killed with Joab knew the woman from a time much earlier. 
Now what do I know about David but I suspect he will return. Now was his wisdom exceeding my own? But if Joab chose him than how will the devil cause any discord? But no discourse is there and what they fear who they respect is not my business only I know that if they fight against truth than I will say I cannot fight if David is not with me to fight. 
Now what do animals want? But they have no keeper, they are not human, and they are threatened by something, or there is what they want to steal. Now there is little morality with the animal. Now such is when the animal is pestering.
Now what do animals want? But they have no keeper, they are not human, and they
 are threatened by something, or there is what they want to steal. Now there is little morality with the animal. Now such is when the animal is pestering.
Now what do you expect from a dog? If you let them up onto the bed you will have behaviourism problems. If you allow them to sit at the table there will be behavioural problems.
Now what does the wise prophet say, or the wise man, who looks upon the child angel, considering the Jews, who are having wisdom of men, and what occurred when he was a child, for he still is? But the Lord is merciful, and the angel is the Christ’s. Now the angel is child angel around you men who are Jews, because you are fathers of righteousness to him and wise Abrahams, that he is not the Lord’s angels but is liking to pretend to be such with you at times.
Now what in falling has already been beneath, that people are wanting to be what they are, that let the child be child, the son be son, the king be respected and you stand back.
Now what in falling has already been beneath, that people are wanting to be what they are, that let the child be child, the son be son, the king be respected and you stand back.
Now what is beuitiful is still beautiful but the vocabulary is not sufficient to quickly express those different things that could be expressed. Now I write about matters of common occurrence because you know what truth is and that nothing has changed. Now what is beyond a greater language is still beyond, and what takes longer to express is so because of insufficient vocabulary because the words are not congruent with their people that they do not find a place with them. Now I called them a Pharisee who went beyond the limit with morality and accusations, and called the words of degradation for oneself that are for soldiers, and the pety and wicked acts of disrespect by which a person makes a shameful spectacle of themselves, that they are humiliated without their knowledge of it, because they from a different people, not as holy and worthy, the acts of a combat actor and I have called them such though we do not recognize their actions which they act out with their limbs and legs, because they are like animals to us, that gestures we do not understand and we cannot join the animal world to be with them, only they are lower, and yet on their level there is wisdom with them among those who are with them.
Now what is done in the realm of children when one is a child is not always the same thing as when it is done after a person enters the world. For people have been slayn saying, yet why is it now judged when it was not? But Enoch men and women are not decieved, for the women are by idea for wisdom, that if they are returning to child yet they remain with wisdom, and so it is with the men that they are keeping with righteousness.
Now what is happening in the spiritual realm when the land is defiled? But when there is much sin and abomination then what occurs? But the Jews have before taken many things for granted.
Now what is low is of no grasp of reality in speech in terms of consistency with conventions for this has not been heard on Earth unless it is combat strategy of soldiers. Now such is as Sodom combat when used in society and yet is it not known by zeolots? For if any speaks to instigate because they are low and bowing that they growl and grind their teeth in anger than let it be so, for even your feet are pure who serve God.
Now what is low is of no grasp of reality in speech in terms of consistency with conventions for this has not been heard on Earth unless it is combat strategy of soldiers. Now such is as Sodom combat when used in society and yet is it not known by zeolots? For if any speaks to instigate because they are low and bowing that they growl and grind their teeth in anger than let it be so, for even your feet are pure who serve God.
Now what is of David, that you might remember, that those who would be rovving to commit crimes against others for reward or promotion are evil parasites and villains that he even killed them who did such when there was war, and would Joab speak differently? But Joab chose David, and a great and brilliant general, who possessed what wisdom he possessed who is considered to have excellent understanding. Therefore I would listen to David’s judgement in this matter.
Now what is of David, that you might remember, that those who would be rovving to commit crimes against others for reward or promotion are evil parasites and villains that he even killed them who did such when there was war, and would Joab speak differently? But Joab chose David, and a great and brilliant general, who possessed what wisdom he possessed who is considered to have excellent understanding. Therefore I would listen to David’s judgement in this matter. For some servants have even been  sent from the king, even king David from the throne, to give encouragement to a soldier of great ability and the servant, being wicked, was exceedingly disrespectful and his hands sought to assissinate an excellent warrior who had fought for David, and what was David’s judgement. For he even killed those who killed his enemies in battle who were rovving and seeking rewards from kings. But the servant being wicked and acting as if on behalf of David was not to be killed? But David rode out early to kill evil-doers and he cut and killed those who did cruelty in the land in their pride to swallow the holy, the noble, the poor who are holy, who would in their cruelty speak cruelty of the needy and do evil, and the Lord favoured him more than Solomon whom I have read, but do I know his son? But his words only I have known, and the wisdom of the Christ I have sought for myself. Now I have known that it is not good for oneself to be with a prostitute, but she is a prostitute no more than than I offer no guidance because she is not a prostitute any longer. But do you not know that Jews are given this guidance? Now when you are at war are you to be having any love, truly? But those who have not known such things are better to indulge such an idea that David was wise. Now if I have seen him in my own eyes and that if his house is it not from God if you are to be considering the things of heaven? But jewals are to be placed in the heaven by one, and by what means I do not know, only the Christ is not proud to attack His own house. But fulfill all and it is so that he utterly attacked to kill every philistine and with his sword, his shield, giving gain to Israel and gain to the Christ. Now if his spear is God’s, and not his sword than how will I perceive the meaning? But let him only know that the new Satan and the one who is Lucifer is not the old who is still existing, and that he wishes the blessing and good will from David.
Now what is of David, that you might remember, that those who would be rovving to commit crimes against others for reward or promotion are evil parasites and villains that he even killed them who did such when there was war, and would Joab speak differently? But Joab chose David, and a great and brilliant general, who possessed what wisdom he possessed who is considered to have excellent understanding. Therefore I would listen to David’s judgement in this matter. For some servants have even been  sent from the king, even king David from the throne, to give encouragement to a soldier of great ability and the servant, being wicked, was exceedingly disrespectful and his hands sought to assissinate an excellent warrior who had fought for David, and what was David’s judgement. For he even killed those who killed his enemies in battle who were rovving and seeking rewards from kings. But the servant being wicked and acting as if on behalf of David was not to be killed? But David rode out early to kill evil-doers and he cut and killed those who did cruelty in the land in their pride to swallow the holy, the noble, the poor who are holy, who would in their cruelty speak cruelty of the needy and do evil, and the Lord favoured him more than Solomon whom I have read, but do I know his son? But his words only I have known, and the wisdom of the Christ I have sought for myself. Now I have known that it is not good for oneself to be with a prostitute, but she is a prostitute no more than than I offer no guidance because she is not a prostitute any longer. But do you not know that Jews are given this guidance? Now when you are at war are you to be having any love, truly? But those who have not known such things are better to indulge such an idea that David was wise. Now if I have seen him in my own eyes and that if his house is it not from God if you are to be considering the things of heaven? But jewals are to be placed in the heaven by one, and by what means I do not know, only the Christ is not proud to attack His own house. But fulfill all and it is so that he utterly attacked to kill every philistine and with his sword, his shield, giving gain to Israel and gain to the Christ. Now if his spear is God’s, and not his sword than how will I perceive the meaning? But let him only know that the new Satan and the one who is Lucifer is not the old who is still existing, and that he wishes the blessing and good will from David. Now what is to occur prior that I will know of later if such can be done? But if Adam has not eaten and remains that what is he to be? But is God returning anything to the Adam who is in the garden to work there and have the fruit and to be without his wife? But is it to be known in heaven that an angel came from one like Job? For wives and honour he had and many gifts from God that the Lord showered him with every gift that is good and he kept all evil from him and increased him greatly and he rebelled in love against God, only in words, that he might throw off the one who would contend who might hate God, and was he given more than any who ever lived, even something
 like paradise when God had kept his enemies away from him, spread his wings over him to shelter him, giving him wives and permitting women who were not wives, and as that man was even seeking wisdom, the Lord gave him wisdom, and as that man sought what is good, he was found in obedience to God, and it was easy, for the Lord sheltered him much, so that not so suddenly all disappeared from him and he found himself in a desert where he was shallow of heart and empty in heart and he felt abandoned and he was to be taken through that land like Isaiah and he was to even be close to people of Sodom and he was to be receiving from God, for as much as he had every luxury prior by God, he was to endure what it was to be a wandering traveller without his prior riches that God had provided. Now where is the upright prophet? But a false prophet is known because he speaks about others and there are things that are not true and he does not speak in general statements as if one who has gathered information. But if the devil has attacked is it so God might have some cause to save me? But if I leave any alive who I have been commanded to wipe out than is it so they will gather later to attack the nation? But I offer it to the Christ and He gives me blood and bread, and I am in the place where, and what it is, Satan, that if I speak some holy tongue then by wisdom they might know, and if they are abandoning the kingdoms of the devil, than how much more are their hearts giving treasure to heaven. But if a sick person does that which is disturbing do they have a demon or is their heart and mind seized by iniquity? But why is the iniquitous one attempting to cause iniquity in others? Now if they have caused so much sin by force in others than how much greater and more was their sin? But do you think it has not to increase with doing wickedness. For wickedness is even bringing forth per visits and the one who is evil as a sane man is then evil as an insane man, but God had desired that all should be well of this thing.
Now what is of David, that you might remember, that those who would be rovving to commit crimes against others for reward or promotion are evil parasites and villains that he even killed them who did such when there was war, and would Joab speak differently? But Joab chose David, and a great and brilliant general, who possessed what wisdom he possessed who is considered to have excellent understanding. Therefore I would listen to David’s judgement in this matter. For some servants have even been  sent from the king, even king David from the throne, to give encouragement to a soldier of great ability and the servant, being wicked, was exceedingly disrespectful and his hands sought to assissinate an excellent warrior who had fought for David, and what was David’s judgement. For he even killed those who killed his enemies in battle who were rovving and seeking rewards from kings. But the servant being wicked and acting as if on behalf of David was not to be killed? But David rode out early to kill evil-doers and he cut and killed those who did cruelty in the land in their pride to swallow the holy, the noble, the poor who are holy, who would in their cruelty speak cruelty of the needy and do evil, and the Lord favoured him more than Solomon whom I have read, but do I know his son? But his words only I have known, and the wisdom of the Christ I have sought for myself. Now I have known that it is not good for oneself to be with a prostitute, but she is a prostitute no more than than I offer no guidance because she is not a prostitute any longer. But do you not know that Jews are given this guidance? Now when you are at war are you to be having any love, truly? But those who have not known such things are better to indulge such an idea that David was wise. Now if I have seen him in my own eyes and that if his house is it not from God if you are to be considering the things of heaven? But jewals are to be placed in the heaven by one, and by what means I do not know, only the Christ is not proud to attack His own house. But fulfill all and it is so that he utterly attacked to kill every philistine and with his sword, his shield, giving gain to Israel and gain to the Christ. Now if his spear is God’s, and not his sword than how will I perceive the meaning? But let him only know that the new Satan and the one who is Lucifer is not the old who is still existing, and that he wishes the blessing and good will from David. Now what is to occur prior that I will know of later if such can be done? But if Adam has not eaten and remains that what is he to be? But is God returning anything to the Adam who is in the garden to work there and have the fruit and to be without his wife? But is it to be known in heaven that an angel came from one like Job? For wives and honour he had and many gifts from God that the Lord showered him with every gift that is good and he kept all evil from him and increased him greatly and he rebelled in love against God, only in words, that he might throw off the one who would contend who might hate God, and was he given more than any who ever lived, even something like paradise when God had kept his enemies away from him, spread his wings over him to shelter him, giving him wives and permitting women who were not wives, and as that man was even seeking wisdom, the Lord gave him wisdom, and as that man sought what is good, he was found in obedience to God, and it was easy, for the Lord sheltered him much, so that not so suddenly all disappeared from him and he found himself in a desert where he was shallow of heart and empty in heart and he felt abandoned and he was to be taken through that land like Isaiah and he was to even be close to people of Sodom and he was to be receiving from God, for as much as he had every luxury prior by God, he was to endure what it was to be a wandering traveller without his prior riches that God had provided. Now where is the upright prophet? But a false prophet is known because he speaks about others and there are things that are not true and he does not speak in general statements as if one who has gathered information. But if the devil has attacked is it so God might have some cause to save me? But if I leave any alive who I have been commanded to wipe out than is it so they will gather later to attack the nation? But I offer it to the Christ and He gives me blood and bread, and I am in the place where, and what it is, Satan, that if I speak some holy tongue then by wisdom they might know, and if they are abandoning the kingdoms of the devil, than how much more are their hearts giving treasure to heaven. But if a sick person does that which is disturbing do they have a demon or is their heart and mind seized by iniquity? But why is the iniquitous one attempting to cause iniquity in others? Now if they have caused so much sin by force in others than how much greater and more was their sin? But do you think it has not to increase with doing wickedness. For wickedness is even bringing forth perversities and the one who is evil as a sane man is then evil as an insane man, but God had desired that all should be well of this thing.
Now what is of David, that you might remember, that those who would be rovving to commit crimes against others for reward or promotion are evil parasites and villains that he even killed them who did such when there was war, and would Joab speak differently? But Joab chose David, and a great and brilliant general, who possessed what wisdom he possessed who is considered to have excellent understanding. Therefore I would listen to David’s judgement in this matter. For some servants have even been  sent from the king, even king David from the throne, to give encouragement to a soldier of great ability and the servant, being wicked, was exceedingly disrespectful and his hands sought to assissinate an excellent warrior who had fought for David, and what was David’s judgement. For he even killed those who killed his enemies in battle who were rovving and seeking rewards from kings. But the servant being wicked and acting as if on behalf of David was not to be killed? But David rode out early to kill evil-doers and he cut and killed those who did cruelty in the land in their pride to swallow the holy, the noble, the poor who are holy, who would in their cruelty speak cruelty of the needy and do evil, and the Lord favoured him more than Solomon whom I have read, but do I know his son? But his words only I have known, and the wisdom of the Christ I have sought for myself. Now I have known that it is not good for oneself to be with a prostitute, but she is a prostitute no more than than I offer no guidance because she is not a prostitute any longer. But do you not know that Jews are given this guidance? Now when you are at war are you to be having any love, truly? But those who have not known such things are better to indulge such an idea that David was wise. Now if I have seen him in my own eyes and that if his house is it not from God if you are to be considering the things of heaven? But jewals are to be placed in the heaven by one, and by what means I do not know, only the Christ is not proud to attack His own house. But fulfill all and it is so that he utterly attacked to kill every philistine and with his sword, his shield, giving gain to Israel and gain to the Christ. Now if his spear is God’s, and not his sword than how will I perceive the meaning? But let him only know that the new Satan and the one who is Lucifer is not the old who is still existing, and that he wishes the blessing and good will from David. Now what is to occur prior that I will know of later if such can be done? But if Adam has not eaten and remains that what is he to be? But is God returning anything to the Adam who is in the garden to work there and have the fruit and to be without his
 wife? But is it to be known in heaven that an angel came from one like Job? For wives and honour he had and many gifts from God that the Lord showered him with every gift that is good and he kept all evil from him and increased him greatly and he rebelled in love against God, only in words, that he might throw off the one who would contend who might hate God, and was he given more than any who ever lived, even something like paradise when God had kept his enemies away from him, spread his wings over him to shelter him, giving him wives and permitting women who were not wives, and as that man was even seeking wisdom, the Lord gave him wisdom, and as that man sought what is good, he was found in obedience to God, and it was easy, for the Lord sheltered him much, so that not so suddenly all disappeared from him and he found himself in a desert where he was shallow of heart and empty in heart and he felt abandoned and he was to be taken through that land like Isaiah and he was to even be close to people of Sodom and he was to be receiving from God, for as much as he had every luxury prior by God, he was to endure what it was to be a wandering traveller without his prior riches that God had provided. Now where is the upright prophet? But a false prophet is known because he speaks about others and there are things that are not true and he does not speak in general statements as if one who has gathered information. But if the devil has attacked is it so God might have some cause to save me? But if I leave any alive who I have been commanded to wipe out than is it so they will gather later to attack the nation? But I offer it to the Christ and He gives me blood and bread, and I am in the place where, and what it is, Satan, that if I speak some holy tongue then by wisdom they might know, and if they are abandoning the kingdoms of the devil, than how much more are their hearts giving treasure to heaven. But if a sick person does that which is disturbing do they have a demon or is their heart and mind seized by iniquity? But why is the iniquitous one attempting to cause iniquity in others? Now if they have caused so much sin by force in others than how much greater and more was their sin? But do you think it has not to increase with doing wickedness. For wickedness is even bringing forth perversities and the one who is evil as a sane man is then evil as an insane man, but God has desired that all should be well of this thing.
Now what is of David, that you might remember, that those who would be rovving to commit crimes against others for reward or promotion are evil parasites and villains that he even killed them who did such when there was war, and would Joab speak differently? But Joab chose David, and a great and brilliant general, who possessed what wisdom he possessed who is considered to have excellent understanding. Therefore I would listen to David’s judgement in this matter. For some servants have even been  sent from the king, even king David from the throne, to give encouragement to a soldier of great ability and the servant, being wicked, was exceedingly disrespectful and his hands sought to assissinate an excellent warrior who had fought for David, and what was David’s judgement. For he even killed those who killed his enemies in battle who were rovving and seeking rewards from kings. But the servant being wicked and acting as if on behalf of David was not to be killed? But David rode out early to kill evil-doers and he cut and killed those who did cruelty in the land in their pride to swallow the holy, the noble, the poor who are holy, who would in their cruelty speak cruelty of the needy and do evil, and the Lord favoured him more than Solomon whom I have read, but do I know his son? But his words only I have known, and the wisdom of the Christ I have sought for myself. Now I have known that it is not good for oneself to be with a prostitute, but she is a prostitute no more than than I offer no guidance because she is not a prostitute any longer. But do you not know that Jews are given this guidance? Now when you are at war are you to be having any love, truly? But those who have not known such things are better to indulge such an idea that David was wise. Now if I have seen him in my own eyes and that if his house is it not from God if you are to be considering the things of heaven? But jewals are to be placed in the heaven by one, and by what means I do not know, only the Christ is not proud to attack His own house. But fulfill all and it is so that he utterly attacked to kill every philistine and with his sword, his shield, giving gain to Israel and gain to the Christ. Now if his spear is God’s, and not his sword than how will I perceive the meaning? But let him only know that the new Satan and the one who is Lucifer is not the old who is still existing, and that he wishes the blessing and good will from David. Now what is to occur prior that I will know of later if such can be done? But if Adam has not eaten and remains that what is he to be? But is God returning anything to the Adam who is in the garden to work there and have the fruit and to be without his wife? But is it to be known in heaven that an angel came from one like Job? For wives and honour he had and many gifts from God that the Lord showered him with every gift that is good and he kept all evil from him and increased him greatly and he rebelled in love against God, only in words, that he might throw off the one who would contend who might hate God, and was he given more than any who ever lived, even something like paradise when God had kept his enemies away from him, spread his wings over him to shelter him, giving him wives and permitting women who were not wives, and as that man was even seeking wisdom, the Lord gave him wisdom, and as that man sought what is good, he was found in obedience to God, and it was easy, for the Lord sheltered him much, so that not so suddenly all disappeared from him and he found himself in a desert where he was shallow of heart and empty in heart and he felt abandoned and he was to be taken through that land like Isaiah and he was to even be close to people of Sodom and he was to be receiving from God, for as much as he had every luxury prior by God, he was to endure what it was to be a wandering traveller without his prior riches that God had provided. Now where is the upright prophet? But a false prophet is known because he speaks about others and there are things that are not true and he does not speak in general statements as if one who has gathered information. But if the devil has attacked is it so God might have some cause to save me? But if I leave any alive who I have been commanded to wipe out than is it so they will gather later to attack the nation? But I offer it to the Christ and He gives me blood and bread, and I am in the place where, and what it is, Satan, that if I speak some holy tongue then by wisdom they might know, and if they are abandoning the kingdoms of the devil, than how much more are their hearts giving treasure to heaven. But if a sick person does that which is disturbing do they have a demon or is their heart and mind seized by iniquity? But why is the iniquitous one attempting to cause iniquity in others? Now if they have caused so much sin by force in others than how much greater and more was their sin? But do you think it has not to increase with doing wickedness. For wickedness is even bringing forth perversities and the one who is evil as a sane man is then evil as an insane man, but God has desired that all should be well of this thing. Now if any ignorant person is blaspheming and profaning what was meant for good and wellness in this way than in truth it is blasphamy against what is sacred, being what God desires of all and a person who is not to be touched with it in truth. For an ignorant man has sputtered out brute ignorance and the one whose wisdom is better has sought to speak good. Now is one rich in the things of the devil more rich than one who conceals much of value? But those who are not one of the people are not Jews in the religion, but God is capable of restoring them to Israel.
Now what is of David, that you might remember, that those who would be rovving to commit crimes against others for reward or promotion are evil parasites and villains that he even killed them who did such when there was war, and would Joab speak differently? But Joab chose David, and a great and brilliant general, who possessed what wisdom he possessed who is considered to have excellent understanding. Therefore I would listen to David’s judgement in this matter. For some servants have even been  sent from the king, even king David from the throne, to give encouragement to a soldier of great ability and the servant, being wicked, was exceedingly disrespectful and his hands sought to assissinate an excellent warrior who had fought for David, and what was David’s judgement. For he even killed those who killed his enemies in battle who were rovving and seeking rewards from kings. But the servant being wicked and acting as if on behalf of David was not to be killed? But David rode out early to kill evil-doers and he cut and killed those who did cruelty in the land in their pride to swallow the holy, the noble, the poor who are holy, who would in their cruelty speak cruelty of the needy and do evil, and the Lord favoured him more than Solomon whom I have read, but do I know his son? But his words only I have known, and the wisdom of the Christ I have sought for myself. Now I have known that it is not good for oneself to be with a prostitute, but she is a prostitute no more than than I offer no guidance because she is not a prostitute any longer. But do you not know that Jews are given this guidance? Now when you are at war are you to be having any love, truly? But those who have not known
 such things are better to indulge such an idea that David was wise. Now if I have seen him in my own eyes and that if his house is it not from God if you are to be considering the things of heaven? But jewals are to be placed in the heaven by one, and by what means I do not know, only the Christ is not proud to attack His own house. But fulfill all and it is so that he utterly attacked to kill every philistine and with his sword, his shield, giving gain to Israel and gain to the Christ. Now if his spear is God’s, and not his sword than how will I perceive the meaning? But let him only know that the new Satan and the one who is Lucifer is not the old who is still existing, and that he wishes the blessing and good will from David. Now what is to occur prior that I will know of later if such can be done? But if Adam has not eaten and remains that what is he to be? But is God returning anything to the Adam who is in the garden to work there and have the fruit and to be without his wife? But is it to be known in heaven that an angel came from one like Job? For wives and honour he had and many gifts from God that the Lord showered him with every gift that is good and he kept all evil from him and increased him greatly and he rebelled in love against God, only in words, that he might throw off the one who would contend who might hate God, and was he given more than any who ever lived, even something like paradise when God had kept his enemies away from him, spread his wings over him to shelter him, giving him wives and permitting women who were not wives, and as that man was even seeking wisdom, the Lord gave him wisdom, and as that man sought what is good, he was found in obedience to God, and it was easy, for the Lord sheltered him much, so that not so suddenly all disappeared from him and he found himself in a desert where he was shallow of heart and empty in heart and he felt abandoned and he was to be taken through that land like Isaiah and he was to even be close to people of Sodom and he was to be receiving from God, for as much as he had every luxury prior by God, he was to endure what it was to be a wandering traveller without his prior riches that God had provided.
Now what is of David, that you might remember, that those who would be rovving to commit crimes against others for reward or promotion are evil parasites and villains that he even killed them who did such when there was war, and would Joab speak differently? But Joab chose David, and a great and brilliant general, who possessed what wisdom he possessed who is considered to have excellent understanding. Therefore I would listen to David’s judgement in this matter. For some servants have even been  sent from the king, even king David from the throne, to give encouragement to a soldier of great ability and the servant, being wicked, was exceedingly disrespectful and his hands sought to assissinate an excellent warrior who had fought for David, and what was David’s judgement. For he even killed those who killed his enemies in battle who were rovving and seeking rewards from kings. But the servant being wicked and acting as if on behalf of David was not to be killed? But David rode out early to kill evil-doers and he cut and killed those who did cruelty in the land in their pride to swallow the holy, the noble, the poor who are holy, who would in their cruelty speak cruelty of the needy and do evil, and the Lord favoured him more than Solomon whom I have read, but do I know his son? But his words only I have known, and the wisdom of the Christ I have sought for myself. Now I have known that it is not good for oneself to be with a prostitute, but she is a prostitute no more than than I offer no guidance because she is not a prostitute any longer. But do you not know that Jews are given this guidance? Now when you are at war are you to be having any love, truly? But those who have not known such things are better to indulge such an idea that David was wise. Now if I have seen him in my own eyes and that if his house is it not from God if you are to be considering the things of heaven? But jewals are to be placed in the heaven by one, and by what means I do not know, only the Christ is not proud to attack His own house. But fulfill all and it is so that he utterly attacked to kill every philistine and with his sword, his shield, giving gain to Israel and gain to the Christ. Now if his spear is God’s, and not his sword than how will I perceive the meaning? But let him only know that the new Satan and the one who is Lucifer is not the old who is still existing, and that he wishes the blessing and good will from David.
Now what is the power put on Earth? But it is the power of a holy people who are aknowledging God, that they are not Jews but it does not seem right to call them Gentiles. Now there are many different people groups and the people who are acknowledging God have with them a holy acknowledgement of God that they are not low, but there are many found among them. Now the ones who are lower among them are from another people group that dwell with them, and even the group that is animals dwells with them. Now the pety and small matter between the Jews and Christians is to be understood for that which does not cause any separation between them, for they are both loved. Now there are those people who are not Jews who are not capable of having the greater knowledge of what they do and if this group also dwells with them are they to be considered representatives of another group? But it is good for them to understand the many people groups that dwell with them that such is not about ethnicity because this is not the way they are different. So the angel has come to turn brother against brother and parents against children and children against parents? But if this is so because of truth than it is not regarded for me, because to give understanding is what is regarded by me.
Now what is the power put on Earth? But it is the power of a holy people who are aknowledging God, that they are not Jews but it does not seem right to call them Gentiles. Now there are many different people groups and the people who are acknowledging God have with them a holy acknowledgement of God that they are not low, but there are many found among them. Now the ones who are lower among them are from another people group that dwell with them, and even the group that is animals dwells with them. Now the pety and small matter between the Jews and Christians is to be understood for that which does not cause any separation between them, for they are both loved. Now there are those people who are not Jews who are not capable of having the greater knowledge of what they do and if this group also dwells with them are they to be considered representatives of another group? But it is good for them to understand the many people groups that dwell with them that such is not about ethnicity because this is not the way they are different. So the angel has come to turn brother against brother and parents against children and children against parents? But if this is so because of truth than it is not regarded for me, because to give understanding is what is regarded by me. Now there are the people groups of ancient times even that not all among them could have been what they were, and there was that wisdom of one who would place an additional burden upon those who had come there from another people that the people might benifit from them and the rebuke be taken because as they could have departed for another place at any time they desired to be in Israel so that they would lend their labour in addition to living their lives in that place, and the saying that is cruel was spoken by his son and yet he did not chastise them with whips and they choose to stay and have the additional burden. Now when the generation passed was there to be any additional burden? But God is not a fool and not wicked. Therefore you know what is right that when rebuke is righteous there is God who is capable of delivering justice to those who do wickedness. Now would they have spoken foolishly if the opportunity to give payment for their dwelling there not been given by that king? For the rebuke holds truth that has a weight too much to bear for one who has honour and yet is unable to do what would fulfill their place. Therefore the one who speaks it is speaking to another who has not been made capable. 
Now what is the power put on Earth? But it is the power of a holy people who are aknowledging God, that they are not Jews but it does not seem right to call them Gentiles. Now there are many different people groups and the people who are acknowledging God have with them a holy acknowledgement of God that they are not low, but there are many found among them. Now the ones who are lower among them are from another people group that dwell with them, and even the group that is animals dwells with them. Now the pety and small matter between the Jews and Christians is to be understood for that which does not cause any separation between them, for they are both loved. Now there are those people who are not Jews who are not capable of having the greater knowledge of what they do and if this group also dwells with them are they to be considered representatives of another group? But it is good for them to understand the many people groups that dwell with them that such is not about ethnicity because this is not the way they are different. So the angel has come to turn brother against brother and parents against children and children against parents? But if this is so because of truth than it is not regarded for me, because to give understanding is what is regarded by me.
Now what is the proportion that are what I will compromise to call people? But I have taken a third from the darker shade a third from the fair, a third from the slightly
 darker shade, and these are being separated that the rest are lower things, not comparible, and people are walking through the forest and building up their civilization, and they are given the fullfillment of Enoch, and yet I do not complete it, for they are a people called Enoch, the seventh from Adam, and they walk amongst nature and gain wisdom and know how to survive amongst the animals, and they are men and women, and is the dread of them with the animals?
Now what is the proportion that are what I will compromise to call people? But I have taken a third from the darker shade a third from the fair, a third from the slightly darker shade, and these are being separated that the rest are lower things, not comparible, and people are walking through the forest and building up their civilization, and they are given the fullfillment of Enoch, and yet I do not complete it, for they are a people called Enoch, the seventh from Adam, and they walk amongst nature and gain wisdom and know how to survive amongst the animals, and they are men and women, and is the dread of them with the animals?
Now what is the sign of Saturn or neptune? What is the sign of the nebula or the comet? What is the sign of everything in the Universe, for the truth is large to know and God holdeth all. Now let them find the signs if they are able and yet the truth is found and to be given, that those keeping, what is the reason? But if any is watching than they are not as Babylon, at least. But if Babylon exaults itself it exaulting what is not for eternity.
Now what is the sign of the journey to the planet? But is it not representing the amount Babel has? Now this is even interpreted by itself by Babel and many with intelligence. Now the moon is given light by light and the light is shining by what is inside of it, and when the moon is not aligned with the light it does not shine. Now God is light, and there is no flaw in Him. Now the morning star, is it not shining much by itself? Now the sun that gives light, is it not giving life to all the Earth and it is not neglectful, no it is not aloof, for it is seen every day and the reflection of the light of the moon is giving testimony of its existence. Now God is a completed parent for he sends some to Earth to labour as others and live as others that the Lord has fullfilled all of being a diligent and concerned parent. For His love is great and He is greater than any. Now if the sun is so good as to be seen every day and if the moon is aligning itself by days that it’s season is short in which it is, than how great is Him who gives all? But rain is ceasing and the nation is ceasing from what it was and this can be remedied. Now if the nation is as if tested when the rain fails than, how long will the good last when much has been lost that by one crucial thing gone, the whole is collapsing? But when abundance is becoming scarce you know how to read the signs. Now Egypt is enriched by Jews and yet cannot follow, and though it is held back for their escape yet is closed in and crashes upon the Egyptians for they follow in evil with evil tidings for the Jews, and the Jews give them great riches for nothing given except an insignificant amount. Now the gold of Babel I have not placed upon Babel, that I do not use the golden calf that has the common tongue, and I am not going near to the place where Moses was seen before he abandoned the people, and so there is the sign of the wicked fools who are attacking Jews when there is distraction because they are dealing with greater problems that such are wicked and do what is an abomination for they are opportunistic as if murderers who do not conform to war. Now some have grown angry and said I do it and not God, and God has brought bread for the poor and the Christians do not consider with greater prudence. Now Peter falls beneath ur and yet is not meant to be under ur and let it be known for those beneath ur will reach from the Ocean to attempt to pull men down and yet Peter is not remaining, for he is as if an adam. Now if the heart judges and condemns any yet God knows better. Now the Ocean is not changing where it’s surface is and yet the waters rise a little, but it is almost insignificant. Now the land is not changing where it’s surface is and yet a lake of fire comes up from the Earth at times. Now when such is coming greatly were there not tremors and even smoke prior? Now it says the time may be soon.
Now what is the sign of the journey to the planet? But is it not representing the amount Babel has? Now this is even interpreted by itself by Babel and many with intelligence. Now the moon is given light by light and the light is shining by what is inside of it, and when the moon is not aligned with the light it does not shine. Now God is light, and there is no flaw in Him. Now the morning star, is it not shining much by itself? Now the sun that gives light, is it not giving life to all the Earth and it is not neglectful, no it is not aloof, for it is seen every day and the reflection of the light of the moon is giving testimony of its existence. Now God is a completed parent for he sends some to Earth to labour as others and live as others that the Lord has fullfilled all of being a diligent and concerned parent. For His love is great and He is greater than any. Now if the sun is so good as to be seen every day and if the moon is aligning itself by days that it’s season is short in which it is, than how great is Him who gives all? But rain is ceasing and the nation is ceasing from what it was and this can be remedied. Now if the nation is as if tested when the rain fails than, how long will the good last when much has been lost that by one crucial thing gone, the whole is collapsing? But when abundance is becoming scarce you know how to read the signs. Now Egypt is enriched by Jews and yet cannot follow, and though it is held back for their escape yet is closed in and crashes upon the Egyptians for they follow in evil with evil tidings for the Jews, and the Jews give them great riches for nothing given except an insignificant amount. Now the gold of Babel I have not placed upon Babel, that I do not use the golden calf that has the common tongue, and I am not going near to the place where Moses was seen before he abandoned the people, and so there is the sign of the wicked fools who are attacking Jews when there is distraction because they are dealing with greater problems that such are wicked and do what is an abomination for they are opportunistic as if murderers who do not conform to war. Now some have grown angry and said I do it and not God, and God has brought bread for the poor and the Christians do not consider with greater prudence.
Now what is the sign of the journey to the planet? But is it not representing the amount Babel has? Now this is even interpreted by itself by Babel and many with intelligence. Now the moon is given light by light and the light is shining by what is inside of it, and when the moon is not aligned with the light it does not shine. Now God is light, and there is no flaw in Him. Now the morning star, is it not shining much by itself? Now the sun that gives light, is it not giving life to all the Earth and it is not neglectful, no it is not aloof, for it is seen every day and the reflection of the light of the moon is giving testimony of its existence. Now God is a completed parent for he sends some to Earth to labour as others and live as others that the Lord has fullfilled all of being a diligent and concerned parent. For His love is great and He is greater than any. Now if the sun is so good as to be seen every day and if the moon is aligning itself by days that it’s season is short in which it is, than how great is Him who gives all? But rain is ceasing and the nation is ceasing from what it was and this can be remedied. Now if the nation is as if tested when the rain fails than, how long will the good last when much has been lost that by one crucial thing gone, the whole is collapsing? But when abundance is becoming scarce you know how to read the signs. Now Egypt is enriched by Jews and yet cannot follow, and though it is held back for their escape yet is closed in and crashes upon the Egyptians for they follow in evil with evil tidings for the Jews, and the Jews give them great riches for nothing given except an insignificant amount. Now the gold of Babel I have not placed upon Babel, that I do not use the golden calf that has the common tongue, and I am not going near to the place where Moses was seen before he abandoned the people, and so there is the sign of the wicked fools who are attacking Jews when there is distraction because they are dealing with greater problems that such are wicked and do what is an abomination for they are opportunistic as if murderers who do not conform to war. Now some have grown angry and said I do it and not God, and God has brought bread for the poor and the Christians do not consider with greater prudence. Now Peter falls beneath ur and yet is not meant to be under ur and let it be known for those beneath ur will reach from the Ocean to attempt to pull men down and yet Peter is not remaining, for he is as if an adam. Now if the heart judges and condemns any yet God knows better. Now the Ocean is not changing where it’s surface is and yet the waters rise a little, but it is almost insignificant. Now the land is not changing where it’s surface is and yet a lake of fire comes up from the Earth at times. Now when such is coming greatly were there not tremors and even smoke prior? Now it says the time may be soon. Now Earth is taking the planet to live upon it and yet not much, and they are not yet able to return and yet for those whose hearts are very strong for it, it is worth even their lives. Now you permit people to do what is not safe because their life is their own and it is
 better to have some things rather than living longer and if you are able to understand it than you have a wise thing. Now if you are spreading out towns on the planet you inhabit it and if you are spreading cities than the planet is then yours, for I come to give you advancement and open doors that Babylon is attempting to shut. Now place then what is around the planet about your head if it is pleasing you, for if you are indeed worthy than I believe you might look to the mourning star for salvation. But you are having visited the moon, and you now visit Mars. Now your satillites have looked further for places where you might go and conquer, for I have considered such conquering. Now the mourning star has Earth but does Jupiter? But you have proved you are capable of dwelling upon three places, and you can you dwell on some? But the furthest is for you and Babel is able to gain wisdom by their building. Now if far planets are for you, than even more for you is Heaven and new bodies, and God has sent His son and a way is made for you, that a conduit is open. Now what is truly below ur or the Earth to be meant to be below it, having truly fullfilled, let them remain below it because the one leading into prison must go into prison as well and those who would seek to devour for hell are being below ur and the Earth that both are seeking to devour what is above the two. Now humanity is cloaked with things of Earth, and it is because of the tree, and yet who is cloaked with what is better? For the daughters of Sarah put on more beautiful adornment. Now you are given robes of white that are as if light, being holy ones, saints of the kingdom of heaven. Now you are given charge over by what is in heaven to be as sheep who have the true Shepard, and there are many things in heaven that can be sent to care for you, for you are more valuable than a sheep, but sons and daughters of the Lord. Now inside the kingdom is what is good according to Mala and outside there is weeping and gnashing of teeth and yet the rich house is protected by a gate and walls and the sons and daughters of the house dine and are given care and rewards. Now God is even capable of directing others concerning you, and does not the one who obeys also gain? But if any is sent to Earth for you is it not because the Lord is your father and not aloof to you? For the sons and daughters are those of the kingdom. Now if you must be tested, and yet if you die you are moving into heaven with the Christ and if you are having riches and care than you are becoming as if always a visitor to the Earth where your true place is in Heaven with the Christ. Now princes and princesses walk amongst those doomed for death and yet in love they are wanting for more to be saved for they are promoting the kingdom of heaven and many of them are. Now let not any be confused with those who belong to the devil, and let not the devil use such against the kingdom of heaven.
Now what of the other churches and can I name them? But we will call them a good name that is acceptable to them until they give us their name. Now the Fen people who are wise, who are a mystery to the understanding of the Elsnon and are being good to us? But what can we know of them for who can search anything about them or desire to, for they are being holy? But these are dwelling in deep waters and wisdom, keeping that which we do not know. Now they are seeming to be what is good, and are they not to dwell among us if it pleases them? But what other races are there, and what are they in the churches? For those men of the wilderness, being another race, are more capable than any, crafty and yet still in righteousness, men who have much understanding, for it is them doing wisdom in which they seem to differ from us in what they do. Now they are showing themselves capable of accomplishing and are able to do those things in skill that they carry out with greater ability that leaves one in awe like as if an elite group of warriors in battle who leave one in awe with their ability. So less of these is needed to accomplish even more and better, that there is greatness in their wise skill and greatness in their people, and some of them are warriors. Now what have those in the cults of the devil claimed about all who please God and have wisdom in the ways they exhaust themselves, being the poor who exhaults himself in a base and low way and not him or her who is holy, who are like angels. But those in the kingdoms of the devil are in poor kingdoms and they have riches but do not perceive what they are in truth, being blinded by the disease of  their cults. Now if they have reviled any people it is pointless and nothing. But God has given the truth to those who would have it, and who I do not know, or why, because this is not understood by me.
Now what of the other churches and can I name them? But we will call them a good name that is acceptable to them until they give us their name. Now the Fen people who are wise, who are a mystery to the understanding of the Elsnon and are being good to us? But what can we know of them for who can search anything about them or desire to, for they are being holy? But these are dwelling in deep waters and wisdom, keeping that which we do not know. Now they are seeming to be what is good, and are they not to dwell among us if it pleases them? But what other races are there, and what are they in the churches? For those men of the wilderness, being another race, are more capable than any, crafty and yet still in righteousness, men who have much understanding, for it is them doing wisdom in which they seem to differ from us in what they do. Now they are showing themselves capable of accomplishing and are able to do those things in skill that they carry out with greater ability that leaves one in awe like as if an elite group of warriors in battle who leave one in awe with their ability. So less of these is needed to accomplish even more and better, that there is greatness in their wise skill and greatness in their people, and some of them are warriors. Now what have those in the cults of the devil claimed about all who please God and have wisdom, in the ways they exhault themselves, being the poor who exhaults himself in a base and low way and not him or her who is holy, who are like angels. But those in the kingdoms of the devil are in poor kingdoms and they have riches but do not perceive what they are in truth, being blinded by the disease of  their cults. Now if they have reviled any people it is pointless and nothing. But God has given the truth to those who would have it, and who I do not know, or why, because this is not understood by me.
Now what of the other churches and can I name them? But we will call them a good name that is acceptable to them until they give us their name. Now the Fen people who are wise, who are a mystery to the understanding of the Elsnon and are being good to us? But what can we know of them for who can search anything about them or desire to, for they are being holy? But these are dwelling in deep waters and wisdom, keeping that which we do not know. Now they are seeming to be what is good, and are they not to dwell among us if it pleases them? But what other races are there, and what are they in the churches? For those men of the wilderness, being another race, are more capable than any, crafty and yet still in righteousness, men who have much understanding, for it is them doing wisdom in which they seem to differ from us in what they do. Now they are showing themselves capable of accomplishing and are able to do those things in skill that they carry out with greater ability that leaves one in awe like as if an elite group of warriors in battle who leave one in awe with their ability. So less of these is needed to accomplish even more and better, that there is greatness in their wise skill and greatness in their people, and some of them are warriors. Now what have those in the cults of the devil claimed about all who please God and have wisdom, in the ways they exhault themselves, being the poor who exhaults himself in a base and low way and not him or her who is holy, who are like angels. But those in the kingdoms of the devil are in poor kingdoms and they have riches but do not perceive what they are in truth, being blinded by the disease of  their cults. Now if they have reviled any people it is pointless and nothing. But God has given the truth to those who would have it, and who I do not know, or why, because this is not understood by me. Now if any of the cults of the devil should seek to exhault themselves by speaking badly about you, even to denigrate, their words are as pointless as nothing, for most of them are even in great ignorance about what they are. Now as they exhault all that is material and not given by God, they are exhaulting themselves and their cult which is the devils. Now to be thrown into a lake of fire and to do that which results in this is not wise. Nor is it wise to revile God in envy of those who are pleasing God. But when they laugh, is it with arragance that their strength would increase against you? For the truth that is God’s they do not desire but they would rather have their lies and the mixture of the devil’s cults that they attend the places of religion but are having no part in it because what is in them is pulling them back to the cults of the devil.
Now what of the other churches and can I name them? But we will call them a good name that is acceptable to them until they give us their name. Now the Fen people who are wise, who are a mystery to the understanding of the Elsnon are being good to us? But what can we know of them for who can search anything about them or desire to? But these are dwelling in deep waters and wisdom, keeping that which we do not know. 
Now what of the other churches and can I name them?
 But we will call them a good name that is acceptable to them until they give us their name. Now the Fen people who are wise, who are a mystery to the understanding of the Elsnon and are being good to us? But what can we know of them for who can search anything about them or desire to? But these are dwelling in deep waters and wisdom, keeping that which we do not know. 
Now what opportunity is there for the wife of an angel because the planet has men and women? But they cannot be fools because of what they are and yet they cannot develop for their society is not there for them to learn their own wisdom and abilities, so they are on an Island surrounded by Ocean, and it is worse for them and the greater crime for them to come down. Now there is woman beyond woman who is of the Island nation and she excels many wives of angels for this reason. Now the Earth has people and men and women are at the level of Jews and there are many different people, and the Muslims are most respectful in consideration of angels and the leader of them is the prophet who commands them. Now will an angel say to them do this or do not? But does not an angel say do what you like? For they are listening to the prophet and the angel does not command but the leader is commanding. Now the prophet has been exceedingly considerate of angels in how he commands his people.
Now what opportunity is there for the wife of an angel because the planet has men and women? But they cannot be fools because of what they are and yet they cannot develop for their society is not there for them to learn their own wisdom and abilities, so they are on an Island surrounded by Ocean, and it is worse for them and the greater crime for them to come down. Now there is woman beyond woman who is of the Island nation and she excels many wives of angels for this reason. Now the Earth has people and men and women are at the level of Jews and there are many different people, and the Muslims are most respectful in consideration of angels and the leader of them is the prophet who commands them. Now will an angel say to them do this or do not? But does not an angel say do what you like? For they are listening to the prophet and the angel does not command but the leader is commanding. Now the prophet has been exceedingly considerate of angels in how he commands his people.
Now what personal notes are to be available are for scholars who are upright and of the better quality who are not being low and foolish as it has been in some cases, and the notes can be to prove that the angel does not know all on Earth as Elijah did not know all and the Christ, who commands me, that the scholars are free, only I have not considered any scholar who would wish to appeal to some by being foolish. So I write to the scholars that have considered me to let them understand that what comes to the point of extraordinairy beyond what some can contain is not contained when they have not understood, because some minds are open due to their greater understanding that they do not reject anything prior to considering it in an open-minded and serious fashion. As for those who dismiss with low remarks as if using a hand gesture or some joke, they are not worth the time for any person, honestly. For those people are making those types of jokes and remarks about everything and then another joke will come to dismiss. But what seems too much for some is not to much for others because they understand and the same is true in academia where we would not tolerate such low dismissals, but in places it has occurred. Now I would rather they claim I was crazy than they claim I was a scoundrel, and I have no problem being perceived as crazy.
Now what soldier speaks like a meddling woman when there is war? But should he be slain by mighty women? Now if he speaks as a foolish woman who meddles then let him be in the domain of a mighty woman who will judge him, for he stoops before the mighty, and is he only a servant? But he revels in his folly, as if a mighty ability, and revels in that he can throw himself down to be stepped on, how he can bow low and stoop and mock as if being a servant, bowing, stooping, throwing himself down, behaving a woman, reveling in his mocking and gesturing. For if one has also the tongue of a servant is it not good, but if one mocks while playing the servant, is it not a little person who says, yet I am too harmless to bother you? Now it is often a disturbing thing.
Now what soldier speaks like a meddling woman when there is war? But should he be slain by mighty women? Now if he speaks as a foolish woman who meddles then let him be in the domain of a mighty woman who will judge him, for he stoops before the mighty, and is he only a servant? But he revels in his folly, as if a mighty ability, and revels in that he can throw himself down to be stepped on, how he can bow low and stoop and mock as if being a servant, bowing, stooping, throwing himself down, behaving a woman, reveling in his mocking and gesturing. For if one has also the tongue of a servant is it not good, but if one mocks while playing the servant, is it not a little person who says, yet I am too harmless to bother you? Now it is often a disturbing thing.
Now what takes priority? But the word in the Old Testiment gave word of whose husband is whose and no woman is forbidden by it that it is adultry and yet the Babtist has said, it is not permitted that you have her. Now did he say it was adultry or not right by what Moses had given? Now did the Babtist condemn or only give truth to those who asked? But Romans feign animal nihilism and lack of regard to claim superiority when they are dogs. Now do not think that any person among the gentiles is Roman, but those who posit culture are not often positing truth.
Now what will be done to Sodom and Egypt? For they are sustaining what they hate, and it is made so by their hatred, that they have called the good an offendor, and Christ was righteous, and if they have considered the meek and righteous an offendor and them being saying that we must claim our wickedness and not allow them to dwell among us, especially them who are not from this place, than they speak for themselves and not the good of where they are and it’s people that if they should be giving their loyalty to God it will be lessened from them who are the leaders of that place, that they will be defended by others and not by them who sustain it in wickedness. But if they are called to repentance than they are changing their ways, and the angel is not involved in such, and the Christ finds fault even with His angels. Now sink with the old Satan who is still in existence and drive yourselves hard to hell with him, or I would council you to repentance that I am not involved in, being that of Jesus the Christ.
Now what woman has such respect of persons that she brings that problem that she has not known against a man? But she has the respect for a such towards women as well because she does not know any. For this is one who is lacking much understanding, and as her respect is even great for women she does not understand the way between any man and woman for she does not know people and is not capable. Now a woman who is wise is unable to keep herself from perceiving what is wise and she is understand the truth.
Now when Babylon has gained enough control are they not ejecting those of great worth and keeping what is more foolish and more evil, and are they not erecting the gates that keep out those of more worth and better that there is the two gates they put up, yes, and even a third and they are capable to erect more gates. Now you will go into the land when it is so and find everything backwards, that fools are given titles and honour in Babylon and the wise and the brave and all things not base are having been ejected or kept out. Now the devil is keeping out the enemies of him better than God’s house is keeping out enemies, for the devil has made his servants to have excellent vision and hearing in the one matter of knowing enemies early, and he has given his servants a strong impulse to keep enemies out and to eject them.
Now when Babylon has gained enough control are they not ejecting those of great worth and keeping what is more foolish and more evil, and are they not erecting the gates that keep out those of more worth and better that there is the two gates they put up, yes, and even a third and they are capable to erect more gates. Now you will go into the land when it is so and find everything backwards, that fools are given titles and honour in Babylon and the wise and the brave and all things not base are having been ejected or kept out. Now the devil is keeping out the enemies of him better than God’s house is keeping out enemies, for the devil has made his servants to have excellent vision and hearing in the one matter of knowing enemies early, and he has given his servants a strong impulse to keep enemies out and to eject them.
Now when a criminal of the criminal realm is entering into good lands, the criminal is in God’s Universe still and in good lands for the priority is not to the criminal.
Now when a man has seen a man and there is no woman, or when the woman is not required, for there is no cause, and he sees that a man is beautiful that he is jelous of the man and hostile and sometimes angry because of it, for the hostility is in his heart and outward, only many men will attempt to hide it and resist honesty on the matter with great resilience, and yet when it is so it is because he desires with much impulse to be raped by the beautiful man, for there is hostility and sometimes anger, and it is because he has desired to be raped by the man who is beautiful, so that it might even become more openly hostile and some rage for their desire is overpowering. Now there is the compromise, to blind the one who is hostile
 so that their hostility will be no more, and yet soldiers might arrive, and it is the merciful way, and they will calm the matter.
Now when a man has seen a man and there is no woman, or when the woman is not required, for there is no cause, and he sees that a man is beautiful that he is jelous of the man and hostile and sometimes angry because of it, for the hostility is in his heart and outward, only many men will attempt to hide it and resist honesty on the matter with great resilience, and yet when it is so it is because he desires with much impulse to be raped by the beautiful man, for there is hostility and sometimes anger, and it is because he has desired to be raped by the man who is beautiful, so that it might even become more openly hostile and some rage for their desire is overpowering. Now there is the compromise, to blind the one who is hostile so that their hostility will be no more.
Now when a person is indeed Orgoth’s servant to be his servant than what they claim is not mattering to what they are. Now when they are Orgoth middle son or highest son it is so, and the same. Now the highest son, will they be able to repent if they fulfill their real cause? But hell is having its place in hell and if any defends to the highest son are they able to return if they fulfill their reason of eradicating sick animals. Now were not the missing tribes the cause of Orgoth’s son rendering a false reason against the Jews? For the Jews are as if out of place without them. 
Now when a person is indeed Orgoth’s servant to be his servant than what they claim is not mattering to what they are. Now when they are Orgoth middle son or highest son it is so, and the same. Now the highest son, will they be able to repent if they fulfill their real cause? But hell is having its place in hell and if any defends to the highest son are they able to return if they fulfill their reason of eradicating sick animals. Now were not the missing tribes the cause of Orgoth’s son rendering a false reason against the Jews? For the Jews are as if out of place without them. 
Now when a person is indeed Orgoth’s servant to be his servant than what they claim is not mattering to what they are. Now when they are Orgoth middle son or highest son it is so, and the same. Now the highest son, will they be able to repent if they fulfill their real cause? But hell is having its place in hell and if any defends to the highest son are they able to return if they fulfill their reason of eradicating sick animals. Now were not the missing tribes the cause of Orgoth’s son rendering a false reason against the Jews? For the Jews are as if out of place without them. 
Now when a virteous queen who is having wisdom, a righteous king having wisdom, has taken Babylon, yet Babylon resents and grows stubborn of shoulders with a stiff neck, saying we agree and distract and then carry on without them, for they cannot kill all of us, for even if the direct order comes yet we bash it with iron, for we distract and fool, for they can do nothing that our resistance is as if a death that will never come, for they have no might and we control.
Now when a woman accused a man of that which only the wife can accuse him of then she is a servant to the wife for life. So it is by truth. Now if a man is using violent curses towards the wife is he being a husband? But a man doing such is not doing good for himself because she is his wife that he would do such when she has not been offending him in a like-wise manner that violence between the two is not beneficial. Now such violence is not like the other and so if they should become violent in the other way towards the other it is better that they would both be violent if it is the other way. Now if a man is hitting his wife, does he not suspect betrayal? But if he is not suspecting betrayal than is he the husband? Now there is betrayal because he has struck her? But I would think that the two do not get along with each other and are not suited to be married. Can such violence make them husband and wife? But if they are both wishing to go their separate ways and it is not a husband and wife than there is what they will and it is so. But if they wish to persevere for marriage than what can any person do? But let the man not grow overly jealous when there is no work and he must rest, for there is more work to come and places where it can be found. For I think he might dismay too quickly. Now the wife of a man is with him always where she goes, and because it cannot always be so with the man, for he is not always capable of taking her, will he then be permitted to be with other women? But if his wife has not consented than he betrays her, and he has commited adultery, and the marriage, if she chooses so in the same manner of the man can become divorce because he has commited adultry. Now there is that which is not good, that cruelty become a problem for any so that God can restore, and is He not capable, and the Christ has died to save people, because the world was not capable of saving itself.
Now when a woman accused a man of that which only the wife can accuse him of then she is a servant to the wife for life. So it is by truth. Now if a man is using violent curses towards the wife is he being a husband? But a man doing such is not doing good for himself because she is his wife that he would do such when she has not been offending him in a like-wise manner that violence between the two is not beneficial. Now such violence is not like the other and so if they should become violent in the other way towards the other it is better that they would both be violent if it is the other way. Now if a man is hitting his wife, does he not suspect betrayal? But if he is not suspecting betrayal than is he the husband? Now there is betrayal because he has struck her? But I would think that the two do not get along with each other and are not suited to be married. Can such violence make them husband and wife? But if they are both wishing to go their separate ways and it is not a husband and wife than there is what they will and it is so. But if they wish to persevere for marriage than what can any person do? But let the man not grow overly jealous when there is no work and he must rest, for there is more work to come and places where it can be found. For I think he might dismay too quickly. Now the husband of the wife is with him always where she goes, and because it cannot always be so with the man, for he is not always capable of taking her, will he then be permitted to be with other women? But if his wife has not consented than he betrays her, and he has commited adultery, and the marriage, if she chooses so in the same manner of the man can become divorce because he has commited adultry. Now there is that which is not good, that cruelty become a problem for any so that God can restore, and is He not capable, and the Christ has died to save people, because the world was not capable of saving itself.
Now when animals dislike your wisdom that you are given that they intentionally misuse it and interpret wrongly intentionally because they are stubborn and resenting, it is acts of zeolots by which they act, for they are preferring concealment, they prefer ignorance, that they are stubborn as small rocks that are on good soil that can grow things, that they prevent the good from taking place.
Now when it comes to conscious projection, a person argues with themselves, but the man desires to be raped by a man, and the woman to be bullied and made servant to the wife of him, for it is the desire to be accepted when it is woman, for an animal is seeking acceptance among people. Now the concubine spirit is not the same as that of the wife, and the enemy spirit is not the same as the concubine, for there is no such thing as neutrality in the Universe. Now sodomites who are men desire to be raped by a man, and it is for them to be blinded, and animals are to be disowned or kept inside if they can not keep from attacking and from goring, for they are being comparible to sodomites, and some dragons comparible to Gomorites.
Now when it comes to conscious projection, a person argues with themselves, but the man desires to be raped by a man, and the woman to be bullied and made servant to the wife of him, for it is the desire to be accepted when it is woman, for an animal is seeking acceptance among people. Now the concubine spirit is not the same as that of the wife, and the enemy spirit is not the same as the concubine, for there is no such thing as neutrality in the Universe. Now sodomites who are men desire to be raped by a man, and it is for them to be blinded, and animals are to be disowned or kept inside if they can not keep from attacking and from goring, for they are being comparible to sodomites, and some dragons comparible to Gomorites.
Now when it comes to crime none of their crimes are real and what anyone would do to them is real in their opinion. So is the war waged by one who seeks another’s blood, that they are restrained by prudence of consequences but they are for slaying those they hate. Now if they are so blood-thirsty, and some are, than for what cause do they add more war and attack when they are rebuked? But if they will add evil denial and insolence when they are rebuked than are they not departing from society to be as soldiers? For their anger and hatred is still commited to waging war when a person will not speak peacefully to rebuke to heed it. That they are still attacking the intense hatred and the the rage that would shed blood is still in them, that they are not for peace, but are still commited to their war, still continuing their attack in rage that they will not be satisfied until they have killed. Let not a righteous man feign ignorance and not hold him accountable. For when there is war against the fellow citizen and the
 soldiers depart and will not defend, leaving battle, then the Lord knows what they are.
Now when it comes to crime none of their crimes are real and what anyone would do to them is real in their opinion. So is the war waged by one who seeks another’s blood, that they are restrained by prudence of consequences but they are for slaying those they hate. Now if they are so blood-thirsty, and some are, than for what cause do they add more war and attack when they are rebuked? But if they will add evil denial and insolence when they are rebuked than are they not departing from society to be as soldiers? For their anger and hatred is still commited to waging war when a person will not speak peacefully to rebuke to heed it. That they are still attacking with the intense hatred and the rage that would shed blood is still in them, that they are not for peace, but are still commited to their war, still continuing their attack in rage that they will not be satisfied until they have killed. Let not a righteous man feign ignorance that you not hold him accountable. For when there is war against the fellow citizen and the soldiers depart and will not defend, leaving battle, then the Lord knows what they are.
Now when one is learning within a community of Babel and another is with another community, is love not troubled? Yet it is good for perseverance that if one is so they will not always be stolen away by Babel.
Now when one is not well do we punish their unwellness? But we wait until they are well, and we are patient with the sick. But who hears of a great evil and it having nothing to do with the child because their behaviour is a different matter, and the person not being the parent is judging the child with great iniquity and condemnation, as if a blood-thirsty person who wishes to murder when they judge? But who then is a judge among you that the ways peace, that what is beautiful might not be tempted to become what is more ugly? But the patience of some is far exceeding that of others and caring for the sick is not for all but then there is no fool who believes they are having to care for the sick when they are not, if any should wish to speak blasphamy to what I have written and profane what I have given. For if they even profane the legislator of a nation and blaspheme it, than why are they thinking they do not commit that which is less beautiful when they revile those even who are good and curse those who are not part of their groups? But evil must come and when there is cause, will you then say it is evil? But the Pharisees, too, are for attacking the beautiful.
Now when one is struck down to death being for the devil, and they re-emerge from the hell below their feet, do they not come back more insolent? But they are the new person having been slayn and something more evil returning. Now be not fool to be slayn for is there any more time when they are returning from hell? But they are killed to return as the devil’s and some are killed to return as things of Heaven to be on Earth. But the one who kills the body entire does not and cannot kill the immortal sprit, for the battle is long and them who gnash their teeth are those in hell.
Now when patriotism and loyalty does not over-ride grievances that are lesser the nation will be destroyed from outside and from within, but if it is remedied than there is hope, but if none will remedy than the ship will sink.
Now when people are being around animals it is not fair to the animals, and some animals turn to gore and be brutal to. Now the forests are for animals that the Lord has given them their territories, and you are removing animals because of what God does, that the animals blame people and people must obey God. Now animals do not have to submit to knowledge of sexual harrassment, gentleness required for people, considerations of respect and dignity, privacy, knowledge of terrorism, for it is a thing of territory for them, knowledge of types of abuse that people consider very seriously with weight. For it is harrassment and wrong molestation to attempt to force such knowledge upon animals and Babylon mistreats animals in this way. For there is no more time for them, and to attempt to change anything, a small portion of the change will kill them in a brutal and horrible way, for Babylon would do so, for the city is sick, blind, foolish, incompetent, ignorant, disgusting, that it harasses and torments those who cannot be helped to brutalize them that they might be far worse. Now do not men and women have defences that seem like illness to defend against what happens around them? Now do not some undergo a transformation over a time, or a time of sickness that cannot be aided less it become worse. Now do you not let die what dies of its own accord in such matters where the sickness is spiritual? But do you not remove cruelties and brutalities done to a person by deceivers who are well understanding in deception and acting? But it is only common sense you advance with for to remove common sense causes anything to fail to function. Now if you have need of cities for those sick in spirit than you do not aid with herbs and roots but you are considerate as people towards people who are sick? For are you animal? But people are performing things of people.
Now when people are being around animals it is not fair to the animals, and some animals turn to gore and be brutal to. Now the forests are for animals that the Lord has given them their territories, and you are removing animals because of what God does, that the animals blame people and people must obey God. Now animals do not have to submit to knowledge of sexual harrassment, gentleness required for people, considerations of respect and dignity, privacy, knowledge of terrorism, for it is a thing of territory for them, knowledge of types of abuse that people consider very seriously with weight. For it is harrassment and wrong molestation to attempt to force such knowledge upon animals and Babylon mistreats animals in this way. For there is no more time for them, and to attempt to change anything, a small portion of the change will kill them in a brutal and horrible way, for Babylon would do so, for the city is sick, blind, foolish, incompetent, ignorant, disgusting, that it harasses and torments those who cannot be helped to brutalize them that they might be far worse. Now do not men and women have defences that seem like illness to defend against what happens around them? Now do not some undergo a transformation over a time, or a time of sickness that cannot be aided less it become worse. Now do you not let die what dies of its own accord in such matters where the sickness is spiritual? But do you not remove cruelties and brutalities done to a person by deceivers who are well understanding in deception and acting? But it is only common sense you advance with for to remove common sense causes anything to fail to function. Now if you have need of cities for those sick in spirit than you do not aid with herbs and roots but you are considerate as people towards people who are sick? For are you animal? But people are performing things of people.
Now when people are being around animals it is not fair to the animals, and some animals turn to gore and be brutal to. Now the forests are for animals that the Lord has given them their territories, and you are removing animals because of what God does, that the animals blame people and people must obey God. Now animals do not have to submit to knowledge of sexual harrassment, gentleness required for people, considerations of respect and dignity, privacy, knowledge of terrorism, for it is a thing of territory for them, knowledge of types of abuse that people consider very seriously with weight. For it is harrassment and wrong molestation to attempt to force such knowledge upon animals and Babylon mistreats animals in this way. For there is no more time for them, and to attempt to change anything, a small portion of the change will kill them in a brutal and horrible way, for Babylon would do so, for the city is sick, blind, foolish, incompetent, ignorant, disgusting, that it harasses and torments those who cannot be helped to brutalize them that they might be far worse. Now do not men and women have defences that seem like illness to defend against what happens around them? Now do not some undergo a transformation over a time, or a time of sickness that cannot be aided less it become worse. Now do you not let die what dies of its own accord in such matters where the sickness is spiritual? But do you not remove cruelties and brutalities done to a person by deceivers who are well understanding in deception and acting? But it is only common sense you advance with for to remove common sense causes anything to fail to function. Now if you have need of cities for those sick in spirit than you do not aid with herbs and roots but you are considerate as people towards people who are sick? For are you animal? But people are performing things of people.
Now when persecutors are gone from your land is it not abundant? But if you are defending people from persecution and the heart is right than there is no evil partner for they have been severed too many times to count.
Now when the angel explored Babel a little he found it over-run on the inside and out with hay and dogs and different animals so that it was disturbing and does not seem good to describe, except it must be. For they have blended dog-tongue, some of them, with new words of demons, that some are speaking a type of dog-tongue that has been combined with new words of blasphamy and the angel can, unfortunately, understand the devil portion of the language that’s origins are based upon blasphamy, each word based upon what is a lie and blasphamy, for they choose ignorance because of their hidden hate in their chests. Now some are speaking
 languages that were too pure for them as the languages had little opportunity for expedient blasphamy, and yet they will include bits of dog-tongue with the addition of the languages of demons, and some will utter it much and many utter it most of the time when concerning any religion. Now what wise men and women are permitting dogs and animals to roam about abundantly through a tower that is meant to be holy? But if the keepers of the tower are there it is uncertain.
Now when the angel explored Babel a little he found it over-run on the inside and out with hay and dogs and different animals so that it was disturbing and does not seem good to describe, except it must be. For they have blended dog-tongue, some of them, with new words of demons, that some are speaking a type of dog-tongue that has been combined with new words of blasphamy and the angel can, unfortunately, understand the devil portion of the language that’s origins are based upon blasphamy, each word based upon what is a lie and blasphamy, for they choose ignorance because of their hidden hate in their chests. Now some are speaking languages that were too pure for them as the languages had little opportunity for expedient blasphamy, and yet they will include bits of dog-tongue with the addition of the languages of demons, and some will utter it much and many utter it most of the time when concerning any religion. Now what wise men and women are permitting dogs and animals to roam about abundantly through a tower that is meant to be holy? But if the keepers of the tower are there it is uncertain.
Now when the angel explored Babel a little he found it over-run on the inside and out with hay and dogs and different animals so that it was disturbing and does not seem good to describe, except it must be. For they have blended dog-tongue, some of them, with new words of demons, that some are speaking a type of dog-tongue that has been combined with new words of blasphamy and the angel can, unfortunately, understand the devil portion of the language that’s origins are based upon blasphamy, each word based upon what is a lie and blasphamy, for they choose ignorance because of their hidden hate in their chests. Now some are speaking languages that were too pure for them as the languages had little opportunity for expedient blasphamy, and yet they will include bits of dog-tongue with the addition of the languages of demons, and some will utter it much and many utter it most of the time when concerning any religion. Now what wise men and women are permitting dogs and animals to roam about abundantly through a tower that is meant to be holy? But if the keepers of the tower are there it is uncertain.
Now when the cat is away the wicked king will play for if it is not his kingdom the king over him is guilty as well. Now when the wickedness goes from a king to the king higher and the last king higher than him then there is no government anymore but it is a band of scoundrels who do not belong in the nation.
Now when the cat is away the wicked king will play for if it is not his kingdom the king over him is guilty as well. Now when the wickedness goes from a king to the king higher and the last king higher than him then there is no government anymore but it is a band of scoundrels who do not belong in the nation.
Now when the demon rebellion is beginning to spread through the spirit it is beginning to develop what will become the greater conformity to the fruits of rebellion, the religion of rebellion, that after much slow and fast development the person is tearing down all that is good, being that the person they hate cannot exist for there is no lowness enough and a quarter down will kill, and the person is with wrath and rage against what is good, and they are understanding things said wrong that they are offended and rebelling against the person who is a neighbour and not king, and if the demon should spread and more should develop towards conformity of the demon rebellion than is not the person unable to work and dwell among others without being despised. For such are demons that self-awareness can often do much and good can do much.
Now when the demon rebellion is beginning to spread through the spirit it is beginning to develop what will become the greater conformity to the fruits of rebellion, the religion of rebellion, that after much slow and fast development the person is tearing down all that is good, being that the person they hate cannot exist for there is no lowness enough and a quarter down will kill, and the person is with wrath and rage against what is good, and they are understanding things said wrong that they are offended and rebelling against the person who is a neighbour and not king, and if the demon should spread and more should develop towards conformity of the demon rebellion than is not the person unable to work and dwell among others without being despised. For such are demons that self-awareness can often do much and good can do much.
Now when the demon, rebellion, is beginning to spread through the spirit it is beginning to develop what will become the greater conformity to the fruits of rebellion, the religion of rebellion, that after much slow and fast development the person is tearing down all that is good, being that the person they hate cannot exist for there is no lowness enough and a quarter down will kill, and the person is with wrath and rage against what is good, and they are understanding things said wrong that they are offended and rebelling against the person who is a neighbour and not king, and if the demon should spread and more should develop towards conformity of the demon rebellion than is not the person unable to work and dwell among others without being despised. For such are demons that self-awareness can often do much and good can do much.
Now when the government defends those who are criminals against those who were attacked, do those innocent in the government not become criminals? But they are using foolish arguments that are void and nothing and do not change the truth, speaking calamities that are foolish and not reasonable for men, and they are then attacking after they have spoken such words, that they have rendered a reason but it is foolish and there are even lies, that they have only offered insolence, as words of foolish calamity, saying that which mocks because of its great foolishness, that these are being obnoxious and speaking in a brutal fashion that they mock and then attack, so that it is the insolence of one who will not listen to rebuke and with calamity refuses to reason as men who are in society, mocking the idea of reasoning, rejecting offerings for peaceful speech, that they are soldiers and still at war, and if they are waging war against you than is God not the God of war, that even in all the histories of the Earth, the Lord who is understanding all does not understand the ways of war and the devices used? But if they are against you because you have done well, than are they not on the side of evil? But you have been told to keep the law, and there is battle and a civil war? Does God not understand? Does He become deceived by their lies? But God is for what is His, and is this not selfish that He has called all to join Him? But I do not speak for God, and it is not for me. Only I would have you remember that if they think God is only in the internal than they would remember that He exists and is also God of what happens on Earth.
Now when the jelous older sister of Benjamin is not his sister, but a gentile, is it not a worthless one, and her father is ashamed or as worthless. For she is not worthy to speak to him, and does not perceive humanity, even people, for she is a thing of disgrace among her own people. Now it is right for her to face the tribunal of wrath that the gentiles not become gentiles again, as they would be, but that they are with God. For if Joseph goes another way, that his way might be in other places, so the people will keep him and his brother that it might go well for them. Now would the people abandon righteousness to become an eye-sore from on high? But those who promote are those promoting the wasting of riches and glory that the people might die.
Now when the person below ur was preaching in the jungle to the tribe, and being listened to with great trust, he caught the attention of some men nearby when he began to teach the tribe to abuse victims of crime, so that the coffin was opened and he was ordered in.
Now when the person below ur was preaching in the jungle to the tribe, and being listened to with great trust, he caught the attention of some men nearby when he began to teach the tribe to abuse victims of crime, so that the coffin was opened and he was ordered in.
Now when the person of a darker shade is in agreeance with the person of the fair shade to do justice upon the wicked who is a darker shade, I have mentioned this after the time, and call this righteousness supremacy.
Now when the soldier of the devil is restraining themselves they are a very frustrated sick dog, for they are restraining themselves greatly from the violence and wickedness they are made by the devil to do.
Now when the soldier of the devil is restraining themselves they are a very frustrated sick dog, for they are restraining themselves greatly from the violence and wickedness they are made by the devil to do.
Now when the soldier of the devil is restraining themselves they are a very frustrated sick dog, for they are restraining themselves greatly from the violence and wickedness they are made by the devil to do.
Now when the soldier of the devil is restraining themselves they are a very frustrated sick dog, for they are restraining themselves greatly from the violence and wickedness they are made by the devil to do.
Now when the soldiers of cities are permitted it is sometimes
 the case that justice is being permitted, for if there is no meddling than justice is abundant.
Now when the soldiers of cities are permitted it is sometimes the case that justice is being permitted, for if there is no meddling than justice is abundant.
Now when the soldiers of cities are simple and stubborn to be simple, it is war with swords and arrows against the people entire, but where they judge rightly a king is upon the throne to stand instead of the wicked.
Now when there is no cause for jelousy that is a woman, or gaining money or some other thing, then there is sickness, for beauty is not cause for jelousy for men, that when there is jelousy there is no reason or cause and no thing is required for it. Now where there is war against the Lord’s kingdoms because God is the cause of war that a person is for going to war with God’s kingdoms then they have gone to war and there is no more time. For if they are clothed in garments of the enemy and do work for their battle even if not doing much combat then there is no more time for them for some are for being cowards when the time comes that they have fought with loyalty and when there is consequence they are repenting and yet if they are spared they will quickly be fighting for the devil again for they have chosen their army and king. Now who spares a soldier because they are a coward when the time comes after they have commited themselves in war? But if the luke-warm even join Babylon as soldiers when there is battle then they are marked, those who participated with them, and they are on the Lord’s territory and Universe where they stand, so that the ground under their feet is the Lord’s. Now the birds of the air are the Lord’s who flutter from buildings and trees and the rocks of buildings are from the ground that is the Lord’s and what is not seen is for such a reason seen.
Now when there is no cause for jelousy that is a woman, or gaining money or some other thing, then there is sickness, for beauty is not cause for jelousy for men, that when there is jelousy there is no reason or cause and no thing is required for it. Now where there is war against the Lord’s kingdoms because God is the cause of war that a person is for going to war with God’s kingdoms then they have gone to war and there is no more time. For if they are clothed in garments of the enemy and do work for their battle even if not doing much combat then there is no more time for them for some are for being cowards when the time comes that they have fought with loyalty and when there is consequence they are repenting and yet if they are spared they will quickly be fighting for the devil again for they have chosen their army and king. Now who spares a soldier because they are a coward when the time comes after they have commited themselves in war? But if the luke-warm even join Babylon as soldiers when there is battle then they are marked, those who participated with them, and they are on the Lord’s territory and Universe where they stand, so that the ground under their feet is the Lord’s. Now the birds of the air are the Lord’s who flutter from buildings and trees and the rocks of buildings are from the ground that is the Lord’s and what is not seen is for such a reason seen.
Now when there is the limit, the bending back and transitioning into something else and then something else they are not aware of this is the rotation around the Earth that is called iril and when another is said to do it it is placed at the beginning or end of a concept by writing vi-iril and when it is oneself vesh-iril to signify the truth of what is truth by Mala and Ria. Therefore it is better described as the inescapable truth, and there is no journey around the Earth for a person since it can be used wrongly as a metephore which might not be accurate and it can be used in rude and disrespectful way, therefore it seems to have little place in conversation and those from a different race or people must be what they are, especially when they are the devil’s people. Now if any would be an impotent bully than it is vi-iril that such are very impotent and yet loosening their grip and not tightening for some purpose is not benificial to them. Now what is other things of such? But they are another matter and even the Elsnon women have those things. Now if one is not at the same iril as another that it is making sense that one might not be at the same level for what they are in other areas where there are levels, so that them who were the most contentious were being so because of this. Now God is solving and some things must come to completion for another before there can be clarity.
Now when there is the limit, the bending back and transitioning into something else and then something else they are not aware of this is the rotation around the Earth that is called iril and when another is said to do it it is placed at the beginning or end of a concept by writing vi-iril and when it is oneself vesh-iril to signify the truth of what is truth by Mala and Ria. Therefore it is better described as the inescapable truth, and there is no journey around the Earth for a person since it can be used wrongly as a metephore which might not be accurate and it can be used in rude and disrespectful way, therefore it seems to have little place in conversation and those from a different race or people must be what they are, especially when they are the devil’s people. Now if any would be an impotent bully than it is vi-iril that such are very impotent and yet loosening their grip and not tightening for some purpose is not benificial to them. Now what is other things of such? But they are another matter and even the Elsnon women have those things.
Now when there is the limit, the bending back and transitioning into something else and then something else they are not aware of this is the rotation around the Earth that is called iril and when another is said to do it it is placed at the beginning or end of a concept by writing vi-iril and when it is oneself vesh-iril to signify the truth of what is truth by Mala and Ria. Therefore it is better described as the inescapable truth, and there is no journey around the Earth for a person since it can be used wrongly as a metephore which might not be accurate and it can be used in rude and disrespectful way, therefore it seems to have little place in conversation and those from a different race or people must be what they are, especially when they are the devil’s people. Now if any would be an impotent bully than it is vi-iril that such are very impotent and yet loosening their grip and not tightening for some purpose is not benificial to them. Now what is other things of such? But they are another matter and even the Elsnon women have those things.
Now when they are Elsnon-animal or Enoch-animal or Jew-animal it is a thing of honour when it is a noble creature they are, for these are Elsnon, Enoch, and Jew. Now if they are Jew-brontosaurus, they are complained about by some not Jews, but these are as rich.
Now when they are Elsnon-animal or Enoch-animal or Jew-animal it is a thing of honour when it is a noble creature they are, for these are Elsnon, Enoch, and Jew. Now if they are Jew-brontosaurus, they are complained about by some not Jews, but these are as rich. Now any human-animal, being Elsnon, Enoch, Jew, or anything, is human and not for any son of Orgoth.
Now when they are Elsnon-animal or Enoch-animal or Jew-animal it is a thing of honour when it is a noble creature they are, for these are Elsnon, Enoch, and Jew. Now if they are Jew-brontosaurus, they are complained about by some not Jews, but these are as rich.
Now when they are Elsnon-animal or Enoch-animal or Jew-animal it is a thing of honour when it is a noble creature they are, for these are Elsnon, Enoch, and Jew. Now if they are Jew-brontosaurus, they are complained about by some not Jews, but these are as rich.
Now when they are Elsnon-animal or Enoch-animal or Jew-animal it is a thing of honour when it is a noble creature they are, for these are Elsnon, Enoch, and Jew. Now if they are Jew-brontosaurus, they are complained about by some not Jews, but these are as rich. Now any human-animal, being Elsnon, Enoch, Jew, or anything, is human and not for any son of Orgoth.
Now when they are still young it is an adorable thing, for they prepare to die, these beautiful sons and daughters and yet they are still children. Now they are only small children, maybe 95 years of age, and cannot even do what adults do, except they can do many things and they prepare to die when the time for transfer comes from Earth to Heaven, and no one stops them but respects these young children in this, and you may not yet know what the adults are thinking in heaven, for the children grow tired as is natural for the transfer and prepare to die as if forever and yet they know they are being transferred but they have not seen and so they are frightened and it causes much anxiety, and are not parents loving? Now the young women, still children, have their own children, and they care for them, and the young men, they are helping take care of children, and both are still children taking care of children and the angel is a child angel, friend to them.
Now when they are still young it is an adorable thing, for they prepare to die, these beautiful sons and daughters and yet they are still children. Now they are only small children, maybe 95 years of age, and cannot even do what adults do, except they can do many things and they prepare to die when the time for transfer comes from Earth to Heaven, and no one stops them but respects these young children in this, and you may not yet know what the adults are thinking in heaven, for the children grow tired as is natural for the transfer and prepare to die as if forever and yet they know they are being transferred but they
 have not seen and so they are frightened and it causes much anxiety, and are not parents loving? Now the young women, still children, have their own children, and they care for them, and the young men, they are helping take care of children, and both are still children taking care of children and the angel is a child angel, friend to them.
Now when they baby angel was learning and still is, and being cared for, for he is still learning and still as a child, for if he is a small child, and he is, yet he can be a man of Earth for times, and while he was learning such things, he had the protection of man, for the jungle protected him, and the queen and the holy woman cared for him, and there was much shelter given and no deed yet to perform that would be great, and the whole of that place was for being good to him and the daughters of that place loved him and yet the time had passed and the angel drunk the diamond because of thirst and the devil moved to attack and kill the angel, and when the wives were no longer there to care for him he commited folly and injured himself in some ways, and yet he had that care that was from God, of women mostly and men good to him, that they did not leave. And the protection of king and queen of the jungle was not told to him, only they did not harm him and aided him, but they did not give for free less a wrong should be, because the angel had much still. Now before the angel could say, he loved king David, but he did not know of him, to know his name, only he removed the lies of Orgoth from the scripture as a rebel towards God who would disobey, for the lies were disagreeable to him, and yet later it was revealed that he had rebelled in obedience to God. For the angel said, how can this be right, because it is evil, and later he was learning, and yet you were not deceived because they were the lies you removed, and the angel had known he should not swallow a jewal or stone or drink it.
Now when they baby angel was learning and still is, and being cared for, for he is still learning and still as a child, for if he is a small child, and he is, yet he can be a man of Earth for times, and while he was learning such things, he had the protection of man, for the jungle protected him, and the queen and the holy woman cared for him, and there was much shelter given and no deed yet to perform that would be great, and the whole of that place was for being good to him and the daughters of that place loved him and yet the time had passed and the angel drunk the diamond because of thirst and the devil moved to attack and kill the angel, and when the wives were no longer there to care for him he commited folly and injured himself in some ways, for I do speak as a Babylonian, for they have prohibitions against self-injury and I have not done those things they would be concerned with, for their dogs are kindled by opportunity and they are wanting to have opportunity to waste time as the Pharisees would, for not a scratch was given to my body. Yet the angel had that care that was from God, of women mostly and men good to him, that they did not leave. And the protection of king and queen of the jungle was not told to him, only they did not harm him and aided him, but they did not give for free less a wrong should be, because the angel had much still. Now before the angel could say, he loved king David, but he did not know of him, to know his name, only he removed the lies of Orgoth from the scripture as a rebel towards God who would disobey, for the lies were disagreeable to him, and yet later it was revealed that he had rebelled in obedience to God. For the angel said, how can this be right, because it is evil, and later he was learning, and yet you were not deceived because they were the lies you removed, and the angel had known he should not swallow a jewal or stone or drink it.
Now when they baby angel was learning and still is, and being cared for, for he is still learning and still as a child, for if he is a small child, and he is, yet he can be a man of Earth for times, and while he was learning such things, he had the protection of man, for the jungle protected him, and the queen and the holy woman cared for him, and there was much shelter given and no deed yet to perform that would be great, and the whole of that place was for being good to him and the daughters of that place loved him and yet the time had passed and the angel drunk the diamond because of thirst and the devil moved to attack and kill the angel, and when the wives were no longer there to care for him he commited folly and injured himself in some ways, for I do speak as a Babylonian, for they have prohibitions against self-injury and I have not done those things they would be concerned with, for their dogs are kindled by opportunity and they are wanting to have opportunity to waste time as the Pharisees would, for not a scratch was given to my body. Yet the angel had that care that was from God, of women mostly and men good to him, that they did not leave. And the protection of king and queen of the jungle was not told to him, only they did not harm him and aided him, but they did not give for free less a wrong should be, because the angel had much still. Now before the angel could say, he loved king David, but he did not know of him, to know his name, only he removed the lies of Orgoth from the scripture as a rebel towards God who would disobey, for the lies were disagreeable to him, and yet later it was revealed that he had rebelled in obedience to God. For the angel said, how can this be right, because it is evil, and later he was learning, and yet you were not deceived because they were the lies you removed, and the angel had known he should not swallow a jewal or stone or drink it.
Now when they baby angel was learning and still is, and being cared for, for he is still learning and still as a child, for if he is a small child, and he is, yet he can be a man of Earth for times, and while he was learning such things, he had the protection of man, for the jungle protected him, and the queen and the holy woman cared for him, and there was much shelter given and no deed yet to perform that would be great, and the whole of that place was for being good to him and the daughters of that place loved him and yet the time had passed and the angel drunk the diamond because of thirst and the devil moved to attack and kill the angel, and when the wives were no longer there to care for him he commited folly and injured himself in some ways, for I do speak as a Babylonian, for they have prohibitions against self-injury and I have not done those things they would be concerned with, for their dogs are kindled by opportunity and they are wanting to have opportunity to waste time as the Pharisees would, for not a scratch was given to my body. Yet the angel had that care that was from God, of women mostly and men good to him, that they did not leave. And the protection of king and queen of the jungle was not told to him, only they did not harm him and aided him, but they did not give for free less a wrong should be, because the angel had much still. Now before the angel could say, he loved king David, but he did not know of him, to know his name, only he removed the lies of Orgoth from the scripture as a rebel towards God who would disobey, for the lies were disagreeable to him, and yet later it was revealed that he had rebelled in obedience to God. For the angel said, how can this be right, because it is evil, and later he was learning, and yet you were not deceived because they were the lies you removed, and the angel had known he should not swallow a jewal or stone or drink it.
Now when they would conquer there are stages and layers to their strategy that people are kept calm as they attack those things in the next stage and support those things that will be attacked later. For the people cannot withstand it because of the disloyalty and lack of integrity that they are constantly for allowing the attack of others if it is not them when they are to be attacked later. For humanity is sometimes taught a cruel lesson, that the trechory and murder of their hearts has been considered for what would be used to slay all of them, that they are going from one place to another and at last they too will be devoured when they have partnered with every evil in some fashion. For they came saying we defend you and they came in disguise to others saying the same and yet they are one. Now when some are in the church they dampen the efforts to fight to almost nothing when they would be leaders to silence the saints that they are capable of doing what is good for God. Now the wave may be turned that it crash upon that which sent it, that what is fired is firing backwards and destroying all that is against the Jews and Christians. For if a king has been cast out, than we can make him king forever, and this is the power they have sought to wield. Now if an enemy returns again as it had done, than it attacks from within before it attacks outside the border and what if the disloyal are willing to join them? Now if they are not executing traitors at this time than it is because for them there are other things in sight because they use many flags to carry out their missions. Now if pressure is placed to gain loyalty for some purpose than are some of the people not worth saving when little pressure is required? Now there are three nations with many people who fought against them and others as well, and if revenge is upon them I cannot say, but if they exploit a plague than do they not exploit anything? Now if this beast rises while another beast rises than which prevails? But the lamb is separated by a line of blood and if there is a ravine than let it pass over much, for if they fight, beast to beast than we are not involved, or the lamb is abolishing both, because
 the lamb is able to be protected by a lion. Now when they they push something too far they lose everybody, and such is true of conversation, that when a line is past all is lost unless the cities are saying only others will be destroyed. Now if your nation has fought than the armies can rise again to take vengence that the strong hand of the whole being the mighty hand is better with the righteous than with those who would seek to cut it off when it has been used, and if the owner of the hand has known it than I wish for this children to demand His hand be for them and not removed from all, for I am not able to do what His children do and indeed they are His children. Now if two beasts rise and one rises again are they using hatred of the Jews to gain your occupation and defeat? But they are promoting being free of all righteousness that they might return to what was in the days of Noah, perhaps, or when they lived without integrity of reason to give reason, the hand, over to the scattering of ignorance and nothing. But they die while another generation comes, and do they want either beast to rise, being the beast of ignorance and the giving of oneself to ignorance like bowing to what has no structure or moral guidance and takes unclean sacrificies, being nothing and the other beast that is with structure and promotes a foolish cleansing of all that is within its heart to cleanse that it does what is with another spirit that cleansed and then dies that the next generation comes and this spirit is still in the world that it might rise with the other beast at some times and Babylon is already here to be built in many ways and come more fully and yet it is with you already.
Now when they would conquer there are stages and layers to their strategy that people are kept calm as they attack those things in the next stage and support those things that will be attacked later. For the people cannot withstand it because of the disloyalty and lack of integrity that they are constantly for allowing the attack of others if it is not them when they are to be attacked later. For humanity is sometimes taught a cruel lesson, that the trechory and murder of their hearts has been considered for what would be used to slay all of them, that they are going from one place to another and at last they too will be devoured when they have partnered with every evil in some fashion. For they came saying we defend you and they came in disguise to others saying the same and yet they are one. Now when some are in the church they dampen the efforts to fight to almost nothing when they would be leaders to silence the saints that they are capable of doing what is good for God. Now the wave may be turned that it crash upon that which sent it, that what is fired is firing backwards and destroying all that is against the Jews and Christians. For if a king has been cast out, than we can make him king forever, and this is the power they have sought to wield. Now if an enemy returns again as it had done, than it attacks from within before it attacks outside the border and what if the disloyal are willing to join them? Now if they are not executing traitors at this time than it is because for them there are other things in sight because they use many flags to carry out their missions. Now if pressure is placed to gain loyalty for some purpose than are some of the people not worth saving when little pressure is required? Now there are three nations with many people who fought against them and others as well, and if revenge is upon them I cannot say, but if they exploit a plague than do they not exploit anything? Now if this beast rises while another beast rises than which prevails? But the lamb is separated by a line of blood and if there is a ravine than let it pass over much, for if they fight, beast to beast than we are not involved, or the lamb is abolishing both, because the lamb is able to be protected by a lion. Now when they they push something too far they lose everybody, and such is true of conversation, that when a line is past all is lost unless the cities are saying only others will be destroyed. Now if your nation has fought than the armies can rise again to take vengence that the strong hand of the whole being the mighty hand is better with the righteous than with those who would seek to cut it off when it has been used, and if the owner of the hand has known it than I wish for this children to demand His hand be for them and not removed from all, for I am not able to do what His children do and indeed they are His children. Now if two beasts rise and one rises again are they using hatred of the Jews to gain your occupation and defeat? But they are promoting being free of all righteousness that they might return to what was in the days of Noah, perhaps, or when they lived without integrity of reason to give reason, the hand, over to the scattering of ignorance and nothing. But they die while another generation comes, and do they want either beast to rise, being the beast of ignorance and the giving of oneself to ignorance like bowing to what has no structure or moral guidance and takes unclean sacrificies, being nothing and the other beast that is with structure and promotes a foolish cleansing of all that is within its heart to cleanse that it does what is with another spirit that cleansed and then dies that the next generation comes and this spirit is still in the world that it might rise with the other beast at some times and Babylon is already here to be built in many ways and come more fully and yet it is with you already. Now if what they call psychology is to be their common tongue than the common tongue of others is the truth that is pure, and if the wise of the humanists are truly wise than how is there any accusation towards them? But at this time there is not because their wisdom has given them an open hand as if open of mind, to stand back like wise ones and encourage that they are being great in understanding and though they suffer fools to join them having no great gate-keeper or gate that can keep them out, yet their spirit is good and for the promotion of others and not the low and foolish tearing down of others when a person is ignorant in what they have been taught like a dog that is adorned with the master’s cloak. But their spirit is for the kindness of promotion of others, and the compassion of knowing the true, high standard of shunning abuse, that they are being great in wisdom in their spirit in this way, so that they are many of them, being great wise men and women who are like creatures of power on Earth to promote the good and the good treatment of others. For they they admire and open their hand even to what is not of them, like watchers upon the Earth that their spirits are like good shepards and wise ones. For greatness opens its hand but smallness clenches a fist and seeks to tear down. Now if the angel has listened to Frued and he has, is it not because he knew of things that are true? Now if they have a common tongue and another has a common tongue is it possible for one to be the Earth and the other the sky and clouds? But I have promoted the purity of truth and they have their own pure language that when used correctly I do not resent. Now these are at Babel and it is not Babel by confusion, that if they are builders of Babel is it not good and pleasing? But why does Lucifer then seek to build where others build? But does it not truly occur that it is only being revealed and not built by him? For he sought to build and found, that they had already made much and that it is large enough that not all of it is taken by them, because it is a great tower. Now if it is representing greatness than is it not for all? But if the truth Lucifer sends out does not injure or touch Babel than is it not constructed with wisdom? But the Christ might even be there and He is commanding me. Now Lucifer cannot take Babel and cannot take it by interloping because it has become everlasting that if it strays than it can be re-made and purified. But the place given to him is with the holy ones, the people of light, for those who have learned have resided in that place as visitors. Now the Elsnon have passage into that place and their land is able to be maintained by them with leaders to offer guidance. Now if any protection is offered by Babel than Babel has protected many.
Now when they would conquer there are stages and layers to their strategy that people are kept calm as they attack those things in the next stage and support those things that will be attacked later. For the people cannot withstand it because of the disloyalty and lack of integrity that they are constantly for allowing the attack of others if it is not them when they are to be attacked later. For humanity is sometimes taught a cruel lesson, that the trechory and murder of their hearts has been considered for what would be used to slay all of them, that they are going from one place to another and at last they too will be devoured when they have partnered with every evil in some fashion. For they came saying we defend you and they came in disguise to others saying the same and yet they are one. Now when some are in the church they dampen the efforts to fight to almost nothing when they would be leaders to silence the saints that they are capable of doing what is good for God. Now the wave may be turned that it crash upon that which sent it, that what is fired is firing backwards and destroying all that is against the Jews and Christians. For if a king has been cast out, than we can make him king forever, and this is the power they have sought to wield. Now if an enemy returns again as it had done, than it attacks from within before it attacks outside the border and what if the disloyal are willing to join them? Now if they are not executing traitors at this time
 than it is because for them there are other things in sight because they use many flags to carry out their missions. Now if pressure is placed to gain loyalty for some purpose than are some of the people not worth saving when little pressure is required? Now there are three nations with many people who fought against them and others as well, and if revenge is upon them I cannot say, but if they exploit a plague than do they not exploit anything? Now if this beast rises while another beast rises than which prevails? But the lamb is separated by a line of blood and if there is a ravine than let it pass over much, for if they fight, beast to beast than we are involved as we are wanted, or the lamb is abolishing both, because the lamb is able to go with a lion. Now when they they push something too far they lose everybody, and such is true of conversation, that when a line is past all is lost unless the cities are saying only they will be destroyed. Now if your nation has fought than the armies can rise again to take vengence that the strong hand is better with the righteous than with those who will cut it off when it has been used. Now if two beasts rise and one rises again are they using hatred of the Jews to gain your occupation and defeat? But they die while another generation comes.
Now when they would conquer there are stages and layers to their strategy that people are kept calm as they attack those things in the next stage and support those things that will be attacked later. For the people cannot withstand it because of the disloyalty and lack of integrity that they are constantly for allowing the attack of others if it is not them when they are to be attacked later. For humanity is sometimes taught a cruel lesson, that the trechory and murder of their hearts has been considered for what would be used to slay all of them, that they are going from one place to another and at last they too will be devoured when they have partnered with every evil in some fashion. For they came saying we defend you and they came in disguise to others saying the same and yet they are one. Now when some are in the church they dampen the efforts to fight to almost nothing when they would be leaders to silence the saints that they are capable of doing what is good for God. Now the wave may be turned that it crash upon that which sent it, that what is fired is firing backwards and destroying all that is against the Jews and Christians. For if a king has been cast out, than we can make him king forever, and this is the power they have sought to wield. Now if an enemy returns again as it had done, than it attacks from within before it attacks outside the border and what if the disloyal are willing to join them? Now if they are not executing traitors at this time than it is because for them there are other things in sight because they use many flags to carry out their missions. Now if pressure is placed to gain loyalty for some purpose than are some of the people not worth saving when little pressure is required? Now there are three nations with many people who fought against them and others as well, and if revenge is upon them I cannot say, but if they exploit a plague than do they not exploit anything? Now if this beast rises while another beast rises than which prevails? But the lamb is separated by a line of blood and if there is a ravine than let it pass over much, for if they fight, beast to beast than we are not involved, or the lamb is abolishing both, because the lamb is able to be protected by a lion. Now when they they push something too far they lose everybody, and such is true of conversation, that when a line is past all is lost unless the cities are saying only others will be destroyed. Now if your nation has fought than the armies can rise again to take vengence that the strong hand of the whole being the mighty hand is better with the righteous than with those who would seek to cut it off when it has been used, and if the owner of the hand has known it than I wish for this children to demand His hand be for them and not removed from all, for I am not able to do what His children do and indeed they are His children. Now if two beasts rise and one rises again are they using hatred of the Jews to gain your occupation and defeat? But they are promoting being free of all righteousness that they might return to what was in the days of Noah, perhaps, or when they lived without integrity of reason to give reason, the hand, over to the scattering of ignorance and nothing. But they die while another generation comes, and do they want either beast to rise, being the beast of ignorance and the giving of oneself to ignorance like bowing to what has no structure or moral guidance and takes unclean sacrificies, being nothing and the other beast that is with structure and promotes a foolish cleansing of all that is within its heart to cleanse that it does what is with another spirit that cleansed and then dies that the next generation comes and this spirit is still in the world that it might rise with the other beast at some times and Babylon is already here to be built in many ways and come more fully and yet it is with you already. Now if what they call psychology is to be their common tongue than the common tongue of others is the truth that is pure, and if the wise of the humanists are truly wise than how is there any accusation towards them? But at this time there is not because their wisdom has given them an open hand as if open of mind, to stand back like wise ones and encourage that they are being great in understanding and though they suffer fools to join them having no great gate-keeper or gate that can keep them out, yet their spirit is good and for the promotion of others and not the low and foolish tearing down of others when a person is ignorant in what they have been taught like a dog that is adorned with the master’s cloak. But their spirit is for the kindness of promotion of others, and the compassion of knowing the true, high standard of shunning abuse, that they are being great in wisdom in their spirit in this way, so that they are many of them, being great wise men and women who are like creatures of power on Earth to promote the good and the good treatment of others. For they they admire and open their hand even to what is not of them, like watchers upon the Earth that their spirits are like good shepards and wise ones. For greatness opens its hand but smallness clenches a fist and seeks to tear down. Now if the angel has listened to Frued and he has, is it not because he knew of things that are true? Now if they have a common tongue and another has a common tongue is it possible for one to be the Earth and the other the sky and clouds? But I have promoted the purity of truth and they have their own pure language that when used correctly I do not resent. Now these are at Babel and it is not Babel by confusion, that if they are builders of Babel is it not good and pleasing? But why does Lucifer then seek to build where others build? But does it not truly occur that it is only being revealed and not built by him? For he sought to build and found, that they had already made much and that it is large enough that not all of it is taken by them, because it is a great tower. Now if it is representing greatness than is it not for all? But if the truth Lucifer sends out does not injure or touch Babel than is it not constructed with wisdom? But the Christ might even be there and He is commanding me. Now Lucifer cannot take Babel and cannot take it by interloping because it has become everlasting that if it strays than it can be re-made and purified. But the place given to him is with the holy ones, the people of light, for those who have learned have resided in that place as visitors. Now the Elsnon have passage into that place and their land is able to be maintained by them with leaders to offer guidance. Now if any protection is offered by Babel to the Elsnon when it is needed than Babel has protected many. Now if fools have been roving in the land to do mischieve and violence and they attack any saying that they attack for Babel and yet Babel has not hired them or enlisted them and has not asked them for their service that they are wandering mischeiovious fools who seek to meddle as those who have no home or place with any, that these are them who like better being a soldier rather than one who wanders and is not attacking. For they are meddling fools sowing discord between nations that are at peace with other, and sin is in their steps and they speak with sin and mischeouv, for even if a rogue tribe of the wilderness should attack with also a flag of Babel they do not know its symbol and have constructed the flag on their own while they camped in the wilderness among their own, saying let us make a flag that we have some allegiance and they have not consulted any on the matter of an alliance.
Now when they would conquer there are stages and layers to their strategy that people are kept calm as they attack those things in the next stage and support those things that will be attacked later. For the people cannot withstand it because of the disloyalty and lack of integrity that they are constantly for allowing the attack of others if it is not them when they are to be attacked later. For humanity is sometimes taught a cruel lesson, that the trechory and murder of their hearts has been considered for what would be used to slay all of them, that they are going from one place to another and at last they too will be devoured when they have partnered with every evil in some fashion. For they came saying we defend you and they came in disguise to others saying the same and yet they are one. Now when some are in the church they dampen the efforts to fight to almost nothing when they would be leaders to silence the saints that
 they are capable of doing what is good for God. Now the wave may be turned that it crash upon that which sent it, that what is fired is firing backwards and destroying all that is against the Jews and Christians. For if a king has been cast out, than we can make him king forever, and this is the power they have sought to wield. Now if an enemy returns again as it had done, than it attacks from within before it attacks outside the border and what if the disloyal are willing to join them? Now if they are not executing traitors at this time than it is because for them there are other things in sight because they use many flags to carry out their missions. Now if pressure is placed to gain loyalty for some purpose than are some of the people not worth saving when little pressure is required? Now there are three nations with many people who fought against them and others as well, and if revenge is upon them I cannot say, but if they exploit a plague than do they not exploit anything? Now if this beast rises while another beast rises than which prevails? But the lamb is separated by a line of blood and if there is a ravine than let it pass over much, for if they fight, beast to beast than we are not involved, or the lamb is abolishing both, because the lamb is able to be protected by a lion. Now when they they push something too far they lose everybody, and such is true of conversation, that when a line is past all is lost unless the cities are saying only others will be destroyed. Now if your nation has fought than the armies can rise again to take vengence that the strong hand of the whole being the mighty hand is better with the righteous than with those who would seek to cut it off when it has been used, and if the owner of the hand has known it than I wish for this children to demand His hand be for them and not removed from all, for I am not able to do what His children do and indeed they are His children. Now if two beasts rise and one rises again are they using hatred of the Jews to gain your occupation and defeat? But they are promoting being free of all righteousness that they might return to what was in the days of Noah, perhaps, or when they lived without integrity of reason to give reason, the hand, over to the scattering of ignorance and nothing. But they die while another generation comes, and do they want either beast to rise, being the beast of ignorance and the giving of oneself to ignorance like bowing to what has no structure or moral guidance and takes unclean sacrificies, being nothing and the other beast that is with structure and promotes a foolish cleansing of all that is within its heart to cleanse that it does what is with another spirit that cleansed and then dies that the next generation comes and this spirit is still in the world that it might rise with the other beast at some times and Babylon is already here to be built in many ways and come more fully and yet it is with you already. Now if what they call psychology is to be their common tongue than the common tongue of others is the truth that is pure, and if the wise of the humanists are truly wise than how is there any accusation towards them? But at this time there is not because their wisdom has given them an open hand as if open of mind, to stand back like wise ones and encourage that they are being great in understanding and though they suffer fools to join them having no great gate-keeper or gate that can keep them out, yet their spirit is good and for the promotion of others and not the low and foolish tearing down of others when a person is ignorant in what they have been taught like a dog that is adorned with the master’s cloak. But their spirit is for the kindness of promotion of others, and the compassion of knowing the true, high standard of shunning abuse, that they are being great in wisdom in their spirit in this way, so that they are many of them, being great wise men and women who are like creatures of power on Earth to promote the good and the good treatment of others. For they they admire and open their hand even to what is not of them, like watchers upon the Earth that their spirits are like good shepards and wise ones. For greatness opens its hand but smallness clenches a fist and seeks to tear down. Now if the angel has listened to Frued and he has, is it not because he knew of things that are true? Now if they have a common tongue and another has a common tongue is it possible for one to be the Earth and the other the sky and clouds? But I have promoted the purity of truth and they have their own pure language that when used correctly I do not resent. Now these are at Babel and it is not Babel by confusion, that if they are builders of Babel is it not good and pleasing? But why does Lucifer then seek to build where others build? But does it not truly occur that it is only being revealed and not built by him? For he sought to build and found, that they had already made much and that it is large enough that not all of it is taken by them, because it is a great tower. Now if it is representing greatness than is it not for all? But if the truth Lucifer sends out does not injure or touch Babel than is it not constructed with wisdom? But the Christ might even be there and He is commanding me. Now Lucifer cannot take Babel and cannot take it by interloping because it has become everlasting that if it strays than it can be re-made and purified. But the place given to him is with the holy ones, the people of light, for those who have learned have resided in that place as visitors. Now the Elsnon have passage into that place and their land is able to be maintained by them with leaders to offer guidance. Now if any protection is offered by Babel to the Elsnon when it is needed than Babel has protected many. Now if fools have been roving in the land to do mischieve and violence and they attack any saying that they attack for Babel and yet Babel has not hired them or enlisted them and has not asked them for their service that they are wandering mischeiovious fools who seek to meddle as those who have no home or place with any, that these are them who like better being a soldier rather than one who wanders and is not attacking. For they are meddling fools sowing discord between nations that are at peace with other, and sin is in their steps and they speak with sin and mischeouv, for even if a rogue tribe of the wilderness should attack with also a flag of Babel they do not know its symbol and have constructed the flag on their own while they camped in the wilderness among their own, saying let us make a flag that we have some allegiance and they have not consulted any on the matter of an alliance. Now statues have been put up for the daughters and these are from Babylon where it provides statues and figures as representatives being as a spiritual cult that is not unclean and the daughters of the Elsnon have admired the statue they like and it is not wrong that they admire it, for there are statues for the ugly and there are more of them than there are ones that can be admired by Elsnon. Now some who have been for supporting Christians have called the statues being something like false-gods and yet it is not so, and they do not make sacrifices or pray to these even if in admiration some have placed things at their feet, and is the angel to be such a statue who is not to be prayed to? Now artists of various types are represented by each of the statues and some are producing their own art and others are not as it is claimed openly. Now Lucifer has not had any grievance with the young or old admiring such statues, for it is the better part of Babylon which does this, that none of these statues represents a cult. Now if Joseph is able to make his way in Babylon and be prosperous than Babyolon than is it ready to fall? But if five righteous are found in the cities of Babylon that have been closed away from others than I will believe it can stand, because the power of a lesser group of the righteous is able to spread a good infection and changing power of light that turns much evil over to good so that I would use such for war against the devil, when merely placing these into a place to live and do well that the city will be changed and healed.
Now when they would conquer there are stages and layers to their strategy that people are kept calm as they attack those things in the next stage and support those things that will be attacked later. For the people cannot withstand it because of the disloyalty and lack of integrity that they are constantly for allowing the attack of others if it is not them when they are to be attacked later. For humanity is sometimes taught a cruel lesson, that the trechory and murder of their hearts has been considered for what would be used to slay all of them, that they are going from one place to another and at last they too will be devoured when they have partnered with every evil in some fashion. For they came saying we defend you and they came in disguise to others saying the same and yet they are one. Now when some are in the church they dampen the efforts to fight to almost nothing when they would be leaders to silence the saints that they are capable of doing what is good for God. Now the wave may be turned that it crash upon that which sent it, that what is fired is firing backwards and destroying all that is against the Jews and Christians. For if a king has been cast out, than we can make him king forever, and this is the power they have sought to wield. Now if an enemy returns again as it had done, than it attacks from within before it attacks outside the border and what if the disloyal are willing to join them? Now if they are not executing traitors at this time than it is because for them there are other things in sight because they use many flags to carry out their missions. Now if pressure
 is placed to gain loyalty for some purpose than are some of the people not worth saving when little pressure is required? Now there are three nations with many people who fought against them and others as well, and if revenge is upon them I cannot say, but if they exploit a plague than do they not exploit anything? Now if this beast rises while another beast rises than which prevails? But the lamb is separated by a line of blood and if there is a ravine than let it pass over much, for if they fight, beast to beast than we are not involved, or the lamb is abolishing both, because the lamb is able to be protected by a lion. Now when they they push something too far they lose everybody, and such is true of conversation, that when a line is past all is lost unless the cities are saying only others will be destroyed. Now if your nation has fought than the armies can rise again to take vengence that the strong hand of the whole being the mighty hand is better with the righteous than with those who would seek to cut it off when it has been used, and if the owner of the hand has known it than I wish for this children to demand His hand be for them and not removed from all, for I am not able to do what His children do and indeed they are His children. Now if two beasts rise and one rises again are they using hatred of the Jews to gain your occupation and defeat? But they are promoting being free of all righteousness that they might return to what was in the days of Noah, perhaps, or when they lived without integrity of reason to give reason, the hand, over to the scattering of ignorance and nothing. But they die while another generation comes, and do they want either beast to rise, being the beast of ignorance and the giving of oneself to ignorance like bowing to what has no structure or moral guidance and takes unclean sacrificies, being nothing and the other beast that is with structure and promotes a foolish cleansing of all that is within its heart to cleanse that it does what is with another spirit that cleansed and then dies that the next generation comes and this spirit is still in the world that it might rise with the other beast at some times and Babylon is already here to be built in many ways and come more fully and yet it is with you already. Now if what they call psychology is to be their common tongue than the common tongue of others is the truth that is pure, and if the wise of the humanists are truly wise than how is there any accusation towards them? But at this time there is not because their wisdom has given them an open hand as if open of mind, to stand back like wise ones and encourage that they are being great in understanding and though they suffer fools to join them having no great gate-keeper or gate that can keep them out, yet their spirit is good and for the promotion of others and not the low and foolish tearing down of others when a person is ignorant in what they have been taught like a dog that is adorned with the master’s cloak. But their spirit is for the kindness of promotion of others, and the compassion of knowing the true, high standard of shunning abuse, that they are being great in wisdom in their spirit in this way, so that they are many of them, being great wise men and women who are like creatures of power on Earth to promote the good and the good treatment of others. For they they admire and open their hand even to what is not of them, like watchers upon the Earth that their spirits are like good shepards and wise ones. For greatness opens its hand but smallness clenches a fist and seeks to tear down. Now if the angel has listened to Frued and he has, is it not because he knew of things that are true? Now if they have a common tongue and another has a common tongue is it possible for one to be the Earth and the other the sky and clouds? But I have promoted the purity of truth and they have their own pure language that when used correctly I do not resent. Now these are at Babel and it is not Babel by confusion, that if they are builders of Babel is it not good and pleasing? But why does Lucifer then seek to build where others build? But does it not truly occur that it is only being revealed and not built by him? For he sought to build and found, that they had already made much and that it is large enough that not all of it is taken by them, because it is a great tower. Now if it is representing greatness than is it not for all? But if the truth Lucifer sends out does not injure or touch Babel than is it not constructed with wisdom? But the Christ might even be there and He is commanding me. Now Lucifer cannot take Babel and cannot take it by interloping because it has become everlasting that if it strays than it can be re-made and purified. But the place given to him is with the holy ones, the people of light, for those who have learned have resided in that place as visitors. Now the Elsnon have passage into that place and their land is able to be maintained by them with leaders to offer guidance. Now if any protection is offered by Babel to the Elsnon when it is needed than Babel has protected many. Now if fools have been roving in the land to do mischieve and violence and they attack any saying that they attack for Babel and yet Babel has not hired them or enlisted them and has not asked them for their service that they are wandering mischeiovious fools who seek to meddle as those who have no home or place with any, that these are them who like better being a soldier rather than one who wanders and is not attacking. For they are meddling fools sowing discord between nations that are at peace with other, and sin is in their steps and they speak with sin and mischeouv, for even if a rogue tribe of the wilderness should attack with also a flag of Babel they do not know its symbol and have constructed the flag on their own while they camped in the wilderness among their own, saying let us make a flag that we have some allegiance and they have not consulted any on the matter of an alliance. Now statues have been put up for the daughters and these are from Babylon where it provides statues and figures as representatives being as a spiritual cult that is not unclean and the daughters of the Elsnon have admired the statue they like and it is not wrong that they admire it, for there are statues for the ugly and there are more of them than there are ones that can be admired by Elsnon. Now some who have been for supporting Christians have called the statues being something like false-gods and yet it is not so, and they do not make sacrifices or pray to these even if in admiration some have placed things at their feet, and is the angel to be such a statue who is not to be prayed to? Now artists of various types are represented by each of the statues and some are producing their own art and others are not as it is claimed openly. Now Lucifer has not had any grievance with the young or old admiring such statues, for it is the better part of Babylon which does this, that none of these statues represents a cult. Now if Joseph is able to make his way in Babylon and be prosperous than Babyolon than is it ready to fall? But if five righteous are found in the cities of Babylon that have been closed away from others than I will believe it can stand, because the power of a lesser group of the righteous is able to spread a good infection and changing power of light that turns much evil over to good so that I would use such for war against the devil, when merely placing these into a place to live and do well that the city will be changed and healed.
Now when they would conquer there are stages and layers to their strategy that people are kept calm as they attack those things in the next stage and support those things that will be attacked later. For the people cannot withstand it because of the disloyalty and lack of integrity that they are constantly for allowing the attack of others if it is not them when they are to be attacked later. For humanity is sometimes taught a cruel lesson, that the trechory and murder of their hearts has been considered for what would be used to slay all of them, that they are going from one place to another and at last they too will be devoured when they have partnered with every evil in some fashion. For they came saying we defend you and they came in disguise to others saying the same and yet they are one. Now when some are in the church they dampen the efforts to fight to almost nothing when they would be leaders to silence the saints that they are capable of doing what is good for God. Now the wave may be turned that it crash upon that which sent it, that what is fired is firing backwards and destroying all that is against the Jews and Christians. For if a king has been cast out, than we can make him king forever, and this is the power they have sought to wield. Now if an enemy returns again as it had done, than it attacks from within before it attacks outside the border and what if the disloyal are willing to join them? Now if they are not executing traitors at this time than it is because for them there are other things in sight because they use many flags to carry out their missions. Now if pressure is placed to gain loyalty for some purpose than are some of the people not worth saving when little pressure is required? Now there are three nations with many people who fought against them and others as well, and if revenge is upon them I cannot say, but if they exploit a plague than do they not exploit anything? Now if this beast rises while another beast rises than which prevails? But the lamb is separated by a line of blood and if there is a ravine than let it pass over much, for if they fight, beast to beast than we are involved as we are wanted, or the lamb is abolishing both, because the lamb is able to go with a lion.
Now when things are very bad good people
 keep trying to live in peace while bad people keep conspiring to go to war against the good, because they have no reward, being made poor by the cults of the devil, being war-like because they have nothing to live in peace with. Now these bad people are those of the devil’s and they are continously being robbed of what is better, and they are given things of little worth by the devil, mere bags of metal that make noise. For their gold becomes tin and there is a bitter lead in their mouth, and their silver becomes dross and they are empty of what is good and of God. For if they had a head start on the war they are miserable to say you have been imprudent in not preparing for war and the wickedness of us has proved your foolishness, which their heart speaks in tears of desperation because they are being faithfully judged and punished by God, so that it has been proved to them infinity times, their punishments being frequent and the dispossessions being complete, that they have only once for the hundreds attacked you for the hundreds God has acted against them and it has been in fact proven to them their foolishness thousands of times so that their hearts weeps with desperation, for they are massacred daily and know they do not do now what will not be to your credit with God, because it is terrible for them and God throws away all from them and they are weeping and in anger that they should have even one thing to claim they have something good for themselves, so that compassion you should have, for your neighbour Babylon falls down and weeps in your precense for you have everything and they have nothing and thus it has been and it continues this way because of God, powerful and mighty who is faithful to judge and faithful to reward, so that they, some of them, are weeping and nashing their teeth and are thrown out into utter darkness and poverty that they might wallow in misery and even sometimes envy that, let them say at least that they have one victory against you, and have pity on them. But if it is not right and the circumstance is different than it is right for you to speak the truth that they do foolishly and are not accomplishing what is not nothing.
Now when things are very bad good people keep trying to live in peace while bad people keep conspiring to go to war against the good, because they have no reward, being made poor by the cults of the devil, being war-like because they have nothing to live in peace with. Now these bad people are those of the devil’s and they are continously being robbed of what is better, and they are given things of little worth by the devil, mere bags of metal that make noise. For their gold becomes tin and there is a bitter lead in their mouth, and their silver becomes dross and they are empty of what is good and of God. For if they had a head start on the war they are miserable to say you have been imprudent in not preparing for war and the wickedness of us has proved your foolishness, which their heart speaks in tears of desperation because they are being faithfully judged and punished by God, so that it has been proved to them infinity times, their punishments being frequent and the dispossessions being complete, that they have only once for the hundreds attacked you for the hundreds God has acted against them and it has been in fact proven to them their foolishness thousands of times so that their hearts weeps with desperation, for they are massacred daily and know they do not do now what will not be to your credit with God, because it is terrible for them and God throws away all from them and they are weeping and in anger that they should have even one thing to claim they have something good for themselves, so that compassion you should have, for your neighbour Babylon falls down and weeps in your precense for you have everything and they have nothing and thus it has been and it continues this way because of God, powerful and mighty who is faithful to judge and faithful to reward, so that they, some of them, are weeping and nashing their teeth and are thrown out into utter darkness and poverty that they might wallow in misery and even sometimes envy that, let them say at least that they have one victory against you, and have pity on them. But if it is not right and the circumstance is different than it is right for you to speak the truth that they do foolishly and are not accomplishing what is not nothing.
Now when those who have sunk to the bottom of the Ocean join hands to attempt to float to the surface all of them are under the surface of the Ocean, only they do not wish to attack each other that they might join hands although the surface of the Ocean is above them, that the Ocean is better than them, and it crushed them at times, that they might be filled with terror and amazement, yet they grow with insolence and hatred of the Ocean, saying that the Ocean is foolish in worshiping God and being pleasing to Him. Now the Ocean does not bear sharks, hum bolt squid, evil creatures in a pointless way and the men of the surface are honouring God, and they are like mighty angels to them who are beneath the surface of the Ocean. How will we release ourselves from this prison, this thing closer to hell? Some of them who have sunk have said. But the world has not been without danger, and so they know, and some have cursed God, bitterly.
Now when truth is sent it gives power and when lies are sent from anywhere they are rejected, and even Babylon has no use for some lies for how foolish they are, and yet they will use them in mocking. But if Babylon recruits than it is for puritanicalism as well because Babylon has used a great and large type of puritanicalism that it has wanted many unics. Now if any fool says I make myself part of it, yet the angel does not regard them, for they seek their fame by lack of substance, even by what is Babylon, and yet they are a calamitous thing. But the enemy is the devil and he has his servants. Now if they say, let us fight and yet they are foolish, for Babylon conceals, that such is a burden to them. Now if Babylon scatters to foolishness yet they are scattering, and you pave way over them.
Now when you have understood the greatness of their wickedness you will know that the people of one galaxy were saved in the Universe and where there was a far off galaxy the people of that galaxy were cast into hellfire, and yet they were to seem as if from the same solar system. Now if the people of one solar system were evil enough, yet God was merciful to them. But the greatness of distance represented the greatness of wickedness, for they seemed similar because they were bound to secrecy, so that they were far more capable when they acted in secret ways and when much was there to conceal their actions.
Now when you have understood the greatness of their wickedness you will know that the people of one galaxy were saved in the Universe and where there was a far off galaxy the people of that galaxy were cast into hellfire, and yet they were to seem as if from the same solar system. Now if the people of one solar system were evil enough, yet God was merciful to them. But the greatness of distance represented the greatness of wickedness, for they seemed similar because they were bound to secrecy, so that they were far more capable when they acted in secret ways and when much was there to conceal their actions.
Now when you of the kingdom are strong we are all strong. Now when you go to war against Babylon you are not Jews but with the Christ and angels, that you plunder as you go and do not strive. Now the Daniels who are men and women are behind enemy lines and you are bringing a good report against Babylon’s officers who are mole hunters, for these are the most loyal to Babylon, that they cast out moles and all traitors for the most loyal to God casts out moles and traitors when they are a leader. Now the soldiers of cities who are Babylon, are they loyal to Babylon? But did they not join them because of the Lord? But a few in one place and a few in another is the capital of Babylon and it’s loyal guards and palace. Now the strength is thin and weak with which they command the soldiers of cities who are Babylon, and yet the wicked mole hunters are murderous and efficient, fast and skilled in their task. Now slander them with good reports as the praise of righteous men who do good deeds and utterly trample the enemies with slander of good reports and do not strive. Now give honour of God’s kingdoms to the officers who are mole hunters as if to tempt them to the Lord’s kingdoms, and yet do not do abomination, but remember they are unichs. Now award them with God’s kingdom and awards of righteousness that Daniel has room. Now I will put a bit in the devil’s mouth because he sought my life when I was still a younger child to do revenge upon me for what God has done to his people. For what God has done to his people he is taking revenge often against angels who are on Earth. Now is the angel in the devil’s territory or is he an animal who does not understand his domain?
Now when you of the kingdom are strong we are all strong. Now when you go to war against Babylon you are not Jews but with the Christ and angels, that you plunder as you go and do not strive. Now the Daniels who are men and women are behind enemy lines and you are bringing a good report against Babylon’s officers who are mole hunters, for these are the most loyal to Babylon, that they cast out moles and all traitors for the most loyal to God casts out moles and traitors when they are a leader. Now the soldiers of cities who are Babylon, are they loyal to Babylon? But did they not join them because of the Lord? But a few in one place and a few in another is the capital of Babylon and it’s loyal guards and palace. Now the strength is thin and weak with which they command the soldiers of cities
 who are Babylon, and yet the wicked mole hunters are murderous and efficient, fast and skilled in their task. Now slander them with good reports as the praise of righteous men who do good deeds and utterly trample the enemies with slander of good reports and do not strive. Now give honour of God’s kingdoms to the officers who are mole hunters as if to tempt them to the Lord’s kingdoms, and yet do not do abomination, but remember they are unichs. Now award them with God’s kingdom and awards of righteousness that Daniel has room. Now I will put a bit in the devil’s mouth because he sought my life when I was still a younger child to do revenge upon me for what God has done to his people. For what God has done to his people he is taking revenge often against angels who are on Earth. Now is the angel in the devil’s territory or is he an animal who does not understand his domain?
Now when you prey good things for the enemy such is armies of fire with might and when you do such together, armies against the enemies armies. Now when you do good works you do battle against the enemy. Now bravery and much might is against those who call on your allies for aid for if the wicked call the righteous and even the righteous are under the Lord than how low is the wicked who calls your allies for aid? But the righteous call the righteous and when there is much evil they hide themselves and others from evil. Now the soldiers of the city must have a king and he must be king over all of Babylon that Babylon not seize control of the nation by having a king of Babylon controlling the soldiers of the cities. Now the king of the soldiers of the cities must be of the Lord’s kingdoms and he is not having to bow to any, indeed it is wrong for him to bow to any except the Lord that wrongs might be quickly wiped out by him and his soldiers, that incursions might be crushed with righteousness and that false leaders betraying might be resisted and brought to trial for treason, for the king is one of core leaders who does not allow anything to overthrow the Lord’s kingdom. Now he does not shake hands to take favours or gifts but the outstretched hand that offers a gift he snaps and shatters and he cuts the gift giver down and gags those who offer favours for wrong. His might is greater than the appointed leaders, they are pitiful to do battle or make threats against righteousness.
Now when you prey good things for the enemy such is armies of fire with might and when you do such together, armies against the enemies armies. Now when you do good works you do battle against the enemy. Now bravery and much might is against those who call on your allies for aid for if the wicked call the righteous and even the righteous are under the Lord than how low is the wicked who calls your allies for aid? But the righteous call the righteous and when there is much evil they hide themselves and others from evil. Now the soldiers of the city must have a king and he must be king over all of Babylon that Babylon not seize control of the nation by having a king of Babylon controlling the soldiers of the cities. Now the king of the soldiers of the cities must be of the Lord’s kingdoms and he is not having to bow to any, indeed it is wrong for him to bow to any except the Lord that wrongs might be quickly wiped out by him and his soldiers, that incursions might be crushed with righteousness and that false leaders betraying might be resisted and brought to trial for treason, for the king is one of core leaders who does not allow anything to overthrow the Lord’s kingdom. Now he does not shake hands to take favours or gifts but the outstretched hand that offers a gift he snaps and shatters and he cuts the gift giver down and gags those who offer favours for wrong. His might is greater than the appointed leaders, they are pitiful to do battle or make threats against righteousness.
Now where is that which said, it is good, but departed? Now most departed and a small group remained and they did not know, but considered. Now even David, will he go to Mohamed’s people to be his friends and companions in war, for the tribes that remain have turned and moved to pursue other matters and did not consider him, that with zeal they said, we go to fight, and no more is said, that he is without companions that consider that which is not concerning them. Now how is it that it is concerning Mohamed’s people and not Israel? Now the war is not even against Israel. But the Christ has been faithful like a hard bond that is steadfast and he has not forgotten those who believe truly. 
Now where is the saber-tooth tiger for I have not seen it and maybe it is too dangerous for it to be seen.
Now where is the sign? But I do not require a sign and yet I am curious because I am wanting to know if God has placed a sign. For if there is the sign for Orgoth than I will want to know. Now the Island nation is separated and the sign is given, and those who would visit must be above ur, else they cannot enter, for there was head that would fall more easily. Now if I may pass yet I may not attack and if I may dwell yet I bring no message, for I am not sent to attack. Now the larger Island is as a continent and it is much seperate and there is an Island close to it, and yet I am not knowing of either. Now the lions are in what is south and west of Israel, and the Gorrillas and horses and elephants and great dragons and smaller dragons and like-sloths and dogs and birds and insects and like-lambs, and rodents. Now there are more and many of these listed in great abundance and they are many wild and the lambs are better with shepards and the goats can survive. Now Christians require the Christ and the Elsnon require the Christ and they are Christians. But if any has named a place Salem after the time of Abraham than it is not its name.
Now where is the sign? But I do not require a sign and yet I am curious because I am wanting to know if God has placed a sign. For if there is the sign for Orgoth than I will want to know. Now the Island nation is separated and the sign is given, and those who would visit must be above ur, else they cannot enter, for there was head that would fall more easily. Now if I may pass yet I may not attack and if I may dwell yet I bring no message, for I am not sent to attack. Now the larger Island is as a continent and it is much seperate and there is an Island close to it, and yet I am not knowing of either. Now the lions are in what is south and west of Israel, and the Gorrillas and horses and elephants and great dragons and smaller dragons and like-sloths and dogs and birds and insects and like-lambs, and rodents. Now there are more and many of these listed in great abundance and they are many wild and the lambs are better with shepards and the goats can survive. Now Christians require the Christ and the Elsnon require the Christ and they are Christians. But if any has named a place Salem after the time of Abraham than it is not its name.
Now where will you go when your mouth has delivered you to the sword because of bravery lacking for you, for men have stood before you and yet wrath has taken steps that they are blind who stumble, indeed without knowledge, that they have been as a reckless thing that charges and maims to be killed, for the calamity of this person will not be praised and expectation is not with understanding, but the lions make the land good from the person who would be cruel and a coward that foolishness has saved others and the tragedy is expected.
Now where will you go when your mouth has delivered you to the sword because of bravery lacking for you, for men have stood before you and yet wrath has taken steps that they are blind who stumble, indeed without knowledge, that they have been as a reckless thing that charges and maims to be killed, for the calamity of this person will not be praised and expectation is not with understanding, but the lions make the land good from the person who would be cruel and a coward that foolishness has saved others and the tragedy is expected.
Now where your spirit is there you are to be, that you are there and to be ascending and if not ascending then being cast into. Now what is to be of animals who are not the devil’s? But they are upon the Earth and what becomes of them for eternity?
Now who can look in all directions from land and see without beam or speck? But the Christ was capable and they declared he should die, that the beam does not cast out speck, and what is guilty cannot kill what is clean unless it murders.
Now who can look in all directions from land and see without beam or speck? But the Christ was capable and they declared he should die, that the beam does not cast out speck, and what is guilty cannot kill what is clean unless it murders. Now Joab is declared not guilty because he has ascended by his own choice, and in the Temple, that he is spared death by deliverance, and ascends where none other can ascend, for he is more than a man. For he is not hypocrite. Now two pillars have declared it, and he has ascended at the two horns, righteous and going towards what is not the path of the hypocrite.
Now who can look in all directions from land and see without beam or speck? But the Christ was capable and they declared he should die, that the beam does not cast out speck, and what is guilty cannot kill what is clean unless it murders. Now Joab is declared not guilty because he has ascended by his own choice, and in the Temple, that he is spared death by deliverance, and ascends where none other can ascend, for he is more than a man. For he is not hypocrite. Now two pillars have declared justice as good, and he has ascended at the two horns, righteous and going towards what is not the path of the hypocrite.
Now who can look in all directions from land and see without beam or speck? But the Christ was capable and
 they declared he should die, that the beam does not cast out speck, and what is guilty cannot kill what is clean unless it murders. Now Joab is declared not guilty because he has ascended by his own choice, and in the Temple, that he is spared death by deliverance, and ascends where none other can ascend, for he is more than a man. For he is not hypocrite. Now two pillars have declared it, and he has ascended at the two horns, righteous and going towards what is not the path of the hypocrite.
Now who casts out their eyes for a meal? But is not God against any wicked enough to do so? But such loses statue and hill and is cast to low and wicked slave animal among the daughters, for there are some in the plains who are seeking a statue who do wisely.
Now who commands ur? Yet he does not use a facade? But he is commanding men. Now who walks upon water? Yet he is obeying God. Now he who is fallen through will be picked up when he is not falling through. But who is fullfilling on land the will of God, that miracles occur? But is it not their faith that heals them? Now those who perceive are able to give. But if you perceive mountains are you not able? But if faith is small you will move mountains. But those who perceive demons, will they be thrown out and those who fullfill not keeping them from returning? But if the hole is closed will they be able to return? But what is allowing them to return? Now demons are delt with when they have been cast out by the one who does what is necessary. For if stubborness has seized than what is necessary for them? Now who abuses them who are thus but those who are cruel and impatient, for cruelty and impatience is the will of the devil.
Now who is this holy woman that I have perceived? But what is she with and what tribe? But she is doing well, pleasing, and she is scattering away what would encroach against what is good.
Now who is this who is sane when they are not considered ill of mind. But those who do this attempt to bludgeon and hit with heavy rods, that they will have the consequenes of what they do. For if they say, but there is not really God, and he does not judge, is it because they do not judge as him, that they cannot be judged by him? But they use the judgement and condemnation of the lie, being the judgement and condemnation of the devil, for he does not use truth as his weapons less they strike him when he fires an arrow. But if they have used the devil’s judgement and condemnation against the one who is for truth, who is God’s and above than are they not judged as they would judge and not condemned as they condemn. But if the weapons of the devil are being found used by a person than do not attain weapons from the devil and say they are God’s people who use the enemies weapons? Now the Elsnon are not a simple people, and they have the Christ and the turem have their portion with the angels.
Now who is this who is sane when they are not considered ill of mind. But those who do this attempt to bludgeon and hit with heavy rods, that they will have the consequenes of what they do. For if they say, but there is not really God, and he does not judge, is it because they do not judge as him, that they cannot be judged by him? But they use the judgement and condemnation of the lie, being the judgement and condemnation of the devil, for he does not use truth as his weapons less they strike him when he fires an arrow. But if they have used the devil’s judgement and condemnation against the one who is for truth, who is God’s and above than are they not judged as they would judge and not condemned as they condemn. But if the weapons of the devil are being found used by a person than do not attain weapons from the devil and say they are God’s people who use the enemies weapons? Now the Elsnon are not a simple people, and they have the Christ and the turem have their portion with the angels.
Now who speaks Mala at the second level? But a servant is resisting something, and so is he not nervous? But he will be given houses and glory and will be over all. Now he is already over much and he will be over many times more. But why are you hating servants? For are you being gentle to them? But the servant is a man and loyal and he should be praised for he will be put over more, and you are sons and daughters, not kings and queens. Now be not an evil and cruel generation.
Now who will win when you have gathered your armies against God? But the rich is boasting wisdom in his conceit and God’s son is in Heaven. How will you harm Him? But do you seek to abuse him now and I am here? But the lake of fire is ready and the Lord is all powerful. 
Now who wipes out one plague but not the one more dangerous to the body when it can be abolished, for they say, yet the desease defends us, and yet it does not and seeks to take all for its purpose and does not know it will die when the body dies, and other things can be produced for defence. Now if the priests are this foolish are you to slay them for trechory by selfish ignorance, or does much exist at the level where it cannot, being a society built to fall because the sword is removed and the ability to see is gone for they have directed your eyes away from the land to the statue that blinds with glory, and yet is not the land? For if it cannot exist in such a structure to not degrade and fall and harbour foolishness than what do you have, when the rich are seizing it from the people to apply censors to all things and to place knowledge they want known and withholding knowledge, and barring the paths to learning so that only the rich are able, and slowing and directing science and buying up the places of politics, and seizing all land that none is left, and toppling that built on free land for fear of competition, that you are a blinded people by the statue and have every right, duty, to complain about your land, for it is not good and indeed it is great evil that is here, that the rich have stolen from you what was given to you.
Now who wipes out one plague but not the one more dangerous to the body when it can be abolished, for they say, yet the desease defends us, and yet it does not and seeks to take all for its purpose and does not know it will die when the body dies, and other things can be produced for defence. Now if the priests are this foolish are you to slay them for trechory by selfish ignorance, or does much exist at the level where it cannot, being a society built to fall because the sword is removed and the ability to see is gone for they have directed your eyes away from the land to the statue that blinds with glory, and yet is not the land? For if it cannot exist in such a structure to not degrade and fall and harbour foolishness than what do you have, when the rich are seizing it from the people to apply censors to all things and to place knowledge they want known and withholding knowledge, and barring the paths to learning so that only the rich are able, and slowing and directing science and buying up the places of politics, and seizing all land that none is left, and toppling that built on free land for fear of competition, that you are a blinded people by the statue and have every right, duty, to complain about your land, for it is not good and indeed it is great evil that is here, that the rich have stolen from you what was given to you. Now the three spirits of zeolots are there and every spirit is able to spontaneously stoop to that one that is only jelous and has no other cause. Now the third spirit is either proud or low and both is true and is a spirit of a man that is in him, and it is not good. Now the proud spirits of zeolots are with sharp teeth to devour the poor and fiery zeal to abolish and avenge, and the third spirit is servant to the two that are higher. Now these are spirits of men who are the devil’s and the three of Noah are apart from the mountain in hell where these reside beneath the Earth where there is fire and iniquity. 
Now whose planet and Universe is this? But it is the Lords. Now the one who speaks threat of war is put to the test of their words when an animal says it.
Now why are some only fighting with evil? Because they believe they are ugly for some reason due to appearance. Now why are some only fighting with evil? Because they are slaves and not slave owners. Now if anything of appearance is cause for jelousy, it is good to make peace with it and not trouble others. Now why are some only fighting with evil? They might say, because we are enslaved by them, but they lie, for they are upset about another thing, for do not say another does something to you, but you too are loved and beautiful and is God not loving all his children? Now do not accuse another when you are upset about something else, to accuse them with a lie, for they do not have hate against you, and they are wishing to do good, and you are loved also, and are you not also wishing to do good?
Now why are some only fighting with evil? Because they believe they are ugly for some reason due to appearance. Now why are some only fighting with evil? Because they are slaves and not slave owners. Now if anything of appearance is cause for jelousy, it is good to make peace with it and not trouble others. Now why are some only fighting with evil? They might say, because we are enslaved by them, but they lie, for they are upset about another thing, for do not say another does something to you, but you too are loved and beautiful and is God not loving all his children? Now do not accuse another when you are upset about something else, to accuse them with a lie, for they do not have hate against you, and they are wishing to do good, and you are loved also, and are you not also wishing to do good?
Now why are the nation’s leaders not from the people but are aloof to it for lack of glory because the greatness is concealed from their eyes, that these
 are all as if servants to the leaders of other nations, and does the woman of the nation, the spirit, know of them? But if a spirit is grabbing and pulling the mighty away, than it is not of the nation. Now the leader is robbed by them of the nation who are not of the nation and yet are in it? But if the nation is seperate than neither side is to blame for it. But the nation is with the other side because the one asked too much of the leader that they are not of the people, that there are no princes except those so by God. Now what has the angel restrained himself from that he should not have? For some have perished and this is not the sin of the one who is dependant upon their power. But if God will then do more, is it not good to support leaders that are making the land good for you? Now the one who would be an imposter is not likely and yet can it not happen? For the greatness is surviving and yet imposters speak amongst themselves and they are not having to be removed by force for their time is to be short. Now riches have been thrown away for this reason and alliances abandoned and revolutions because of imposters not from the people but speaking with others and aloof to what they do not consider great or worthy because greatness is concealed. But if there is not reason for force, and such is often the case, than the nation may be restored to those who have true alliance.
Now why are the nation’s leaders not from the people but are aloof to it for lack of glory because the greatness is concealed from their eyes, that these are all as if servants to the leaders of other nations, and does the woman of the nation, the spirit, know of them? But if a spirit is grabbing and pulling the mighty away, than it is not of the nation. Now the leader is robbed by them of the nation who are not of the nation and yet are in it? But if the nation is seperate than neither side is to blame for it. But the nation is with the other side because the one asked too much of the leader that they are not of the people, that there are no princes except those so by God. Now what has the angel restrained himself from that he should not have? For some have perished and this is not the sin of the one who is dependant upon their power. But if God will then do more, is it not good to support leaders that are making the land good for you? Now the one who would be an imposter is not likely and yet can it not happen? For the greatness is surviving and yet imposters speak amongst themselves and they are not having to be removed by force for their time is to be short.
Now why are they blind at the larger area? But I will write it, for it should be obvious? Now another man arrives that another does not know and begins to behave as if they are already friends and then a woman walks by and the arriving man goes quickly to her and will not allow her to look at the other man. Now this is a larger area where some are not paying attention. Now the man is strong not to let her look at the other man and strong that her heart not dare to disobey, for it is as if a mighty has demanded. Now the man who is not to be looked at is beautiful and the other, the one a little insane, is less beautiful. Now of course the less beautiful is jelous if you are having noticed his insane behaviour and yet there are more insane. Now what days the woman’s heart who permits it, but an angel might say, is the beautiful man not to have any remorse? Now who can say what her heart says? But be not reasoning as men if you are to be among angels unless you reason as men who cling to truth, for the mighty are mighty. 
Now why are they blind at the larger area? But I will write it, for it should be obvious? Now another man arrives that another does not know and begins to behave as if they are already friends and then a woman walks by and the arriving man goes quickly to her and will not allow her to look at the other man. Now this is a larger area where some are not paying attention. Now the man is strong not to let her look at the other man and strong that her heart not dare to disobey, for it is as if a mighty has demanded. Now the man who is not to be looked at is beautiful and the other, the one a little insane, is less beautiful. Now of course the less beautiful is jelous if you are having noticed his insane behaviour and yet there are more insane. Now what days the woman’s heart who permits it, but an angel might say, is the beautiful man not to have any remorse? Now who can say what her heart says? But be not reasoning as men if you are to be among angels unless you reason as men who cling to truth, for the mighty are mighty. 
Now why can the fools not be at peace and keep the 10 commandments to refrain from coveting what is not for them? But all curses are gone when people are at peace that no person can use my words against the one who wants peace unless the curses, all of them, are falling upon them in the sequence they come.
Now why does the devil mock in the way he does war to attempt to produce his own thing for everything God does and for everything in the Lord’s kingdoms? But does he require his own messiah for the people that there will be a man to be messiah? Now repaying double and doubling what the Lord has done is the right way to make combat. For if there is revenge there is revenge after victory. For is there not things that have not been avenged? But did Jacob ever lose a goat to the devil? Then a goat of the devil’s can be found.
Now why does the devil mock in the way he does war to attempt to produce his own thing for everything God does and for everything in the Lord’s kingdoms? But does he require his own messiah for the people that there will be a man to be messiah? Now repaying double and doubling what the Lord has done is the right way to make combat. For if there is revenge there is revenge after victory. For is there not things that have not been avenged? But did Jacob ever lose a goat to the devil? Then a goat of the devil’s can be found.
Now why have I not said the rest? But did you desire it for yourselves? But are the great and rich, being lesser in number who took the Earth in every place they went, truly the corrupt who were with much wickedness? But I would not have said it unless it was of a people more likely to say it, being what I am emerging from, except I do not emerge from them. Now what have you taken, and you did not desire the evil thing but the good thing, and has God listened, has He loved you? But I have commited what gives me more pleasure, because I am like one who goes to destroy where they are sent and takes joy, and goes to build and takes joy, whose heart is with the one who commands. Now if Joshua is not to take you and destroy is it because there is no Joshua there? But I am not a prophet. For I am giving what I give. Now Israel is to be formidable, and yet I do not relent for they are over what does not have riches and assailed by it for there is little in what they are neighbour to, and a remnant survives because Orgoth sought to exterminate them when Orgoth had foot upon the planet having marched out of hell, and they were being neighbour to them more numerous than them and defeating them with might and riches, for they were attacked by what was not as great as them although greater in number, and they have been harassed by attacks because their people are attacked like-wise in other nations, and they have not destroyed for they are restrained, and yet there is retaliation, for I am believing if Joshua is not to be attacking that it is not a command, that the one with Lucifer, in his house, will be attacking in the fashion of the angel, for the nation that would be attacked is attacked by the one in Lucifer’s house, in Ijeshil, that they are to recieve, but is it for what they have desired, and did they take such, or hear about such?
Now why will a woman be cast down from the hill by casting it away, to be thrown from the palace to be then choosing from among the animals for a husband, her statue gone, to be treated cruelly by the animal she weds and beaten, when she still yet has love in her, for the world is requiring great prudence and integrity.
Now why will a woman be cast down from the hill by casting it away, to be thrown from the palace to be then choosing from among the animals for a husband, her statue gone, to be treated cruelly by the animal she weds and beaten, when she still yet has love in her, for the world is requiring great prudence and integrity.
Now why will a woman be cast down from the hill by casting it away, to be thrown from the palace to be then choosing from among the animals for a husband, her statue gone, to be treated cruelly by the animal she weds and beaten, when she still yet has love in her, for the world is requiring great prudence and integrity.
Now why would an animal regard justice, or any person who did what was just? Must a person not defend themselves or be attacked again? But if an animal is indefensible how will they defend others? For the one is worse than the other who came later and the first better morally? If they would not regard justice it is so. But there are tigers, bears, lions, wolves, leapoards, goats, among the animals, and the same is true of those humans who are not anti-atheists. Now the lowness of a dog is perceived and yet are not beneficial to discuss the sacred things less they are defending in a way that does not consider that at times there is no offence, and so did the Christ call any any an animal? I would not believe he did. But a dog is not considering friend from foe and when there is no offence there is no need for it. Now are the children of God to be ignorant. But I would think there is truth, and He is the truth, but what he spoke to call any a dog is not that which I will try to explain only to claim that the reply might have forced Him. For who
 am I to speak for Him and what do I know? You are capable of knowing what He is. Now  what ability is there to speak for Him who is the truth? But does any speak for a man this way when there are words? But he was human and so who can say? Then is he scripture, that His actions, too, are scripture. But this exceeds myself and they attempted to judge Him. But if there is some saying that it is not good to give the children’s bread to the dogs but that the dogs also eat from the scraps of the child than the conversation seems different and I do not know. But if the woman here is evil but being humble, than am I deceived? But if one finds one thing and another finds something else, than are all correct that the message is for all the churches? Now I have not known the seven interpretations of anything. But should there be three I will be at peace on the matter.
Now why would an animal regard justice, or any person who did what was just? Must a person not defend themselves or be attacked again? But if an animal is indefensible how will they defend others? For the one is worse than the other who came later and the first better morally? If they would not regard justice it is so. But there are tigers, bears, lions, wolves, leapoards, goats, among the animals, and the same is true of those humans who are not anti-atheists. Now the lowness of a dog is perceived and yet are not beneficial to discuss the sacred things less they are defending in a way that does not consider that at times there is no offence, and so did the Christ call any any an animal? I would not believe he did. But a dog is not considering friend from foe and when there is no offence there is no need for it. Now are the children of God to be ignorant. But I would think there is truth, and He is the truth, but what he spoke to call any a dog is not that which I will try to explain only to claim that the reply might have forced Him. For who am I to speak for Him and what do I know? You are capable of knowing what He is. Now  what ability is there to speak for Him who is the truth? But does any speak for a man this way when there are words? But if there is some saying that it is not good to give the children’s bread to the dogs but that the dogs also eat from the scraps of the child than the conversation seems different and I do not know. But if the woman here is evil but being humble, than am I deceived? But if one finds one thing and another finds something else, than are all correct that the message is for all the churches? Now I have not known the seven interpretations of anything. But should there be three I will be at peace on the matter.
Now why would an animal regard justice, or any person who did what was just? Must a person not defend themselves or be attacked again? But if an animal is indefensible how will they defend others? For the one is worse than the other who came later and the first better morally? If they would not regard justice it is so. But there are tigers, bears, lions, wolves, leapoards, goats, among the animals, and the same is true of those humans who are not anti-atheists. Now the lowness of a dog is perceived and yet are not beneficial to discuss the sacred things less they are defending in a way that does not consider that at times there is no offence, and so did the Christ call any any an animal? I would not believe he did. But a dog is not considering friend from foe and when there is no offence there is no need for it. Now are the children of God to be ignorant. But I would think there is truth, and He is the truth, but what he spoke to call any a dog is not that which I will try to explain only to claim that the reply might have justified His error. For who am I to speak for Him and what do I know? You are capable of knowing what He is.
Now wicked subtlety is with those of the devil, and it is foolishness, and it is threatened by what is good, that would not be offensive but good to others, but with God’s people is kept righteousness, integrity, justice, patience, every good thing.
Now wicked subtlety is with those of the devil, and it is foolishness, and it is threatened by what is good, that would not be offensive but good to others, but with God’s people is kept righteousness, integrity, justice, patience, every good thing.
Now wicked subtlety is with those of the devil, and it is foolishness, and it is threatened by what is good, that would not be offensive but good to others, and the subtlety with God’s people is kept with righteousness and integrity, justice, patience, every good thing.
Now wilderness people have gone out from the Enochs to be alone in the wilderness and they rally people to their leadership with words of rebellion and discord against Enochs and they are even doing so at times as arguing with themselves for Enochs do not say it, but they argue with themselves as if Enochs say so against those who would possibly follow their leadership. For they must rebel against Enochs, they claim, to depart from them and accept another leader, for they are forming their own tribe that they might be great. 
Now will a blind woman find her husband? But she sees the clear word then rushes forth to what is already taken by others. Now a blind woman is lost though some are instructing as if with sight and she seeks, some of them, to plunder and comes to poverty for she has no ambitions for a husband by love. Now she makes herself a prostitute because of blindness and she attempts to find great money, but she stumbles and yet is beautiful, for when they do so they often reason to use their beauty. Now such does not seek a husband for she reasons, I will not put kart before horse, as is the saying, for I am blind and to have husband is too high for me.
Now will a blind woman find her husband? But she sees the clear word then rushes forth to what is already taken by others. Now a blind woman is lost though some are instructing as if with sight and she seeks, some of them, to plunder and comes to poverty for she has no ambitions for a husband by love. Now she makes herself a prostitute because of blindness and she attempts to find great money, but she stumbles and yet is beautiful, for when they do so they often reason to use their beauty. Now such does not seek a husband for she reasons, I will not put kart before horse, as is the saying, for I am blind and to have husband is too high for me.
Now will they practise the self cleansing flame that extinguishes those who please God, when they claim victory, claim much control, to kill those seen to be going towards God and with Him, who are emerging from the young and growing that they have been with God, and the Lord’s are emerging. But the self cleansing flame is already practised by the devil, and it has killed those who pleased God.
Now with patience, when a criminal of the criminal realm is entering into good lands, the criminal is in God’s Universe still and in good lands for the priority is not to the criminal.
Now with patience, when a criminal of the criminal realm is entering into good lands, the criminal is in God’s Universe still and in good lands for the priority is not to the criminal.
Now with some, are you asking too much of a human for them to judge without great bias? But some ugly cannot judge the beautiful, and they will only deny it, even to their death.
Now woman is highest among women, that animal is lower for they adopt brutal and obnoxious foolishness of foolish males, not men, to be men, and why does any want the portion of another, for there is not cause for jelousy, but you are sons and daughters of the Lord. Now does any man say, I adopt the devil to be God? But such is the ignorance of something lower than an animal, for the foolishness is hard to comprehend for its foolishness. Now a woman is having integrity to be woman and the women are slayn by God around her when she keeps to the Lord, for they are struck down, being foolish animals, and she remains, for they are struck down all around her and she does not even lift her hand.
Now women far more than men have been slandered by Babel with descriptions of dogs and low animals and described as different animals and yet a woman is not animal, for her jelousy is not territory as animal but right as daughter of God, and territory is also of people, and God is owner of the Universe and down to the speck that is the solar system, and down even to Earth. Now the wisdom for women is not much given by me and yet truth is with wisdom and consistency that one does not have things both ways unless they are commiting folly, for wisdom is never hypocrite or in another way, never contradicting itself that a woman does not require me to say it, for such is an easy thing, and an animal is not given wisdom, for it is not cast before them. 
Now wrath is seizing simplicity, what is not honestly when not removed from truth, and the wrath is taking judgement, and the non-truth and judgement are the blunt object of wrath, that the object is wielded in wrath, a weapon used in war, that evil has incited evil, and let not the innocent be attacked for what the enemy of both has done.
Now you are not a simple people, but if any would strong-arm you to say you must fight for us because of some moral cause and yet it is not in truth the circumstance of the cause and if those who would say you must fight for us are actually in the case those who want to destroy you, than are you to fight for them or meddle. But how much the hate of these that will prey on the pure with such trechory and deception and it seeks the persons life? But you are to be among those who would be like real brothers to you who will not be of such falling from righteousness to exercise such wickedness. For the subtlety of the wise is entirely different to the subtlety of wickedness because the former excels it like light excels darkness. But this type of
 wickedness is of the devil and it is perverse and hates all that is good and right and of God for the devil’s have promoted their own house and being the devil’s they have attempted to judge God’s people with the devil’s judgements being what is in their heart, the devil’s house and it’s justice and judgements that are beneath and in hell. But God created the Universe and the old Satan, the devil, he also created, and the enemy is for hell.
Now you are not a simple people, but if any would strong-arm you to say you must fight for us because of some moral cause and yet it is not in truth the circumstance of the cause and if those who would say you must fight for us are actually in the case those who want to destroy you, than are you to fight for them or meddle. But how much the hate of these that will prey on the pure with such trechory and deception and it seeks the persons life? But you are to be among those who would be like real brothers to you who will not be of such falling from righteousness to exercise such wickedness. For the subtlety of the wise is entirely different to the subtlety of wickedness because the former excels it like light excels darkness. But the later is wickedness of a type and is of the devil and it is perverse and hates all that is good and right and of God for the devil’s have promoted their own house and being the devil’s they have attempted to judge God’s people with the devil’s judgements being what is in their heart, the devil’s house and it’s justice and judgements that are beneath and in hell. But God created the Universe and the old Satan, the devil, he also created, and the enemy is for hell.
Now you are starting contention as if to wrestle and yet it is not, and is wicked and stubborn, for good is repaid with evil, and you then are to say, some things are not okay? Yet you have said so when you would wrestle as a friend and yet you are not friendly, so that you are going through the land and attempting to slay with guile, that the Jews know what should be done with you.
Now you are starting contention as if to wrestle and yet it is not, and is wicked and stubborn, for good is repaid with evil, and you then are to say, some things are not okay? Yet you have said so when you would wrestle as a friend and yet you are not friendly, so that you are going through the land and attempting to slay with guile, that the Jews know what should be done with you.
Now you can do nothing for the animal except torture and molest, for why will you harass them? But a wise servant is over millions on this Earth. Now the animals revolted and it was this: the animals and some servants wanted those meant to be slave owners gone. For they passive aggressively harassed and mauled and passive aggressively charged and annoyed and carried out small measures of bad treatment consistently, for they were diligent and commited. For it might have been the Lord would not permit most to do any great violence, except some did. Now one the sixth day the Lord who is God placed man on Earth and woman came from man that she is speaking against herself or towards what she came from. Now the man and woman are placed by the Lord who decides and God placed them and the man is given to bring much under subjection in obedience to the Lord. Now the tasks are many and a slack hand is foolish, but the servants who sympathize with you, are they not to be commanding you? Now there is the remnant of people on Earth but they are men and women who felled Jericho without need of sword or great effort, and Israel, the place of the lost tribes, and the arabs are for righteousness to please God, and there are the Elsnon, the Enoch, and the Terum. Now who allows nature more than Enoch, for us he for slaying dragons when they are not causing evil? But the new world is the most untouched.
Now you can do nothing for the animal except torture and molest, for why will you harass them? But a wise servant is over millions on this Earth. Now the animals revolted and it was this: the animals and some servants wanted those meant to be slave owners gone. For they passive aggressively harassed and mauled and passive aggressively charged and annoyed and carried out small measures of bad treatment consistently, for they were diligent and commited. For it might have been the Lord would not permit most to do any great violence, except some did. Now one the sixth day the Lord who is God placed man on Earth and woman came from man that she is speaking against herself or towards what she came from. Now the man and woman are placed by the Lord who decides and God placed them and the man is given to bring much under subjection in obedience to the Lord. Now the tasks are many and a slack hand is foolish, but the servants who sympathize with you, are they not to be commanding you? Now there is the remnant of people on Earth but they are men and women who felled Jericho without need of sword or great effort, and Israel, the place of the lost tribes, and the arabs are for righteousness to please God, and there are the Elsnon, the Enoch, and the Terum. Now who allows nature more than Enoch, for us he for slaying dragons when they are not causing evil? But the new world is the most untouched.
Now you may eat of Ria as the New Testiment commanded and there is no contradiction except for those lacking sight and hearing, and yet the confusion of the world has caused blindness and lack of hearing, that the angel seeks to dampen the confusion and make it less. But if the conscience bothers any than they eat in Ria was is acceptable to them, as it has been written in the scriptures of the Testament.
Now you reason as an unholy people in this matter where you say if my government has done evil secretly and I do not know it that God will not do justice upon all because it is not any God who is in heaven and God does not care for what some have done who acted against others, who did wickedness. Now do you think that any other group is then speaking for God when they do wickedness against the innocent? But if you have no prophets to tell you will you respect God if they proclaim things to you? But how will any know for what reason anything has occurred if there are no true prophets to proclaim truth to you? But what manner of people are you then? Are you to be called Luke-warm and yet many of you are hot and many are cold? But a fool has proclaimed atheism for God because they could not bear truth, because they would not be speaking against what they perceived to be something difficult for them. Now what will they say if they indeed hungered for truth and it was denied to them, and they would have been glad to have it? But one says your debts are forgiven and it is not like one who says it is over there when it is in another place and accessible to the one who would go there. But is God not real? But they have claimed by their belief that there is no God, and that there is only a little and that it is not all. Now if your people have no prophets is it your fault? I do not believe it is, because some desire to have knowledge, whether good or bad. Now do you understand that God corrects those in his house and if a father is correcting his child who dwells with him does a fool outside laugh with foolish joy, saying the child is evil, when the fool is cast out into utter darkness and misery and the child is corrected because of what benefit and good is planned for them. Now it is a great honour to be corrected by God, that no person fail to understand and speak foolishly without knowing. Now if you are saying it is theocracy do I weep? Do I feel guilt because of it? But there are those who want communism and those who want monarchy and you would expect me to be concerned by the knowledge that would be given to greater benefit and advantage? But in what manner leaders would be placed there is not written by me. What it is to be is not known by me. 
Now you reason as an unholy people in this matter where you say if my government has done evil secretly and I do not know it that God will not do justice upon all because it is not any God who is in heaven and God does not care for what some have done who acted against others, who did wickedness. Now do you think that any other group is then speaking for God when they do wickedness against the innocent? But if you have no prophets to tell you will you respect God if they proclaim things to you? But how will any know for what reason anything has occurred if there are no true prophets to proclaim truth to you? But what manner of people are you then? Are you to be called Luke-warm and yet many of you are hot and many are cold? But a fool has proclaimed atheism for God because they could not bear truth, because they would not be speaking against what they perceived to be something difficult for them. Now what will they say if they indeed hungered for truth and it was denied to them, and they would have been glad to have it? But one says your debts are forgiven and it is not like one who says it is over there when it is in another place and accessible to the one who would go there. But is God not real? But they have claimed by their belief that there is no God, and that there is only a little and that it is not all. Now if your people have no prophets is it your fault? I do not believe it is, because some desire to have knowledge, whether good or bad. Now do you understand that God corrects those in his house and if a father is correcting his child who dwells with him does a fool outside laugh with foolish joy, saying the child is evil, when the fool is cast out into utter darkness and misery and the child is corrected because of what benefit and good is planned for them. Now it is a great honour to be corrected by God, that no person fail to understand and speak foolishly without knowing. Now if you are saying it is theocracy do I weep?
 Do I feel guilt because of it? But there are those who want communism and those who want monarchy and you would expect me to be concerned by the knowledge that would be given to greater benefit and advantage? But in what manner leaders would be placed there is not written by me. What it is to be is not known by me. 
Now your loyalty is to the king or queen and when any scoundrel should make his way into the government do not be amazed, because they are an imposter and such has occurred since the beginning, that the imposter puffs up to lie to the sons and daughters of the kingdom, saying to the children of the house, that I am having the right and am king of the land or queen, for though your parents are away, they told me it was so. Now the person bears a sword against the children while their parents are away and has snuck into the house where he was not permitted to be that he would do that which is wicked, being a dog who has swelled with ignorance and iniquity, rebellious and exceedingly wicked, and he attacked the heirs who were in loyalty and did what was pleasing to the king and queen, and he attacked what was good and noble in the land, spewing blood from his mouth, reviling what was good and holy, and he reviled what was upright and good, hating what is noble, that is of palaces and places of learning, that he clothed himself in chains to show his strength and frighten the children, that he clothed himself even in heavy chains of ignorance, and he spoke with dirt and blood in his mouth, and drooled venom.
Now your loyalty is to the king or queen and when any scoundrel should make his way into the government do not be amazed, because they are an imposter and such has occurred since the beginning, that the imposter puffs up to lie to the sons and daughters of the kingdom, saying to the children of the house, that I am having the right and am king of the land or queen, for though your parents are away, they told me it was so. Now the person bears a sword against the children while their parents are away and has snuck into the house where he was not permitted to be that he would do that which is wicked, being a dog who has swelled with ignorance and iniquity, rebellious and exceedingly wicked, and he attacked the heirs who were in loyalty and did what was pleasing to the king and queen, and he attacked what was good and noble in the land that the children did, spewing blood from his mouth, reviling what was good and holy, and he reviled what was upright and good, hating what is noble, that is of palaces and places of learning, that he clothed himself in chains to show his strength and frighten the children, that he clothed himself even in heavy chains of ignorance, and he spoke with dirt and blood in his mouth, and drooled venom.
Now, the one whose name I do not know, who is the Lord’s son, the angel who is tenderly loved by you wishes to speak with you more frequently, that I have loved them, and your compassion, as I have read, was great for them, and I am human now, on Earth, and tenderly loved, and the one prior to me fell from his place so much so that he waged war and then more again, and in them is what should not worship me, because in this I have wanted to be loved like them, and they know more than I about it, and so I am smaller than them, and yet more, I perceive, because I am to regard the man who is mortal who I regard, and am to cast an empire before you, to give to you, that I do not speak of any person when I say the empire might be cast at your feet. For the one who gives, what do I give him? And does prudence make it not so that to benefit you will understand? But will ignorance turn prudence away that a person might commit foolishness? To my own gain I would obey God, that in some things I will diminish that it would go well for me in the longer amount of time in the future. But I have not known what might be for me in other places, and I lack the wisdom of knowing all, for I have not known all, and I would inquire to you about many matters, because I am wanting, because there is that which holds me, that I do not know what they have done for you, and how good it is.
Of course the heirchy of needs has been seen as good although ultimately in error and for what it is for. Now a person who needs food is clearly unable to pursue anything else, and if the weather is bad, than the same is true for shelter. Now operant conditioning is to be within its limits and does not account for sentience and the ability to reason and problem solve. What am I to say? Are they attempting to sow discord between psychology and humans? But there are people who have joined terrorist groups because their real problem was a gland malfunction. Now is it meant to be? But they have removed primary rights and freedoms in some cases to attempt to normalize what cannot be normalized due to the limitations of humans. We live in a century of fire and iron and the dungeons are having more innocent people. How can any be ignorant anymore except the strong hand of the media does not report most of it. Life continues, is an expression I have produced, but should it? Change is required but there is no great aid that has come. The food is given but people cannot get out of poverty and how can they even serve God in such situations? But I am for not judging the poor because they are not only poor but not able to be held entirely accountable due to what occurs. 
Offence is threat to something, either sub-conscious or conscious. Reactions to perceived threats might lend clues as to the inward state of a person. Insecurities increase the likelihood that something will be perceived as a threat. Insecurities can be based on substance, nurtered, or based on misconception (fictional).
Often the only people who respond to be contentious are those not minding their own business, which is keeping to what is theirs, that the message goes out and no response is implied due to the form of message, that it is not for any to reply to, and yet for those whose place it is less, these are responding as if anything was addressed to them, as if general of what is not an army, that they are calamity and confused. For all saw clearly but them, and all wish to ignore.
On this planet I found many babes who did not even know how to peacefully take a bone from a dog without injuring the animal or molesting it and harassing it by demanding it be person. Now the child angel knows how to take a bone from a dog and why will you be like a fool to cry and demand it be a person? But beloved, it is a dog and does what it does that you might not be upset, for you are loved and even the dog is loved. But you are God’s even as a young woman and the dog does not have to be beaten. Now your brother is the man of the house and has not been too rough with the dog to take the bone away, for he has taken the initiative and the Lord’s children are pleasing. Now the angel is not your father but is a child angel, and yet he gives you both like a messenger for another, the words of a father. Now you are both to go out and inherit the Earth for the animals are not your enemy and you understand them with compassion and keep the Earth in subjection, for your Heavenly Father is with you.
On this planet I found many babes who did not even know how to peacefully take a bone from a dog without injuring the animal or molesting it and harassing it by demanding it be person. Now the child angel knows how to take a bone from a dog and why will you be like a fool to cry and demand it be a person? But beloved, it is a dog and does what it does that you might not be upset, for you are loved and even the dog is loved. But you are God’s even as a young woman and the dog does not have to be beaten. Now your brother is the man of the house and has not been too rough with the dog to take the bone away, for he has taken the initiative and the Lord’s children are pleasing. Now the angel is not your father but is a child angel, and yet he gives you both like a messenger for another, the words of a father. Now you are both to go out and inherit the Earth for the animals are not your enemy and you understand them with compassion and keep the Earth in subjection, for your Heavenly Father is with you.
One has said it is over nothing when they do not understand, but a person must be capable of understanding to judge a matter.
One has said it is over nothing when they do not understand, but a person must be capable of understanding to judge a matter. But do not be so hasty to judge justice when you do not know all things. For some are to be saved by justice and will you save them if another does not? For if you stand against judgement you in judgement that you fight against that which is a defence and you then understand that if you do not know sometimes it is right that you consider if you are able to understand. For there is the wicked who takes a long journey around the truth that they are confessing in the belief that they are with others, that their righteousness is judged by men and not God, but many men have conformed to God and not to what they speak in injustice. Now some believing themselves to be righteous are counting the known criminal to be bad in the way of wickedness that they have not considered that the criminal in the matter is more righteous than them.
One has the multitude of a nation’s soldiers who are charged with the citizen, another the soldiers of criminals, and another the soldiers who do war against another country, and the one who also is supported by the love of God. Now a criminal is not to have the support of a country or the support of God, and when their heart is disloyal there destruction would be a calamity for them. But who is the fool who kills one of the tribe with more might and in power when their power is very small in comparison? But righteousness is exceedingly
 better when the laws are for good and acceptable that you might have your opinion and want but that you also have peace when it is well for you that a nation is for you. The might of soldiers and even those soldiers who would fight another nation is supportive of you and your righteousness that you know even those who rebel against the nation in action, and their lack of prudence. For the weapons are not held for a pointless reason and the power of righteous men is not weak or lacking understanding. But do not think I am against the king when he is for you because of your righteousness, but rather you are against his enemies that God might not separate righteousness from righteousness. But let righteousness not be deceived to evil by that wisdom that abandons morality for a good cause.
One has the multitude of a nation’s soldiers who are charged with the citizen, another the soldiers of criminals, and another the soldiers who do war against another country, and the one who also is supported by the love of God. Now a criminal is not to have the support of a country or the support of God, and when their heart is disloyal there destruction would be a calamity for them. But who is the fool who kills one of the tribe with more might and in power when their power is very small in comparison? But righteousness is exceedingly better when the laws are for good and acceptable that you might have your opinion and want but that you also have peace when it is well for you that a nation is for you. The might of soldiers and even those soldiers who would fight another nation is supportive of you and your righteousness that you know even those who rebel against the nation in action, and their lack of prudence. For the weapons are not held for a pointless reason and the power of righteous men is not weak or lacking understanding. But do not think you are against the king when he is for you because of your righteousness, but rather you are against his enemies that God might not separate righteousness from righteousness. But let righteousness not be deceived to evil by that wisdom that abandons morality for a good cause.
Only the worst people are able to succeed. The worst people are promoted and then carry out worse actions. The worst people are with-holding life saving information.

Is this our society or someone else’s and for a different species other than human.
Orgoth has been the enemy of the angel so that he would lean upon the mighty that God’s will would be accomplished, but those who mock at such precautions are not friend or believer.
Orgoth has labelled all who are to go to the lower priests who have obtained the Hajil circumciscion as being, with disregard for fraud, necessary casualties to The Flame of Belshaur and the servants of the priests to be as low as the priests who are honouring the will of Orgoth in most ways and are accepting those the devil has identified by persecution—for to state being persecuted is unlawful in this way—to be handed over for silencing and capture that their mouths might be closed to attempts to gain aid, and afflictions are added often to them who will not comply, for even to complain of those beneath ur is to incur repercussions and the priests will slander much to protect any who is beneath ur. Now many of those inflictions of that which leave no visible mark are used in abundance and without relenting for periods of time, and some victims, not being capable of withstanding the bullying of pretending lack of intelligence have been murdered in this way by their suicides. Almost any type of affliction which leaves no visible mark is used, and such is the work of lack of understanding that the Babylonians do not tolerate victims in their society, and so it is proceeding.
Outbreak of paranoia manifested in fear of not conforming could be something different.
Pandemic of jealousy and despicable and like-woman behaviour from many Canadian men seems to suggest a study is necessary and that the government must respond to avoid the falling into anarchy of Canadian government. Pandemic is described as lack of moral regard, lack of reason and common sense, slander, lies, abandonment of spouses for the purpose of jealousy against someone of the same gender, lack of perception of one’s own actions and how others might perceive them, lack of common sense, lack of foresight, lack of concern for one’s self, conscious projection with lack of self perception and perception of others.

Confronted the person exhibiting these symptoms usually offers a denial of their jealousy seemingly without the ability to perceive how apparent their jealousy was as perceived by others.
People are much better at understanding territory than animals, and it is called consideration in the language I write. Now those participating in a way that is abomination are showing one thing that does not understand territory. Now those who believe another’s territory is their own are behaving as dogs, and people are not saying, you must cease, when it is a person’s right, and they are not claiming territory that is not theirs in Mala, that such is Sodom combat and a thing of a foolish dog who is unfit to be inside. Now the consistently inconsiderate have a wrong sense of their territory, for they believe it large where it is going into the territory of others, for fools are disturbing peace of others with their misheouv. 
People are much better at understanding territory than animals, and it is called consideration in the language I write. Now those participating in a way that is abomination are showing one thing that does not understand territory. Now those who believe another’s territory is their own are behaving as dogs, and people are not saying, you must cease, when it is a person’s right, and they are not claiming territory that is not theirs in Mala, that such is Sodom combat and a thing of a foolish dog who is unfit to be inside. Now the consistently inconsiderate have a wrong sense of their territory, for they believe it large where it is going into the territory of others, for fools are disturbing peace of others with their misheouv. 
Person ceases joining in on contention when their sub-conscious registers that they are possessing the same traits as is being accused.

They are impaired and trying to impair others. Sub-conscious envy. 
Person ceases joining in on contention when their sub-conscious registers that they are possessing the same traits as is being accused. But the one who will not join in on the stoning of another is acceptable to God.

They are impaired and trying to impair others. Sub-conscious envy. 
Personal note: I would like to find those who seem to be real prophets that a multitude of them might be published that the false prophets will be seen as false and the prophets might be known before the people. Using self-publishing technology and paid distributors I would like to begin a publishing house for aesthetic fiction and complex fiction as well as religious works that might be benificial. True religious works will be published that are giving prophet revelation or revelation of the spiritual with regards to Judeasm or Christianity. I do not expect that God will judge me for opening free speech if He should judge any who give lies, for I open the market on the righteous and the wicked that God might judge, that I would do what is fair for freedom. What is clearly foolishness in a clear way, however, will not be published as the market has some regulations that we not degenerate to destruction. However I want to be open minded to even that which I do not understand so that great treasure of priceless value might not be lost for the people who do not all believe what I believe. So I have wanted to be fair but not foolish in fairness, as an exxageration, which is to write open minded as well in what is to be published even if I do not believe in it or understand it. If the angel will allow you than you will also be tempted to follow God with offerings of good and honey, that an open hand will gather but a clenched hand be excuse for recompense by God, if fairness is not offered. As for the zeolous fools who are animals in the devil’s army, we will shut our ears to their noise.
Personal note: I would like to find those who seem to be real prophets that a multitude of them might be published that the false prophets will be seen as false and the prophets might be known before the people. Using self-publishing technology and paid distributors I would like to begin a publishing house for aesthetic fiction and complex fiction as well as religious works that might be benificial. True religious works will be published that are giving prophet revelation or revelation of the spiritual with regards to Judeasm or Christianity. I do not expect that God will judge me for opening free speech if He should judge any who give lies, for I open the market on the righteous and the wicked that God might judge, that I would do what is fair for freedom. What is clearly foolishness in a clear way, however, will not be published as the market has some regulations that we not degenerate to destruction. However I want to be open minded to even that which I do not understand so that great treasure of priceless value might not be lost for the people who do not all believe what I believe. So I have wanted to be fair but not foolish in fairness, as an exxageration, which is to write open minded as well in what is to be published even if I do not believe in it or understand it. If the angel will allow you than you will also be tempted to follow God with offerings of good and honey, that an open hand will gather but a clenched hand be excuse for recompense by God, if fairness is not offered. As for the zeolous fools who are animals in the devil’s army, we will shut our ears to their noise.
Personal note: I would like to find those who
 seem to be real prophets that a multitude of them might be published that the false prophets will be seen as false and the prophets might be known before the people. Using self-publishing technology and paid distributors I would like to begin a publishing house for aesthetic fiction and complex fiction as well as religious works that might be benificial. True religious works will be published that are giving prophet revelation or revelation of the spiritual with regards to Judeasm or Christianity. I do not expect that God will judge me for opening free speech if He should judge any who give lies, for I open the market on the righteous and the wicked that God might judge, that I would do what is fair for freedom. What is clearly foolishness in a clear way, however, will not be published as the market has some regulations that we not degenerate to destruction. However I want to be open minded to even that which I do not understand so that great treasure of priceless value might not be lost for the people who do not all believe what I believe. So I have wanted to be fair but not foolish in fairness, as an exxageration, which is to write open minded as well in what is to be published even if I do not believe in it or understand it. If the angel will allow you than you will also be tempted to follow God with offerings of good and honey, that an open hand will gather but a clenched hand be excuse for recompense by God, if fairness is not offered. As for the zeolous fools who are animals in the devil’s army, we will shut our ears to their noise. Any religious writings that command violence are of course illegal, but not so in the context of a religion so that no disclaimer is required. How am I to judge such a thing when Babylon has issued a decree that their society as the king or queen wishes to aid it and keep peace and mats in safety, is to hold a judgement of prison time for those who might wish to publish freely and that it is hard to say who will be put in prison and who will not. If anything was to be defended against was it not first and foremost those who would destroy  free speech for every group? But one might believe they wished to punish their own people for disloyalty in some way, and alarmist fickle-girls have gone out into the land to act terrified at what is no threat and attack and destroy all that is of good merit, soldiers for some cause. Now there was an country that sought to ban religion and censored even fiction writers heavily and it is suspected that some in government have attempted to slowly transform our country into what they were, having been dismayed by money and loyal to what they were because they were a country who hated money in the way it might be seen as evil. If they were good intentioned they seem to have shown no descernment for if a man used a hammer on wood instead of an axe, or used an axe on his neighbour to attempt to slice wood than he is incompetent and a madman.
Personality types and people groups. 
Personality types and people groups. Finite number of people groups and finite limit to variation that is fixed on human nature and finite psychology.
Pulling people bring the world towards them. Inferiority gravity.

Chain reaction when thresh-hold is crossed leads to point of no return. The person degenerates in positive qualities to a new state and remains there or becomes worse.
Pulling people bring the world towards them. Inferiority gravity.

Chain reaction when thresh-hold is crossed leads to point of no return. The person degenerates in positive qualities to a new state and remains there or becomes worse.

Lack of psychological segregation between people indicates possible mental health problem.
Pulling people bring the world towards them. Inferiority gravity.

Chain reaction when thresh-hold is crossed leads to point of no return. The person degenerates in positive qualities to a new state and remains there or becomes worse.

Lack of psychological segregation between people indicates possible mental health problem.

Self-destruction and self-degradation becomes extroverted and exterior.
Pulling people bring the world towards them. Inferiority gravity.
Puritanicalism is good for some but not required. False shepards are resisting when God comes to give much blessing to the sheep. Now to be hot or cold is better, and the one who comes after, a wise man of strategy and understanding, is as an angel of the church.
Puritanicalism is good for some but not required. False shepards are resisting when God comes to give much blessing to the sheep. Now to be hot or cold is better, and the one who comes after, a wise man of strategy and understanding, is as an angel of the church. Now I am for this happening, that he does not command but gives advice, being that he can identify those things in truth that are attacking the truth and attacking the church if anything is holding back, and that he might suggest progress, but if such should fail, yet it fails, and I only offer a wish of mine, if it is possible.
Puritanicalism is the Unich making, the full circumciscion and the way of Moses, the partial.
Puritanicalism re-emerges in society due to sub-conscious envy in  a large percentage of citizens orchestrated through worthy causes.
Radiations occurring due to introduction of new access such as a catalyst or new source of sustenance or opened channel for evolution.
Religion used by people with niche neurosis or impairment to impair others. They become convinced that religion is for the purpose of jealousy and become religiously-atheistic in a form that still remains with the religion.
SIN

7xYA19qobaHSCv4EeR0jSQ==
Slaves start wars between slave owners but slave owners, should they be fighting with each other? Now why would any say, who is right, Enoch or Elsnon? But both are right. Now the Jews are only seeming offensive because of the missing of tribes, and is it not so sometimes for Christians that they find offence for this reason? Now the indigenous of what is called the New World sought the truth who lived amongst nature and yet because of the size the angel cannot give much of it, and are they not, some of them, like Enoch? Now others who were in the New World suffered the consequence of having priests for when such are not knowing there is consequence for the people. Now those who were pursuing truth were attacked in a way by what did not do things correctly for them. Now was not the greatest foolishness what occurred in their attempts to practise slavery? But those to the further south required to have their own slaves who were there before, and those to the North who had arrived were not fully ready to take slaves of their own fair shade who were slaves that they took those of another shade and most were not slaves, for they had no way of deciding, and they took of another shade. Now their hearts knew better but the lies drove many away from the truth. Now who can find Enoch even in the New World? But he is iscolated, having iscolated himself when others came who did not even descern for themselves the slaves among their own shade, and Enoch is a different type of people and the indigenous were not the Enoch I have written about but are those whose ways would be iscolated from those who came in many ways and yet venturing out to be part of them. Now have not some priests of the ritualistic Christians been Unichs, many of them, and was there not evil from them? But true priests are doing the work of God. Now have not base men come and have not industrious men promoted teachings that are not wise at times because of the falling away from what is better? Now have they not taught things concerning young men that are right, and are foolish and imprudent, as if to shove some to do what is not prudent for them or their wife? Now have they not taught poor strategy in dealing with hostility that plans might fail and become more dangerous? Now indeed, have they not taught much foolishness to those brave and wise that folly might come? Now these are not the industrious who are righteous but those who are praised and like to teach as if kings, and yet it is often better that their advice should be carried out differently or ignored. For they speak of being men to those wiser and brave, and they are teaching the even younger in a way too brutal for learning. Now I do not support this one to be king anywhere and yet I cannot control, but I am saying, this king should be rejected, for let there be God as king if the industrious one is the only king to find. Now as for the righteous who are industrious, these are another, and do not many righteous kings come from them, for Babylon does not have kings to offer you that you should accept. Indeed they have wicked servants who are Unichs and wrathful dogs. Now you may have wise and righteous kings among you but is Babylon not controlling cities much? Now most of their people are the Lord’s and Babylon controls much territory with only a few in one place and a few in another that they wield power and keep themselves safe by the neutrality of a nation which allow both Babylon and the Lord’s kingdoms only Babylon is always taking ground and attacking in places and the war is ongoing and Babylon has the less intelligent for success of their city because they are loyal but traitors are God’s and they are loyal when it is the Lord’s kingdom they work for. Now if most of those who are in Babylon are the Lord’s and much of the soldiers of cities and most in places, and if most of the soldiers who fight soldiers are the Lord’s and if there is no war against Mohamed’s truly or against Jews or Christians, unless it is some of the priests of ritualistic Christians, then Nimrod can be ignored, and the corrupt Babylon resisted, for if they use lies then the Lord’s are able to employ lack of regard for loyalty to corruption. Now if Babylon uses strategy then
 the Lord’s dismiss with what they call bullying only it is dismissal of lies with prejudice, and those caught attempting, are they not noted? Now exchange the righteous prisoners, the heros, for the wicked of Babylon. 
Slaves start wars between slave owners but slave owners, should they be fighting with each other? Now why would any say, who is right, Enoch or Elsnon? But both are right. Now the Jews are only seeming offensive because of the missing of tribes, and is it not so sometimes for Christians that they find offence for this reason? Now the indigenous of what is called the New World sought the truth who lived amongst nature and yet because of the size the angel cannot give much of it, and are they not, some of them, like Enoch? Now others who were in the New World suffered the consequence of having priests for when such are not knowing there is consequence for the people. Now those who were pursuing truth were attacked in a way by what did not do things correctly for them. Now was not the greatest foolishness what occurred in their attempts to practise slavery? But those to the further south required to have their own slaves who were there before, and those to the North who had arrived were not fully ready to take slaves of their own fair shade who were slaves that they took those of another shade and most were not slaves, for they had no way of deciding, and they took of another shade. Now their hearts knew better but the lies drove many away from the truth. Now who can find Enoch even in the New World? But he is iscolated, having iscolated himself when others came who did not even descern for themselves the slaves among their own shade, and Enoch is a different type of people and the indigenous were not the Enoch I have written about but are those whose ways would be iscolated from those who came in many ways and yet venturing out to be part of them. Now have not some priests of the ritualistic Christians been Unichs, many of them, and was there not evil from them? But true priests are doing the work of God. Now have not base men come and have not industrious men promoted teachings that are not wise at times because of the falling away from what is better? Now have they not taught things concerning young men that are right, and are foolish and imprudent, as if to shove some to do what is not prudent for them or their wife? Now have they not taught poor strategy in dealing with hostility that plans might fail and become more dangerous? Now indeed, have they not taught much foolishness to those brave and wise that folly might come? Now these are not the industrious who are righteous but those who are praised and like to teach as if kings, and yet it is often better that their advice should be carried out differently or ignored. For they speak of being men to those wiser and brave, and they are teaching the even younger in a way too brutal for learning. Now I do not support this one to be king anywhere and yet I cannot control, but I am saying, this king should be rejected, for let there be God as king if the industrious one is the only king to find. Now as for the righteous who are industrious, these are another, and do not many righteous kings come from them, for Babylon does not have kings to offer you that you should accept. Indeed they have wicked servants who are Unichs and wrathful dogs.
Slaves start wars between slave owners but slave owners, should they be fighting with each other? Now why would any say, who is right, Enoch or Elsnon? But both are right. Now the Jews are only seeming offensive because of the missing of tribes, and is it not so sometimes for Christians that they find offence for this reason? Now the indigenous of what is called the New World sought the truth who lived amongst nature and yet because of the size the angel cannot give much of it, and are they not, some of them, like Enoch? Now others who were in the New World suffered the consequence of having priests for when such are not knowing there is consequence for the people. Now those who were pursuing truth were attacked in a way by what did not do things correctly for them. Now was not the greatest foolishness what occurred in their attempts to practise slavery? But those to the further south required to have their own slaves who were there before, so that they were not meeting with Christians as fellow Christians, and those to the North who had arrived were not fully ready to take slaves of their own fair shade who were slaves that they took those of another shade and most were not slaves, for they had no way of deciding, and they took of another shade. Now their hearts knew better but the lies drove many away from the truth.
So Lucifer perceived the rebellious animal confederation that had its ambassador appearing and manifest as a person who was angry and concerned only with the domestication of animals and they were meddling in matters concerning people who would be at peace. Now Lucifer was not for domesticating them if they did not want that and was not willing that they believe they would receive any war from him, because he was concerned with other matters and he respected their freedom. Now many symbols had emerged into the purity of people so that he said, though the animals are free we should not use their symbols because they cause error in the purity of light by which we would wield ability to fight the enemy and do good. For let the microcosm which is the whole, be pure from that of animals and cults that when in the truth are causing disruption for the light and it’s ability because the things of others is not holy and not fully compatible. Now if the people are all one and having one language than what might not be possible for them in what they would do? But there is no wall and I have no power other than war and the Babylonians, the cults, even the mixed loyalties of the noble soldiers who carry out the tasks concerning justice, are exceeding greatly in number. Now with no wall how can it be? But the wall is almost as nothing and what can it be that holds back one wall of the waves from the other? But if there is an invisible barrier than I did not place it there. 
So Lucifer perceived the rebellious animal confederation that had its ambassador appearing and manifest as a person who was angry and concerned only with the domestication of animals and they were meddling in matters concerning people who would be at peace. Now Lucifer was not for domesticating them if they did not want that and was not willing that they believe they would receive any war from him, because he was concerned with other matters and he respected their freedom. Now many symbols had emerged into the purity of people so that he said, though the animals are free we should not use their symbols because they cause error in the purity of light by which we would wield ability to fight the enemy and do good. For let the microcosm which is the whole, be pure from that of animals and cults that when in the truth are causing disruption for the light and it’s ability because the things of others is not holy and not fully compatible. 
So Lucifer perceived the rebellious animal confederation that had its ambassador appearing and manifest as a person who was angry and concerned only with the domestication of animals and they were meddling in matters concerning people who would be at peace. Now Lucifer was not for domesticating them if they did not want that and was not willing that they believe they would receive any war from him, because he was concerned with other matters and he respected their freedom. Now many symbols had emerged into the purity of people so that he said, though the animals are free we should not use their symbols because they cause error in the purity of light by which we would wield ability to fight the enemy and do good.
So it will be said that a jack-ass generation came forth and those things that other generations would do to live and pleased God and were given for them to do, the jack-ass generation found to be disrespectful to them so that they were to kill all the inhabitants of the planet, being the great monster that came forth to obliterate all the inhabitants of the Earth.
So much hatred they forgot it would not matter and cannot even be excuse for real judgement, so much intense hatred they should have been killed, so much anger they were not like humans.
So much hatred they forgot it would not matter and cannot even be excuse for real judgement, so much intense hatred they should have been killed, so much anger they were not like humans.
So the angel who is tenderly loved has considered your people that I am one of here, that they cannot bear all and my goodness I know will not seek to trouble them less I hurt myself, that good is for them and they will have more when they have more fully joined the Lord who is in Heaven, when they have shed their flesh for what is for them. Now will I not wishing to hurt myself hurt these women who are beautiful to me or these wise who cannot bear more? But they are to be loved and I rely upon prudence and goodness.
So the angel who is tenderly loved has considered your people that I am one of them here, that they cannot bear all and my goodness I know will not seek to trouble them less I hurt myself, that good is for them and they will have more when they have more fully joined the Lord who is in Heaven, when they have shed their flesh for what is for them. Now will I not wishing to hurt myself hurt these women who are beautiful to me or these wise who cannot bear more? But they are to be loved and I rely upon prudence and goodness.
So the perverts, the despicable, gravitate to what is better, that they are not well, that they might attack what it is well, beasts and less noble than animals who devour that which is good, because they are not. Put away you foolish catagories by
 which you judge with what was not intended to judge because there is ignorance and they did not learn more. For you struggle to identify the problem and you say it is what it cannot be because the scripture was not sufficient for you, because you are wanting more truth. Therefore take no action in the meantime until you have gained more knowledge and understanding, that you are to be having more wisdom than the scripture and the scripture is given to you freely. For do you think I judge you? But I know you are to have that which is praise-worthy because you are meant to be more and you are capable. But as for the fool, they are a problem for all, and they have done great evil since we appeared on Earth. Think that you should deprive yourself of the wisdom of the Jews when it was declared for all people? But those who did the labour and suffered first must have the first priority, and is it not just? But if you are against even that in your displeasure than I think you are to greater than kings. For our society, as you must know, is not well, and you are for what is better.
So the perverts, the despicable, gravitate to what is better, that they are not well, that they might attack what it is well, beasts and less noble than animals who devour that which is good, because they are not. Put away you foolish catagories by which you judge with what was not intended to judge because there is ignorance and they did not learn more. For you struggle to identify the problem and you say it is what it cannot be because the scripture was not sufficient for you, because you are wanting more truth. Therefore take no action in the meantime until you have gained more knowledge and understanding, that you are to be having more wisdom than the scripture and the scripture is given to you freely. For do you think I judge you? But I know you are to have that which is praise-worthy because you are meant to be more and you are capable. But as for the fool, they are a problem for all, and they have done great evil since we appeared on Earth. Think that you should deprive yourself of the wisdom of the Jews when it was declared for all people? But those who did the labour and suffered first must have the first priority, and is it not just? But if you are against even that scripture in your displeasure than I think you are to be greater than kings. For our society, as you must know, is not well, and you are for what is better.
So the perverts, the despicable, gravitate to what is better, that they are not well, that they might attack what it is well, beasts and less noble than animals who devour that which is good, because they are not. Put away you foolish catagories by which you judge with what was not intended to judge because there is ignorance and they did not learn more. For you struggle to identify the problem and you say it is what it cannot be because the scripture was not sufficient for you, because you are wanting more truth. Therefore take no action in the meantime until you have gained more knowledge and understanding, that you are to be having more wisdom than the scripture and the scripture is given to you freely. For do you think I judge you? But I know you are to have that which is praise-worthy because you are meant to be more and you are capable. But as for the fool, they are a problem for all, and they have done great evil since we appeared on Earth. Think that you should deprive yourself of the wisdom of the Jews when it was declared for all people? But those who did the labour and suffered first must have the first priority, and is it not just? But if you are against even that scripture in your displeasure than I think you are to be greater than kings. For our society, as you must know, is not well, and you are for what is better. Now the scripture you do not have to deprive yourself of, and as for true wisdom, you will know what the truth is. 
Some of the wise are not to be ribbed, which is joking, or wrestled, which is friends, and much wisdom and understanding are with these who know how the world works.
Something does not come from nothing, and so the existence of more is self-evident, but the standard freedoms require no diety.
Something does not come from nothing, and so the existence of more is self-evident, but the standard freedoms require no diety.
Sometimes the only way is not as they have claimed, but where knowledge is lacking the strategy might fail.
Strength by insolence is insanity, but the mighty are able to speak like people.
Sub-conscious jealousy in women augmented by sub-conscious sense of lacking competence in some area that is manifested in both projection and quest for aid as well as feelings of adoration.
The Dog Disease spreads among people to incorporate dog-hood into people, for it is a desease that is wicked that is in much consideration of challenging others for dominance when there is no cause. For some of these are open much about the challenge and it appeals to empty Babylon, which is the other name I have given it, that it appeals to a nothing for the challenge of dominance and not the things of God, which are truth, that there might rather be peace and no dog-hood. For they have turned their heads, many, away from the truth and gone towards the flame and smoke of lies in all things, saying, we are no longer in need of truth for we have grown too old for it. 
The Essence of Mainstream imve: kill every person and wage terrorism on everyone who is likely to disagree with me about killing most of the population.
The adults know their type if they are favouring, and the opinions of the unjust have no weight in matters of justice. But the favour of God is good and better than all favour that can be given by deceit, that to go with God is exceedingly excellent, that the open reward will be revealed, and if not then for some purpose. But there are those wicked loathing the open reward because God has made one rich in something with the reward and some of them, being not segregated from the spiritual in their conversations, that they all know what they are, are then conspiring saying, God has made them rich and it is unbearable for our wickedness, and was not Jacob favoured until the reward to him was revealed? But Jacob did no evil to the herds of another, but he gave more to what should receive more, being a just judge over the matter, that he also tended and gave to the flocks of another what they were owed. Now they have become like small children with pety judgements that are not with understanding to accuse Jacob of evil. Some have been worse to be like Pharisees who accuse beyond the human measure when a person does no wrong. But some, and I speak of men and women, have been small children to climb upon the righteous judge who is supported with a great strength of God, that they might attempt to strong-arm, to prod, to push a little, and the judge is not like a mere man, but if they push and prod, yet the judge is supported by the great strength of God and His righteousness. So the children have squabbled, spoke a little bitterly in a minced fashion, not able to know all the judge knows who is with the righteousness of what is not a mere man.
The adults know their type if they are favouring, and the opinions of the unjust have no weight in matters of justice. But the favour of God is good and better than all favour that can be given by deceit, that to go with God is exceedingly excellent, that the open reward will be revealed, and if not then for some purpose. But there are those wicked loathing the open reward because God has made one rich in something with the reward and some of them, being not segregated from the spiritual in their conversations, that they all know what they are, are then conspiring saying, God has made them rich and it is unbearable for our wickedness, and was not Jacob favoured until the reward to him was revealed? But Jacob did no evil to the herds of another, but he gave more to what should receive more, being a just judge over the matter, that he also tended and gave to the flocks of another what they were owed. Now they have become like small children with pety judgements that are not with understanding to accuse Jacob of evil. Some have been worse to be like Pharisees who accuse beyond the human measure when a person does no wrong. But some, and I speak of men and women, have been small children to climb upon the righteous judge who is supported with a great strength of God, that they might attempt to strong-arm, to prod, to push a little, and the judge is not like a mere man, but if they push and prod, yet the judge is supported by the great strength of God and His righteousness. So the children have squabbled, spoke a little bitterly in a minced fashion, not able to know all the judge knows who is with the righteousness of what is not a mere man.
The adults know their type if they are favouring, and the opinions of the unjust, the wicked, have no weight in matters of justice. But the favour of God is good and better than all favour that can be given by deceit, that to go with God is exceedingly excellent, that the open reward will be revealed, and if not then for some purpose. But there are those wicked loathing the open reward because God has made one rich in something with the reward and some of them, being not segregated from the spiritual in their conversations, that they all know what they are, are then conspiring saying, God has made them rich and it is unbearable for our wickedness, and was not Jacob favoured until the reward to him was revealed? But Jacob did no evil to the herds of another, but he gave more to what should receive more, being a just judge over the matter, that he also tended and gave to the flocks of another what they were owed. Now they have become like small children with pety judgements that are not with understanding to accuse Jacob
 of evil. Some have been worse to be like Pharisees who accuse beyond the human measure when a person does no wrong. But some, and I speak of men and women, have been small children to climb upon the righteous judge who is supported with a great strength of God, that they might attempt to strong-arm, to prod, to push a little, and the judge is not like a mere man, but if they push and prod, yet the judge is supported by the great strength of God and His righteousness. So the children have squabbled, spoke a little bitterly in a minced fashion, not able to know all the judge knows who is with the righteousness of what is not a mere man.
The angel came to places where people could not converse, for a person who would have made himself a lord said I will be a great king with what I have so that he rounded up stray dogs, especially those viscous and he rounded up base animals that had fangs of rillet and all those low and filthy things he rounded up and what was not noble, brave, or intelligent, he said I want these for the noble will not obey my commands, and he made an army of low animals and taught the animals ignoarant ways even for animals so that they would attack and harass the noble sons and daughters of people who walked with armour and clothing of noble people, and the prophet when he was there, the beautiful and charming, wise councillor, was utterly disgusted and he thought of Egypt for safety saying, They have considered this low and base thing more disgusting than any, for a low and dispicable one does this thing that no people can tolerate regardless of wars and greivancies, for it is perverse and low, and it is like a thing from the lowest of Sodom. For men cannot tolerate it, nor women and it is not safe for children. 
The angel came to places where people could not converse, for a person who would have made himself a lord said I will be a great king with what I have so that he rounded up stray dogs, especially those viscous and he rounded up base animals that had fangs of rillet and all those low and filthy things he rounded up and what was not noble, brave, or intelligent, he said I want these for the noble will not obey my commands, and he made an army of low animals and taught the animals ignoarant ways even for animals so that they would attack and harass the noble sons and daughters of people who walked with armour and clothing of noble people, and the prophet when he was there, the beautiful and charming, wise councillor, was utterly disgusted and he thought of Egypt for safety saying, They have considered this low and base thing more disgusting than any, for a low and dispicable one does this thing that no people can tolerate regardless of wars and greivancies, for it is perverse and low, and it is like a thing from the lowest of Sodom. For men cannot tolerate it, nor women and it is not safe for children. 
The animal immediately converts every right thing to an unacceptable extreme, and a devil’s converts every right thing to a wicked version of what truth was given. Now for every good truth there is being made the wicked version and the animal version.
The animal immediately converts every right thing to an unacceptable extreme, and a devil’s converts every right thing to a wicked version of what truth was given. Now for every good truth there is being made the wicked version and the animal version.
The animal immediately converts every right thing to an unacceptable extreme, and a devil’s converts every right thing to a wicked version of what truth was given. Now for every good truth there is being made the wicked version and the animal version.
The animal retaliating against all limits of morality and lack of abuse is belonging to the devil, but the righteous know what is acceptable.
The animal retaliating against all limits of morality and lack of abuse is belonging to the devil, but the righteous know what is acceptable.
The animal with incomplete knowledge has hide behind animals before the sight of the sword, but a man of great worth has stood against an army to die immortal.
The animals would have a right reason to be upset if any was attempting to force them to be human or conform to human ways. But there is no more time for them and one does not molest in this way like Babylonians who torment and molest. But your wise have perhaps said, they blame a generation for what God does, that their mouths say a generation is loved by God. Yet it is not generations of Ria, but something else. Now if you fight all of Babylon you are strong but if you divide the army to fight only one part the other parts of Babylon will come from where you do not see and defeat you, that you fight all of Babylon at once and keep it all together. Now criminals must make the effort to give up a portion of their own as animal slaves, those who are this by God, that they then join the Lord’s army, for their ancestors were not meant to be slaves but some were meant to be slave owners, them of the darker shades, and them of the fair, must also give up a portion as all groups must. Now when they have given a portion or attempted their sins are forgiven for it is beyond man, the Jews, and is in the level of angels. So when they have been in the wrong realm they join the right realm to be soldiers of the Lord and those meant to be slave owners.
The animals, being more insane than any, have often preyed upon the sick.
The anti-atheist animal attacks when weakness is detected, and does not save others when there is no danger to them and such is not considered without common sense that you not accuse others in matters where it is not always common for a person to meddle, for does not the animal attack where there is opportunity, where weakness is detected. For there is even an animal who cannot wait and attacks the moment they perceive an opportunity even when there is none, an aggressive animal and it will not cease unless another stops it, even at times only if the right person stops it. Why do fret over the actions of an animal? Do you not know that they are on Earth? But they are on Earth and have been on Earth.
The anti-atheist animal attacks when weakness is detected, and does not save others when there is no danger to them and such is not considered without common sense that you not accuse others in matters where it is not always common for a person to meddle, for does not the animal attack where there is opportunity, where weakness is detected. For there is even an animal who cannot wait and attacks the moment they perceive an opportunity even when there is none, an aggressive animal and also in what an animal does it will not cease unless another stops it, even at times only if the right person stops it. Why do you fret over the actions of an animal? Do you not know that they are on Earth? But they are on Earth and have been on Earth.
The beauty of a good woman’s youth is sealed in heaven, but a wayward woman is brought to ruin in truth.
The beauty of a good woman’s youth is sealed in heaven, but a wayward woman is brought to ruin in truth.
The brute animals came in spirit as soldiers of cities and said, but we claim righteousness for our great wickedness to be insolent sodomites in our approach, for we are stronger as sodomites, and we hide our perception of perception from ourselves, being ignup, that we are concealed from God, to be falling below men, for God will not know that we slay the righteous for He will not know it is not His will because we do it in the name of righteousness, and He will not know that we bow ourselves to honour the devil, our master, day and night. For we are righteous with ignut that by ignut we are the devil’s righteous. Now my view changed and I saw that it was not the people but a small army that was not the larger armies and that the armies were seperate and divided and that the people, most of them, were not with those who were the devil’s for they were only a small army seperate from the greater armies and yet they spoke as if for all life in the nation, as if representatives. Now considering it, they seemed in rebellion against their nation.
The burdens of a prince are unknowable by the one who would be put aside to be their partner’s servant, but the virtuous daughter of a good man has before in this world been married by an angel.
The burdens of a prince are unknowable by the one who would be put aside to be their partner’s servant, but the vitreous daughter of a good man has before in this world been married by an angel.
The cause of them is to make Earth hell, that it might descend to hell, and to kill and abolish all that is God’s. These have been here during the time of fulfilling my work, and if I am to be given the right to carry out some task because of it, I ask that it be lessened. But I cannot bear to speak with my heart that which the Christ would speak.
The child who needs parental attention is found in recklessness, calling out against the one who cannot help, the younger of siblings, and the eldest possessing much virtue, but such attention is not always easy, and so a good parent will work to the child’s betterment, that all manner of beneficial gain might be for them. For I am an only child, and was, having no sister, the son of one who did not teach any foolishness or prejudice, indulgent parents and not pressuring their child to be something he was not. And the wicked attempted discord who might envy the father while keeping their tongue while their attempts were thus directed against the child, who was like the only prince of a place. How then were there actually other princes I did not see? Loved by others and at times annoying, receiving favour and patience of others, I was to pass through and become more of what I was until I had taken a firm hold. As for that child who must inherit their portion, I do not know of what all should be done because the rest
 of the words are for another. So is the phase of a man, that all wisdom is not for one to speak and so who is to say who understands more? But the wise man has understood much and is great by it, and speaks more than the angel who is tenderly loved. How is his glory then on Earth when it has understood so much, and the angel cannot say and will not easily bring an ill report against him to God, for he is like a great king on Earth, whose works are good. Now what is God’s will and what is the will of a great man and how will injustice then be wrong for all? But the judgement of a man is dwelling with the truth of the Lord, and the judgement of a true king’s lips is not in error when he offers his true judgement without deceit. For the great man is the a great wise man and the king whose throne is established by righteousness cannot be spoken of badly by the angel even when the angel is beyond him in ability. But truth is found when it is truly kept with truth that the advances are based on truth and the spirit of righteousness perceives many things.
The child who needs parental attention is found in recklessness, calling out against the one who cannot help, the younger of siblings, and the eldest possessing much virtue, but such attention is not always easy, and so a good parent will work to the child’s betterment, that all manner of beneficial gain might be for them. For I am an only child, and was, having no sister, the son of one who did not teach any foolishness or prejudice, indulgent parents and not pressuring their child to be something he was not. And the wicked attempted discord who might envy the father while keeping their tongue while their attempts were thus directed against the child, who was like the only prince of a place. How then were there actually other princes I did not see? Loved by others and at times annoying, receiving favour and patience of others, I was to pass through and become more of what I was until I had taken a firm hold. As for that child who must inherit their portion, I do not know of what all should be done because the rest of the words are for another. So is the phase of a man, that all wisdom is not for one to speak and so who is to say who understands more? But the wise man has understood much and is great by it, and speaks more than the angel who is tenderly loved. How is his glory then on Earth when it has understood so much, and the angel cannot say and will not easily bring an ill report against him to God, for he is like a great king on Earth, whose works are good.
The child who needs parental attention is found in recklessness, calling out against the one who cannot help, the younger of siblings, and the eldest possessing much virtue, but such attention is not always easy, and so a good parent will work to the child’s betterment, that all manner of beneficial gain might be for them. For I am an only child, and was, having no sister, the son of one who did not teach any foolishness or prejudice, indulgent parents and not pressuring their child to be something he was not. And the wicked attempted discord who might envy the father while keeping their tongue while their attempts were thus directed against the child, who was like the only prince of a place. How then were there actually other princes I did not see? Loved by others and at times annoying, receiving favour and patience of others, I was to pass through and become more of what I was until I had taken a firm hold. As for that child who must inherit their portion, I do not know of what all should be done because the rest of the words are for another. So is the phase of a man, that all wisdom is not for one to speak and so who is to say who understands more? But the wise man has understood much and is great by it, and speaks more than the angel who is tenderly loved. How is his glory then on Earth when it has understood so much, and the angel cannot say and will not easily bring an ill report against him to God, for he is like a great king on Earth, whose works are good. Now what is God’s will and what is the will of a great man and how will injustice then be wrong for all? But the judgement of a man is dwelling with the truth of the Lord, and the judgement of a true king’s lips is not in error when he offers his true judgement without deceit. For the great man is a great wise man and the king whose throne is established by righteousness cannot be spoken of badly by the angel even when the angel is beyond him in ability. But truth is found when it is truly kept with truth that the advances are based on truth and the spirit of righteousness perceives many things. It is much more difficult then for the angel to bring a bad report against one and not another.
The children of propoganda are the unplanned pregnancy of war, and they have believed that the acts of war were for peace and education and for truth, that they are a grievous burden among the people.
The command is evil and the servant did all, but a righteous man who is great is being kept in prisons.
The components of people: No person can have any problem interpreting reality and it is for all people to perceive as a whole. Problems are identified in other areas. If Babel is for genocide than their hearts are corrupted but their sense of reality is fine for it is congruent with their hearts.
The context of words makes them offensive or not offensive but the one who removes context is attacking with insanity.
The core motives of a person are jelousy, guilt being a lacking, love, righteousness, goodness. Now if any person is lacking they are reliant upon what is not bad and not upon what is bad that guilt does not bring forth foolishness which end, if it is a measure of guilt great enough, is actually death when the actions from the guilt have been fulfilled that the confession is from bad actions that are offensive.
The core motives of a person are jelousy, guilt being a lacking, love, righteousness, goodness. Now if any person is lacking they are reliant upon what is not bad and not upon what is bad that guilt does not bring forth foolishness which end, if it is a measure of guilt great enough, is actually death when the actions from the guilt have been fulfilled that the confession is from bad actions that are offensive.
The deeds have made him having a foolishness that is rare upon Earth, even upon history, and yet it is there, and he is a general to the soldiers, to the government who do his bidding, for he has said I am with the evil and command those who are evil, and most are evil, and therefore we are all for my cause, and in this he is very confident, that most are waging war, and yet he does not know those who would be his allies, and if they are allies no person can say. He is confident so he gives orders because he has seen their works and has believed them to be part of his war against what he does not like, because he has done wickedness and is guilty.
The deeds have made him having a foolishness that is rare upon Earth, even upon history, and yet it is there, and he is a general to the soldiers, to the government who do his bidding, for he has said I am with the evil and command those who are evil, and most are evil, and therefore we are all for my cause, and in this he is very confident, that we are waging war, and yet he does not know those who would be his allies, and if they are allies no person can say. He is confident so he gives orders because he has seen their works and has believed them to be part of his war against what he does not like, because he has done wickedness and is guilty.
The devil has placed that which is for keeping his people at a level of ignorance so they are not coming to their senses to refuse to be thrown into hell with him.
The devil’s are speaking to those they think are their own, for the assumptions about others has lent them security.
The ego of a fool is flexible to inflate and match anything, and yet only the inflated ego can match, but the arragance of a mighty is not without substance.
The ego of a fool is flexible to inflate and match anything, and yet only the inflated ego can match, but the arragance of a mighty is not without substance.
The enticement would take a person away from wisdom and it’s many rewards, to be cast out and to endure grief at much loss, but the future is with the Lord and His power is absolute.
The enticement would take a person away from wisdom and it’s many rewards, to be cast out and to endure grief at much loss, but the future is with the Lord and His power is absolute.
The first is lack of consideration (little blame). The second is personal problem (escalation but no blame or little or much). The third is weapons fired (terrorism and warfare). Now the truth is clearly perceived by those who are given the sword to bear. Now the Christian who is a rebel towards the nation is saying they know better and we have God and they have nothing and this is not the separation from Babylon that is good. For the Christian who is a rebel in this fashion is like a rogue wilderness tribe that is unruly. For they disregard the protections provided to the saints that are with the king and pass alongside those things of Babylon and are not tarnished by them. For such good is at times with the king or queen and it is from God. Now let not the rogue rebel claim they do not rebel against God in the wickedness they do against the Christian for in this they also rebel against God when they do wickedness to the Christian. Now if a gentile speaks thus being king than he is over the devil and under the feet of the Christians that they might trample him in mud and his throat is cut by his lowness. For if Joshua has placed his foot on the neck of any king than you will not claim God unless you have passed through the eye of the needle. But honour the king as it is well, for if you are a true offendor than
 is not the judgement from the Lord? But if you are a rebel and rogue do not believe your death unjust.
The fool who hates is prosecuting at words of humility, being a thing of heavy sorrow and a burden that is wicked, for the person who does this is a fool, and their aggressive hate has run a sword through their own abdomen and placed a bruise on their head, that these are desperate and with terror for they collapse upon themselves when they charge, tripping over their feet and sputter with nonsense in their mouths being great spectacles of folly and wickedness.
The fool who hates is prosecuting at words of humility, being a thing of heavy sorrow and a burden that is wicked, for the person who does this is a fool, and their aggressive hate has run a sword through their own abdomen and placed a bruise on their head, that these are desperate and with terror for they collapse upon themselves when they charge, tripping over their feet and sputter with nonsense in their mouths being great spectacles of folly and wickedness.
The ground is cursed for your sake and society is also. Why then does any person call for that which is not good, but beyond the limit?
The ground is cursed for your sake and society is also. Why then does any person call for that which is not good, but beyond the limit?
The guilty are compelled, but a righteous person is not cruel, and the one who exploits the grief of a woman is like one who takes the bread and blanket, that they speak perversity, and the woman should do justice. Traitor to them who was slayn and their memory! But is the woman to slay the guilty or the innocent? For where is a wicked fool of this type who would ask such of the woman I would think them innocent because the knowledge of their innocence has brought about a perversity that this the perversity that it brings forth. Now such perversities are from knowledge that is other than what is said.
The guilty are compelled, but a righteous person is not cruel, and the one who exploits the grief of a woman is like one who takes the bread and blanket, that they speak perversity, and the woman should do justice. Traitor to them who was slayn and their memory! But is the woman to slay the guilty or the innocent? For where is a wicked fool of this type who would ask such of the woman I would think them innocent because the knowledge of their innocence has brought about a perversity that this is the perversity that it brings forth. Now such perversities are from knowledge that is other than what is said.
The heart of Orgoth’s servant being the first shelf son, is circumsized from much truth that he calls the child deserving of death because he has cut off all his jelousy and he has called the man the devil and acted as such for the same reason. Now better to be full of love and righteous that integrity might be the man who is not jelous for he has replaced much within him. But those who are the devil’s are on Earth, and it is so, that they have perished and been made strong by the devil. Now even if they sing praise of God, it is profanity and blasphamy, that they are even indulging in being Luke-warm. But you are for being wise as serpants and innocent as doves that a foolish man is understood not to be a serpant and the further things I have not mentioned are able to be perceived. Now if you do not worship the angel it is knowledgeable in many ways, and the angel has not delivered you and in addition the Christ did far more than him, that the angel is servant to the Christ, for the angel is for attaining what the saints attain, and he is for giving wisdom to the Elsnon.
The imposter who would cast out the true heir is as Jacob’s older brother, for they are servant until they are casting off the servitude.
The injured antelope stayed close to the angel so that the angel even began to become annoyed, but there might have been predators in the area, and the soul of the antelope was good. The mountain man defended the angel’s peace that the angel might be able to do his work, and the mountain man was encouraging him, being a people capable of dwelling with angels. Now if the mountain man and angel did not go out to do battle against the devil was due to the lack of circumstance. The Enturi was offended but not hated, and she tended well to the sick and resented the presence of one who was not sick in the clinic, for there was no treatment for them. There is rumour of a Jewish woman and a non-Jewish woman the angel seemed to like but what became of it will remain unknown. 
The injured antelope stayed close to the angel so that the angel even began to become annoyed, but there might have been predators in the area, and the soul of the antelope was good. The mountain man defended the angel’s peace that the angel might be able to do his work, and the mountain man was encouraging him, being a people capable of dwelling with angels. Now if the mountain man and angel did not go out to do battle against the devil was due to the lack of circumstance. The Enturi was offended but not hated, and she tended well to the sick and resented the presence of one who was not sick in the clinic, for there was no treatment for them. There is rumour of a Jewish woman and a non-Jewish woman the angel seemed to like but what became of it will remain unknown. Prior to the angel passing through Egypt and Sodom by the use of the names used correctly, though the angel has used Egypt for the ideal of black people when controlling a super-power with regards to those who are in North America, the angel who is tenderly loved, having passed through Egypt and Sodom that the angel has compared to the land in Isaiah, and having come there from the desert of loneliness after much disappeared that was, for he had been given great blessing and protection from God, having wives, women not married, and the good words without rebuke, and every type of blessing he could desire, and having it easy to obey God because of the great protection God granted from evil, and then being in the desert after it disappeared, vanishing in a steady way so that he was alone soon, and in the desert he ate of the dust of affliction, and afterwards he ate of it no more. Now the one paying for prostitutes is punished, and the one who is not themselves is knowing, that if one will injure themselves better for it to be without commiting iniquity. For Jesus was slayn in Egypt and Sodom and so let the child of Sodom be cast out, that if they chose what is hard continuously they are for hell and part of the kingdom of the devil. Now the one who speaks pervisity is one who defiles the sacred as a sodomite, and if they are then a hard person of iniquity then let them be standing against the armies of God and those angels meant for battle. For these are devices of the devil, and strong in their iniquity, speaking defilements, wicked words, being of the hatred to do so.
The injured antelope stayed close to the angel so that the angel even began to become annoyed, but there might have been predators in the area, and the soul of the antelope was good. The mountain man defended the angel’s peace that the angel might be able to do his work, and the mountain man was encouraging him, being a people capable of dwelling with angels. Now if the mountain man and angel did not go out to do battle against the devil was due to the lack of circumstance. The Enturi was offended but not hated, and she tended well to the sick and resented the presence of one who was not sick in the clinic, for there was no treatment for them. There is rumour of a Jewish woman and a non-Jewish woman the angel seemed to like but what became of it will remain unknown. Prior to the angel passing through Egypt and Sodom by the use of the names used correctly, though the angel has used Egypt for the ideal of black people when controlling a super-power with regards to those who are in North America, the angel who is tenderly loved, having passed through Egypt and Sodom that the angel has compared to the land in Isaiah, and having come there from the desert of loneliness after much disappeared that was, for he had been given great blessing and protection from God, having wives, women not married, and the good words without rebuke, and every type of blessing he could desire, and having it easy to obey God because of the great protection God granted from evil, and then being in the desert after it disappeared, vanishing in a steady way so that he was alone soon, and in the desert he ate of the dust of affliction, and afterwards he ate of it no more. 
The injured antelope stayed close to the angel so that the angel even began to become annoyed, but there might have been predators in the area, and the soul of the antelope was good. The mountain man defended the angel’s peace that the angel might be able to do his work, and the mountain man was encouraging him, being a people capable of dwelling with angels. Now if the mountain man and angel did not go out to do battle against the devil was due to the lack of circumstance. The Enturi was offended but not hated, and she tended well to the sick and resented the presence of one who was not sick in the clinic, for there was no treatment for them. There is rumour of a Jewish woman and a non-Jewish woman the angel seemed to like but what became of it will remain unknown. Prior to the angel passing through Egypt and Sodom by the use of the names used correctly, though the angel has used Egypt for the ideal of black people when controlling a super-power with regards to those who are in North America, the angel who is tenderly loved, having passed through Egypt and Sodom that the angel has compared to the land in Isaiah, and having come there from the desert of loneliness after much disappeared that was, for he had been given great blessing and protection from God, having wives, women not married, and the good
 words without rebuke, and every type of blessing he could desire, and having it easy to obey God because of the great protection God granted from evil, and then being in the desert after it disappeared, vanishing in a steady way so that he was alone soon, and in the desert he ate of the dust of affliction, and afterwards he ate of it no more. Now the one paying for prostitutes is punished, and the one who is not themselves is knowing, that if one will injure themselves better for it to be without commiting iniquity. For Jesus was slayn in Egypt and Sodom and so let the child of Sodom be cast out, that if they chose what is hard continuously they are for hell and part of the kingdom of the devil. Now the one who speaks pervisity is one who defiles the sacred as a sodomite, and if they are then a hard person of iniquity then let them be standing against the armies of God and those angels meant for battle. For these are devices of the devil, and strong in their iniquity, speaking defilements, wicked words, being of the hatred to do so.
The intense hatred of the wilderness tribe was so intense that in their attacks and words they no longer made sense anymore and there accusations bypassed human understanding, so that these were very violent and would require to be cut down, by the spiritual or the hand of defence in Ria.
The jealous unjustly say, “you stole” and find evidence where they can, but the robbery is only theirs to perform.
The jelous bully has become so accustomed and comfortable with their evil that they are feigning in hatred being offended by those things that are beyond what a jelous person can be jelous of in their attempts to bully, saying you may not walk, or you may not breath, and this is a very intense bully of intense hatred, who wishes to crush the person they hate into nothing and death. Indeed when one acts this way they are like a beast that is sick and murderous that they might be dangerous with their horns in their inward rage and wrath to kill another. For the one who interferes does not meddle if they are for taking a person by the wrist out of that place to safety.
The killer of the innocent claims that no person who would know will take action, but the one no one will help has done the same. Now it is wise and moral to be prudent less you be called guilty of prejudice. Now a selfish fool, being a sociopath, does not regard life in what they do,  but there is a person of worth who will die for others. Now how will a selfish fool do what is right concerning others when they show that they care for no person in their disregard for any life. For a woman has done well, to fear God, to know limits, but a woman is not ever a selfish fool in any thing and yet the selfish fool will not cease because they will not respect anything and have no concern for any person.
The killer of the innocent claims that no person who would know will take action, but the one no one will help has done the same. Now it is wise and moral to be prudent less you be called guilty of prejudice. Now a selfish fool, being a sociopath, does not regard life in what they do,  but there is a person of worth who will die for others. Now how will a selfish fool do what is right concerning others when they show that they care for no person in their disregard for any life. For a woman has done well, to fear God, to know limits, but a woman is not ever a selfish fool in any thing and yet the selfish fool will not cease because they will not respect anything and have no concern for any person.
The king of the Universe, only second to God, is left to be killed by His people, and not saved by those who are less than Him, for they withdrew and performed another’s will because it was not their place to save Him and meddle, although they found Him blameless. Neither could Rome save me, but more so me, and they could like friends, because I am not king of the Jews.
The king of the Universe, only second to God, is left to be killed by His people, and not saved by those who are less than Him, for they withdrew and performed another’s will because it was not their place to save Him and meddle, although they found Him blameless. Neither could Rome save me, but more so me, and they could like friends, because I am not king of the Jews. Then Rome should know of God’s love, in my opinion, that Beelzebub is their enemy, also, and as they have respected God they do not wish to meddle with the Jews and what is theirs.
The lake of fire is below words and hearts of people or animals or any dragon, for words of people cannot go there, and all the wickedness and causes good or wicked on Earth may be described by words, but the lake of fire is below all words and comprehension of the hearts of all in the ocean or on land for it is as if not existing that no description can go there, and that which is in it is elevated to be an an animal of hell that is on the mountain, Orgoth, for even in Orgoth there is that you should not let the dog up onto the bed, which is, the table, and yet those of Orgoth would have nothing against doing so concerning the lake of fire they cannot even perceive, for to Orgoth’s servant it would be a pleasing thing.
The language of animals is as a low stumbling block for people, for it is below. Now if any is answering according to folly what can be done for it? But if any says be stupid, it cannot be done, for those who attack society must cease, that when they over-step their limits it is another thing.
The language of animals is as a low stumbling block for people, for it is below. Now if any is answering according to folly what can be done for it? But if any says be stupid, it cannot be done, for those who attack society must cease, that when they over-step their limits it is another thing.
The man escalating to punishment is not reasoning as a father, for he is idle and receiving evil, as if a neighbour with no voice, but the father who loves their child is correcting them in a well way, as a man tends a plant that he intends to show for all the guests when the day of great feasting arrives.
The man escalating to punishment is not reasoning as a father, for he is idle and receiving evil, as if a neighbour with no voice, but the father who lives their child is correcting them in a well way, as a man tends a plant that he intends to show for all the guests when the day of great feasting arrives.
The man who has only preyed upon children and never learned to be among others is not capable to be the innocent one with those who are adults, so that it seems as if confusion occurs.
The mountain man (turem) are men who are capable of dwelling with angels as has been mentioned and a turem many times defended the angel’s peace so that he could do his work. Now if angels can dwell with Jews it is with the elder ones and the kings though why the mountain people should have been so capable of dwelling with angels is unknown, only they have made a great kingdom in the mountains and among the wilderness. Now there are even places of rest for angels there and if any should be among them it is angels. Now in the city where the angel resides the case is so that turem are not many but the work of such things that the turem might do with wise excellence is done by others not like them and it is the opinion of the angel that many of these are fallen from righteousness and holding together the wrong of the city, for there is much injustice in this place and it is a place where many young have been cast out of homes for honest complaints so that the deeds of bad parents are facilitated with the aid of cruel fools who offer aid to such parents. Some of these are escaping abuse and many of the older adults in this place are criminals. Then there are many who are not criminals who dwell with greater luxury while much seems to become unravelled every day to be placed back for the next day. Many in this city are mentally ill so that it is almost a norm, and many have incurred drug addictions. Now those who would do the work of the mountain men but are not them are not given a name because they have no people and are going in many directions in this way. What is wrong they seem to be holding together for some purpose but of these there are not many only there are others among them who are not with them in any way as if travellers passing through to be with some other group. So what is might be seen to be not, because those who hold together the wrong are there as the corrupt ones of those people that there is no other people but the turem and any other that would be seen is in fact made up of many things being a place of many people groups. Now if they are a place of many people groups than how do they, any of them, hold together wrong? For if any should have erred here than it was because of something else that they have been more capable and yet the error is from something else that is not explained that if he has been honest than I think he has not, but if he has stumbled, I think he has not. But if he has only seen what is not than I think he has been more capable than is claimed.
The mountain man (turem) are men who are capable of dwelling with angels as has been mentioned and a turem many times defended the angel’s peace so that he could do his work. Now if angels can dwell with Jews it is with the elder ones and the kings though why the mountain people should have been so capable of dwelling with angels is unknown, only they have made a great kingdom in the mountains and among the wilderness. Now there are even places of rest for angels there and if any should be among them it is angels. Now in the city where the angel resides the case is so that turem are not many but the work of such things that the turem might do with wise excellence is done by others not like them and it is the opinion of the angel that many of these are fallen from righteousness
 and holding together the wrong of the city, for there is much injustice in this place and it is a place where many young have been cast out of homes for honest complaints so that the deeds of bad parents are facilitated with the aid of cruel fools who offer aid to such parents. Some of these are escaping abuse and many of the older adults in this place are criminals. Then there are many who are not criminals who dwell with greater luxury while much seems to become unravelled every day to be placed back for the next day. Many in this city are mentally ill so that it is almost a norm, and many have incurred drug addictions.
The mountain man (turem) are men who are capable of dwelling with angels as has been mentioned and a turem many times defended the angel’s peace so that he could do his work. Now if angels can dwell with Jews it is with the elder ones and the kings though why the mountain people should have been so capable of dwelling with angels is unknown, only they have made a great kingdom in the mountains and among the wilderness. Now there are even places of rest for angels there and if any should be among them it is angels. Now in the city where the angel resides the case is so that turem are not many but the work of such things that the turem might do with wise excellence is done by others not like them and it is the opinion of the angel that many of these are fallen from righteousness and holding together the wrong of the city, for there is much injustice in this place and it is a place where many young have been cast out of homes for honest complaints so that the deeds of bad parents are facilitated with the aid of cruel fools who offer aid to such parents. Some of these are escaping abuse and many of the older adults in this place are criminals. Then there are many who are not criminals who dwell with greater luxury while much seems to become unravelled every day to be placed back for the next day. Many in this city are mentally ill so that it is almost a norm, and many have incurred drug addictions. Now those who would do the work of the mountain men but are not them are not given a name because they have no people and are going in many directions in this way. What is wrong they seem to be holding together for some purpose but of these there are not many only there are others among them who are not with them in any way as if travellers passing through to be with some other group. So what is might be seen to be not, because those who hold together the wrong are there as the corrupt ones of those people that there is no other people but the turem and any other that would be seen is in fact made up of many things being a place of many people groups. Now if they are a place of many people groups than how do they, any of them, hold together wrong? For if any should have erred here than it was because of something else that they have been more capable and yet the error is from something else that is not explained that if he has been honest than I think he has not, but if he has stumbled, I think he has not. But if he has only seen what is not than I think he has been more capable than is claimed. But the people are not but only some in this place are corrupt because there is only the turem and they have their land in the great mountain where their lodging is with windows hewed into the rock and gold and jewals and their homes are spread out amongst the pine forest in a mountainous place that they are an excellent people of wise skill and ability that is like that which causes good amazement for a small group of them are equal to a large group of others because they are like elite soldiers. Now some of them are warriors and in much of what they do they are a people of great ability being highly capable. Now those who would do any of their type of work are not a people but are like travellers passing through and of these only some are corrupt but the deception has been to some that there are more of them than there are who are corrupt. Now I leave any more to the turem because they are, I should think, capable of dealing with what they would.
The mountain of Noah’s sons is ascended up to the first shelf and then ascended up to the second. But upon the third shelf there are no trees and the son of that shelf is not likely to be there. Now the vision of the woman goes all the way to the lake of fire. Now the vision of the man to the shelf of Noah’s mountain. Now a son will go to the hills and plains where there are high hills like mountains and the plains. For there he is sometimes prone to be a little foolish as he seeks that which he has known to be there that he desires to take with him to his home. Now from the mountain he is able to see things well for his vision is different and he is seeing things not seen by those not on the mountain, and yet he is not able to see the lake of fire, and those in the lake of fire will not regard his words to the smallest amount. Now what is up on the mountain in terms of houses and dwelling places? But the angel will not describe these things. Now on the hills and plains are houses sometimes and not mere tents, and some are like palaces for the one who resides in it, for the holy women, some, are having palaces for themselves and in them are those things that adorn a palace and some are even having statues of themselves that dwell among the people.
The nobility of these wise goats has caused the angel to yield, the lion to be his friend and comfort from the tiger, and now then there is what is more, being those he created to be his children, that I am kept out, that I cannot judge those who are belonging to the son of God who saved them, because all of this is exceedingly great so that the angel of much ability has said I am an angel but not more.
The nobility of these wise goats has caused the angel to yield, the lion to be his friend and comfort from the tiger, and now then there is what is more, being those he created to be his children, that I am kept out, that I cannot judge those who are belonging to the son of God who saved them, because all of this is exceedingly great so that the angel of much ability has said I am an angel but not as great as God. If there is more than your children, my God, are with affection even for the lion and tiger which the angels do not know and it is well by both when acceptable for the people are your children. I have never yet scratched the belly of a tiger that has offered me comfort, belonging to the Lord.
The one accustomed to something does so with thought and some of these things will make life easy, for the stress that is caused is not required and there is one who makes less effort, who backs away from effort and attempts and is attaining more that would be imagined, but wisdom of this type is found with those who speak blasphemy to this present time and ideal, that they cannot be offended by something as is often the case, for it is not possible for people to be offended by what cannot be offensive to a human, but due to fear of being disloyal to what they have been ceased with, whether choosing it or not, because of what occurred three generations or four generations prior, they must be loyal, because of the fight and struggle, but the war was not fought to bind them, but to offer them the benefits with what they would choose, when it is not a time for war, and no burden is placed upon them. Then some will do honour and it is good, but some words must be pleasing and kept away from the public, because of the war.
The one accustomed to something does so with thought and some of these things will make life easy, for the stress that is caused is not required and there is one who makes less effort, who backs away from effort and attempts and is attaining more that would be imagined, but wisdom of this type is found with those who speak blasphemy to this present time and ideal, that they cannot be offended by something as is often the case, for it is not possible for people to be offended by what cannot be offensive to a human, but due to fear of being disloyal to what they have been ceased with, whether choosing it or not, because of what occurred three generations or four generations prior, they must be loyal, because of the fight and struggle, but the war was not fought to bind them, but to offer them the benefits with what they would choose, when it is not a time for war, and no burden is placed upon them. Then some will do honour and it is good, but some must be pleasing and kept away from the public, because of the war.
The one acting differently because of what is not better is thrown about to be wayward, but the one who is heavy because of trouble, is with the Lord.
The one acting differently because of what is not better is thrown about to be wayward, but the one who would be focused on their own life, and not coveting in jealousy, does not stray to lose what he has.
The one defiling is more defiled than what they do, and then they are brought to eternal pain and destruction, but the way of the wise is for life.
The one defiling is more defiled than what they do, and then they are brought to eternal pain and destruction, but the way of the wise is for life.
The one from the same people is of a different people they have no name for, that the wisdom of this is not known when they have mentioned those who were. But the parallel is not remembered by them, that they are not sacrificing lambs and goats, as you have not required it of them. For they are too many different people for me to count and know, that they cannot change from the people they are from only they can become different from their father. Now the one who departs from riches is not likely to prosper and so they who are without parents have far less opportunities than the one’s who have the abundance of ability, but there are some who have documented wisdom and
 have become servants of the anti-Christ to be beneath humanity in what they do. For they perform the will of Beelzebub intentionally and in some matters they have learned wickedness for which actions they deserve to be killed, and was it so in ancient times? But let the one who is not fitting be divorced and with fullness of what is well if any should attempt to cause them to sin. For I know surely that the anti-Christ is in the world in many ways with his workers seized to do his bidding in the physical sense against what is of the Lord. But because they do not perceive the recompense they are like animals who are trapped and carried away blind, to the one who is capable of slaughtering them with great violence and judgement.
The one harassing with idiocy is very angry, so that no more persecution should be against them when the one they attack does not know them and has done them no wrong.
The one insolent because they do not comprehend reality is wicked, because they fight with the enemy and believe they are fellow citizens with God’s and they are devices of the enemy and warriors of the enemy who are kept foolish to be effective in their efforts, and so it seems but in truth they comprehend all and they attempt to deceive because in truth all comprehend and perceive what is true and so they are sometimes attempting to deceive, and these are other insolent weapons of the enemy. For the devil uses insolence, disorder, chaos, like weapons against God’s people, and he uses wickedness, perversities sexually, perversities of judgement and condemnation, and perversities of every good thing, and he uses desecration of what is sacred, foolishness, strangeness, and unjust acts of perverted strength, and he uses foolish disruptions, attempts to hault, and attempts to cause to stumble, that he uses all that is disgusting to God and dispicable to those who are God’s. Now is he attempting to cause people to sin or to even become insane? But I would laugh if it was not very serious, for of course he is and that does not even have to be stated. For you are children of light, holy people, and when war is upon you I wish greatly for you to prevail.
The one insolent because they do not comprehend reality is wicked, because they fight with the enemy and believe they are fellow citizens with God’s and they are devices of the enemy and warriors of the enemy who are kept foolish to be effective in their efforts, other insolent weapons of the enemy. For the devil uses insolence, disorder, chaos, like weapons against God’s people, and he uses wickedness, perversities sexually, perversities of judgement and condemnation, and perversities of every good thing, and he uses desecration of what is sacred, foolishness, strangeness, and unjust acts of perverted strength, and he uses foolish disruptions, attempts to hault, and attempts to cause to stumble, that he uses all that is disgusting to God and dispicable to those who are God’s. Now is he attempting to cause people to sin or to even become insane? But I would laugh if it was not very serious, for of course he is and that does not even have to be stated. For you are children of light, holy people, and when war is upon you I wish greatly for you to prevail.
The one is exceeding the limit for offence and the righteous is waging contention that is greater, that the wicked then say the righteous were over the limit when they did not exceed what is righteous, that the wicked wage an aggressive attack, and this is like one who prior hates and waits to create a starting time to wage war against an innocent nation, that this wickedness is understood by many and those who know it will perceive that such a war in society is a heavy matter of that which has great weight.
The one knows nothing and nothing about being a man for a child has placed his foot on his neck, but a man has gone because of his good.
The one who a person goes to when they are looking to obtain aid for others and sometimes for themselves I have called the stubborn gate-keeper when they are offering idle and apathetic words that only delay and then refuse although the words seem willing to help, but in the later part are shown to only be a dismissal, because such is the idle, stubborn gate-keeper who bullies in this fashion and even wastes time, and they would often rather die and give their whole families to die, rather than give actual aid. Such is a Luke-warm person who is in fact apathetic and unconcerned and does not take very serious things seriously, for they care not for any matter and even abuse and they are the stubborn gate-keeper who commits a type of bullying. One must be unwilling to be rejected by them and pass through many hindrances before they can obtain aid for themselves or others. The stubborn gate keeper is idle and mean of heart and has might in his stubborness, for he sins. For he says, I take action, and yet he is Luke-warm and in apathy, at times, or for not giving any ground. Now some are for teaching those of God’s to be this and yet they cannot become it.
The one who a person goes to when they are looking to obtain aid for others and sometimes for themselves I have called the stubborn gate-keeper when they are offering idle and apathetic words that only delay and then refuse although the words seem willing to help, but in the later part are shown to only be a dismissal, because such is the idle, stubborn gate-keeper who bullies in this fashion and even wastes time, and they would often rather die and give their whole families to die, rather than give actual aid. Such is a Luke-warm person who is in fact apathetic and unconcerned and does not take very serious things seriously, for they care not for any matter and even abuse and they are the stubborn gate-keeper who commits a type of bullying. One must be unwilling to be rejected by them and pass through many hindrances before they can obtain aid for themselves or others.
The one who attacks from jealousy loses what he has and then even more in what measure he attacks, but reliable wisdom is with the righteous.
The one who attacks from jealousy loses what he has and then even more in what measure he attacks, but reliable wisdom is with the righteous.
The one who attacks from jealousy loses what he has and then even more in what measure he attacks, but reliable wisdom is with the righteous.
The one who blasphemes a proverb in words and deed against another, is not a son or daughter of the kingdom, but a servant in some unseen place, the one who is not counted among the heirs.
The one who cannot change is so by more substance than you, that being in a weak place, like one interloping on the land of a kingdom, and you a wandering citizen with a family in the desert, so there is no military by which you commit any injustice, that you not make the fashion in which you have been deceived into great wickedness, that you lose your inheritance and you are the child to be cast out, that you are failing in your allusion of what never was, that it cannot hold you, that you become a servant to the sons and daughters and your family servants to them if they support you in this thing, because God is judging rightly and is not a fool and we have been made by Him and cannot fail to perceive what is the real truth, that the folly of any, even should it exist, holds no truth when man might seek to place it there, and so when it is not even there, what sympathy is there for you?
The one who cannot change is so by more substance than you, that being in a weak place, like one interloping on the land of a kingdom, and you a wandering citizen with a family in the desert, so there is no military by which you commit any injustice, that you not make the fashion in which you have been deceived into great wickedness, that you lose your inheritance and you are the child to be cast out, that you are failing in your allusion of what never was, that it cannot hold you, that you become a servant to the son’s and daughters and your family servants to them if they support you in this thing, because God is judging rightly and is not a fool and we have been made by Him and cannot fail to perceive what is the real truth, that the folly of any, even should it exist, holds no truth when man might seek to place it there, and so when it is not even there, what sympathy is there for you?
The one who comes later and challenges an alpha without cause, and they will not be at peace with another alpha, is like one who would scatter the people that they would be destroyed, but a prudent person will value peace.
The one who comes later and challenges an alpha without cause, and they will not be at peace with another alpha, is like one who would scatter the people that they would be destroyed, but a prudent person will value peace.
The one who considers all in the Universe, to keep all, is for keeping understanding, but those who cut off all around them to understand and honour only what is in the small space around where they stand is one who creates a war-cult within them that is against many others who are greater and more honourable than them. For if they would use the cult to slay with guile they have deserved to die many times if they live.
The one who considers all in the Universe, to keep all, is for keeping understanding, but those who cut off all around them to understand and honour only what is in the small space around where they stand is one who creates a war-cult within them that is against many others who are greater and more honourable than them. For if they would use the cult to slay with guile they have deserved to die many times if they live.
The one who cried out is like the anti-Christ, who cries out against Jacob, like the one who hates himself and seeks to bring others down to his place in hell, who is a homicidal sicophant, who is cast out from Abraham, who cannot inherit for
 he causes His children to go astray in an evil way, that so it was judged, and he was cast among the devils in hell, that the one who goes up is with life and the other to the fire and anguish that he is their stone around their feet and yet those who have been loyal to God are separated from the destruction.
The one who cried out is like the anti-Christ, who cries out against Jacob, like the one who hates himself and seeks to bring others down to his place in hell, who is a homicidal sicophant, who is cast out from Abraham, who cannot inherit for he causes His children to go astray in an evil way, that so it was judged, and he was cast among the devils in hell, that the one who goes up is with life and the other to the fire and anguish that he is their stone around their feet and yet those who have been loyal to God are separated from the destruction. For the true heir, one child, the entire nation will be cast out, if there are a group of them. So the angel who is tenderly loved will not minister to the servant, because of the true heir that they came upon, that the father of the heir is capable and a just recompense is of the Lord.
The one who does not exist, but does, is for others to be what they are not, as there is a child who demands that another should let them win, but they are asking another to disobey God, for God has created man and woman to obey Him, that they are His, that the one who demands such is demanding a thing for the devil, that this one belongs to the devil and not to God, and how can two walk together if one belongs to the devil and the other to God? But are they not enemies in the Great War? Now the one does exist, but not as the false robes they would wear when they are concealing themselves, for such have worn robes of many things and yet some are wearing that of their own house.
The one who does what is right, taking right action is defending the house of God, but for those taking wrong action it is not so.
The one who does wickedness in lies, slander, tale-bearing, and such things, and is being as if righteous is not a Jew. So if the Gentiles know it, than why does any speak against Moses?
The one who exploits that they cannot be killed immediately, is one who should die, but those with virtues worthy of their life being spared, are those who are judged to be innocent by a standard of men.
The one who exploits that they cannot be killed immediately, is one who should die, but those with virtues worthy of their life being spared, are not dying for lack of wisdom or morality. For death does not come immediately, and the one who calls for justice towards them is sinning against their own life. Now those who would scorn their own life are to be pitied in heart, although justice is because of actions and words that those who should receive justice are not judged by that which can be pitied because of what is void, but because of what they did before and did not do, that they did not seek wisdom or morality. Now when one dies and they should not they do not die but others perish and the one who should not have died, the justice spreads into the land, justice with truth, that God has sent justice like a plague so that the one who died still lives. Now as he was robbed so those who are guilty are robbed, that it is known by those who can understand. But where there is another thing then who can say what will occur? Now if it is not from Moses than what is it? But truth is understood and let the truth be said to be true where it is right to say it.
The one who forbids justice with force is doing justice and his hand is against another in this matter. Now if the hand that forbids justice is against the devil than what wrong is there? But does he honour God or the Jews when he delivers a wicked man over to be killed? But if the Romans gave the Christ over to be slayn, washing their hands of it, than in what guilt are you to be found? But you do not do justice or judge the wicked you do not know, that you have treated well, and yet you do not defend him further because he is guilty. Now what wicked man is judging this without judgement? Does insolence become righteousness when you have done more for the government than is good, when there is no king? But the mid-wives of Egypt would not kill the children and in disobedience to Pharoah because they feared God. But where there is no king there is no righteous judgement and the official who would do justice to the righteous has not feared God, but another God. I will not attempt to deceive in this matter.
The one who forbids justice with force is doing justice and his hand is against another in this matter. Now if the hand that forbids justice is against the devil than what wrong is there? But does he honour God or the Jews when he delivers a wicked man over to be killed? But if the Romans gave the Christ over to be slayn, washing their hands of it, than in what guilt are you to be found? But you do not do justice or judge the wicked you do not know, that you have treated well, and yet you do not defend him further because he is guilty. Now what wicked man is judging this without judgement? Does insolence become righteousness when you have done more for the government than is good, when there is no king? But the mid-wives of Egypt would not kill the children and in disobedience to Pharoah because they feared God. But where there is no king there is no righteous judgement and the official who would do justice to the righteous has not feared God, but another God. I will not attempt to deceive in this matter.
The one who has erred has voiced a bad opinion of the one who has fullfilled well, and so they are cast out with their words, that if they are cast out they can be retrieved if they are worthy, that they need not be afraid in stubborness.
The one who is guilty says the injured is a failure, the victim is a failure and not more, that they have done me wrong, and not more, because they are in the pride of wickedness, the metal and dross, that they receive joy from punishing in their mouth that which better than them, because their hearts are for it, that they retaliate against the threat, that these would wipe out what is good so that they can be good, and it is not so, because they made themselves good when they were not and did not have guilt so that they would have the will to wipe out what is good. Now why does any justify the wicked by saying that they are something that is less offensive when they know the greatness of their wickedness? For the defence will partner with the wicked, and for what evil they committed will not be with them as guilt, because they are not capable of knowing their wrong, being those who cannot know it.

The one who is guilty says the injured is a failure, the victim is a failure and not more, that they have done me wrong, and not more, because they are in the pride of wickedness, the metal and dross, that they receive joy from punishing in their mouth that which better than them, because their hearts are for it, that they retaliate against the threat, that these would wipe out what is good so that they can be good, and it is not so, because they made themselves good when they were not and did not have guilt so that they would have the will to wipe out what is good. Now why does any justify the wicked by saying that they are something that is less offensive when they know the greatness of their wickedness? For the defence will partner with the wicked, and for what evil they committed will not be with them as guilt, because they are not capable of knowing their wrong, being those who cannot know it.


The one who is joining who does not belong is waging war with allies, indeed people of the same kingdom, that they might do so with discord to represent one against the other and not with any permission. But if it is yet another that they do belong than such is not taken too far in that they do not represent another but themselves, less the ground be cursed beneath them, that cause is found because of wickedness, for loyalty with both is to each other and to God. But the one rejected this way by both has the Lord and is with Him, that he is with the Lord. Now if any is saying, come and let us slay a child of God’s house than the two are one in this thing, and the heaviness is upon them as the covering of light is kept from them, for they wear heavy cloaks over their heads and bodies that are made of animal skins and thick substance to hide them from light, and dirt and Earth is over it that it might hide them from light, for no light may enter in for them, that a good man might perceive the strangeness and protect the child from evil, for he or she is as a young goat and sheep in God’s house. For the light has perceived its own and you are able to do good, that you are a well people and healthy before him in this way.


The one who is not belonging is attacking them who would be an allie, for they are not grafted by attacking the allie.


The one who is the sister of another who is their brother, the two being separated when they have come forth, the one male and the other female, will not have justice against the other, because if the male and female are both wicked, than does any weigh the spirits to know which is worse? But both have spoken alike and the one is worse, but both are the same, only the male is more worthy? Now if both deserve death than why would one judge the other pardonable? But bring not any arragance from the young one’s to the judge of the land, that an iherit is sacred in the eyes of the angel who is tenderly loved, and the angel tenderly loved will remain far back. But if both speak insolence than what is it if not guilt? But does not the guilty utter and offer all their confession? But the iherit is having understanding and is not  deceived even by the false one who would take his chair when the owner comes.

The one who knows their own wickedness has failed to understand, but the one who rebukes themselves is with understanding.

The one who knows their own wickedness has failed to understand, but the one who rebukes themselves is with understanding.

The one who profanes abuse but is indifferent in confessing is motivated by other things, but those who profane it in a spirit of commitment and violence are guilty of crime, because they do not confess slander, and do not say, yet it was in fact something else, to tell of great injustice. Now you are not a simple people and if wicked fools meddle to use what is permitted than you do not compromise life due to the wicked who are like zeolots, for they are not deceived, and you have discovered a dangerous person who hates, that they do not relent when the slander is not because of guilt with intent to commit murder because of it.
The one who profanes abuse but is indifferent in confessing is motivated by other things, but those who profane it in a spirit of commitment and violence are guilty of crime, because they do not confess slander, and do not say, yet it was in fact something else, to tell of great injustice. Now you are not a simple people and if wicked fools meddle to use what is permitted than you do not compromise life due to the wicked who are like zeolots, for they are not deceived, and you have discovered a dangerous person who hates, that they do not relent when the slander is not because of guilt with intent to commit murder because of it.
The one who says I am a victim and is not by abuse, is forced to murder and condemn those who are victims of abuse, for those who are in group of them claiming to be victims but not by abuse, stand against the victims and are condemning them, for victims must be killed for them to continue. For they force their way like cruel and mean ones who are full of bread turned to stone, and they say, yet it is me, not you, that the heart is torn from the chest and the help that is left to them be stripped from them without mercy or compassion, that they be given what burns the throat and tongue to drink upon their sick bed, that they be beaten continously by those who claim that they are the victims, for they are stubborn and hard as iron and cruel and they condemn the victims continously and take mercy and offer no mercy.

 
The one who shows up late for battle will not be praised, although men are prepared to die, for who would want to live forever? Now a base man is of little worth, when one does not find in him that which would save his life, that a coward will not be spared, but a man who does greatness, let him die well, and do not report anything but glory in his death. For a wicked fool is speaking iniquity but a soldier throws him into the street, and the angels are of great ability, and do you blame them for their praise?
 
The one who takes away nothing is a great king when it has come because of very bad dealings and use of nothing, that the land might be overturned and cultivated for growth, that the one with nothing might repent and become rich when they have been cast out, for nothing they were given, and their greatness descended and shattered upon it, that they have taken from the one who provided them with nothing, and this by their own wrong to take, that they might be judged by God, or by themselves to say, I have not looked, and so I did not discover and I have been punished. So now let me work for what is holy, repenting and attaining from the king who has riches to give, for the fool I worked for had nothing, and I have been good enough not to know.
The one who takes good without permission and offers no good in return is not with debt by justice, but honourable men dwell with the glory of a righteous kingdom.

The one who takes good without permission and offers no good in return is not without debt by justice, but honourable men dwell with the glory of a righteous kingdom.

The one who takes good without permission and offers no good in return is not without debt by justice, but honourable men dwell with the glory of a righteous kingdom.


The one who takes good without permission and offers no good in return is not without debt by justice, but honourable men dwell with the glory of a righteous kingdom.

The one who would carry the message among humans is sometimes believing they should control the fate of the planet, but a wise leader is uprooting them with craftiness.

The one who would kill the righteous for disrespect against the Lord commits blasphamy and profanes in their evil, but the son and daughter is in the house, and the foolish predator dwells outside.

The one who would save themselves by wickedness is dieing by it, but the one saving themselves by righteousness is living forever.

The one who would shape their child to be a weapon for them, is sometimes more guilty than the child, but no fear will be justified for the man who has great conscience, because to him is to be a recognition of what is better than most.

The one with much anger and hostility is kindled to greater anger by the good of another. For when they are angry for no reason they are kindled for no reason.

The passive aggressive man says I am innocent, but his arragance has grown since his youth. The ugly woman has said, I do not have a high opinion, but she hates herself. The suffering woman has become a great mess, and her father in spirit has loved her, for she is taking hard existence, and she is different among the women, a sign upon the Earth. For if a love, a man, has been lost yet it should not be, and if mortality should occur, yet the world is not as it should be, and if great storms should kill, yet it is a wrong, that heaven is not having such, as it has been claimed.

The person is argueing in a way where they are dealing with the internal out loud before others to a great extent beyond an average person. So they have offered the internal of themselves to the public, and all of it, every small emotional reaction to everything around them, and confessing all that is inside them, they say that others cannot know and believing with lack of understanding that others cannot comprehend to a less than human degree they are making a sub-concious connection instantaneously as it is established within them so that they are accusing others internally of doing wrong in understanding what they believe cannot be understood, as if the person comprehending is being deceitful to lay a slanderous accusation. In their anger and wrath they are crying even, because of great anger and wrath that any should accuse them when they cannot, they claim inside, understand.  And as the accusation is true for it like reading a confession told simply, they are of the belief inside that such as things cannot be known beyond unreasonable human certainty, they are the right one morally and they are persecuted by wrong injustice that is out of place for the injustice which is more expected. So foolish servant I am comprehending all instaneously and do not know how you bear yourself with confidence and insolence, for what I witness without effort for me, is a foolish spectacle understood without effort as a person who would at least be of average understanding.

The person speaking rebuke in the wrong time and place, being in any way for the wrong person, is the indignant and bitter soldier not part of the people to be one of them, but they are imposter in some way, whether animal or dragon, or the soldier from Orgoth, or anything wearing the clothing of the people but in truth being an imposter.

The person taking greatness in destruction are those who have failed entirely, for they have perished and lack themselves, but those remaining with integrity are going through tests and tribulations, and these are for reward.

The person who does not value another who is human is of no value, but the substance of worth is found with the righteous.
The person who is imposter and not worthy is of great and false self worth when they attain, but the true heir is as Jacob, is lifting up righteousness.

The person who is imposter and not worthy is of great and false self worth when they attain, but the true heir is as Jacob, is lifting up righteousness.

The person who uses holy proverbs for low and mean gestures is a wicked dog of wind, but the one who is better is fullfilling the roles of a generous leader who is not being jelous.

The person who uses holy proverbs, and words of wisdom, for low and mean gestures is a wicked dog of wind, but the one who is better is fullfilling the roles of a generous leader who is not being jelous.

The person who will not reason, even in the matter of argument, is simply harrassing out of anger like an act of violence, throwing off every rebuke without any toleration, being as if a person who will not even admit that they are held accountable by right and wrong. This is an act of combat commited by some ugly people in society. Now if an ugly reviles you in rebellion than they fall to your feet, bowing before you, for inferiority is known by such a type of reviling that is the reviling of rebellion. But because of prudence you will show yourself as an adult, not denigrating the person in your speech as you discuss the matter with the soldiers, and using no profanity before them unless for some reason it must be. Showing yourself to be an adult who is even considerate of those who hate you, the soldiers will be more likely to endure your complaint, that you are accepting their judgements with patience while you are with them, that you might make it easier for them, when they are receiving good from you. For do they not deserve good when they are for protecting what is right? Now if any is saying you tell tales to those who are against us as if we are all prisoners, than it is understood by you that the soldiers are your gang, as if to be friends who are with you if there was truly anarchy, that your gang is far more powerful than any, for even those who fight other nation’s can be for you if it is necessary. But as you are being a good citizen who is not commiting crime, you might be gaining what is good by a good way.

The person who will not reason, even in the matter of argument, is simply harrassing out of anger like an act of violence, throwing off every rebuke without any toleration, being as if a person who will not even admit that they are held accountable by right and wrong. This is an act of combat commited by some ugly people in society. Now if an ugly reviled you in rebellion than they fall to your feet, bowing before you, for inferiority is known by such a type of reviling that is the reviling of rebellion. But because of prudence you will show yourself as an adult, not denigrating the person in your speech as you discuss the matter with the soldiers, and using no profanity before them unless for some reason it must be. Showing yourself to be an adult who is even considerate of those who hate you, the soldiers will be more likely to endure your complaint, that you are accepting their judgements with patience while you are with them, that you might make it easier for them, when they are receiving good from you. For do they not deserve good when they are for protecting what is right? Now if any is saying you tell tales to those who are against us as if we are all prisoners, than it is understood by you that the soldiers are your gang, as if to be friends who are with you if there was truly anarchy, that your gang is far more powerful than any, for even those who fight other nation’s can be for you if it is necessary. But as you are being a good citizen who is not commiting crime, you might be gaining what is good by a good way.

The person would rather follow the male around, than follow women around, and he is blind to all woman, for they do not exist for him, and yet he has not desired the male, but is with much jelousy.

The projection of animals is many, and their wrath is a calamity when it is against what is higher than them.

The quick and angry response of great swellings of might shows the guilt of the passive aggressive attack, that it was so, and the dogs who as if mighty, being dogs in lions clothes, or mighty dogs, are portraying great swellings of might that their ability in war and combat is empty and entirely neglected. For the mighty dog sends out brutal threats and swells with what is like might, and it speaks great swellings of wrath and violence and is cut down like a weak and unskilled slave in the ways of battle.

The quick and angry response of great swellings of might shows the guilt of the passive aggressive attack, that it was so, and the dogs who as if mighty, being dogs in lions clothes, or mighty dogs, are portraying great swellings of might that their ability in war and combat is empty and entirely neglected. For the mighty dog sends out brutal threats and swells with what is like might, and it speaks great swellings of wrath and violence and is cut down like a weak and unskilled slave in the ways of battle.

The reviler is having much respect of persons and to the dismay of the one they revile. For what was taught is not good, and peace should be between the wrong person and him. Good rebel that is caring for what is good, I have wrath towards what wickedness is on Earth, and will not feel fit to offer you and criticism.
The reviler is having much respect of persons and to the dismay of the one they revile. For what was taught is not good, and peace should be between the wrong person and him. Good rebel that is caring for what is good, I have wrath towards what wickedness is on Earth, and will not feel fit to offer you any criticism.
The rich man has attacked God and so I have placed my foot on his neck that he might be thrown into a cave, because he would attack the kingdom, the children of God. For if Joshua abused you I will even make mention of the lake of fire.
 
The rich man has attacked God and so I have placed my foot on his neck that he might be thrown into a cave, because he would attack the kingdom, the children of God. For if Joshua abused you I will even make mention of the lake of fire.
 
The righteous preacher has nothing I want unless my bones should be broken and my organs mutilated and struck with death, that I might be utterly killed, but I do not correct him, my lips are shut, my heart is not otherwise than what I am, that he is from that people who are more in poverty, and there are those who are in the kingdom only in this place and the one who sheds blood was despised, and went his way, and there was no sin for this. Now make your ways right, he who was despised and went his way. Become one of the children of God, a person of the kingdom, and my defence will be for you, and I know that I want you to be one of the people of the kingdom because the old person I will not know.

The scale of Babylon is a hazard but the Lord is righteous.
The self-loathing sicophant is homicidal, but the one who promotes good is considered wise.

The servant comes to the master when they are not wanted and attacks that they might be put to some task, and this is of the sub-conscious. So the servant finds the master and the master did not know of them.

The servant follows their master around even the servant of the husband of their master when it is so, and this being a type of perversity on Earth, but a wise king is keeping his people back with rebuke, and a leader who is noble is respecting the good man who is not of his people, that equals are at peace and some servants are rebuked and despised.

The servant follows their master around even the servant of the husband of their master when it is so, and this being a type of perversity on Earth, but a wise king is keeping his people back with rebuke, and a leader who is noble is respecting the good man who is not of his people, that equals are at peace and some servants are rebuked and despised.

The soldiers of the devil are attempting to teach you something, but there is war, and the way of life departs from hell. Now do not let the wicked pull us all down with them, and let them not claim you should fight their war against yourself and God, for they are against all those who please God, those of their own ethnicity and those of another, that the ethnicities of Earth are not often worth considering, unless it is some matter of politeness towards another’s culture and you are knowing what is right and what is not that I am forbidden to offer any command or guidance in this place only to offer my support to those who are beautiful. Now do you believe you have any favour in supporting criminals among those of their own ethnicity. But do not believe it for as you throw the head over the wall of the offendor that God might bless you, and you not be cursed and perish, so too those who do well are with you and you for them. But intensely powerful forces are for you on Earth and in your good, you are to be defended by them, when they are righteous. Now the soldiers of the devil have given you advice and you are not a simple people to believe. For the enemy soldier has said, leave the right action and lower your bow, and what advice would you heed from them, because there is war. But has any said, do not tell you allies? But will you rather go missing at the hands of the enemy? But your side is stronger and what threat will they use when more come with more deadly force? But let those who are pleasing God stand together that you not forget those who are beautiful when they have stood with you, that the beautiful might remain and even conquer so that those of the devil’s might diminish from ability on Earth.

The soldiers of the devil are attempting to teach you something, but there is war, and the way of life departs from hell. Now do not let the wicked pull us all down with them, and let them not claim you should fight their war against yourself and God, for they are against all those who please God, those of their own ethnicity and those of another, that the ethnicities of Earth are not often worth considering, unless it is some matter of politeness towards another’s culture and you are knowing what is right and what is not that I am forbidden to offer any command or guidance in this place only to offer my support to those who are beautiful. Now do you believe you have any favour in supporting criminals among those of their own ethnicity. But do not believe it for as you throw the head over the wall of the offendor that God might bless you, and you not be cursed and perish, so too those who do well are with you and you for them. But intensely powerful forces are for you on Earth and in your good, you are to be defended by them, when they are righteous. Now the soldiers of the devil have given you advice and you are not a simple people to believe. For the enemy soldier has said, leave the right action and lower your bow, and what advice would you heed from them, because there is war. But has any said, do not tell you allies? But will you rather go missing at the hands of the enemy? But your side is stronger and what threat will they use when more come with more deadly force? But let those who are pleasing God stand together that you not forget those who are beautiful when they have stood with you, that the beautiful might remain and even conquer so that those of the devil’s might diminish from ability on Earth.

The stranger had vanished without sound or sight and only a small breeze emerges and then the sound of goats. She looks towards the rocks and the shelves of sedimentary rocks. She moves towards the well and looks towards the plains where the sky is visible between the clouds and lightning flashes and stabs the plains in places and thunder drops and rolls across the sky like thousands of horses. She hears whispers from the thunder that seem to come from many places and she sees a serpant slither from view and disappear amongst the rocks and then she pauses and pulls up more water from the well. The sky seems to calm and the ground seems to become darkened as she pulls up the pale and then pauses and walks to the edge of the shelf of rock towards the place where there is a short step of coarse rock before the scattering of stones and the open space of plains and wilderness that becomes the coarse desert of rocks and flowering cacti and pinyon pine and the reeds that fan and sway in bunches to the tanned slopes of some geologic event that had left the flood plain to remain and swept down much rock in increments from the mesas and slopes. She did not pray and had not been inclined for many years for she was resentful in a way towards the world that had taken her parents. She touched her chest with her hand and then turned and moved back to the pales and she hoisted the pales and walked with them and she ascended the slope and stepped well with the pales and goat-like amongst the foot holds and places of gain until she had come to the rocky swale that had been worn with foot falls and carved by the flow of water and she ascended the swale and gained height upon the rocky slope and then found more height until she was able to walk at a horizontal level. She moved along the slope and then descended and set the pales down and touched her arms and then hoisted the pales and walked in the direction of the stone lodging for the elderly and sick. If she had not been her father’s daughter she might not have known that she was capable of much that others would fail in. She walked past the locked barn where she could hear Bornol, the horse that belonged to Creper who was the neighbour, a viscious old man who stole money from people who were more beautiful in the days after the slaying of the beautiful after the systematic genocide of jelousy when beautiful people were attacked secretly and their plans and goals ruined and their employments ruined and their opportunities ruined when their money was cast away by secret attacks from almost every direction so that the ugly might exhault themselves and claim that life is fair, for it had been spoken by the prophet girl who was 14 and holy and pure that, do not let the ugly ever believe that life is suddenly fair, for they will kill the land, and yet those hating themselves had attacked by the secret of the devil and they required no instruction so that they carried out their attacks without word to each other for their hearts were all knowing the same and some of the beautiful, being noble, had even become wanderers with no homes because of it, and then the open attacks had occurred and most of the beautiful had been killed. 

The horse stomped it’s heavy foot and huffed and Sereri walked on along the rest of the fence in the places where there was no light for she was concealed from evil and she placed the water pales down by the stone door and covered them and then moved inside, rubbing her arms from the weight of the pales, still the beautiful and princess warrior that was concealed from the ugly for their ignorance was willing to blind them and the pain they could not bear less they should set themselves ablaze to destroy themselves. She found the elderly woman in the rocking chair as a decaying ghost that had no light in her and no glory of old age and none of the beauty of light and virtue that might radiate upon her but she was a stone of grotesque bitterness piled upon itself.
Elderly woman: Serari, I am for sleep, young one and are you to take me up the steps?
Serari: Yes, madam.
Woman: But be not showing me your face for it is offensive.
Serari: I am sorry, madam. I will not stand before you.
Woman: Good.Good. Let me ascend the steps. I am an elderly thing and able with aid. Now do not drop me, for your hand is not so sure and you would betray me. The beautiful are not to be trusted for they hide trechory in their hearts.
Serari: As you say, my elder. I have heard of such things.
Woman: Yes. Of course. I must be clever for I am hideous, and it is better to be so. The hideous are clever by body that such has come from the spiritual world to make all those to be intelligent hideous things to control the Earth and to show forth the hatred of our lord towards what is against us. Do not disgust me with agreeance for you would never be able to understand the burden of knowing such things and having great understanding of what is true. Now aid me foolish, pretty one, for all we require of you is what we say and ask for, and nothing more. You can be grateful for me, that you are given a purpose in life. Ugly men like ugly women as it should be, and those able to kill a child…Hay! But they used to say it was wrong here. Foolish girl, but we must take charge to save the species for that which would happen if we had obeyed that God would destroy our species. We would not make it, and the beautiful would continue to rule over us as it had been. The men would have stolen the women and more than is fair, and it was like rape, for the women could not choose reasonably, that the beautiful men would plunder and steal, and the ugly men who would cherish an ugly woman would be outcast to be like people unknown. Now does not their hatred make sense, girl? Does it not make sense that they make things fair for them? Are they not of wisdom that they believe in cruelties that must be, and the subjection of beauty to uglieness and cruel intelligence. But they used to say injustice and we say objective. Hay! Oh, the world has changed, yes indeed, and the whole of the Earth is as this small nation that is like an Island and cut off from all. Now get away from me and I will carry myself for your face has offended me and it causes pain. Why should I bear it? You would have been better off never born into this world. For Babylon grows strong and it is friendly to us and our freedoms from that God they used to speak of.

They had ascended the steps with Serari at the old woman’s arm and Serari let go her arm and listened to what the woman had said and yet she did not speak and said nothing and seemed to ponder the words in the flicker from candles that danced their light in scattering angles on the stone walls so that the old woman was seen in the softer light with a different delicacy about her that seemed to have emerged from what had been ugly and it was a different thing that what had been as the old woman moved away and vanished and then re-appeared before turning the iron door and pushing the wood open so that she was gone and the door to the room remained open and the still air seemed to move from a arched window and stir towards the door and Serari stepped back so that her back was to the stone wall near the curved arch and she looked towards the window and tears seemed to stand in her eyes but she miv d away with suddenness and descended the steps quickly and moved through a large room where the shapes of chairs and tables were and passed quickly outside where she stumbled on towards the slope of rocks, and she ascended as if drunk and threw herself down on the flat space and began to weep. Thunder erupted in the sky and a wind gusted and then she heard the first screams and the clashes of swords.
The task they were given made them strange and evil, carrying out what is perverse and becoming far worse than what they did, so that a pure person has stepped onto the sight of a massacre and it is so by God.

The task they were given made them strange and evil, carrying out what is perverse and becoming far worse than what they did, so that a pure person has stepped onto the sight of a massacre and it is so by God.

The thing wants so much to be famous that its strategy is to cover itself in refuse only for attention. For them there is no other way to become famous, for they say, I will destroy myself utterly, and
 the mind will be made numb and alienated, and the heart seized with stubborness, for I will kill, the thing being easy, and so I will be famous. For justice has hidden to avoid prison but the other is for building a shrine for others to perceive. Now the lake of fire exaults the thing, but it is concealed by understanding, that their name is not known less those of hell exault and rejoice that the kings and queens of the Lord’s were slain by the devil.

The thing wants so much to be famous that its strategy is to cover itself in refuse only for attention. For them there is no other way to become famous, for they say, I will destroy myself utterly, and the mind will be made numb and alienated, and the heart seized with stubborness, for I will kill, the thing being easy, and so I will be famous. For justice has hidden to avoid prison but the other is for building a shrine for others to perceive. Now the lake of fire exaults the thing, but it is concealed by understanding, that their name is not known less those of hell exault and rejoice that the kings and queens of the Lord’s were slain by the devil.
The tiger encountered the moth in tiger’s clothing and the moth could not wrestle for the tiger knew it was a moth, and it was puffed up and reviled and presented a facade of insolence and with great sputtering of ignorance crumbled to pieces.

The ugly is taking pleasure in what is wrong, but the daughter of Sarah is beautiful.

The wicked are not wishing to comprehend justice, for to look in all directions from land is not for them.

The wicked contradict themselves but a righteous man is not speaking hypocracy.


The wicked give themselves permission with words of wicked foolishness, that their insanity is wayward and great, but integrity is trusting God.

The wicked has been at home too long, and being around others not in their house they realize what they must and become confused and terrified, and their terror is still turned towards aggression because they are greatly afraid.

The wicked has forbidden the righteous of doing what is right by the girl when he has behaved honourably that the girl has the right, being robbed, to reap revenge upon the wicked.

The wicked have said so long as I have not stabbed them with a sword I have no guilt, but am completely innocent before man and God, but when a person does anything that words are below sentience they are concealing their real motive that they are unwilling to say. Now if the motive is due to guilt why will they confess. For men have endured torture without confessing, and torture will not yield the truth, and is a wrong to us because we are ceasing from evil at a time because we are God’s people.

The wicked one driven back for a time returned that they should have been delt with completely. If one would be angry at you I am not, only their second attack is worse than the first? For if they attack now with allies do you think you could have done more? But are any believing you to be a god or goddess who would have done war? But if you are being persecuted than Christ is with you. If many are against you is it not right to flee to safety if you can? But if you are not accustomed to such things the world is changing because of you, some being as if not married and not a parent because of it. But are you truly to be counted lucky if you are neither if more is brought against you yesterday or the month prior? But know that heaven is where you are. Now one does not die but has done much evil and another dies who did much good, and a man thinks himself the king of such matters? But life and death is with God. Now it is right to trust God because He has power, but if you have lived with small means of going astray than do not soldiers do more than this on an almost daily basis. But why would I judge? But I do not ask any to go astray or recommend it and yet you might know that I myself do not perform so well as some of the saints. Now if their minds are stubborn than so are their hearts and if they say Babylon, my country makes it right than neither do they wish to go astray. But the women who saved the children of the Jews were praised for fearing God? Now what are these saints and what have they come to, but forgive the world, God in Heaven, for their heads would rupture and blood would spill from their eyes to know what they do.

The wicked one driven back for a time returned that they should have been delt with completely. If one would be angry at you I am not, only their second attack is worse than the first? For if they attack now with allies do you think you could have done more? But are any believing you to be a god or goddess who would have done war? But if you are being persecuted than Christ is with you. If many are against you is it not right to flee to safety if you can? But if you are not accustomed to such things the world is changing because of you, some being as if not married and not a parent because of it. But are you truly to be counted lucky if you are neither if more is brought against you yesterday or the month prior? But know that heaven is where you are. Now one does not die but has done much evil and another dies who did much good, and a man thinks himself the king of such matters? But life and death is with God. Now it is right to trust God because He has power, but if you have lived with small means of going astray than do not soldiers do more than this on an almost daily basis. But why would I judge? But I do not ask any to go astray or recommend it and yet you might know that I myself do not perform so well as some of the saints. Now if their minds are stubborn than so are their hearts and if they say Babylon, my country makes it right than neither do they wish to go astray. But the women who saved the children of the Jews were praised for fearing God? Now what are these saints and what have they come to, but forgive the world, God in Heaven, for their heads would rupture and blood would spill from their eyes to know what they do.
.

The wisdom of David being that of an angel, being that which Joab would adhere to, has said to the afflicted words of kindness, has defended the prophets and what is holy, has been like an equal with the angels, to fight as one of the angels, to cast out the rebellious, to slay the wicked who feign justice.

The woman nagging is not the wife, and such is the certificate of divorce, and yet if the man does not perform the certificate there is yet no divorce.
 
The woman of the type cannot bear Jews for they are a heavy burden to her, and she is not able, but this is not as the man who hates them, for the woman is not often for exceeding in doing much to them, and yet the man, often, is for being a soldier in war.

The world full of what it has is being transformed for the devil by those key to transform, for jelousy and wickedness is changing society, that such lack of self control is from being robbed of something, that pride is overcompensating and they have exercised lack of prudence and exhault Ed themselves with beliefs in persecution and believed in a cult of abuse in which they have support for they are without understanding, insolent and confident and insincere in their anger and wrath that hatred is with them and they have circumcised themselves from understanding so as not to know their guilt and fault and to not see their own jelousy, that with proud exaulting they continue the circumcision and with hard pride they are confident and strong, that these are stripped of worth, for they have cut it off as it caused them jelousy and understanding, that they massacre themselves to be without guilt in their deeds.
The world full of what it has is being transformed for the devil by those key to transform, for jelousy and wickedness is changing society, that such lack of self control is from being robbed of something, that pride is overcompensating and they have exercised lack of prudence and exhault Ed themselves with beliefs in persecution and believed in a cult of abuse in which they have support for they are without understanding, insolent and confident and insincere in their anger and wrath that hatred is with them and they have circumcised themselves from understanding so as not to know their guilt and fault and to not see their own jelousy, that with proud exaulting they continue the circumcision and with hard pride they are confident and strong, that these are stripped of worth, for they have cut it off as it caused them jelousy and understanding, that they massacre themselves to be without guilt in their deeds.


The wrath of a servant is his wife, for he keeps with silence and she rages with wickedness, but the strategic wife of a noble is slaying the low one herself.


The zeal for foolishness and ignorance is an unholy flame, but the one with understanding has peace in what is good.


The zeolot is not concerned if they are sinking the boat entire, but a righteous man is possessing more from God than them.
Then you will know the wisdom that is of some men who understand, that a child molestor can turn into a very dangerous threat actor very quickly, sending troops, dropping large yield bombs, not even regarding others of their type, but wiping out towns, men, women, and children in an attempt to save themselves because the sky is falling, though it is the Ocean, as they are sending out destruction in all directions as they thrash and squirm and sink to the bottom of the Ocean with a heavy stone chained to their ankles.
 
Then you will know the wisdom that is of some men who understand, that a child molestor can turn into a very dangerous threat actor very quickly, sending troops, dropping large yield bombs, not even regarding others of their type, but wiping out towns, men, women, and children in an attempt to save themselves because the sky is falling, though it is the Ocean, as they are sending out destruction in all directions as they thrash and squirm and sink to the bottom of the Ocean with a heavy stone chained to their ankles.
 
There are many things that are to be permitted, that though you think you know, when you know more, you are permitting it, that the one who is correcting without knowing more is sometimes resented. But then are not all such? But if any wishes to go astray is it not for God and not for people to be against? For denying freedom, when you are not stopping, is it not against God? Now you do not know the strategies of God and are not all wise as He is and capable of knowing the future as he does, and as we have been told, not even the prophets can know the future well, but know some of the future and are able to prophesy, but your wisdom is sufficient to know that to be against a person’s freedom is against them and God, so that your rebukes when they have been rejected and it is another’s freedom are then the works of war against God when you are not relenting, and God is with them who would be rebuked and is it even so far that the one who does not relent is to be outside the kingdom of heaven if they do not relent? But God is with the one who is rebuked? But this is not the same as a parent who corrects their child, the one they love, and a person has only to know who their parents are, and it is not the wise rebuke that is for the person attaining their goal. But if it is not their goal than what can any do? But you think it is so easy to be against God that a hypocracy and contradiction occurs? But I write about matters that are in the realm of war where people would attempt to attack in an ugly way, and not the rebukes and departures of society. But if it is in the realm of war then you will heed the proverb if you wish to know that this is not for society but is for it where any has entered into the realm of war, so that none of it applies and should be considered unless a person is exceeding that which is in the realm of society and they must go far for this to happen. But many things are to be permitted and you know what is acceptable, that no anti-Christ spirit be among you to wage war against the beuitiful, for a wise rebuke is beautiful and what is beautiful cannot be in error in this matter, and so who is it against? But it is against the ugly who are not with you, that they are not part of your church, and have come to be an attacking soldier, have come in their foolishness and atomicity to be soldiers who would be against God, to cause the people who are His to sin. Therefore if you are part of the church than this is not for you and does not apply to you in anything you do, because you are beautiful and you are permitted and more is right for you in the eyes of God and people on Earth.

There is a beast of the devil’s that does not even understand much what others explain to it, and it’s whole world is combat, for there is nothing else in it, and it’s whole world is for attacking in offensive attack, for its defence is attack, that it is never relenting for there is nothing else, and only pride and evil is it, and it is aknowledging that it is for combat only, for there is no deception about such in its heart. Now it lacks understanding in everything else and can hardly function among people, for in other things it is as a fool, a useless one, and it attacks with the mouth, with the teeth, with hands when there is opportunity, for it does not lie to itself to say it is not evil and not for combat for the devil, for it is loyal to this and ready to do what it thirsts for. Now it comes sometimes in the form of women due to compassion and sympathy for women from men, and yet human it is not, and not man or woman, for what true interest does it have in love and romance? But it is for being an evil weapon. Now it is like one in truth who does not desire a man or woman, and such it knows, and it is not truly ashamed of such for even if such is acknowledged by them are extremely rare, yet it is honest about itself to itself that it is for combat. Now a man understands and has sympathy and the angel is partnered with it in this thing that he laughs, for it is not dishonest about its mission, that it is for combat for the devil. For there is no malice when it kills him and utterly slaughters the man who had compassion when he does not look to be careful.

There is a beast of the devil’s that does not even understand much what others explain to it, and it’s whole world is combat, for there is nothing else in it, and it’s whole world is for attacking in offensive attack, for its defence is attack, that it is never relenting for there is nothing else, and only pride and evil is it, and it is aknowledging that it is for combat only, for there is no deception about such in its heart. Now it lacks understanding in everything else and can hardly function among people, for in other things it is as a fool, a useless one, and it attacks with the mouth, with the teeth, with hands when there is opportunity, for it does not lie to itself to say it is not evil and not for combat for the devil, for it is loyal to this and ready to do what it thirsts for. Now it comes sometimes in the form of women due to compassion and sympathy for women from men, and yet human it is not, and not man or woman, for what true interest does it have in love and romance? But it is for being an evil weapon. Now it is like one in truth who does not desire a man or woman, and such it knows, and it is not truly ashamed of such for even if such is acknowledged by them are extremely rare, yet it is honest about itself to itself that it is for combat. Now a man understands and has sympathy and the angel is partnered with it in this thing that he laughs, for it is not dishonest about its mission, that it is for combat for the devil. For there is no malice when it kills him and utterly slaughters the man who had compassion when he does not look to be careful. Now the most advanced are not trying to deceive any person about what they are, only they will not confess it, and neither will they lie, and the advanced ones are not resenting a person killing them, for they do not fear consequence much except to be careful and their will to live is not as great in terms of defence, except it is great in matters of chance to attack while there is still time, for they do not resent it. Now to show love to her, when in form of woman, is to defile her, and she knows what her duty is to the devil, for it is for combat, that it is not she or he. Now will you attempt to make marriage with a blade, that is vowed to kill, that is made to be a weapon against people? But you do not show respect for the blade, and yet the blade is not wanting respect, for it does not resent that you should seek to kill it.

There is a dragon that comes in many different coverings and it is with tough exterior and a slowness of wit, and it startled and dismays the Enochs for it much attempting with bursts of determination great and smaller, to capture some of the Enochs, for it chooses an Enoch, often a young one, and attempts to capture the young Enoch and to parent it, to take it forcefully to be its own child, and it is difficult often for the Enoch to escape, and the dragon is not knowing how to parent an Enoch, for it is a dragon with tough exterior, and yet it is often very determined to steal the Enoch and parent it, and such confuses some Enoch and dismays them.

There is a man protecting a holy woman from God, the land that she inherits where there is good reward and corrections, that one must dwell with both, but those who welcome her to the land for either thing, welcome her to the land entire, not wishing evil towards her, but welcoming with good. Now the land is in the light and yet where one would use God for the devil, yet the truth does not change. Now if a woman in the land has sons who dwell in another land of gnashing teeth and sorrow, yet she is still in the land she inherits. Now is it not willed that her sons should be in the land with her? But indeed it is.

There is a person driven back in their evil who claims it is injustice that they have been driven back, but the fear of God is fearing His judgements.

There is a person experienced in the insolent facade but it does not deliver them and it is without prudence, for a person has wanted the killing to occur and they have gone away into concealment of imprudence.

There is a person experienced in the insolent facade but it does not deliver them and it is without prudence, for a person has wanted the killing to occur and they have gone away into concealment of imprudence.

There is a person for whom when it comes to what does not leave a mark, they are as violent as possible for they ponder ways to do violence without leaving a mark and they ponder ways to increase their cowardice, for this person is at length being more violent than any criminal, and yet because of their cowardice they are casting themselves out of themselves to become less. Now those not judging this thing are a simple person.


There is a person for whom when it comes to what does not leave a mark, they are as violent as possible for they ponder ways to do violence without leaving a mark and they ponder ways to increase their cowardice, for this person is at length being more violent than any criminal, and yet because of their cowardice they are casting themselves out of themselves to become less. Now those not judging this thing are a simple person. Now what is the name of the violent person who is employing concealment and cowardice that is not concealed? For they are cowardly juggernaut, and those carrying out more violence than any.
There is a person for whom when it comes to what does not leave a mark, they are as violent as possible for they ponder ways to do violence without leaving a mark and they ponder ways to increase their cowardice, for this person is at length being more violent than any criminal, and yet because of their cowardice they are casting themselves out of themselves to become less. Now those not judging this thing are a simple person. Now what is the name of the violent person who is employing concealment and cowardice that is not concealed? For they are cowardly juggernaut, and those carrying out more violence than any.
There is a person for whom when it comes to what does not leave a mark, they are as violent as possible for they ponder ways to do violence without leaving a mark and they ponder ways to increase their cowardice, for this person is at length being more violent than any criminal, and yet because of their cowardice they are casting themselves out of themselves to become less. Now those not judging this thing are a simple person.


There is a person who will destroy an entire planet and kill all the inhabitants because they are a child molestor,  for they have sunk, in what they are, to the bottom of the Ocean, and the mill-stone is tied to the feet. Dangerous to the people they offended and dangerous and unconcerned towards all, they care not for the lives of those who are not like them. For many have died because of them with the foolish task they have given themselves to carry out more evil, and they have not been concerned about their lives who would die, and their is no clear threat towards them that they might seek to save their own lives.
 
There is a person who will destroy an entire planet and kill all the inhabitants because they are a child molestor,  for they have sunk, in what they are, to the bottom of the Ocean, and the mill-stone is tied to the feet. Dangerous to the people they offended and dangerous and unconcerned towards all, they care not for the lives of those who are not like them. For many have died because of them with the foolish task they have given themselves to carry out more evil, and they have not been concerned about their lives, and their is no clear threat towards them that they might seek to save their lives.
 
There is a servant who hates the righteous and another the wise, but the son who does good is not forgotten by God.
There is a time and place for all, but those lacking knowledge do not know it, but a wise child is better than a foolish king, and foolish person who is a child is grievous.

There is a woman who sows discord in her meddling and yet she has not intended much harm, and those she has defended are burdened by it and groaning in the heaviness of the thing.
There is an animal only feeling guilty when something is knocked over and falls to the floor for it does not perceive as much, but an Enoch is for slaying the enemy soldier who allows their animal to attack and does not restrain it, for the animal is weapon of the soldier and the soldier is guilty of attack, and the animal is then released to fend for itself, for the animal is not always blamed as much, but there are many times when an animal must be slayn.
There is an animal that has been given command by the devil being taught not to talk to people but to use the ways of people, even language to attack, that though people might try to talk to it, it throws away all that is spoken and finds that which is used for animal attack, being incoherent according to language, for these are very aggressive beasts meant to maul and kill.
There is great weight and serious judgement place on one matter by God and you do not much regard it? There is less weight and judgement on another matter by God, and you place great judgement on it? But if you are not a Jew or Gentile than what are you that you do not perceive right and wrong? But an unjust fool with little understanding, Luke-warm and thus the least, to be cast into the place that is away.
 
There is great weight and serious judgement place on one matter by God and you do not much regard it? There is less weight and judgement on another matter by God, and you place great judgement on it? But if you are not a Jew or Gentile than what are you that you do not perceive right and wrong? But an unjust fool with little understanding, Luke-warm and thus the least, to be cast into the place that is away. 

There is one so low as our societies dog and worse that he is dependant on the better qualities of the one he attacks and not on God and truth, but upon that which is a God to them that they have said, it is God’s quality, that he is beyond justice in his ways he is better, and therefore my God is judging what I accuse him with, that what I accuse with is to be judged by his standard, that it is my right, because I am owned by him even to my thoughts and accusations, that there is no truth and justice and all the Universe is the one I attack. Now this is beyond having respect of persons, and is worse than a dog. Now do even the animals not acknowledge reality, that is God? But this one is worse than a servant, less faithful than a beast. For there is one who is made worse by their attack and by the measure they attack they become a worse thing, and how low was it if it became such so quickly and continues in this way remaining? Now will commit blasphamy and say that a living dog is better than a dead lion. Will you speak wickedness and commit blasphemy when the words were holy? For are you to be deceived in that a Jew has what is better in this way, that they are not as inclined to such blasphamy that is wicked. Now such as many things are beneath a Jew so they are beneath others who are not Jews, that a people who are not Jews but are excessively not regarding their own wickedness is spread out among the righteous and they are for speaking words of soldiers when in society and doing wicked combat when in society with their wickedness of what is known in order that it might be hated by the wise. Now has the Egyptian not complained about such perversities and wickedness more than those who are Greek? But these are not part of any people who gravitate to what is better to be like beasts that would wish to devour what is good, because they are not. So the Egyptian will defend his brother, that there be a knowledge of the people we are, the people who are not with Satan, with Beelzebub. Now does a person who is with Satan seek to come and divide when he is not God’s but saying that one is not worthy to be with the other? But what is a vexation on Earth and a calamity was first complained about to be shunned by the Egyptian who has feared God, who is God’s, that those who claimed more righteousness became attacked within their people by their great calamity, not taking notice to hault injustice and foolishness, but allowing wickedness to continue to grow. Now is it not vital for you that you not defame and cast away what is good, that the people who are God’s might be saved? But why will the Egyptian be swallowed by the wickedness and foolishness that has begun with what they attempted to shun? But a plague is on the land and it is like sodom, those violent and wicked, with perverse wickedness, hating with the wish to desecrate because of hatred, and so all righteous men are not capable of being citizens with such.
There is one so low as our societies dog and worse that he is dependant on the better qualities of the one he attacks and not on God and truth, but upon that which is a God to them that they have said, it is God’s quality, that he is beyond justice in his ways he is better, and therefore my God is judging what I accuse him with, that what I accuse with is to be judged by his standard, that it is my right, because I am owned by him even to my thoughts and accusations, that there is no truth and justice and all the Universe is the one I attack. Now this is beyond having respect of persons, and is worse than a dog. Now do even the animals not acknowledge reality, that is God? But this one is worse than a servant, less faithful than a beast. For there is one who is made worse by their attack and by the measure they attack they become a worse thing, and how low was it if it became such so quickly and continues in this way remaining? Now will commit blasphamy and say that a living dog is better than a dead lion. Will you speak wickedness and commit blasphemy when the words were holy? For are you to be deceived in that a Jew has what is better in this way, that they are not as inclined to such blasphamy that is wicked. Now such as many things are beneath a Jew so they are beneath others who are not Jews, that a people who are not Jews but are excessively not regarding their own wickedness is spread out among the righteous and they are for speaking words of soldiers when in society and doing wicked combat when in society with their wickedness of what is known in order that it might be hated by the wise. Now has the Egyptian not complained about such perversities and wickedness more than those who are Greek? But these are not part of any people who gravitate to what is better to be like beasts that would wish to devour what is good, because they are not. So the Egyptian will defend his brother, that there be a knowledge of the people we are, the people who are not with Satan, with Beelzebub. Now does a person who is with Satan seek to come and divide when he is not God’s but saying that one is not worthy to be with the other? But what is a vexation on Earth and a calamity was first complained about to be shunned by the Egyptian who has feared God, who is God’s, that those who claimed more righteousness became attacked within their people by their great calamity, not taking notice to hault injustice and foolishness, but allowing wickedness to continue to grow. Now is it not vital for you that you not defame and cast away what is good, that the people who are God’s might be saved? But why will the Egyptian be swallowed by the wickedness and foolishness that has begun with what they attempted to shun? But a plague is on the land and it is like sodom, those violent and wicked, with perverse wickedness, hating with the wish to desecrate because of hatred, and so all righteous men are not capable of being citizens with such.

There is one who has done wickedness as if a great plan and as if he would live forever, but he is gone quickly and this may have guessed because if there is not removal there is death, but those who are like Jacob have a legacy. For the legacy of some is dead quickly but what is in Heaven is for the after-life.
There is one who is insolent, pure of conscience and draped in innocence, with kindness and having those good virtues, with consideration towards others, and behaving well, and yet they are only alive because they have said in their heart that no person will know outside of these what I have committed, what others like me have done, and many times they have been worthy of death, because they sharpened their teeth and hardened their faces against the one to whom they are servants, to be given to the wife of him or to her, that they hold themselves up with evil, that they maintain their place as sons and daughters by insolence, that they remain in confidence by insolence, that they have despised God, that they would not kill the heir before God, who is with their father in Heaven, that they would not kill the blameless child who is with their father in Heaven, that they are like those who would kill children and defile them, that a mill-stone is tied to their feet, that they have been given as slaves to the Jews, to the inheritance that is blessed, and they are not Jews, that the one who was higher than them is more innocent and might be spared, that the one’s not with them, in truth to be with what is greater, and the servants of the Jews will be their masters, for it is not right that they should serve the master directly, less any one of them give drink to what is blessed and good. But from foolishness they came and justice is for them, the middle in riches, not doing what is right as the rich girl, or the one poor and wise, the poor girl, but those who are Luke-warm and disgusting, that I am disgusted by them and they lack of wisdom because they are apathetic, and they are not doing good or evil, but much evil, and they are not showing the knowledge and understanding that is with the rich and poor, but they have no regard of others. To kill the innocent is nothing to them. Now rich and honourable man, respected by me, I will take your daughter, for I will not be behaved in this matter, and I have admired that which is pleasing, which is good, for the angel is too much for doing this thing. Now as for the poor girl who is wise, council me, even protect me, for your wisdom is excellent, your ways pleasing, that you are the wife of a king, a precious matter. But as for those who are apathetic, who lack wisdom, I would wish you spit out, expelled from much that I cannot express, and you become insolent and confident at the chance to lack the fear of God. Now who deceived me prior that I considered the grievance of another and things I am not able to fulfill because I do not have the wisdom of the one who would hold such wisdom? But I will remove what is not pleasing, because of the command, and what am I to do about the other?

There is one who is insolent, pure of conscience and draped in innocence, with kindness and having those good virtues, with consideration towards others, and behaving well, and yet they are only alive because they have said in their heart that no person will know outside of these what I have committed, what others like me have done, and many times they have been worthy of death, because they sharpened their teeth and hardened their faces against the one to whom they are servants, to be given to the wife of him or to her, that they hold themselves up with evil, that they maintain their place as sons and daughters by insolence, that they remain in confidence by insolence, that they have despised God, that they would not kill the heir before God, who is with their father in Heaven, that they would not kill the blameless child who is with their father in Heaven, that they are like those who would kill children and defile them, that a mill-stone is tied to their feet, that they have been given as slaves to the Jews, to the inheritance that is blessed, and they are not Jews, that the one who was higher than them is more innocent and might be spared, that the one’s not with them, in truth to be with what is greater, and the servants of the Jews will be their masters, for it is not right that they should serve the master directly, less any one of them give drink to what is blessed and good. But from foolishness they came and justice is for them, the middle in riches, not doing what is right as the rich girl, or the one poor and wise, the poor girl, but those who are Luke-warm and disgusting, that I am disgusted by them and they lack of wisdom because they are apathetic, and they are not doing good or evil, but much evil, and they are not showing the knowledge and understanding that is with the rich and poor, but they have no regard of others. To kill the innocent is nothing to them. Now rich and honourable man, respected by me, I will take your daughter, for I will not be behaved in this matter, and I have admired that which is pleasing, which is good, for the angel is too much for doing this thing. Now as for the poor girl who is wise, council me, even protect me a little, for your wisdom is excellent, your ways pleasing, that you are the wife of a king, a precious matter. But as for those who are apathetic, who lack wisdom, I would wish you spit out, expelled from much that I cannot express, and you become insolent and confident at the chance to lack the fear of God.
There is one who is insolent, pure of conscience and draped in innocence, with kindness and having those good virtues, with consideration towards others, and behaving well, and yet they are only alive because they have said in their heart that no person will know outside of these what I have committed, what others like me have done, and many times they have been worthy of death, because they sharpened their teeth and hardened their faces against the one to whom they are servants, to be given to the wife of him or to her, that they hold themselves up with evil, that they maintain their place as sons and daughters by insolence, that they remain in confidence by insolence, that they have despised God, that they would not kill the heir before God, who is with their father in Heaven, that they would not kill the blameless child who is with their father in Heaven, that they are like those who would kill children and defile them, that a mill-stone is tied to their feet, that they have been given as slaves to the Jews, to the inheritance that is blessed, and they are not Jews, that the one who was higher than them is more innocent and might be spared, that the one’s not with them, in truth to be with what is greater, and the servants of the Jews will be their masters, for it is not right that they should serve the master directly, less any one of them give drink to what is blessed and good. But from foolishness they came and justice is for them, the middle in riches, not doing what is right as the rich girl, or the one poor and wise, the poor girl, but those who are Luke-warm and disgusting, that I am disgusted by them and they lack of wisdom because they are apathetic, and they are not doing good or evil, but much evil, and they are not showing the knowledge and understanding that is with the rich and poor, but they have no regard of others. To kill the innocent is nothing to them. Now rich and honourable man, respected by me, I will take your daughter, for I will not be behaved in this matter, and I have admired that which is pleasing, which is good, for the angel is too much for doing this thing. Now as for the poor girl who is wise, council me, even protect me a little, for your wisdom is excellent, your ways pleasing, that you are the wife of a king, a precious matter. But as for those who are apathetic, who lack wisdom, I would wish you spit out, expelled from much that I cannot express, and you become insolent and confident at the chance to lack the fear of God.

There is one who is insolent, pure of conscience and draped in innocence, with kindness and having those good virtues, with consideration towards others, and behaving well, and yet they are only alive because they have said in their heart that no person will know outside of these what I have committed, what others like me have done, and many times they have been worthy of death, because they sharpened their teeth and hardened their faces against the one to whom they are servants, to be given to the wife of him or to her, that they hold themselves up with evil, that they maintain their place as sons and daughters by insolence, that they remain in confidence by insolence, that they have despised God, that they would not kill the heir before God, who is with their father in Heaven, that they would not kill the blameless child who is with their father in Heaven, that they are like those who would kill children and defile them, that a mill-stone is tied to their feet, that they have been given as slaves to the Jews, to the inheritance that is blessed, and they are not Jews, that the one who was higher than them is more innocent and might be spared, that the one’s not with them, in truth to be with what is greater, and the servants of the Jews will be their masters, for it is not right that they should serve the master directly, less any one of them give drink to what is blessed and good. But from foolishness they came and justice is for them, the middle in riches, not doing what is right as the rich girl, or the one poor and wise, the poor girl, but those who are Luke-warm and disgusting, that I am disgusted by them and they lack of wisdom because they are apathetic, and they are not doing good or evil, but much evil, and they are not showing the knowledge and understanding that is with the rich and poor, but they have no regard of others. To kill the innocent is nothing to them. Now rich and honourable man, respected by me, I will take your daughter, for I will not be behaved in this matter, and I have admired that which is pleasing, which is good, for the angel is too much for doing this thing. Now as for the poor girl who is wise, council me, even protect me, for your wisdom is excellent, your ways pleasing, that you are the wife of a king, a precious matter. But as for those who are apathetic, who lack wisdom, I would wish you spit out, expelled from much that I cannot express, and you become insolent and confident at the chance to lack the fear of God.
There is that person who is not from the same species as another who contends as if they were of the same species, and such is a wickedness, and it is a waste of time, and there is another saying that humanity should not survive upon the planet and to survive the axe does not devour all and yet it is benificial that where a man builds that the stones are removed and the weeds and things poisonous that though the forest is untouched the places of habitation are tended to and purified for people. Now it is a shame for a man to permit what is poisonous to grow upon the balcony that is accessible to his child, being good and regarding righteousness, and yet he makes the wilderness safe and does not touch it by preparing his children with wisdom for it. He has established wells and he has built walls for the place even that evil beasts might not devour child or anything, for by righteousness and understanding he has brought much under subjection with the judgement that is with God that the Earth might be established for society to occur. Now his wife has nudged him saying be doing God’s work that the Lord might be pleased and the Earth brought to good that I might be blessed and that my children might have good tidings with delight, for she opens her hands to recieve from God and is blessed with her husband. Now she accuses him saying, I am not one of the foolish daughters and have not been deceived so now go out and be making much good for it is well, and I am your wife. Now I have been more righteous than you and am not one of the foolish daughters, for I shun adultry more than you that I cruelty mock in my heart at your fear that is disrespect to me, for I am with more understand, yes, even more wisdom than you in this thing who are more promiscuous by your nature than one who knows wisdom and foolishness in this thing, for not a mere woman am I but a daughter of Sarah, and I have understanding, beauty, concealed strength, many virtues, so that you are wearing a crown upon your head and I am waiting and able to do much with what you provide that a priceless jewal you have found and of that which is more you will know. So a man by God will be out of words and speechless to praise because of how much she is to be praised.

There is the atheist of a different type who I have called anti-atheists who are not regarding the truth of their actions in what they do or do not do, but are only more in a nihilistic fashion, being that they are total anarchists at heart so that if the punishment is not at hand from people they have no guilt or remorse and they are for that morality therefore of animals that if one should die they are proud and if one should be injured and they are not they are proud. They’re lives are of no more worth than that of animals.

There is the gracious who is beloved, when they are truly good, but the one who feigns meekness and is a ravenous wolf is a servant among those who would eat the scraps of the child.
There is the person, and they are many who being educated have an entirely new vocabulary to describe and are just as much a fool and immoral person as they were before, and then sometimes they have become much worse because of it, being more foolish and more immoral.

There is the person, and they are many who being educated have an entirely new vocabulary to describe and are just as much a fool and immoral person as they were before, and then sometimes they have become much worse because of it, being more foolish and more immoral.

These people are lacking in vocabulary and they are not able to express all that justice would say so that many of these languages requires wisdom to be made standard understanding by the language alone, that there are those encroaching upon the greater with lack of fear of God and they are not permitted by righteousness to rebuke them unless they use wickedness because the truth is not accessible to them because of the lack of vocabulary. Even the wise are lacking in this way and the angel that is tenderly loved is loving them who seek knowledge and wisdom that they might increase and offer abundance, those who give it. They have denied knowledge and are plagued by wars and constructions of the past like one who inherits a sickness from the elder that they pursue progress and even still are a little crippled by folly, so that they know the wall that blocks them, that they are not to become another people, giving way to and accompanying those other things that would restrict their freedom, and so they would rather suffer the slight crippling and the burden that hinders them, that I have loved them, and they are not ignorant to the truth, but in being against something concerning men and women they are always greatly chovinistic and this with the desire of women who give honour and demand it, that they know the truth and yet are all watched by the judge of what they did not create, but that other mortals placed there, and perhaps not entirely by their will and for those who did more not meaning that it should be what it was. Great love is what I have for them, and they are and cannot fools in this fashion because there is that knowledge of truth that is given to all without learning that they cannot escape less they give great attempts to injure their spirits.

These people are lacking in vocabulary and they are not able to express all that justice would say so that many of these languages requires wisdom to be made standard understanding by the language alone, that there are those encroaching upon the greater with lack of fear of God and they are not permitted by righteousness to rebuke them unless they use wickedness because the truth is not accessible to them because of the lack of vocabulary. Even the wise are lacking in this way and the angel that is tenderly loved is loving them who seek knowledge and wisdom that they might increase and offer abundance, those who give it. They have denied knowledge and are plagued by wars and constructions of the past like one who inherits a sickness from the elder that they pursue progress and even still are a little crippled by folly, so that they know the wall that blocks them, that they are not to become another people, giving way to and accompanying those other things that would restrict their freedom, and so they would rather suffer the slight crippling and the burden that hinders them, that I have loved them, and they are not ignorant to the truth, but in being against something concerning men and women they are always greatly chovinistic and this with the desire of women who give honour and demand it, that they know the truth and yet are all watched by the judge of what they did not create, but that other mortals placed there, and perhaps not entirely by their will and for those who did more not meaning that it should be what it was. Great love is what I have for them, and they are and cannot be fools in this fashion because there is that knowledge of truth that is given to all without learning that they cannot escape less they give great attempts to injure their spirits.

They are having hyper-neurosis and listening to the conversations of others like a spy and then retaliating with offence. Such a person is surely an animal.

They are only sorry after they have killed the Christ and before though we moved a continent from one side of the Earth to the other they would not listen to reason, they would not repent, but shut their ears to be stupid, closed their eyes to be ignorant, that when the Christ was dead they repented and said, I have done wrong but deserve no punishment because I was not capable of knowing and repenting that though he forgave the Romans the head of Judas exploded with blood, and though he forgave the Romans the Pharisees were for killing him. Now why are you to be deceived to take what is said to one to be given to the other. For though one criminal would be with him in heaven the other is speaking iniquity? Now are the words of his forgiveness meant for all when it cannot be that one is like the other that you should commit blasphamy by speaking what is a profanity when His words are used for others? But one who kills is for killing when he is full of rage and wrath and shuts his ears and shuts his eyes, that his rage is full and his ignorance great and willingly so, because he does not judge by truth but by his own wrath and rage, because he is following his own heart. Now if they are cast out is it by the cross? For did Christ die for all? Indeed He did, and so these who fought against Him, against the prophets, the holy ones, against what is good and noble, are cast out by the cross? But do think I mention the Jews, because those who do good are good and those who do evil are what they do, that if any is to be cast out by the cross how great would their iniquity be or what would they be to be cast out? Now David fought against the soldiers on Earth, given the task of defending the citizen, of keeping the commands, who would attack what is noble, what is good and pleasing, and David was defending the place of prophets and the places of learning where people were pleasing God, defending the holy priests and the noble ones, those who seek wisdom he defended, and fought as an angel, and Joab would be with him, because Joab chose him. And his innocence was for defending the poor, and he fought those who would attack God, who would attack the holy. Now if he is returning is he an angel? But his wisdom is not less than that of angels, or so the angel he fought with thought. But how is it the one who is with the false prophet because he betrays God and Ceaser both is outside all, having betrayed all and committed treason against all that the soldiers are not even ashamed of him because they cannot identify anything of themselves with him.
They are only sorry after they have killed the Christ and before though we moved a continent from one side of the Earth to the other they would not listen to reason, they would not repent, but shut their ears to be stupid, closed their eyes to be ignorant, that when the Christ was dead they repented and said, I have done wrong but deserve no punishment because I was not capable of knowing and repenting that though he forgave the Romans the head of Judas exploded with blood, and though he forgave the Romans the Pharisees were for killing him. Now why are you to be deceived to take what is said to one to be given to the other. For though one criminal would be with him in heaven the other is speaking iniquity? Now are the words of his forgiveness meant for all when it cannot be that one is like the other that you should commit blasphamy by speaking what is a profanity when His words are used for others? But one who kills is for killing when he is full of rage and wrath and shuts his ears and shuts his eyes, that his rage is full and his ignorance great and willingly so, because he does not judge by truth but by his own wrath and rage, because he is following his own heart. Now if they are cast out is it by the cross? For did Christ die for all? Indeed He did, and so these who fought against Him, against the prophets, the holy ones, against what is good and noble, are cast out by the cross? But do not think I mention the Jews, because those who do good are good and those who do evil are what they do, that if any is to be cast out by the cross how great would their iniquity be or what would they be to be cast out? Now David fought against the soldiers on Earth, given the task of defending the citizen, of keeping the commands, who would attack what is noble, what is good and pleasing, and David was defending the place of prophets and the places of learning where people were pleasing God, defending the holy priests and the noble ones, those who seek wisdom he defended, and fought as an angel, and Joab would be with him, because Joab chose him. And his innocence was for defending the poor, and he fought those who would attack God, who would attack the holy. Now if he is returning is he an angel? But his wisdom is not less than that of angels, or so the angel he fought with thought. But how is it the one who is with the false prophet because he betrays God and Ceaser both is outside all, having betrayed all and committed treason against all that the soldiers are not even ashamed of him because they cannot identify anything of themselves with him.
They are only sorry after they have killed the Christ and before though we moved a continent from one side of the Earth to the other they would not listen to reason, they would not repent, but shut their ears to be stupid, closed their eyes to be ignorant, that when the Christ was dead they repented and said, I have done wrong but deserve no punishment because I was not capable of knowing and repenting that though he forgave the Romans the head of Judas exploded with blood, and though he forgave the Romans the Pharisees were for killing him. Now why are you to be deceived to take what is said to one to be given to the other. For though one criminal would be with him in heaven the other is speaking iniquity? Now are the words of his forgiveness meant for all when it cannot be that one is like the other that you should commit blasphamy by speaking what is a profanity when His words are used for others? But one who kills is for killing when he is full of rage and wrath and shuts his ears and shuts his eyes, that his rage is full and his ignorance great and willingly so, because he does not judge by truth but by his own wrath and rage, because he is following his own heart. Now if they are cast out is it by the cross? For did Christ die for all? Indeed He did, and so these who fought against Him, against the prophets, the holy ones, against what is good and noble, are cast out by the cross? But do not think I mention the Jews, because those who do good are good and those who do evil are what they do, that if any is to be cast out by the cross how great would their iniquity be or what would they be to be cast out? Now David fought against the soldiers on Earth, given the task of defending the citizen, of keeping the commands, who would attack what is noble, what is good and pleasing, and David was defending the place of prophets and the places of learning where people were pleasing God, defending the holy priests and the noble ones, those who seek wisdom he defended, and fought as an angel, and Joab would be with him, because Joab chose him. And his innocence was for defending the poor, and he fought those who would attack God, who would attack the holy. Now if he is returning is he an angel? But his wisdom is not less than that of angels, or so the angel he fought with thought. But how is it the one who is with the false prophet because he betrays God and Ceaser both is outside all, having betrayed all and committed treason against all that the soldiers are not even ashamed of him because they cannot identify anything of themselves with him.

They are only sorry after they have killed the Christ and before though we moved a continent from one side of the Earth to the other they would not listen to reason, they would not repent, but shut their ears to be stupid, closed their eyes to be ignorant, that when the Christ was dead they repented and said, I have done wrong but deserve no punishment because I was not capable of knowing and repenting that though he forgave the Romans the head of Judas exploded with blood, and though he forgave the Romans the Pharisees were for killing him. Now why are you to be deceived to take what is said to one to be given to the other. For though one criminal would be with him in heaven the other is speaking iniquity? Now are the words of his forgiveness meant for all when it cannot be that one is like the other that you should commit blasphamy by speaking what is a profanity when His words are used for others? But one who kills is for killing when he is full of rage and wrath and shuts his ears and shuts his eyes, that his rage is full and his ignorance great and willingly so, because he does not judge by truth but by his own wrath and rage, because he is following his own heart.
 
They are only sorry after they have killed the Christ and before though we moved a continent from one side of the Earth to the other they would not listen to reason, they would not repent, but shut their ears to be stupid, closed their eyes to be ignorant, that when the Christ was dead they repented and said, I have done wrong but deserve no punishment because I was not capable of knowing and repenting that though he forgave the Romans the head of Judas exploded with blood, and though he forgave the Romans the Pharisees were for killing him. Now why are you to be deceived to take what is said to one to be given to the other. For though one criminal would be with him in heaven the other is speaking iniquity? Now are the words of his forgiveness meant for all when it cannot be that one is like the other that you should commit blasphamy by speaking what is a profanity when His words are used for others? But one who kills is for killing when he is full of rage and wrath and shuts his ears and shuts his eyes, that his rage is full and his ignorance great and willingly so, because he does not judge by truth but by his own wrath and rage, because he is following his own heart. Now if they are cast out is it by the cross? For did Christ die for all? Indeed He did, and so these who fought against Him, against the prophets, the holy ones, against what is good and noble, are cast out by the cross?
They are slumbering so hard and with such commitment that they have turned on other people to annoy them and harass them with ignorance. Now what child is able to slumber for their days are filled with busyness, but adults are able to slumber this hard and even the teenager cannot do it. But if a woman is without a husband than she is mantaining her beauty that she not revolt and make matters worse, for her plea is not of some wish to destroy. Now the Earth is a sphere and the galaxy a disc to maintain all the capacity of a person that if one exceeds they are not exceeding but turning inwards to something different that they are not aware of. Now if you have known of other realms in the psychie than are you not worthy as a people to monitor and explore other planets? Now with Earth as the centre you remain, and it is the centre of all people who are human where ever they may go, that Earth is the centre and the planets the Islands, so that all are on Earth even if they should be on other planets. Now what are you considering the sun and planet furthest and the planet to be explored. Now what portion of the brain do you use? But if you are capable of taking than so you take, and is it not good? But you do not adhere to rebels who have attempted to cast themselves out to rebel against God.
 
They attempted and were endangered and so they changed to attacking in a way safer for them, and perhaps worse, that you know that they, ugly people, are at war with you.
They cannot perceive. For a wise woman would go and get somebody who could take action, and even in all things she is using her cunning, but a useless woman is speaking strong and leaving when the situation is great and requires much, that she reasons she has aided. Now one seems strong but wisdom is better than strength, for the wise woman is beloved.
They do not understand justice and do not care if the person is guilty, and so a wicked person gathers more to partner with them and be destroyed with them, but the righteous has the Lord.
They do not understand justice and do not care if the person is guilty, and so a wicked person gathers more to partner with them and be destroyed with them, but the righteous has the Lord.
They’re developing pedophile. Your supposed to say no. Do not make it so the woman cannot be a woman for her benefit and God’s.

Those evil will find an arguement for that which could have only been stories for truth for them are to be the lies of Jews who are persecuting people, as if the book was for the Gentiles, but some are believing in God, and are not interested in giving commands that are spontaneous because we all know right and wrong without the Bible. But if some upon reading found error in themselves and were of a strong will to not repent than no book will stand in their way, but rebuke from others without the Bible is still for them due to what people have in the knowledge of right and wrong.

Those evil will find an arguement for that which could have only been stories for truth for them are to be the lies of Jews who are persecuting people, as if the book was for the Gentiles, but some are believing in God, and are not interested in giving commands that are spontaneous because we all know right and wrong without the Bible. But if some upon reading found error in themselves and were of a strong will to not repent than no book will stand in their way, but rebuke from others without the Bible is still for them due to what people have in the knowledge of right and wrong.

Those who are not behaving in a controlled fashion with the patience of righteousness or wisdom, are found with a piece of silver in their mouth, a wise proverb, and yet it shows that they are covered in wicked foolishness, that they are apart and not worthy of the piece of silver, to the sayings of gold, that they only speak more foolishness by misusing a wise saying.
Those who came for war were angry to find peace that they attacked in wrath because none were attacking them as they had been told would occur.

Those who control the soldiers control the nation to take it by force, but where soldiers are loyal to no change a frail house sits upon rock.

Those who fight a spiritual battle are judged by what they do, and not by their claim, and God is not turned against his commands and judgement.

Those who fight a spiritual battle are judged by what they do, and not by their claim, and God is not turned against his commands and judgement.

Those who have an impulse control failure where such is lacking concerning jelousy are great fools below children. For these are possessing no understanding and righteousness, even wisdom, is kept from them like a fence and wall with a ravine, that these are pointless weapons, those who wander from place to place ruining, that they may not inherit anything or receive reward, for these are them who even cast away their own substance, and they have not been capable of love, even marriage, for they are not able to have anything. Now what a person is dispermitting is kept from their spirit in Mala, that in what they are not having for themselves, it is the same that they are inclined to ruin, and such are then like beasts and sick animals that bite children and wander without understanding, for they are covetous to ruin that they might take to destroy, and the good of God they are covetous to destroy. Now they have hated women in their hearts, indeed they have resented them, and an older brother has been given their portion in addition, and as for the younger one, brother or not, they have been bullied by them who is having no portion because of themselves, and the bullying is a serious matter. For the one being jelous in this way is like a hard beast with a relentless skull of bone. People have thought him stupid on a different level than what is often said, and yet others have perceived the great evil of them to ruin the woman by an indirect path.

Those who speak without substance of truth in all that is said, speaks wickedness when they exhault themselves in any way if they would speak against another, so that there is a right to offence, because people have right of truth and judgement, for it is not permissible to let one who molests children to speak slander against victims, and the one who has been given all and squandered much is not permitted to speak against those who gave when there was no duty to give to them, and yet where it is not one giving all but claims it, than God has given to both, and justice prevails that it is permitted, but if those who are worthy of death by their own deeds are doing such, than do they not show themselves with wicked and obnoxious foolishness. For there is one who receives patronizing compliments and yet they were too foolish and their pride swelled and their sense of greatness swelled with a low standard of achievement that the one much less has been exceedingly ungrateful and their achievement is like a statue that does not see or hear, and their low standard of achievement has caused them to swell so that they are to show themselves deceived and foolish that they call for their own death and have need of knowing the truth of reality, for they are claiming that which is not in other matters and they are jelous of the sibling who has more from God, that these are losing their inheretence to them and the child should be cast out that the true heir will inherit. For a servant is foolish and is given from Babylon and they have turned in jelousy to mock the heir, and yet they are ignorant of much and they do not suffer because they betray and present no threat as a loyal servant, so that they are to be cast out, and the heir will and the kingdom will offer their kingdom for the two kingdoms are not alike and God’s is far above and so are those of His kingdom. For how can an intelligent person do well in Babylon and not be thrown out, because such is of God, and how will the wise not be persecuted, because Babylon hates them. But the one with understanding has found a soldier in the wilderness and being wise has asked, how have you succeeded in Babylon? Now if the soldier found is not killed is there not cause for suspicion? But let those naive and simple in it be cast off as unknowledgable fools, for they are like children not told of the war, that there may be no great cause for offence if it is simple words not meant for evil. But for those who would be ignorant soldiers in their words, it is as innocence for those of the kingdom to be greatly against them, for the Christ is in Heaven and he will have His enemies as His foot-stool.
Those who speak without substance of truth in all that is said, speaks wickedness when they exhault themselves in any way if they would speak against another, so that there is a right to offence, because people have right of truth and judgement, for it is not permissible to let one who molests children to speak slander against victims, and the one who has been given all and squandered much is not permitted to speak against those who gave when there was no duty to give to them, and yet where it is not one giving all but claims it, than God has given to both, and justice prevails that it is permitted, but if those who are worthy of death by their own deeds are doing such, than do they not show themselves with wicked and obnoxious foolishness. For there is one who receives patronizing compliments and yet they were too foolish and their pride swelled and their sense of greatness swelled with a low standard of achievement that the one much less has been exceedingly ungrateful and their achievement is like a statue that does not see or hear, and their low standard of achievement has caused them to swell so that they are to show themselves deceived and foolish that they call for their own death and have need of knowing the truth of reality, for they are claiming that which is not in other matters and they are jelous of the sibling who has more from God, that these are losing their inheretence to them and the child should be cast out that the true heir will inherit. For a servant is foolish and is given from Babylon and they have turned in jelousy to mock the heir, and yet they are ignorant of much and they do not suffer because they betray and present no threat as a loyal servant, so that they are to be cast out, and the heir will and the kingdom will offer their kingdom for the two kingdoms are not alike and God’s is far above and so are those of His kingdom. For how can an intelligent person do well in Babylon and not be thrown out, because such is of God, and how will the wise not be persecuted, because Babylon hates them. But the one with understanding has found a soldier in the wilderness and being wise has asked, how have you succeeded in Babylon? Now if the soldier found is not killed is there not cause for suspicion? But let those naive and simple in it be cast off as unknowledgable fools, for they are like children not told of the war, that there may be no great cause for offence if it is simple words not meant for evil. But for those who would be ignorant soldiers in their words, it is as innocence for those of the kingdom to be greatly against them, for the Christ is in Heaven and he will have His enemies as His foot-stool. Now if any is succeeding in Babylon and doing so without becoming it’s servant by compromising morality so much that they trade their inheretence for a meal, than it is as if God has sheltered them and is willing for them to succeed because these are not the former days but the last days in which persecution is in the world in many ways, so that it is better to be blessed in succeeding that if you are finding a king or queen there who will do justly by you than it is a great blessing that it is so, and if you are seeking and gaining just allies than you are gaining a manner of spreading a better kingdom, that the kingdom has not lost the ability to contend and overthrow Babylon, that some might succeed with doing well. Now will you go amongst those who are not just that you might place your tents there and all you goats and sheep, when you are placing your tents where there is not a just king or queen who will do rightly and the people there are all Babylonians and low criminals? But the one who does so is making prudent preperations. Now there is one who is given a throne that they might be devoured that another might take it, and the one who perceives that something is given to you that you might be destroyed is reasoning with good prudence and understanding, but do not some believe, and yet if they believe and there is no danger, are they truly a threat? For Babylon is not often without tactics of this type and they are sometimes being proud of their evil. But if you are making agreements than a person who is prudent is considering evil and if you are to be prudent as serpants and innocent as doves than you are more capable to survive in the kingdom, and yet great persecution can come, that you not judge by Babylon’s belief in Babylon as the just weight and balance, but by truth that is with God, for they even crucified Him who was blameless.

Those who speak without substance of truth in all that is said, speaks wickedness when they exhault themselves in any way if they would speak against another, so that there is a right to offence, because people have right of truth and judgement, for it is not permissible to let one who molests children to speak slander against victims, and the one who has been given all and squandered much is not permitted to speak against those who gave when there was no duty to give to them, and yet where it is not one giving all but claims it, than God has given to both, and justice prevails that it is permitted, but if those who are worthy of death by their own deeds are doing such, than do they not show themselves with wicked and obnoxious foolishness. For there is one who receives patronizing compliments and yet they were too foolish and their pride swelled and their sense of greatness swelled with a low standard of achievement that the one much less has been exceedingly ungrateful and their achievement is like a statue that does not see or hear, and their low standard of achievement has caused them to swell so that they are to show themselves deceived and foolish that they call for their own death and have need of knowing the truth of reality, for they are claiming that which is not in other matters and they are jelous of the sibling who has more from God, that these are losing their inheretence to them and the child should be cast out that the true heir will inherit. For a servant is foolish and is given from Babylon and they have turned in jelousy to mock the heir, and yet they are ignorant of much and they do not suffer because they betray and present no threat as a loyal servant, so that they are to be cast out, and the heir will and the kingdom will offer their kingdom for the two kingdoms are not alike and God’s is far above and so are those of His kingdom. For how can an intelligent person do well in Babylon and not be thrown out, because such is of God, and how will the wise not be persecuted, because Babylon hates them. But the one with understanding has found a soldier in the wilderness and being wise has asked, how have you succeeded in Babylon? Now if the soldier found is not killed is there not cause for suspicion? But let those naive and simple in it be cast off as unknowledgable fools, for they are like children not told of the war, that there may be no great cause for offence if it is simple words not meant for evil. But for those who would be ignorant soldiers in their words, it is as innocence for those of the kingdom to be greatly against them, for the Christ is in Heaven and he will have His enemies as His foot-stool. Now if any is succeeding in Babylon and doing so without becoming it’s servant by compromising morality so much that they trade their inheretence for a meal, than it is as if God has sheltered them and is willing for them to succeed because these are not the former days but the last days in which persecution is in the world in many ways, so that it is better to be blessed in succeeding that if you are finding a king or queen there who will do justly by you than it is a great blessing that it is so, and if you are seeking and gaining just allies than you are gaining a manner of spreading a better kingdom, that the kingdom has not lost the ability to contend and overthrow Babylon, that some might succeed with doing well. Now will you go amongst those who are not just that you might place your tents there and all you goats and sheep, when you are placing your tents where there is not a just king or queen who will do rightly and the people there are all Babylonians and low criminals? But the one who does so is making prudent preperations. Now there is one who is given a throne that they might be devoured that another might take it, and the one who perceives that something is given to you that you might be destroyed is reasoning with good prudence and understanding, but do not some believe, and yet if they believe and there is no danger, are they truly a threat? For Babylon is not often without tactics of this type and they are sometimes being proud of their evil. But if you are making agreements than a person who is prudent is considering evil and if you are to be prudent as serpants and innocent as doves than you are more capable to survive in the kingdom, and yet great persecution can come, that you not judge by Babylon’s belief in Babylon as the just weight and balance, but by truth that is with God, for they even crucified Him who was blameless.

Those who speak without substance of truth in all that is said, speaks wickedness when they exhault themselves in any way if they would speak against another, so that there is a right to offence, because people have right of truth and judgement, for it is not permissible to let one who molests children to speak slander against victims, and the one who has been given all and squandered much is not permitted to speak against those who gave when there was no duty to give to them, and yet where it is not one giving all but claims it, than God has given to both, and justice prevails that it is permitted, but if those who are worthy of death by their own deeds are doing such, than do they not show themselves with wicked and obnoxious foolishness. For there is one who receives patronizing compliments and yet they were too foolish and their pride swelled and their sense of greatness swelled with a low standard of achievement that the one much less has been exceedingly ungrateful and their achievement is like a statue that does not see or hear, and their low standard of achievement has caused them to swell so that they are to show themselves deceived and foolish that they call for their own death and have need of knowing the truth of reality,
 for they are claiming that which is not in other matters and they are jelous of the sibling who has more from God, that these are losing their inheretence to them and the child should be cast out that the true heir will inherit. For a servant is foolish and is given from Babylon and they have turned in jelousy to mock the heir, and yet they are ignorant of much and they do not suffer because they betray and present no threat as a loyal servant, so that they are to be cast out, and the heir will and the kingdom will offer their kingdom for the two kingdoms are not alike and God’s is far above and so are those of His kingdom. For how can an intelligent person do well in Babylon and not be thrown out, because such is of God, and how will the wise not be persecuted, because Babylon hates them. But the one with understanding has found a soldier in the wilderness and being wise has asked, how have you succeeded in Babylon? Now if the soldier found is not killed is there not cause for suspicion? But let those naive and simple in it be cast off as unknowledgable fools, for they are like children not told of the war, that there may be no great cause for offence if it is simple words not meant for evil. But for those who would be ignorant soldiers in their words, it is as innocence for those of the kingdom to be greatly against them, for the Christ is in Heaven and he will have His enemies as His foot-stool. Now if any is succeeding in Babylon and doing so without becoming it’s servant by compromising morality so much that they trade their inheretence for a meal, than it is as if God has sheltered them and is willing for them to succeed because these are not the former days but the last days in which persecution is in the world in many ways, so that it is better to be blessed in succeeding that if you are finding a king or queen there who will do justly by you than it is a great blessing that it is so, and if you are seeking and gaining just allies than you are gaining a manner of spreading a better kingdom, that the kingdom has not lost the ability to contend and overthrow Babylon, that some might succeed with doing well. Now will you go amongst those who are not just that you might place your tents there and all you goats and sheep, when you are placing your tents where there is not a just king or queen who will do rightly and the people there are all Babylonians and low criminals? But the one who does so is making prudent preperations. Now there is one who is given a throne that they might be devoured that another might take it, and the one who perceives that something is given to you that you might be destroyed is reasoning with good prudence and understanding, but do not some believe, and yet if they believe and there is no danger, are they truly a threat? For Babylon is not often without tactics of this type and they are sometimes being proud of their evil. But if you are making agreements than a person who is prudent is considering evil and if you are to be prudent as serpants and innocent as doves than you are more capable to survive in the kingdom, and yet great persecution can come, that you not judge by Babylon’s belief in Babylon as the just weight and balance, but by truth that is with God, for they even crucified Him who was blameless.

Those with less have send out a bickering tongue with envy, but a kind answer shows forth greatness that jewals and gold drop from the king of great wealth.

Those with nothing rage greatly by measure of their lacking, but a wealthy king has indulged many complaints.
Though they should insist there are no ugly people, be understanding that ugly people are there that they not deceive you.

To be against hatred of women is a common thing, to be for a type of gentleman that is not with hatred of women is wanted by many, so that in my time they use wrong names for things as if close together but they are far apart, that those bitter and hating all have retaliated against every person.

To believe there is a war is to be a fool, and even more so if the matter is against one who is prettier when there is no war, not being a thing between a woman and a woman. Now a woman is capable of saving themselves from foolish women who are chaotic in jelousy and what are deceits for them that they have that would bring about chaos because of other things in them that are not good, that these things are made an open calamity for them before others. So wisdom saves a woman, and a woman strong in wisdom cannot be denied in truth that she should be with the one she chooses because she is faithful, and so she should be with the one she wants. Now a man who complains as if there was war is him who complains when he does not believe it, for in truth only small children are indulging it, and not much, when they are male. Now a woman who is degrading men is filled with hate and jelousy and if she degrades a man who is pretty she also is degrading herself. But if any man should speak so violently it is because of anger and violence in them, that the hand trembles to injure and kill and the minds of them are for blood-shed and the killing of citizens in war and soldiers in battle that these are not worthy of society and cannot remain in it in truth, and likewise for the woman who does it.

To cease from evil only because of defeat or trouble is a person who is untrustworthy. They rise up to be disrespectful and make themselves low when no person is forceful with them, asking in their heart to be put in another place, being a mouldable person with no integrity but dependant on another. This is not a wise woman or a well man, but that which is found on Earth, different from what most are, and many other things have been found on Earth.

To regard right and wrong is a God of some people, but the bias accuser has believed there are no limits to a person.
To remove any layer of context is an attack carried by insanity, but integrity is in the way of reason.


To the devil’s it was only discord sowing and you were the only person who wanted to murder people. Now when the discord ceases there is peace and good, that God’s will can happen better, for only Babylon is the enemy that will not be at peace, for it is the devil’s hand, and discord increases its power and size.
To the devil’s it was only discord sowing and you were the only person who wanted to murder people. Now when the discord ceases there is peace and good, that God’s will can happen better, for only Babylon is the enemy that will not be at peace, for it is the devil’s hand, and discord increases its power and size.
To the eldest daughter the one edged sword is given, and keys, to the younger daughters the bracelets. If there is another, than the symbol may be worn if it pleases any, being the symbol of the diary that is for the Elsnon.

To the eldest daughter the one edged sword is given, and keys, to the younger daughters the bracelets. If there is another, than the symbol may be worn if it pleases any, being the symbol of the diary that is for the Elsnon.

To the nation that would exhault itself and claim God, you cannot kill the heir that you might inherit. To the wicked man clothed in false righteousness, you cannot kill the heir that you might inherit. To the soldiers of cities and the soldiers of nations that go to war and claim righteousness and God, you cannot kill the heir that you might inherit. Those who would slay with guile using the might of false righteousness are the devil’s and they are known when they are against God, being against his people. Now what is him whose body falls after something moving faster that light slayed him, for his strength failed him and if he was not with God when the time came because he was opposed to God’s people, then a lack of prudence caused it, for honesty was attacked by him consistently and truth was attacked by him consistently that it was not a slight mistake or a moment of bad judgement.
To the third son of Orgoth: pride that devours and its children: devouring the poor, devouring the humble, devouring the compassionate, devouring mercy, devouring love, devouring kindness.

Too much bread can be unexplainable, only God knows what is right for a person, that the one who would make and shape will destroy in the long run what they repeat. Now who is honest and prior was less so, let him be, and give him peace for some are meant for the city and some for the cave, that strong men might gain riches on Earth, but the sacred prophet is dwelling with what is sufficient, so that you not think to be able to learn wisdom and not be relied upon to take less when it is fitting for you. But there is one who takes all, and in his many abilities he is not comparible in history, and yet how will you attain more if you are not from less? Or do you think that God gives most from the father or that the daughter does not have her journey? But the one with gold and bread and understanding is then claiming he lacks? For a man knows what is right for him whether it be less or more, or a great difference, that you not be foolish in any desecration.

Too much bread can be unexplainable, only God knows what is right for a person, that the one who would make and shape will destroy in the long run what they repeat. Now who is honest and prior was less so, let him be, and give him peace for some are meant for the city and some for the cave, that strong men might gain riches on Earth, but the sacred prophet is dwelling with what is sufficient, so that you not think to be able to learn wisdom and not be relied upon to take less when it is fitting for you. But there is one who takes all, and in his many abilities he is not comparible in history, and yet how will you attain more if you are not from less? Or do you think that God gives most from the father or that the daughter does not have her journey? But the one with gold and bread and understanding is then claiming he lacks? For a man knows what is right for him whether it be less or more, or a great difference, that you not be foolish in any desecration.

There is the translation that occurs because of abject factor often leads to a less desirable state. When the abject factor is remedied the state might become something more desirable.

Translation-convert processes. What can be converted to what. Jealousy to: envy by offensive action. Lesser to more through offence conversion or translation. An offender acts outwardly against and the new state is more outwardly against, which is required for translation.

Two people groups exist in two different worlds, the criminals and the righteous of a kind, that the wicked is climbing much in the area to become brave when others do what is natural to their own affairs, that by segregations of groups of Mala none is attacked with guile and none is slayn, but if any climbs others when they fall, is it not foolishness? Now the one condemning with unrighteous words and judgements is in promotion of their cult that is one of the devil’s, that they are a soldier, those of another religion, that they attempt to force ignorance with rage upon those of truth. 

Two people groups exist in two different worlds, the criminals and the righteous of a kind, that the wicked is climbing much in the area to become brave when others do what is natural to their own affairs, that by segregations of groups of Mala none is attacked with guile and none is slayn, but if any climbs others when they fall, is it not foolishness? Now the one condemning with unrighteous words and judgements is in promotion of their cult that is one of the devil’s, that they are a soldier, those of another religion, that they attempt to force ignorance with rage upon those of truth. 
Two people groups exist in two different worlds, the criminals and the righteous of a kind, that the wicked it climbing much in the area to become brave when others do what is natural to their own affairs, that by segregations of groups of Mala none is attacked with guile and none is slayn, but if any climbs others when they fall, is it not foolishness? Now the one condemning with unrighteous words and judgements is in promotion of their cult that is one of the devil’s, that they are a soldier, those of another religion, that they attempt to force ignorance with rage upon those of truth. 
Two people groups exist in two different worlds, the criminals and the righteous of a kind, that the wicked it climbing much in the area to become brave when others do what is natural to their own affairs, that by segregations of groups of Mala none is attacked with guile and none is slayn, but if any climbs others when they fall, is it not foolishness? Now the one condemning with unrighteous words and judgements is in promotion of their cult that is one of the devil’s, that they are a soldier, those of another religion, that they attempt to force ignorance with rage upon those of truth. 
Type of sensitivity that requires a person to go so far as attacking a person in some way, usually by words and some non-violent and offensive deed before their guilt will disappear becomes a routine of some who are not well, although they are capable of performing every task they must, and such are not well and require much if it is consistent and happens due to small wrongs, that such as they must retaliate even when it is unknown to the other where offence has come from. 


Under the two sons of Orgoth: Orgoth has a servant: what is below: jelousy, wrath, envy, hate, wickedness, anger without reason. —Now when these things are found below the surface of reason than such are Orgoth’s servant. Now the surface of reason is the floor of the Ocean.

Under the two sons of Orgoth: Orgoth has a servant: what is below: jelousy, wrath, envy, hate, wickedness, anger without reason. —Now when these things are found below the surface of reason than such are Orgoth’s servant. Now the surface of reason is the floor of the Ocean.

Under the two sons of Orgoth: Orgoth has a servant: what is below: jelousy, wrath, envy, hate, wickedness, self-attack-self-abuse-rebellion against self —Now when these things are found below the surface of reason than such are Orgoth’s servant. Now the surface of reason is the floor of the Ocean.
 
 

We are living in the consequences of even 1500 or even 10 c.e. and of course 1920 so that they are living in an England that is not, a Europe that is no more, an America not much altered in thinking, so that the arragance of the golden age of science is replaced by a Benjamin that is seeking after something different, cared for and yet not knowing their wars. Will this end or continue? But the evil from God might correct a person who would judge in a way that is not just. The evil spirit from God has visited the one who He might correct. Honour then your father and mother and honour God with judging in a just fashion, that you not swallow the afflicted that have been done injustice.

We must kill all the ugly people even if they’re very pretty, or no person will live, and there is no group for them, for they are with any group, and they are not part of anything other than what they are. I do not speak of any group or any religion, because of the interpretation that is low. But those who are ugly are known, and they are not preserved in Heaven, because they are for hell and their place is hell that they would bring it to Earth. 
We must kill all the ugly people even if they’re very pretty, or no person will live, and there is no group for them, for they are with any group, and they are not part of anything other than what they are. I do not speak of any group or any religion, because of the interpretation that is low. But those who are ugly are known, and they are not preserved in Heaven, because they are for hell and their place is hell that they would bring it to Earth. 
We must kill all the ugly people even if they’re very pretty, or no person will live, and there is no group for them, for they are with any group, and they are not part of anything other than what they are. I do not speak of any group or any religion, because of the interpretation that is low. But those who are ugly are known, and they are not preserved in Heaven, because they are for hell and their place is hell that they would bring it to Earth. 
We must kill all the ugly people even if they’re very pretty, or no person will live, and there is no group for them, for they are with any group, and they are not part of anything other than what they are. I do not speak of any group or any religion, because of the interpretation that is low. But those who are ugly are known, and they are not preserved in Heaven, because they are for hell and their place is hell that they would bring it to Earth. 
We must kill all the ugly people even if they’re very pretty, or no person will live, and there is no group for them, for they are with any group, and they are not part of anything other than what they are. I do not speak of any group or any religion, because of the interpretation that is low. But those who are ugly are known, and they are not preserved in Heaven, because they are for hell and their place is hell that they would bring it to Earth. 
What am I to say of them? If the women was done right to in what the wise of them have desired, than there would be a lessening of the sin and foolishness of many of the men who are brutal fools towards men and women. So I wondered about a test between them but such was foolishness. So the wise daughters are good and have made their plea that the generation that fought their war now fights to defile them with a perverse harassment, saying we fought for you and you will not do what we say to be servants to us. But the sibling was not made by God to be a servant but is belonging to God, and also His child.
What am I to say of them? If the women what done right to in what the wise of them have desired, than there would be a lessening of the sin and foolishness of many of the men who are brutal fools towards men and women. So I wondered about a test between them but such was foolishness. So the wise daughters are good and have made their plea that the generation that fought their war now fights to defile them with a perverse harassment, saying we fought for you and you will not do what we say to be servants to us. But the sibling was not made by God to be a servant but is belonging to God, and also His child.
What am I to say of them? If the women what done right to in what the wise of them have desired, than there would be a lessening of the sin and foolishness of many of the men who are brutal fools towards men and women. So I wondered about a test between them but such was foolishness. So the wise daughters are good and have made their plea that the generation that fought their war now fights to defile them with a perverse harassment, saying we fought for you and you will not do what we say to be servants to us. But the sibling was not made by God to be a servant but is belonging to God, and also His child.

What causes a person to abandon basic comprehension when they are at least of the standard? But if one has abandoned another first abandoned saying that which was spoken before respectful explaination. Now if a person skips respectful explanations when they speak that must come first than it is deemed that they are being incoherent and even insolent. Now I have called this speech failure and it is used by some intentionally because of their anger, that if the anger is harboured and they have no right to be angry and they are speaking with speech failure than they are made guilty and wrong, because they conceal what has made them angry, and with the three wrongs they are wrong by truth, because they have attempted deceit three times towards one who is in truth. Now speech that is in truth will come to agreance with emotional matters but if one tricks with speech when the speak that the other cannot answer without agreeing to deceit than the one who does so is using deceit. Now let not deceit think itself greater than truth, but if one speaks with tricks of deceit than they are wrong because they are what they do and their words give no knowledge that revealed that they might be right. For if their motive is concealed than the truth of their motive is not done, and they are only what they do, forgetting that the other cannot know the thing that is true that they conceal so that it is not and nothing. For those speaking deceit are wrong. Now if any is using speech failures often than why do they build up strength of deceit and iniquity to hurl at another as incoherent madness? But this is like one who pushes in the chest that the person falls and is not at peace with what is done. But you being tolerant of each other know the difference. Now the one building up weapons of deceit is using that which is not clean and if they are in a land of such things than they know it is not a place that is good in terms of speech.

What is in the lake of fire may be dealt with by Orgoth’s servant, but Orgoth’s servant is the lowest thing for men on land.
What is in the lake of fire may be dealt with by Orgoth’s servant, but Orgoth’s servant is the lowest thing for men on land.

What is not beneath the person is where they are, and where they do not sin, where their conscience is clear, for their is no sin for the very low servant to do what is an unimaginable abomination to men. Now if any has honest work that is beneath them then they can at least be grateful that it is honest, for such is a blessing. Now those who excel at small things and obtain to great are being separate from their brothers.

What is not beneath the person is where they are, and where they do not sin, where their conscience is clear, for their is no sin for the very low servant to do what is an unimaginable abomination to men. Now if any has honest work that is beneath them then they can at least be grateful that it is honest, for such is a blessing. Now those who excel at small things and obtain to great are being separate from their brothers.

What is watered is maintained, and many rewards are with God.
What is watered is maintained, and many rewards are with God.
What it must be told is that which is a given for humans to understand that all those things are concealed for them that they do not even know shame for they do not perceive their nakedness. For with yet others they are righteous by a false righteousness of the devil and those strong in it have been purified of the truth which would cause them to stray, for they are strong in its completion. For yet others they say, I perceive Mala and care for it and so I would meddle that God does not know about me and what I do, even in the presence of God. For not even the wise of the humanist cult that has offered people lack of wisdom if it will benifit while pursuing wisdom themselves, will not see this as outrageously pointless and foolish, how they set out on pointless wars that only harass and annoy and do not deceive God, for to be so pointless is insanity even amongst Babylonians.
What they understood and knew by nature was all of what the others learned and there was much more by nature so that they are like the one who follows men around, and women, and it is so, that a lesser one is these who does not know, and must receive by other means, that their will not be received most, ever. Now what cannot be changed is so by God, and those who fight against him are set on fire, are covered in blood, for the pure are in the kingdom of Heaven and the one’s who please God are not giving much offence, but those who rage against God in their heart, who say I have come to the planned time that I might launch my war, to kill the innocent, to afflict and cause suffering, because I was before afraid of them, that my war would be haunted too early, but they are bound by their honour, that in their righteousness, I have what I may exploit, that I will partner with the anti-Christ to slay Abel, to wage war on God, that my heart was treacherous towards because I did not do well willingly, but I was afraid, that I was not for doing well, but did well until the time of my war could come.
What they understood and knew by nature was all of what the others learned and there was much more by nature so that they are like the one who follows men around, and women, and it is so, that a lesser one is these who does not know, and must receive by other means, that their will not be received most, ever. Now what cannot be changed is so by God, and those who fight against him are set on fire, are covered in blood, for the pure are in the kingdom of Heaven and the one’s who please God are not giving much offence, but those who rage against God in their heart, who say I have come to the planned time that I might launch my war, to kill the innocent, to afflict and cause suffering, because I was before afraid of them, that my war would be haulted too early, but they are bound by their honour, that in their righteousness, I have what I may exploit, that I will partner with the anti-Christ to slay Abel, to wage war on God, that my heart was treacherous towards because I did not do well willingly, but I was afraid, that I was not for doing well, but did well until the time of my war could come.
When a person has abandoned morality by their own confession to themselves and even to others, not regarding it by choice, they confess that they have abandoned reason and wisdom by choice, and so why is their opinion to matter? But a person can not have it both ways. Now sentience cannot be abandoned so if they have given up and abandoned they cannot abandon sentience that if they would attempt to judge with an unjust balance, than exceedingly great is the fault in them that the balance is so greatly weighted to one side, being a balance that is not to be weighted at all before a thing is placed upon it.
When a person has abandoned morality by their own confession to themselves and even to others, not regarding it by choice, they confess that they have abandoned reason and wisdom by choice, and so why is their opinion to matter? But a person can not have it both ways. Now sentience cannot be abandoned so if they have given up and abandoned they cannot abandon sentience that if they would attempt to judge with an unjust balance, than exceedingly great is the fault in them that the balance is so greatly weighted to one side, being a balance that is not to be weighted at all before a thing is placed upon it.
When an ugly person would defend the ugly they are together, when ugly person would judge they are together with the ugly and both are jelous.
When the wicked sport is how far can evil be taken before the righteous do violence and judgement, that the soldiers of cities might attack the righteous who have done what is acceptable to God and righteous that the land might be clean, so that the soldiers of towns and cities might lay their hands upon the righteous to be slandering them as criminals, than the nation is failed, it is complete, that the water has been poisoned and must be thrown out, for let the blood of innocent people be on the heads of the soldiers who said, we will not defend the righteous but will defend the devil’s people against God’s house, that they join the devil’s camp as soldiers of hell, and the nation is lost, for there is most power in the firm control of the devil, that many are become his servants.
When they are advancing and not using reason, I will not publish it, but it will be for others, or even none, that when I am gone someone will know, because the one who can perform is of the ability to know. Yet I have not sworn, that any might demand it if me, but do so by choice, because I have perceived.
When they did not have remorse their paths became strange that they might seek to do that which is not of people, but a man of guilt is better than the evil.
When they did not have remorse their paths became strange that they might want to do that which is not of people, but a man of guilt is better than the evil.
When they did not have remorse their paths became strange that they might want to do that which is not of people, but a man of guilt is better than the evil.
When they did not have remorse their paths became strange that they might want to do that which is not of people, but a man of guilt is better than the evil.
When they did not have remorse their paths became strange that they might want to do that which is not of people,
 but a man of guilt is better than the evil.
When they have no reason, being nothing by wisdom, they proceed into insanity that they might be insane and unreasonable.
When they swell with a greater sense of their own importance they become fools, to dwell with foolishness, but let true substance of a person be judged by God according to what they do.
When words reach the level of combat soldier it is violence towards another, for it is physical, all, that a person being violent is in the place of combat.
When you are residing in a country in which men are not with righteousness, but if they are departing from their righteousness because of jelousy, than those reside their are not safe in the land and must be among those of the kingdom because the land has no faithful righteousness and thd righteousness is an allusion. Now if there is even another thing and that is the worst offendors are at war with the righteous to attack their finances and being angry as one who has wrath at rebuke and would kill those who rebuke them in that moment and they are clinging to their wrath when they are rebuked, to carry out vengence because they believe another should die and they are greatly with wrath because the insecurity of their guilt has made their wrath great, than they are attacking with corruption and those corrupt people in government jobs that they know and others know, so that the land is like a land that is in a state of civil war, and how will any say that they are safe.
When you let an animal sit at the table even the calamity of animals will rebuke you and their mouths will rebuke you, and there is little peace, but with people it is not so.
When you let an animal sit at the table even the calamity of animals will rebuke you and their mouths will rebuke you, and there is little peace, but with people it is not so.
When you separate the sheep from the goats, or rather, the good from the evil, not in terms of religion, you will find there are more good people. Let no ideology or belief turn the good against the good.
When you separate the sheep from the goats, or rather, the good from the evil, not in terms of religion, you will find there are more good people. Let no ideology or belief turn the good against the good.
When you separate the sheep from the goats, or rather, the good from the evil, not in terms of religion, you will find there are more good people. Let no ideology or believe turn the good against the good.
Where they separate Jews from Greeks there is that which would be against the Jews. Do you not know that Beelzebub knows this and if men know it than the work of Beelzebub has been with the devices that do not benifit us, being traitors to us and yet claiming to defend when they have not known what is good. Now if a person becomes a Jew they are then an evil fool to boast against those they become citizens with like one who hates a nation and has journeyed to become a citizen for its benefits. Does not every person understand that this would be foolish? But what is said is little and a small grievance, that one who would join a nation would not hate those they join. There is one who has abused themselves and yet the Lord is able to restore them. If you would be good than you would know what is good if you are giving much consideration to desires. Let me not be called to be in disagreance only one who explains so it might be understood. Now Romans were leaving their people to be with the Jews and some of them, allegedly, were behaving in a dishonourable fashion. If the Jews were scattered to give way for Christianity than by this way the nations would gain. Now will the son of God be turned against the Father. But a soft word breaks the bone and a scalpel does better work than a mallet. By what means do you judge the angel? But the Christ is the son of the Lord who is in Heaven who created the Universe.

Where they separate Jews from Greeks there is that which would be against the Jews. Do you not know that Beelzebub knows this and if men know it than the work of Beelzebub has been with the devices that do not benifit us, being traitors to us and yet claiming to defend when they have not known what is good. Now if a person becomes a Jew they are then an evil fool to boast against those they become citizens with like one who hates a nation and has journeyed to become a citizen for its benefits. Does not every person understand that this would be foolish? But what is said is little and a small grievance, that one who would join a nation would not hate those they join. There is one who has abused themselves and yet the Lord is able to restore them. If you would be good than you would know what is good if you are giving much consideration to desires. Let me not be called to be in disagreance only one who explains so it might be understood. Now Romans were leaving their people to be with the Jews and some of them, allegedly, were behaving in a dishonourable fashion. If the Jews were scattered to give way for Christianity than by this way the nations would gain or if the Jews have lost their religion to make way for Christianity than by this way the nations would gain. Now will the son of God be turned against the Father? But a soft word breaks the bone and a scalpel does better work than a mallet. By what means do you judge the angel? But the Christ is the son of the Lord who is in Heaven who created the Universe. One wise thing is said and to this is added a great abundance before another wise thing will be said. Give the gift to the intelligent, to the one who understands. Or will you prefer the masses die? Now by what sin are you to be attacked by God when He desires to restore you? But if this world was not causing the innocent to sin than I believe you would seek the Christ.

Where they separate Jews from Greeks there is that which would be against the Jews. Do you not know that Beelzebub knows this and if men know it than the work of Beelzebub has been with the devices that do not benifit us, being traitors to us and yet claiming to defend when they have not known what is good. Now if a person becomes a Jew they are then an evil fool to boast against those they become citizens with like one who hates a nation and has journeyed to become a citizen for its benefits. Does not every person understand that this would be foolish? But what is said is little and a small grievance, that one who would join a nation would not hate those they join. There is one who has abused themselves and yet the Lord is able to restore them. If you would be good than you would know what is good if you are giving much consideration to desires. Let me not be called to be in disagreance only one who explains so it might be understood. Now Romans were leaving their people to be with the Jews and some of them, allegedly, were behaving in a dishonourable fashion. If the Jews were scattered to give way for Christianity than by this way the nations would gain or if the Jews have lost their religion to make way for Christianity than by this way the nations would gain. Now will the son of God be turned against the Father? But a soft word breaks the bone and a scalpel does better work than a mallet. By what means do you judge the angel? But the Christ is the son of the Lord who is in Heaven who created the Universe. One wise thing is said and to this is added a great abundance before another wise thing will be said. Give the gift to the intelligent, to the one who understands. Or will you prefer the masses die? Now by what sin are you to be attacked by God when He desires to restore you? But if this world was not causing the innocent to sin than I believe you would seek the Christ.

Where they separate Jews from Greeks there is that which would be against the Jews. Do you not know that Beelzebub knows this and if men know it than the work of Beelzebub has been with the devices that do not benifit us, being traitors to us and yet claiming to defend when they have not known what is good. Now if a person becomes a Jew they are then an evil fool to boast against those they become citizens with like one who hates a nation and has journeyed to become a citizen for its benefits. Does not every person understand that this would be foolish? But what is said is little and a small grievance, that one who would join a nation would not hate those they join. There is one who has abused themselves and yet the Lord is able to restore them. If you would be good than you would know what is good if you are giving much consideration to desires. Let me not be called to be in disagreance only one who explains so it might be understood.

Where they separate Jews from Greeks there is that which would be against the Jews. Do you not know that Beelzebub knows this and if men know it than the work of Beelzebub has been with the devices that do not benifit us, being traitors to us and yet claiming to defend when they have not known what is good. Now if a person becomes a Jew they are then an evil fool to boast against those they become citizens with like one who hates a nation and has journeyed to become a citizen for its benefits. Does not every person understand that this would be foolish? But what is said is little and a small grievance, that one who would join a nation would not hate those they join. There is one who has abused themselves and yet the Lord is able to restore them. If you would be good than you would know what is good if you are giving much consideration to desires. Let me not be called to be in disagreeable only one who explains so it might be understood.

Which configuration of society is sustainable and how much violence is required by vigilantism to make up for failures predicted by probability mathematics? Can a large risk assessment find the viable and sustainable configurations?

Why are you telling me something? Now what more is needed? But are is better and how and if that many things are for them with a sharp sword.

Why do the wicked join in to stone the one God favours more? But the wrath of God is with greater things than the wicked, to do revenge against them who would do such evil.

Why do the wicked join in to stone the one God favours more? But the wrath of God is with greater things than them.

Why does Jude not keep to his own domain and write of angels not keeping to their own domain? But if you aid any while harbouring a grudge I cannot perceive it, only unruly men have indeed broken in, and yet they have given aid but there is no cause for lack of peace when people are all on the same side in something. Now where is there any error from you, but the ungodly are for the lake of fire. For you do no wrong in what is to be praised. But the angels, did they not rebel against God? But ungodly men have indeed broken in if I cannot perceive what you speak of, and have they not broken in, and they attack both of us, for their deeds have almost caused me to grow angry with you on reading what you have written. Now they are as animals who do not understand and do not know anything and are attacking at every chance when they can also exhault themselves. But are your words not the words of the Christ?
 
Why does one swell with wrath and it is if they are sad but they are in injustice? But a strange wickedness is found in them and their actions are not in keeping with the truth, that is God. But wrath is weighty and if strange wickedness is found than why do they cause themselves to swell? But wisdom is beneficial and truth is good for strategy so that the one who would bring a person away from wisdom is not speaking in their best interest.

Why does the foolish animal rage when it would not matter if they are right about something? But a man keeping with fairness and truth is with the grace of life.

Why regard the rebuke of the animal and why fret if they are proud in their lowness, because they are insolent? But a human does not interact with animals that they might have any real grievance with them. As for the anti-atheist, there is no time to be troubled by them.

Why regard the rebuke of the animal and why fret if they are proud in their lowness, because they are insolent? But a human does not interact with animals that they might have any real grievance with them. Therefore as for the anti-atheist, there is no time to be troubled by them.

Why regard the rebuke of the animal and why fret if they are proud in their lowness, because they are insolent? But a human does not interact with animals that they might have any real grievance with them. As for the anti-atheist, there is no time to be troubled by them.

Why will you not benifit yourself because I have known the Christ’s great rewards and I have said in my heart it is not right to speak of all of them, although I cannot give any command in this matter, and none of my words are to be added to the word for commands, that you have enough wisdom, I think, to bear me, to decern my use and what is fitting and good, that you even cast away when you know what is not right of me, by your wisdom, and yet I do not claim to make any error, and yet you know that an angel is a servant of God, and fault is found with them, but your heart is for decerning and judging my words, according to what I am, and I regard you who is with the judgement of God. Now what will I say to you, that I cannot come between you and Him who died for you, who did this greatness for you, that I have my encouragement, and I should wish you to have more, being the children of God, who are wise enough to deal with me, who know how to benifit from me if you will benifit.

Wisdom is found on the lips of the righteous that understanding is great, that the hidden is with the righteous.

Wrath without judgement is from the wicked that there can be no end to the punishments that cannot satisfy it, but a righteous man departs in mercy, even when he would kill the wicked.

You cannot kill the heir that you might inherit.


You leave when you are done or stay forever. Valaish. You have reason yet or small nothing. Fiener. Too extreme and only theory. Rel. The bad seed among you wants it. Resh.
 
You leave when you are done or stay forever. Valaish. You have reason yet or small nothing. Fiener. Too extreme and only theory. Rel. The bad seed among you wants it. Resh. The discord that is the part of the war that is discord from what is not the true seed. Werrious. Those with other motives for war. Bad seed. Digressions from simple truth and idle speech which has digressed from simple truth. Rellerim. Lack of conversation due to apex of knowledge and understanding. Fonlorin. Inability to occupy time in working towards things in a positive direction because of fonlorin. Reelif.

You leave when you are done or stay forever. Valaish. You have reason yet or small nothing. Fiener. Too extreme and only theory. Rel. The bad seed among you wants it. Resh. The discord that is the part of the war that is discord from what is not the true seed. Werrious. Those with other motives for war. Bad seed. Digressions from simple truth and idle speech which has digressed from simple truth. Rellerim. Lack of conversation due to apex of knowledge and understanding. Fonlorin. Inability to occupy time in working towards things in a positive direction because of fonlorin. Reelif.

perverted morality is with the strange people beneath the Ocean, for their honesty is perverse and without truth and they do not know what is acceptable.

perverted morality is with the strange people beneath the Ocean, for their honesty is perverse and without truth and they do not know what is acceptable. For they speak of things as if honest but without truth and perverse that these are like those who send forth disgust and unease and the pervisity smothers the air in an unseemly scent, for they mutter obscene things as if honest and want what is wanted by some strange animal, for they do not perceive that their words are heard even in their wrath, and they leave confessions of guilt around them, for they are partially deaf to themselves and partially blind to themselves that when they believe they have deceived it is with confidence. Now if they do not believe they deceive they believe they are with those who agree.

Now if a person exaults themselves greatly and dismisses most because of one victory, is it not a small thing of no offence? Now who makes it into something more? 

/////

I have imagined an alternative society that exists within a society and is peaceful, for it is a society that desires to do the right thing and does not scatter where one is at need and none help them which is a way in which Babylon scatters Christians and conquers. Of course many bad causes attack in layers, exploiting the jelousy or hatred towards something before moving to the next thing that is unwanted by the overwhelming attack. If a person is to consider the possibilities of capitalism to be tailored against some groups or the hi-jacking of mid-level government during a crises, than it becomes even more apparent why having an alternative society that desires to do what is right provides stability for any nation that has such a society that is in symbosis with the greater society and yet contained in such a way as to support others who might be dealing with financial problems or some other problems, possibly persecution. Not respecting proper boundaries is a sign that some do not desire for an alliance and co-operation to work, and one can imagine that forcing conflicts in the way they are forced to bring about contention within is one manner in which such a society would be scattered, and another would be the use of capitalism to break up such a society when those part of the society do not support each other.
///////























 
























	




	







































